
 
 
 
 Produced by Curtis Weyant, Louise Pryor and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
 file was produced from images generously made available
 by Case Western Reserve University Preservation Department
 Digital Library)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 {Transcriber's notes:
     ~Bold~ text is surrounded by tildes ~, _italic_ text by underscores _.
     +Greek+ text is transliterated and surrounded by plus signs +.
     oe ligatures have been unpacked.
     Letters with overscores are represented as {=a}, {=e}, {=o}.
     The use of  e and e to indicate stresses is inconsistent, as is
     the use of ae ligatures. No changes have been made to the original.
 }
 
 
 
   MILTON'S COMUS
 
   WITH
   INTRODUCTION AND NOTES
 
   BY
   WILLIAM BELL, M.A.
   PROFESSOR OF PHILOSOPHY AND LOGIC, GOVERNMENT COLLEGE, LAHORE
 
 
 
 
   London
   MACMILLAN AND CO
   AND NEW YORK
   1891
 
   [_All rights reserved_]
 
 
 
 
   First Edition, 1890.
   Reprinted, 1891.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS.
 
                                              PAGE
   INTRODUCTION,                               vii
   COMUS,                                        7
   NOTES,                                       38
   INDEX TO THE NOTES,                         113
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 Few poems have been more variously designated than _Comus_. Milton
 himself describes it simply as "A Mask"; by others it has been
 criticised and estimated as a lyrical drama, a drama in the epic style,
 a lyric poem in the _form_ of a play, a phantasy, an allegory, a
 philosophical poem, a suite of speeches or majestic soliloquies, and
 even a didactic poem. Such variety in the description of the poem is
 explained partly by its complex charm and many-sided interest, and
 partly by the desire to describe it from that point of view which should
 best reconcile its literary form with what we know of the genius and
 powers of its author. Those who, like Dr. Johnson, have blamed it as a
 drama, have admired it "as a series of lines," or as a lyric; one
 writer, who has found that its characters are nothing, its sentiments
 tedious, its story uninteresting, has nevertheless "doubted whether
 there will ever be any similar poem which gives so true a conception of
 the capacity and the dignity of the mind by which it was produced"
 (Bagehot's _Literary Studies_). Some who have praised it as an allegory
 see in it a satire on the evils both of the Church and of the State,
 while others regard it as alluding to the vices of the Court alone. Some
 have found its lyrical parts the best, while others, charmed with its
 "divine philosophy," have commended those deep conceits which place it
 alongside of the _Faerie Queen_, as shadowing forth an episode in the
 education of a noble soul and as a poet's lesson against intemperance
 and impurity. But no one can refuse to admit that, more than any other
 of Milton's shorter poems, it gives us an insight into the peculiar
 genius and character of its author: it was, in the opinion of Hallam,
 "sufficient to convince any one of taste and feeling that a great poet
 had arisen in England, and one partly formed in a different school from
 his contemporaries." It is true that in the early poems we do not find
 the whole of Milton, for he had yet to pass through many years of
 trouble and controversy; but _Comus_, in a special degree, reveals or
 foreshadows much of the Milton of _Paradise Lost_. Whether we regard its
 place in Milton's life, in the series of his works, or in English
 literature as a whole, the poem is full of significance: it is worth
 while, therefore, to consider how its form was determined by the
 external circumstances and previous training of the poet; by his
 favourite studies in poetry, philosophy, history, and music; and by his
 noble theory of life in general, and of a poet's life in particular.
 
 The mask was represented at Ludlow Castle on September 29th, 1634; it
 was probably composed early in that year. It belongs, therefore, to that
 group of poems (_L'Allegro_, _Il Penseroso_, _Arcades_, _Comus_, and
 _Lycidas_) written by Milton while living in his father's house at
 Horton, near Windsor, after having left the University of Cambridge in
 July, 1632. As he was born in 1608, he would be twenty-five years of age
 when this poem was composed. During his stay at Horton (1632-39), which
 was broken only by a journey to Italy in 1638-9, he was chiefly occupied
 with the study of the Greek, Roman, Italian, and English literatures,
 each of which has left its impress on _Comus_. He read widely and
 carefully, and it has been said that his great and original imagination
 was almost entirely nourished, or at least stimulated, by books: his
 residence at Horton was, accordingly, pre-eminently what he intended it
 to be, and what his father wisely and gladly permitted it to be--a time
 of preparation and ripening for the work to which he had dedicated
 himself. We are reminded of his own words in _Comus_:
 
                     And Wisdom's self
     Oft seeks to sweet retired solitude,
     Where, with her best nurse, Contemplation,
     She plumes her feathers, and lets grow her wings,
     That, in the various bustle of resort,
     Were all to-ruffled, and sometimes impaired.
 
 We find in _Comus_ abundant reminiscences of Milton's study of the
 literature of antiquity. "It would not be too much to say that the
 literature of antiquity was to Milton's genius what soil and light are
 to a plant. It nourished, it coloured, it developed it. It determined
 not merely his character as an artist, but it exercised an influence on
 his intellect and temper scarcely less powerful than hereditary
 instincts and contemporary history. It at once animated and chastened
 his imagination; it modified his fancy; it furnished him with his
 models. On it his taste was formed; on it his style was moulded. From it
 his diction and his method derived their peculiarities. It transformed
 what would in all probability have been the mere counterpart of
 Caedmon's Paraphrase or Langland's Vision into Paradise Lost; and what
 would have been the mere counterpart of Corydon's Doleful Knell and the
 satire of the Three Estates, into Lycidas and Comus." (_Quarterly
 Review_, No. 326.)
 
 But Milton has also told us that Spenser was his master, and the full
 charm of _Comus_ cannot be realised without reference to the artistic
 and philosophical spirit of the author of the _Faerie Queene_. Both
 poems deal with the war between the body and the soul--between the lower
 and the higher nature. In an essay on 'Spenser as a philosophic poet,'
 De Vere says: "The perils and degradations of an animalised life are
 shown under the allegory of Sir Guyon's sea voyage with its successive
 storms and whirlpools, its 'rock of Reproach' strewn with wrecks and
 dead men's bones, its 'wandering islands,' its 'quicksands of
 Unthriftihead,' its 'whirlepoole of Decay,' its 'sea-monsters,' and
 lastly, its 'bower of Bliss,' and the doom which overtakes it, together
 with the deliverance of Acrasia's victims, transformed by that witch's
 spells into beasts. Still more powerful is the allegory of worldly
 ambition, illustrated under the name of 'the cave of Mammon.' The Legend
 of Holiness delineates with not less insight those enemies which wage
 war upon the spiritual life." All this Milton had studied in the _Faerie
 Queene_, and had understood it; and, like Sir Guyon, he felt himself to
 be a knight enrolled under the banner of Parity and Self-Control. So
 that, in _Comus_, we find the sovereign value of Temperance or
 Self-Regulation--what the Greeks called +sophrosyne+--set forth
 no less clearly than in Spenser's poem: in Milton's mask it becomes
 almost identical with Virtue itself. The enchantments of Acrasia in her
 Bower of Bliss become the spells of Comus; the armour of Belphoebe
 becomes the "complete steel" of Chastity; while the supremacy of
 Conscience, the bounty of Nature and man's ingratitude, the unloveliness
 of Mammon and of Excess, the blossom of Courtesy oft found on lowly
 stalk, and the final triumph of Virtue through striving and temptation,
 all are dwelt upon.
 
     It is the mind that maketh good or ill,
     That maketh wretch or happie, rich or poore:
 
 so speaks Spenser; and Milton similarly--
 
     He that has light within his own clear breast
     May sit i' the centre, and enjoy bright day:
     But he that hides a dark soul and foul thoughts
     Benighted walks under the mid-day sun;
     Himself is his own dungeon.
 
 In endeavouring still further to trace, by means of verbal or structural
 resemblances, the sources from which Milton drew his materials for
 _Comus_, critics have referred to Peele's _Old Wives' Tale_ (1595); to
 Fletcher's pastoral, _The Faithful Shepherdess_, of which Charles Lamb
 has said that if all its parts 'had been in unison with its many
 innocent scenes and sweet lyric intermixtures, it had been a poem fit to
 vie with _Comus_ or the _Arcadia_, to have been put into the hands of
 boys and virgins, to have made matter for young dreams, like the loves
 of Hermia and Lysander'; to Ben Jonson's mask of _Pleasure reconciled to
 Virtue_ (1619), in which Comus is "the god of cheer, or the Belly"; and
 to the _Comus_ of Erycius Puteanus (Henri du Puy), Professor of
 Eloquence at Louvain. It is true that Fletcher's pastoral was being
 acted in London about the time Milton was writing his _Comus_, that the
 poem by the Dutch Professor was republished at Oxford in 1634, and that
 resemblances are evident between Milton's poem and those named. But
 Professor Masson does well in warning us that "infinitely too much has
 been made of such coincidences. After all of them, even the most ideal
 and poetical, the feeling in reading _Comus_ is that all here is
 different, all peculiar." Whatever Milton borrowed, he borrowed, as he
 says himself, in order to better it.
 
 It is interesting to consider the mutual relations of the poems written
 by Milton at Horton. Everything that Milton wrote is Miltonic; he had
 what has been called the power of transforming everything into himself,
 and these poems are, accordingly, evidences of the development of
 Milton's opinions and of his secret purpose. It has been said that
 _L'Allegro_ and _Il Penseroso_ are to be regarded as "the pleadings, the
 decision on which is in Comus"--_L'Allegro_ representing the Cavalier,
 and _Il Penseroso_ the Puritan element. This is true only in a limited
 sense. It is true that the Puritan element in the Horton series of poems
 becomes more patent as we pass from the two lyrics to the mask of
 _Comus_, and from _Comus_ to the elegy of _Lycidas_, just as, in the
 corresponding periods of time, the evils connected with the reign of
 Charles I. and with Laud's crusade against Puritanism were becoming more
 pronounced. But we can hardly regard Milton as having expressed any new
 decision in _Comus_: the decision is already made when "vain deluding
 Joys" are banished in _Il Penseroso_, and "loathed Melancholy" in
 _L'Allegro_. The mask is an expansion and exaltation of the delights of
 the contemplative man, but there is still a place for the "unreproved
 pleasures" of the cheerful man. Unless it were so, _Comus_ could not
 have been written; there would have been no "sunshine holiday" for the
 rustics and no "victorious dance" for the gentle lady and her brothers.
 But in _Comus_ we realise the mutual relation of _L'Allegro_ and _Il
 Penseroso_; we see their application to the joys and sorrows of the
 actual life of individuals; we observe human nature in contact with the
 "hard assays" of life. And, subsequently, in _Lycidas_ we are made to
 realise that this human nature is Milton's own, and to understand how it
 was that his Puritanism which, three years before, had permitted him to
 write a cavalier mask, should, three years after, lead him from the
 fresh fields of poetry into the barren plains of controversial prose.
 
 The Mask was a favourite form of entertainment in England in Milton's
 youth, and had been so from the time of Henry VIII., in whose reign
 elaborate masked shows, introduced from Italy, first became popular. But
 they seem to have found their way into England, in a crude form, even
 earlier; and we read of court disguisings in the reign of Edward III. It
 is usually said that the Mask derives its name from the fact that the
 actors wore masks, and in Hall's Chronicle we read that, in 1512, "on
 the day of Epiphany at night, the king, with eleven others, was
 disguised after the manner of Italy, called a Mask, a thing not seen
 before in England; they were appareled in garments long and broad,
 wrought all with gold, with _visors_ and caps of gold." The truth,
 however, seems to be that the use of a visor was not essential in such
 entertainments, which, from the first, were called 'masks,' the word
 'masker' being used sometimes of the players, and sometimes of their
 disguises. The word has come to us, through the French form _masque_,
 cognate with Spanish _mascarada_, a masquerade or assembly of maskers,
 otherwise called a mummery. Up to the time of Henry VIII. these
 entertainments were of the nature of dumb-show or _tableaux vivants_,
 and delighted the spectators chiefly by the splendour of the costumes
 and machinery employed in their representation; but, afterwards, the
 chief actors spoke their parts, singing and dancing were introduced, and
 the composition of masks for royal and other courtly patrons became an
 occupation worthy of a poet. They were frequently combined with other
 forms of amusement, all of which were, in the case of the Court, placed
 under the management of a Master of Revels, whose official title was
 Magister Jocorum, Revellorum et _Mascorum_; in the first printed English
 tragedy, _Gorboduc_ (1565), each act opens with what is called a
 dumb-show or mask. But the more elaborate form of the Mask soon grew to
 be an entertainment complete in itself, and the demand for such became
 so great in the time of James I. and Charles I. that the history of
 these reigns might almost be traced in the succession of masks then
 written. Ben Jonson, who thoroughly established the Mask in English
 literature, wrote many Court Masks, and made them a vehicle less for the
 display of 'painting and carpentry' than for the expression of the
 intellectual and social life of his time. His masks are excelled only
 by _Comus_, and possess in a high degree that 'Doric delicacy' in their
 songs and odes which Sir Henry Wotton found so ravishing in Milton's
 mask. Jonson, in his lifetime, declared that, next himself, only
 Fletcher and Chapman could write a mask; and apart from the compositions
 of these writers and of William Browne (_Inner Temple Masque_), there
 are few specimens worthy to be named along with Jonson's until we come
 to Milton's _Arcades_. Other mask-writers were Middleton, Dekker,
 Shirley, Carew, and Davenant; and it is interesting to note that in
 Carew's _Coelum Brittanicum_ (1633-4), for which Lawes composed the
 music, the two boys who afterwards acted in _Comus_ had juvenile parts.
 It has been pointed out that the popularity of the Mask in Milton's
 youth received a stimulus from the Puritan hatred of the theatre which
 found expression at that time, and drove non-Puritans to welcome the
 Mask as a protest against that spirit which saw nothing but evil in
 every form of dramatic entertainment. Milton, who enjoyed the
 theatre--both "Jonson's learned sock" and what "ennobled hath the
 buskined stage"--was led, through his friendship with the musician
 Lawes, to compose a mask to celebrate the entry of the Earl of
 Bridgewater upon his office of "Lord President of the Council in the
 Principality of Wales and the Marches of the same." He had already
 written, also at the request of Lawes, a mask, or portion of a mask,
 called _Arcades_, and the success of this may have stimulated him to
 higher effort. The result was _Comus_, in which the Mask reached its
 highest level, and after which it practically faded out of our
 literature.
 
 Milton's two masks, _Arcades_ and _Comus_, were written for members of
 the same noble family, the former in honour of the Countess Dowager of
 Derby, and the latter in honour of John, first Earl of Bridgewater, who
 was both her stepson and son-in-law. This two-fold relation arose from
 the fact that the Earl was the son of Viscount Brackley, the Countess's
 second husband, and had himself married Lady Frances Stanley, a daughter
 of the Countess by her first husband, the fifth Earl of Derby. Amongst
 the children of the Earl of Bridgewater were three who took important
 parts in the representation of _Comus_--Alice, the youngest daughter,
 then about fourteen years of age, who appeared as _The Lady_; John,
 Viscount Brackley, who took the part of the _Elder Brother_, and Thomas
 Egerton, who appeared as the _Second Brother_. We do not know who acted
 the parts of _Comus_ and _Sabrina_, but the part of the _Attendant
 Spirit_ was taken by Henry Lawes, "gentleman of the Chapel Royal, and
 one of His Majesty's private musicians." The Earl's children were his
 pupils, and the mask was naturally produced under his direction.
 Milton's friendship with Lawes is shown by the sonnet which the poet
 addressed to the musician:
 
     Harry, whose tuneful and well measur'd song
       First taught our English music how to span
       Words with just note and accent, not to scan
       With Midas' ears, committing short and long;
     Thy worth and skill exempts thee from the throng,
       With praise enough for Envy to look wan;
       To after age thou shalt be writ the man,
     That with smooth air could'st humour best our tongue.
     Thou honour'st Verse, and Verse must lend her wing
       To honour thee, the priest of Phoebus' quire,
       That tun'st their happiest lines in hymn, or story.
     Dante shall give Fame leave to set thee higher
       Than his Casella, who he woo'd to sing,
       Met in the milder shades of Purgatory.
 
 We must remember also that it was to Lawes that Milton's _Comus_ owed
 its first publication, and, as we see from the dedication prefixed to
 the text, that he was justly proud of his share in its first
 representation.
 
 Such were the persons who appeared in Milton's mask; they are few in
 number, and the plan of the piece is correspondingly simple. There are
 three scenes which may be briefly characterised thus:
 
     I. The Tempter and the Tempted: lines 1-658.
        _Scene_: A wild wood.
 
    II. The Temptation and the Rescue: lines 659-958.
        _Scene_: The Palace of Comus.
 
   III. The Triumph: lines 959-1023.
        _Scene_: The President's Castle.
 
 In the first scene, after a kind of prologue (lines 1-92), the interest
 rises as we are introduced first to Comus and his rout, then to the Lady
 alone and "night-foundered," and finally to Comus and the Lady in
 company. At the same time the nature of the Lady's trial and her
 subsequent victory are foreshadowed in a conversation between the
 brothers and the attendant Spirit. This is one of the more Miltonic
 parts of the mask: in the philosophical reasoning of the elder brother,
 as opposed to the matter-of-fact arguments of the younger, we trace the
 young poet fresh from the study of the divine volume of Plato, and
 filled with a noble trust in God. In the second scene we breathe the
 unhallowed air of the abode of the wily tempter, who endeavours, "under
 fair pretence of friendly ends," to wind himself into the pure heart of
 the Lady. But his "gay rhetoric" is futile against the "sun-clad power
 of chastity"; and he is driven off the scene by the two brothers, who
 are led and instructed by the Spirit disguised as the shepherd Thyrsis.
 But the Lady, having been lured into the haunt of impurity, is left
 spell-bound, and appeal is made to the pure nymph Sabrina, who is "swift
 to aid a virgin, such as was herself, in hard-besetting need." It is in
 the contention between Comus and the Lady in this scene that the
 interest of the mask may be said to culminate, for here its purpose
 stands revealed: "it is a song to Temperance as the ground of Freedom,
 to temperance as the guard of all the virtues, to beauty as secured by
 temperance, and its central point and climax is in the pleading of these
 motives by the Lady against their opposites in the mouth of the Lord of
 sensual Revel." _Milton: Classical Writers_. In the third scene the Lady
 Alice and her brothers are presented by the Spirit to their noble father
 and mother as triumphing "in victorious dance o'er sensual folly and
 intemperance." The Spirit then speaks the epilogue, calling upon mortals
 who love true freedom to strive after virtue:
 
     Love Virtue; she alone is free.
     She can teach ye how to climb
     Higher than the sphery chime;
     Or, if Virtue feeble were,
     Heaven itself would stoop to her.
 
 The last couplet Milton afterwards, on his Italian journey, entered in
 an album belonging to an Italian named Cerdogni, and underneath it the
 words, _Coelum non animum muto dum trans mare curro_, and his
 signature, Joannes Miltonius, Anglus. The juxtaposition of these verses
 is significant: though he had left his own land Milton had not become
 what, fifty or sixty years before, Roger Ascham had condemned as an
 "Italianated Englishman." He was one of those "worthy Gentlemen of
 England, whom all the Siren tongues of Italy could never untwine from
 the mast of God's word; nor no enchantment of vanity overturn them from
 the fear of God and love of honesty" (Ascham's _Scholemaster_). And one
 might almost infer that Milton, in his account of the sovereign plant
 Haemony which was to foil the wiles of _Comus_, had remembered not only
 Homer's description of the root Moly "that Hermes once to wise Ulysses
 gave,"{16:A} but also Ascham's remarks thereupon: "The true medicine
 against the enchantments of Circe, the vanity of licentious pleasure,
 the enticements of all sin, is, in Homer, the herb Moly, with the black
 root and white flower, sour at first, but sweet in the end; which Hesiod
 termeth the study of Virtue, hard and irksome in the beginning, but in
 the end easy and pleasant. And that which is most to be marvelled at,
 the divine poet Homer saith plainly that this medicine against sin and
 vanity is not found out by man, but given and taught by God." Milton's
 _Comus_, like his last great poems, is a poetical expression of the same
 belief. "His poetical works, the outcome of his inner life, his life of
 artistic contemplation, are," in the words of Prof. Dowden, "various
 renderings of one dominant idea--that the struggle for mastery between
 good and evil is the prime fact of life; and that a final victory of the
 righteous cause is assured by the existence of a divine order of the
 universe, which Milton knew by the name of 'Providence.'"
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 {16:A} It is noteworthy that Lamb, whose allusiveness is remarkable,
 employs in his account of the plant Moly almost the exact words of
 Milton's description of Haemony; compare the following extract from _The
 Adventures of Ulysses_ with lines 629-640 of _Comus_: "The flower of the
 herb Moly, which is sovereign against enchantments: the moly is a small
 unsightly root, its virtues but little known, and in low estimation; the
 dull shepherd treads on it every day with his clouted shoes, but it bears
 a small white flower, which is medicinal against charms, blights,
 mildews, and damps."
 
 
 
 
   COMUS.
 
 
   A MASK
 
   PRESENTED AT LUDLOW CASTLE, 1634.
 
   BEFORE
 
   JOHN, EARL OF BRIDGEWATER,
 
   THEN PRESIDENT OF WALES.
 
 
 
 
 _The Copy of a Letter written by Sir Henry Wotton to the Author upon the
 following Poem._
 
 
 From the College, this 13 of April, 1638.
 
 SIR,
 
 It was a special favour, when you lately bestowed upon me here the first
 taste of your acquaintance, though no longer than to make me know that I
 wanted more time to value it, and to enjoy it rightly; and, in truth, if
 I could then have imagined your farther stay in these parts, which I
 understood afterwards by Mr. H., I would have been bold, in our vulgar
 phrase, to mend my draught (for you left me with an extreme thirst), and
 to have begged your conversation again, jointly with your said learned
 friend, at a poor meal or two, that we might have banded together some
 good authors of the antient time; among which I observed you to have
 been familiar.
 
 Since your going, you have charged me with new obligations, both for a
 very kind letter from you dated the sixth of this month, and for a
 dainty piece of entertainment which came therewith. Wherein I should
 much commend the tragical part, if the lyrical did not ravish me with a
 certain Doric delicacy in your songs and odes, whereunto I must plainly
 confess to have seen yet nothing parallel in our language: _Ipsa
 mollities_.{19:A} But I must not omit to tell you, that I now only owe
 you thanks for intimating unto me (how modestly soever) the true
 artificer. For the work itself I had viewed some good while before, with
 singular delight, having received it from our common friend Mr. R. in
 the very close of the late R.'s poems, printed at Oxford; whereunto it
 is added (as I now suppose) that the accessory might help out the
 principal, according to the art of stationers, and to leave the reader
 _con la bocca dolce_.{20:A}
 
 Now, Sir, concerning your travels, wherein I may challenge a little more
 privilege of discourse with you; I suppose you will not blanch{20:B}
 Paris in your way; therefore I have been bold to trouble you with a few
 lines to Mr. M. B., whom you shall easily find attending the young Lord
 S. as his governor, and you may surely receive from him good directions
 for shaping of your farther journey into Italy, where he did reside by
 my choice some time for the king, after mine own recess from Venice.
 
 I should think that your best line will be through the whole length of
 France to Marseilles, and thence by sea to Genoa, whence the passage
 into Tuscany is as diurnal as a Gravesend barge. I hasten, as you do, to
 Florence, or Siena, the rather to tell you a short story, from the
 interest you have given me in your safety.
 
 At Siena I was tabled in the house of one Alberto Scipione, an old Roman
 courtier in dangerous times, having been steward to the Duca di
 Pagliano, who with all his family were strangled, save this only man,
 that escaped by foresight of the tempest. With him I had often much chat
 of those affairs; into which he took pleasure to look back from his
 native harbour; and at my departure toward Rome (which had been the
 centre of his experience) I had won confidence enough to beg his advice,
 how I might carry myself securely there, without offence of others, or
 of mine own conscience. _Signor Arrigo mio_ (says he), _I pensieri
 stretti, ed il viso sciolto_,{21:A} will go safely over the whole world.
 Of which Delphian oracle (for so I have found it) your judgment doth
 need no commentary; and therefore, Sir, I will commit you with it to the
 best of all securities, God's dear love, remaining
 
                                          Your friend as much to command
                                          as any of longer date,
 
                                          HENRY WOTTON.
 
 _Postscript._
 
 Sir,--I have expressly sent this my footboy to prevent your departure
 without some acknowledgment from me of the receipt of your obliging
 letter, having myself through some business, I know not how, neglected
 the ordinary conveyance. In any part where I shall understand you fixed,
 I shall be glad and diligent to entertain you with home-novelties, even
 for some fomentation of our friendship, too soon interrupted in the
 cradle.{21:B}
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 {19:A} It is delicacy itself.
 
 {20:A} With a sweet taste in his mouth (so that he may desire more).
 
 {20:B} Avoid.
 
 {21:A} "Thoughts close, countenance open."
 
 {21:B} This letter was printed in the edition of 1645, but omitted in
 that of 1673. It was written by Sir Henry Wotton, Provost of Eton
 College, just in time to overtake Milton before he set out on his journey
 to Italy. As a parting act of courtesy Milton had sent Sir Henry a letter
 with a copy of Lawes's edition of his _Comus_, and the above letter is an
 acknowledgment of the favour.
 
 
 
 
 TO THE RIGHT HONOURABLE{22:A}
 
 JOHN, LORD VISCOUNT BRACKLEY,
 
 _Son and Heir-Apparent to the Earl of Bridgewater, etc._
 
 
 MY LORD,
 
 This Poem, which received its first occasion of birth from yourself and
 others of your noble family, and much honour from your own person in the
 performance, now returns again to make a final Dedication of itself to
 you. Although not openly acknowledged by the Author, yet it is a
 legitimate offspring, so lovely and so much desired that the often
 copying of it hath tired my pen to give my several friends satisfaction,
 and brought me to a necessity of producing it to the public view; and
 now to offer it up, in all rightful devotion, to those fair hopes and
 rare endowments of your much-promising youth, which give a full
 assurance to all that know you, of a future excellence. Live, sweet
 Lord, to be the honour of your name, and receive this as your own, from
 the hands of him who hath by many favours been long obliged to your most
 honoured Parents, and as in this representation your attendant
 _Thyrsis_,{22:B} so now in all real expression,
 
                                 Your faithful and most humble Servant,
 
                                 H. LAWES.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 {22:A} Dedication of the anonymous edition of 1637: reprinted in the
 edition of 1645, but omitted in that of 1673.
 
 {22:B} See Notes, line 494.
 
 
 
 
 THE PERSONS.
 
   The ATTENDANT SPIRIT, afterwards in the habit of THYRSIS.
   COMUS, with his Crew.
   The LADY.
   FIRST BROTHER.
   SECOND BROTHER.
   SABRINA, the Nymph.
 
   The Chief Persons which presented were:--
       The Lord Brackley;
       Mr. Thomas Egerton, his Brother;
       The Lady Alice Egerton.
 
 
 
 
 
 COMUS.
 
 
 _The first Scene discovers a wild wood._
 
 _The ATTENDANT SPIRIT descends or enters._
 
     Before the starry threshold of Jove's court
     My mansion is, where those immortal shapes
     Of bright aerial spirits live insphered
     In regions mild of calm and serene air,
     Above the smoke and stir of this dim spot
     Which men call Earth, and, with low-thoughted care,
     Confined and pestered in this pinfold here,
     Strive to keep up a frail and feverish being,
     Unmindful of the crown that Virtue gives,
     After this mortal change, to her true servants                    10
     Amongst the enthroned gods on sainted seats.
     Yet some there be that by due steps aspire
     To lay their just hands on that golden key
     That opes the palace of eternity.
     To such my errand is; and, but for such,
     I would not soil these pure ambrosial weeds
     With the rank vapours of this sin-worn mould.
       But to my task. Neptune, besides the sway
     Of every salt flood and each ebbing stream,
     Took in by lot, 'twixt high and nether Jove,                      20
     Imperial rule of all the sea-girt isles
     That, like to rich and various gems, inlay
     The unadorned bosom of the deep;
     Which he, to grace his tributary gods,
     By course commits to several government,
     And gives them leave to wear their sapphire crowns
     And wield their little tridents. But this Isle,
     The greatest and the best of all the main,
     He quarters to his blue-haired deities;
     And all this tract that fronts the falling sun                    30
     A noble Peer of mickle trust and power
     Has in his charge, with tempered awe to guide
     An old and haughty nation, proud in arms:
     Where his fair offspring, nursed in princely lore,
     Are coming to attend their father's state,
     And new-intrusted sceptre. But their way
     Lies through the perplexed paths of this drear wood,
     The nodding horror of whose shady brows
     Threats the forlorn and wandering passenger;
     And here their tender age might suffer peril,                     40
     But that, by quick command from sovran Jove,
     I was despatched for their defence and guard:
     And listen why; for I will tell you now
     What never yet was heard in tale or song,
     From old or modern bard, in hall or bower.
       Bacchus, that first from out the purple grape
     Crushed the sweet poison of misused wine,
     After the Tuscan mariners transformed,
     Coasting the Tyrrhene shore, as the winds listed,
     On Circe's island fell: (who knows not Circe,                     50
     The daughter of the Sun, whose charmed cup
     Whoever tasted lost his upright shape,
     And downward fell into a grovelling swine?)
     This Nymph, that gazed upon his clustering locks,
     With ivy berries wreathed, and his blithe youth,
     Had by him, ere he parted thence, a son
     Much like his father, but his mother more,
     Whom therefore she brought up, and Comus named:
     Who, ripe and frolic of his full-grown age,
     Roving the Celtic and Iberian fields,                             60
     At last betakes him to this ominous wood,
     And, in thick shelter of black shades imbowered,
     Excels his mother at her mighty art;
     Offering to every weary traveller
     His orient liquor in a crystal glass,
     To quench the drouth of Phoebus; which as they taste
     (For most do taste through fond intemperate thirst),
     Soon as the potion works, their human count'nance,
     The express resemblance of the gods, is changed
     Into some brutish form of wolf or bear,                           70
     Or ounce or tiger, hog, or bearded goat,
     All other parts remaining as they were.
     And they, so perfect is their misery,
     Not once perceive their foul disfigurement,
     But boast themselves more comely than before,
     And all their friends and native home forget,
     To roll with pleasure in a sensual sty.
     Therefore, when any favoured of high Jove
     Chances to pass through this adventurous glade,
     Swift as the sparkle of a glancing star                           80
     I shoot from heaven, to give him safe convoy,
     As now I do. But first I must put off
     These my sky-robes, spun out of Iris' woof,
     And take the weeds and likeness of a swain
     That to the service of this house belongs,
     Who, with his soft pipe and smooth-dittied song,
     Well knows to still the wild winds when they roar,
     And hush the waving woods; nor of less faith,
     And in this office of his mountain watch
     Likeliest, and nearest to the present aid                         90
     Of this occasion. But I hear the tread
     Of hateful steps; I must be viewless now.
 
 _COMUS enters, with a charming-rod in one hand, his glass in the other;
 with him a rout of monsters, headed like sundry sorts of wild beasts,
 but otherwise like men and women, their apparel glistering. They come in
 making a riotous and unruly noise, with torches in their hands._
 
     _Comus._ The star that bids the shepherd fold
     Now the top of heaven doth hold;
     And the gilded car of day
     His glowing axle doth allay
     In the steep Atlantic stream;
     And the slope sun his upward beam
     Shoots against the dusky pole,
     Pacing toward the other goal                                     100
     Of his chamber in the east.
     Meanwhile, welcome joy and feast,
     Midnight shout and revelry,
     Tipsy dance and jollity.
     Braid your locks with rosy twine,
     Dropping odours, dropping wine.
     Rigour now is gone to bed;
     And Advice with scrupulous head,
     Strict Age, and sour Severity,
     With their grave saws, in slumber lie.                           110
     We, that are of purer fire,
     Imitate the starry quire,
     Who, in their nightly watchful spheres,
     Lead in swift round the months and years.
     The sounds and seas, with all their finny drove,
     Now to the moon in wavering morrice move;
     And on the tawny sands and shelves
     Trip the pert fairies and the dapper elves.
     By dimpled brook and fountain-brim,
     The wood-nymphs, decked with daisies trim,                       120
     Their merry wakes and pastimes keep:
     What hath night to do with sleep?
     Night hath better sweets to prove;
     Venus now wakes, and wakens Love.
     Come, let us our rights begin;
     'Tis only daylight that makes sin,
     Which these dun shades will ne'er report.
     Hail, goddess of nocturnal sport,
     Dark-veiled Cotytto, to whom the secret flame
     Of midnight torches burns! mysterious dame,                      130
     That ne'er art called but when the dragon womb
     Of Stygian darkness spets her thickest gloom,
     And makes one blot of all the air!
     Stay thy cloudy ebon chair,
     Wherein thou ridest with Hecat', and befriend
     Us thy vowed priests, till utmost end
     Of all thy dues be done, and none left out,
     Ere the blabbing eastern scout,
     The nice Morn on the Indian steep,
     From her cabined loop-hole peep,                                 140
     And to the tell-tale Sun descry
     Our concealed solemnity.
     Come, knit hands, and beat the ground
     In a light fantastic round.           [_The Measure._
       Break off, break off! I feel the different pace
     Of some chaste footing near about this ground.
     Run to your shrouds within these brakes and trees;
     Our number may affright. Some virgin sure
     (For so I can distinguish by mine art)
     Benighted in these woods! Now to my charms,                      150
     And to my wily trains: I shall ere long
     Be well stocked with as fair a herd as grazed
     About my mother Circe. Thus I hurl
     My dazzling spells into the spongy air,
     Of power to cheat the eye with blear illusion,
     And give it false presentments, lest the place
     And my quaint habits breed astonishment,
     And put the damsel to suspicious flight;
     Which must not be, for that's against my course.
     I, under fair pretence of friendly ends,                         160
     And well-placed words of glozing courtesy,
     Baited with reasons not unplausible,
     Wind me into the easy-hearted man,
     And hug him into snares. When once her eye
     Hath met the virtue of this magic dust,
     I shall appear some harmless villager
     Whom thrift keeps up about his country gear.
     But here she comes; I fairly step aside,
     And hearken, if I may, her business here.
 
 _The LADY enters._
 
     _Lady._ This way the noise was, if mine ear be true,
     My best guide now. Methought it was the sound
     Of riot and ill-managed merriment,                               172
     Such as the jocund flute or gamesome pipe
     Stirs up among the loose unlettered hinds,
     When, for their teeming flocks and granges full,
     In wanton dance they praise the bounteous Pan,
     And thank the gods amiss. I should be loth
     To meet the rudeness and swilled insolence
     Of such late wassailers; yet, oh! where else
     Shall I inform my unacquainted feet                              180
     In the blind mazes of this tangled wood?
     My brothers, when they saw me wearied out
     With this long way, resolving here to lodge
     Under the spreading favour of these pines,
     Stepped, as they said, to the next thicket-side
     To bring me berries, or such cooling fruit
     As the kind hospitable woods provide.
     They left me then when the grey-hooded Even,
     Like a sad votarist in palmer's weed,
     Rose from the hindmost wheels of Phoebus' wain.                  190
     But where they are, and why they came not back,
     Is now the labour of my thoughts. 'Tis likeliest
     They had engaged their wandering steps too far;
     And envious darkness, ere they could return,
     Had stole them from me. Else, O thievish Night,
     Why shouldst thou, but for some felonious end,
     In thy dark lantern thus close up the stars
     That Nature hung in heaven, and filled their lamps
     With everlasting oil to give due light
     To the misled and lonely traveller?                              200
     This is the place, as well as I may guess,
     Whence even now the tumult of loud mirth
     Was rife, and perfect in my listening ear;
     Yet nought but single darkness do I find.
     What might this be? A thousand fantasies
     Begin to throng into my memory,
     Of calling shapes, and beckoning shadows dire,
     And airy tongues that syllable men's names
     On sands and shores and desert wildernesses.
     These thoughts may startle well, but not astound                 210
     The virtuous mind, that ever walks attended
     By a strong siding champion, Conscience.
     O, welcome, pure-eyed Faith, white-handed Hope,
     Thou hovering angel girt with golden wings,
     And thou unblemished form of Chastity!
     I see ye visibly, and now believe
     That He, the Supreme Good, to whom all things ill
     Are but as slavish officers of vengeance,
     Would send a glistering guardian, if need were,
     To keep my life and honour unassailed....                        220
     Was I deceived, or did a sable cloud
     Turn forth her silver lining on the night?
     I did not err: there does a sable cloud
     Turn forth her silver lining on the night,
     And casts a gleam over this tufted grove.
     I cannot hallo to my brothers, but
     Such noise as I can make to be heard farthest
     I'll venture; for my new-enlivened spirits
     Prompt me, and they perhaps are not far off.
 
 _Song._
 
     Sweet Echo, sweetest nymph, that liv'st unseen                   230
           Within thy airy shell
         By slow Meander's margent green,
     And in the violet-embroidered vale
         Where the love-lorn nightingale
     Nightly to thee her sad song mourneth well:
     Canst thou not tell me of a gentle pair
         That likest thy Narcissus are?
           O, if thou have
         Hid them in some flowery cave,
           Tell me but where,                                         240
       Sweet Queen of Parley, Daughter of the Sphere!
       So may'st thou be translated to the skies,
     And give resounding grace to all Heaven's harmonies!
 
     _Comus._ Can any mortal mixture of earth's mould
     Breathe such divine enchanting ravishment?
     Sure something holy lodges in that breast,
     And with these raptures moves the vocal air
     To testify his hidden residence.
     How sweetly did they float upon the wings
     Of silence, through the empty-vaulted night,                     250
     At every fall smoothing the raven down
     Of darkness till it smiled! I have oft heard
     My mother Circe with the Sirens three,
     Amidst the flowery-kirtled Naiades,
     Culling their potent herbs and baleful drugs,
     Who, as they sung, would take the prisoned soul,
     And lap it in Elysium: Scylla wept,
     And chid her barking waves into attention,
     And fell Charybdis murmured soft applause.
     Yet they in pleasing slumber lulled the sense,                   260
     And in sweet madness robbed it of itself;
     But such a sacred and home-felt delight,
     Such sober certainty of waking bliss,
     I never heard till now. I'll speak to her,
     And she shall be my queen.--Hail, foreign wonder!
     Whom certain these rough shades did never breed,
     Unless the goddess that in rural shrine
     Dwell'st here with Pan or Sylvan by blest song
     Forbidding every bleak unkindly fog
     To touch the prosperous growth of this tall wood.                270
 
     _Lady._ Nay, gentle shepherd, ill is lost that praise
     That is addressed to unattending ears.
     Not any boast of skill, but extreme shift
     How to regain my severed company,
     Compelled me to awake the courteous Echo
     To give me answer from her mossy couch.
 
     _Comus._ What chance, good Lady, hath bereft you thus?
 
     _Lady._ Dim darkness and this leafy labyrinth.
 
     _Comus._ Could that divide you from near-ushering guides?
 
     _Lady._ They left me weary on a grassy turf.                     280
 
     _Comus._ By falsehood, or discourtesy, or why?
 
     _Lady._ To seek i' the valley some cool friendly spring.
 
     _Comus._ And left your fair side all unguarded, lady?
 
     _Lady._ They were but twain, and purposed quick return.
 
     _Comus._ Perhaps forestalling night prevented them.
 
     _Lady._ How easy my misfortune is to hit!
 
     _Comus._ Imports their loss, beside the present need?
 
     _Lady._ No less than if I should my brothers lose.
 
     _Comus._ Were they of manly prime, or youthful bloom?
 
     _Lady._ As smooth as Hebe's their unrazored lips.                290
 
     _Comus._ Two such I saw, what time the laboured ox
     In his loose traces from the furrow came,
     And the swinked hedger at his supper sat.
     I saw them under a green mantling vine,
     That crawls along the side of yon small hill,
     Plucking ripe clusters from the tender shoots;
     Their port was more than human, as they stood
     I took it for a faery vision
     Of some gay creatures of the element,
     That in the colours of the rainbow live,                         300
     And play i' the plighted clouds. I was awe-strook,
     And, as I passed, I worshiped. If those you seek,
     It were a journey like the path to Heaven
     To help you find them.
 
     _Lady._                Gentle villager,
     What readiest way would bring me to that place?
 
     _Comus._ Due west it rises from this shrubby point.
 
     _Lady._ To find out that, good shepherd, I suppose,
     In such a scant allowance of star-light,
     Would overtask the best land-pilot's art,
     Without the sure guess of well-practised feet.                   310
 
     _Comus._ I know each lane, and every alley green,
     Dingle, or bushy dell, of this wild wood,
     And every bosky bourn from side to side,
     My daily walks and ancient neighbourhood;
     And, if your stray attendance be yet lodged,
     Or shroud within these limits, I shall know
     Ere morrow wake, or the low-roosted lark
     From her thatched pallet rouse. If otherwise,
     I can conduct you, lady, to a low
     But loyal cottage, where you may be safe                         320
     Till further quest.
 
     _Lady._              Shepherd, I take thy word,
     And trust thy honest-offered courtesy,
     Which oft is sooner found in lowly sheds,
     With smoky rafters, than in tapestry halls
     And courts of princes, where it first was named,
     And yet is most pretended. In a place
     Less warranted than this, or less secure,
     I cannot be, that I should fear to change it.
     Eye me, blest Providence, and square my trial
     To my proportioned strength! Shepherd, lead on.
 
 [_Exeunt._
 
 _Enter the TWO BROTHERS._
 
     _Elder Brother._ Unmuffle, ye faint stars; and thou, fair moon,  331
     That wont'st to love the traveller's benison,
     Stoop thy pale visage through an amber cloud,
     And disinherit Chaos, that reigns here
     In double night of darkness and of shades;
     Or, if your influence be quite dammed up
     With black usurping mists, some gentle taper,
     Though a rush-candle from the wicker hole
     Of some clay habitation, visit us
     With thy long levelled rule of streaming light,                  340
     And thou shalt be our star of Arcady,
     Or Tyrian Cynosure.
 
     _Second Brother._       Or, if our eyes
     Be barred that happiness, might we but hear
     The folded flocks, penned in their wattled cotes,
     Or sound of pastoral reed with oaten stops,
     Or whistle from the lodge, or village cock
     Count the night-watches to his feathery dames,
     'Twould be some solace yet, some little cheering,
     In this close dungeon of innumerous boughs.
     But, Oh, that hapless virgin, our lost sister!                   350
     Where may she wander now, whither betake her
     From the chill dew, amongst rude burs and thistles?
     Perhaps some cold bank is her bolster now,
     Or 'gainst the rugged bark of some broad elm
     Leans her unpillowed head, fraught with sad fears.
     What if in wild amazement and affright,
     Or, while we speak, within the direful grasp
     Of savage hunger, or of savage heat!
 
     _Elder Brother._ Peace, brother: be not over-exquisite
     To cast the fashion of uncertain evils;                          360
     For, grant they be so, while they rest unknown,
     What need a man forestall his date of grief,
     And run to meet what he would most avoid?
     Or, if they be but false alarms of fear,
     How bitter is such self-delusion!
     I do not think my sister so to seek,
     Or so unprincipled in virtue's book,
     And the sweet peace that goodness bosoms ever,
     As that the single want of light and noise
     (Not being in danger, as I trust she is not)                     370
     Could stir the constant mood of her calm thoughts,
     And put them into misbecoming plight.
     Virtue could see to do what Virtue would
     By her own radiant light, though sun and moon
     Were in the flat sea sunk. And Wisdom's self
     Oft seeks to sweet retired solitude,
     Where, with her best nurse, Contemplation,
     She plumes her feathers, and lets grow her wings,
     That, in the various bustle of resort,
     Were all to-ruffled, and sometimes impaired.                     380
     He that has light within his own clear breast
     May sit i' the centre, and enjoy bright day:
     But he that hides a dark soul and foul thoughts
     Benighted walks under the mid-day sun;
     Himself is his own dungeon.
 
     _Second Brother._            'Tis most true
     That musing meditation most affects
     The pensive secrecy of desert cell,
     Far from the cheerful haunt of men and herds,
     And sits as safe as in a senate-house;
     For who would rob a hermit of his weeds,                         390
     His few books, or his beads, or maple dish,
     Or do his grey hairs any violence?
     But Beauty, like the fair Hesperian tree
     Laden with blooming gold, had need the guard
     Of dragon-watch with unenchanted eye
     To save her blossoms, and defend her fruit,
     From the rash hand of bold Incontinence.
     You may as well spread out the unsunned heaps
     Of miser's treasure by an outlaw's den,
     And tell me it is safe, as bid me hope                           400
     Danger will wink on Opportunity,
     And let a single helpless maiden pass
     Uninjured in this wild surrounding waste.
     Of night or loneliness it recks me not;
     I fear the dread events that dog them both,
     Lest some ill-greeting touch attempt the person
     Of our unowned sister.
 
     _Elder Brother._           I do not, brother,
     Infer as if I thought my sister's state
     Secure without all doubt or controversy;
     Yet, where an equal poise of hope and fear                       410
     Does arbitrate the event, my nature is
     That I incline to hope rather than fear,
     And gladly banish squint suspicion.
     My sister is not so defenceless left
     As you imagine; she has a hidden strength,
     Which you remember not.
 
     _Second Brother._        What hidden strength,
     Unless the strength of Heaven, if you mean that?
 
     _Elder Brother._ I mean that too, but yet a hidden strength,
     Which, if Heaven gave it, may be termed her own.
     'Tis chastity, my brother, chastity:                             420
     She that has that is clad in complete steel,
     And, like a quivered nymph with arrows keen,
     May trace huge forests, and unharboured heaths,
     Infamous hills, and sandy perilous wilds;
     Where, through the sacred rays of chastity,
     No savage fierce, bandite, or mountaineer,
     Will dare to soil her virgin purity.
     Yea, there where very desolation dwells,
     By grots and caverns shagged with horrid shades,
     She may pass on with unblenched majesty,                         430
     Be it not done in pride, or in presumption.
     Some say no evil thing that walks by night,
     In fog or fire, by lake or moorish fen,
     Blue meagre hag, or stubborn unlaid ghost,
     That breaks his magic chains at curfew time,
     No goblin or swart faery of the mine,
     Hath hurtful power o'er true virginity.
     Do ye believe me yet, or shall I call
     Antiquity from the old schools of Greece
     To testify the arms of chastity?                                 440
     Hence had the huntress Dian her dread bow
     Fair silver-shafted queen for ever chaste,
     Wherewith she tamed the brinded lioness
     And spotted mountain-pard, but set at nought
     The frivolous bolt of Cupid; gods and men
     Feared her stern frown, and she was queen o' the woods.
     What was that snaky-headed Gorgon shield
     That wise Minerva wore, unconquered virgin,
     Wherewith she freezed her foes to congealed stone,
     But rigid looks of chaste austerity,                             450
     And noble grace that dashed brute violence
     With sudden adoration and blank awe?
     So dear to Heaven is saintly chastity
     That, when a soul is found sincerely so,
     A thousand liveried angels lackey her,
     Driving far off each thing of sin and guilt,
     And in clear dream and solemn vision
     Tell her of things that no gross ear can hear;
     Till oft converse with heavenly habitants
     Begin to cast a beam on the outward shape,                       460
     The unpolluted temple of the mind,
     And turns it by degrees to the soul's essence,
     Till all be made immortal. But, when lust,
     By unchaste looks, loose gestures, and foul talk,
     But most by lewd and lavish act of sin,
     Lets in defilement to the inward parts,
     The soul grows clotted by contagion,
     Imbodies, and imbrutes, till she quite loose
     The divine property of her first being.
     Such are those thick and gloomy shadows damp                     470
     Oft seen in charnel-vaults and sepulchres,
     Lingering and sitting by a new-made grave,
     As loth to leave the body that it loved,
     And linked itself by carnal sensualty
     To a degenerate and degraded state.
 
     _Second Brother._ How charming is divine Philosophy!
     Not harsh and crabbed, as dull fools suppose,
     But musical as is Apollo's lute,
     And a perpetual feast of nectared sweets,
     Where no crude surfeit reigns.
 
     _Elder Brother._               List! list! I hear                480
     Some far-off hallo break the silent air.
 
     _Second Brother._ Methought so too; what should it be?
 
     _Elder Brother._                                       For certain,
     Either some one, like us, night-foundered here,
     Or else some neighbour woodman, or, at worst,
     Some roving robber calling to his fellows.
 
     _Second Brother._ Heaven keep my sister! Again, again, and near!
     Best draw, and stand upon our guard.
 
     _Elder Brother._                     I'll hallo.
     If he be friendly, he comes well: if not,
     Defence is a good cause, and Heaven be for us!
 
 _Enter the ATTENDANT SPIRIT, habited like a shepherd._
 
     That hallo I should know. What are you? speak.                   490
     Come not too near; you fall on iron stakes else.
 
     _Spirit._ What voice is that? my young Lord? speak again.
 
     _Second Brother._ O brother, 'tis my father's shepherd, sure.
 
     _Elder Brother._ Thyrsis! whose artful strains have oft delayed
     The huddling brook to hear his madrigal,
     And sweetened every musk-rose of the dale.
     How camest thou here, good swain? Hath any ram
     Slipped from the fold, or young kid lost his dam,
     Or straggling wether the pent flock forsook?
     How couldst thou find this dark sequestered nook?                500
 
     _Spirit._ O my loved master's heir, and his next joy,
     I came not here on such a trivial toy
     As a strayed ewe, or to pursue the stealth
     Of pilfering wolf; not all the fleecy wealth
     That doth enrich these downs is worth a thought
     To this my errand, and the care it brought,
     But, oh! my virgin Lady, where is she?
     How chance she is not in your company?
 
     _Elder Brother._ To tell thee sadly, Shepherd, without blame
     Or our neglect, we lost her as we came.                          510
 
     _Spirit._ Ay me unhappy! then my fears are true.
 
     _Elder Brother._ What fears, good Thyrsis? Prithee briefly shew.
 
     _Spirit._ I'll tell ye. 'Tis not vain or fabulous
     (Though so esteemed by shallow ignorance)
     What the sage poets, taught by the heavenly Muse,
     Storied of old in high immortal verse
     Of dire Chimeras and enchanted isles,
     And rifted rocks whose entrance leads to Hell;
     For such there be, but unbelief is blind.
       Within the navel of this hideous wood,                         520
     Immured in cypress shades, a sorcerer dwells,
     Of Bacchus and of Circe born, great Comus,
     Deep skilled in all his mother's witcheries,
     And here to every thirsty wanderer
     By sly enticement gives his baneful cup,
     With many murmurs mixed, whose pleasing poison
     The visage quite transforms of him that drinks,
     And the inglorious likeness of a beast
     Fixes instead, unmoulding reason's mintage
     Charactered in the face. This have I learnt                      530
     Tending my flocks hard by i' the hilly crofts
     That brow this bottom glade; whence night by night
     He and his monstrous rout are heard to howl
     Like stabled wolves, or tigers at their prey,
     Doing abhorred rites to Hecate
     In their obscured haunts of inmost bowers.
     Yet have they many baits and guileful spells
     To inveigle and invite the unwary sense
     Of them that pass unweeting by the way.
     This evening late, by then the chewing flocks                    540
     Had ta'en their supper on the savoury herb
     Of knot-grass dew-besprent, and were in fold,
     I sat me down to watch upon a bank
     With ivy canopied, and interwove
     With flaunting honeysuckle, and began,
     Wrapt in a pleasing fit of melancholy,
     To meditate my rural minstrelsy,
     Till fancy had her fill. But ere a close
     The wonted roar was up amidst the woods,
     And filled the air with barbarous dissonance;                    550
     At which I ceased, and listened them awhile,
     Till an unusual stop of sudden silence
     Gave respite to the drowsy frighted steeds
     That draw the litter of close-curtained Sleep.
     At last a soft and solemn-breathing sound
     Rose like a steam of rich distilled perfumes,
     And stole upon the air, that even Silence
     Was took ere she was ware, and wished she might
     Deny her nature, and be never more,
     Still to be so displaced. I was all ear,                         560
     And took in strains that might create a soul
     Under the ribs of Death. But, oh! ere long
     Too well I did perceive it was the voice
     Of my most honoured Lady, your dear sister.
     Amazed I stood, harrowed with grief and fear;
     And "O poor hapless nightingale," thought I,
     "How sweet thou sing'st, how near the deadly snare!"
     Then down the lawns I ran with headlong haste,
     Through paths and turnings often trod by day,
     Till, guided by mine ear, I found the place                      570
     Where that damned wizard, hid in sly disguise
     (For so by certain signs I knew), had met
     Already, ere my best speed could prevent,
     The aidless innocent lady, his wished prey;
     Who gently asked if he had seen such two,
     Supposing him some neighbour villager.
     Longer I durst not stay, but soon I guessed
     Ye were the two she meant; with that I sprung
     Into swift flight, till I had found you here;
     But further know I not.
 
     _Second Brother._       O night and shades,                      580
     How are ye joined with hell in triple knot
     Against the unarmed weakness of one virgin,
     Alone and helpless! Is this the confidence
     You gave me, brother?
 
     _Elder Brother._          Yes, and keep it still;
     Lean on it safely; not a period
     Shall be unsaid for me. Against the threats
     Of malice or of sorcery, or that power
     Which erring men call Chance, this I hold firm:
     Virtue may be assailed, but never hurt,
     Surprised by unjust force, but not enthralled;                   590
     Yea, even that which Mischief meant most harm
     Shall in the happy trial prove most glory.
     But evil on itself shall back recoil,
     And mix no more with goodness, when at last,
     Gathered like scum, and settled to itself,
     It shall be in eternal restless change
     Self-fed and self-consumed. If this fail,
     The pillared firmament is rottenness,
     And earth's base built on stubble. But come, let's on!
     Against the opposing will and arm of Heaven                      600
     May never this just sword be lifted up;
     But, for that damned magician, let him be girt
     With all the grisly legions that troop
     Under the sooty flag of Acheron,
     Harpies and Hydras, or all the monstrous forms
     'Twixt Africa and Ind, I'll find him out,
     And force him to return his purchase back,
     Or drag him by the curls to a foul death,
     Cursed as his life.
 
     _Spirit._           Alas! good venturous youth,
     I love thy courage yet, and bold emprise;                        610
     But here thy sword can do thee little stead.
     Far other arms and other weapons must
     Be those that quell the might of hellish charms.
     He with his bare wand can unthread thy joints,
     And crumble all thy sinews.
 
     _Elder Brother._            Why, prithee, Shepherd,
     How durst thou then thyself approach so near
     As to make this relation?
 
     _Spirit._                  Care and utmost shifts
     How to secure the Lady from surprisal
     Brought to my mind a certain shepherd lad,
     Of small regard to see to, yet well skilled                      620
     In every virtuous plant and healing herb
     That spreads her verdant leaf to the morning ray.
     He loved me well, and oft would beg me sing;
     Which when I did, he on the tender grass
     Would sit, and hearken even to ecstasy,
     And in requital ope his leathern scrip,
     And show me simples of a thousand names,
     Telling their strange and vigorous faculties.
     Amongst the rest a small unsightly root,
     But of divine effect, he culled me out.                          630
     The leaf was darkish, and had prickles on it,
     But in another country, as he said,
     Bore a bright golden flower, but not in this soil:
     Unknown, and like esteemed, and the dull swain
     Treads on it daily with his clouted shoon;
     And yet more med'cinal is it than that Moly
     That Hermes once to wise Ulysses gave.
     He called it Haemony, and gave it me,
     And bade me keep it as of sovran use
     'Gainst all enchantments, mildew blast, or damp,                 640
     Or ghastly Furies' apparition.
     I pursed it up, but little reckoning made,
     Till now that this extremity compelled.
     But now I find it true; for by this means
     I knew the foul enchanter, though disguised,
     Entered the very lime-twigs of his spells,
     And yet came off. If you have this about you
     (As I will give you when we go) you may
     Boldly assault the necromancer's hall;
     Where if he be, with dauntless hardihood                         650
     And brandished blade rush on him: break his glass,
     And shed the luscious liquor on the ground;
     But seize his wand. Though he and his curst crew
     Fierce sign of battle make, and menace high,
     Or, like the sons of Vulcan, vomit smoke,
     Yet will they soon retire, if he but shrink.
 
     _Elder Brother._ Thyrsis, lead on apace; I'll follow thee;
     And some good angel bear a shield before us!
 
 _The Scene changes to a stately palace, set out with all manner of
 deliciousness: soft music, tables spread with all dainties. COMUS
 appears with his rabble, and the LADY set in an enchanted chair: to whom
 he offers his glass; which she puts by, and goes about to rise._
 
     _Comus._ Nay, lady, sit. If I but wave this wand,
     Your nerves are all chained up in alabaster,                     660
     And you a statue, or as Daphne was,
     Root-bound, that fled Apollo.
 
     _Lady._                        Fool, do not boast.
     Thou canst not touch the freedom of my mind
     With all thy charms, although this corporal rind
     Thou hast immanacled while Heaven sees good.
 
     _Comus._ Why are you vexed, lady? why do you frown?
     Here dwell no frowns, nor anger; from these gates
     Sorrow flies far. See, here be all the pleasures
     That fancy can beget on youthful thoughts,
     When the fresh blood grows lively, and returns                   670
     Brisk as the April buds in primrose season.
     And first behold this cordial julep here,
     That flames and dances in his crystal bounds,
     With spirits of balm and fragrant syrups mixed.
     Not that Nepenthes which the wife of Thone
     In Egypt gave to Jove-born Helena
     Is of such power to stir up joy as this,
     To life so friendly, or so cool to thirst.
     Why should you be so cruel to yourself,
     And to those dainty limbs, which Nature lent                     680
     For gentle usage and soft delicacy?
     But you invert the covenants of her trust,
     And harshly deal, like an ill borrower,
     With that which you received on other terms,
     Scorning the unexempt condition
     By which all mortal frailty must subsist,
     Refreshment after toil, ease after pain,
     That have been tired all day without repast,
     And timely rest have wanted. But, fair virgin,
     This will restore all soon.
 
     _Lady._                     'Twill not, false traitor!           690
     'Twill not restore the truth and honesty
     That thou hast banished from thy tongue with lies.
     Was this the cottage and the safe abode
     Thou told'st me of? What grim aspects are these,
     These oughly-headed monsters? Mercy guard me!
     Hence with thy brewed enchantments, foul deceiver!
     Hast thou betrayed my credulous innocence
     With vizored falsehood and base forgery?
     And would'st thou seek again to trap me here
     With liquorish baits, fit to ensnare a brute?                    700
     Were it a draught for Juno when she banquets,
     I would not taste thy treasonous offer. None
     But such as are good men can give good things;
     And that which is not good is not delicious
     To a well-governed and wise appetite.
 
     _Comus._ O foolishness of men! that lend their ears
     To those budge doctors of the Stoic fur,
     And fetch their precepts from the Cynic tub,
     Praising the lean and sallow Abstinence!
     Wherefore did Nature pour her bounties forth                     710
     With such a full and unwithdrawing hand,
     Covering the earth with odours, fruits, and flocks,
     Thronging the seas with spawn innumerable,
     But all to please and sate the curious taste?
     And set to work millions of spinning worms,
     That in their green shops weave the smooth-haired silk,
     To deck her sons; and, that no corner might
     Be vacant of her plenty, in her own loins
     She hutched the all-worshipped ore and precious gems,
     To store her children with. If all the world                     720
     Should, in a pet of temperance, feed on pulse,
     Drink the clear stream, and nothing wear but frieze,
     The All-giver would be unthanked, would be unpraised,
     Not half his riches known, and yet despised;
     And we should serve him as a grudging master,
     As a penurious niggard of his wealth,
     And live like Nature's bastards, not her sons,
     Who would be quite surcharged with her own weight,
     And strangled with her waste fertility:
     The earth cumbered, and the winged air darked with plumes,       730
     The herds would over-multitude their lords;
     The sea o'erfraught would swell, and the unsought diamonds
     Would so emblaze the forehead of the deep,
     And so bestud with stars, that they below
     Would grow inured to light, and come at last
     To gaze upon the sun with shameless brows.
     List, lady; be not coy, and be not cozened
     With that same vaunted name, Virginity.
     Beauty is Nature's coin; must not be hoarded,
     But must be current; and the good thereof                        740
     Consists in mutual and partaken bliss,
     Unsavoury in the enjoyment of itself.
     If you let slip time, like a neglected rose
     It withers on the stalk with languished head.
     Beauty is Nature's brag, and must be shown
     In courts, at feasts, and high solemnities,
     Where most may wonder at the workmanship.
     It is for homely features to keep home;
     They had their name thence: coarse complexions
     And cheeks of sorry grain will serve to ply                      750
     The sampler, and to tease the huswife's wool.
     What need of vermeil-tinctured lip for that,
     Love-darting eyes, or tresses like the morn?
     There was another meaning in these gifts;
     Think what, and be advised; you are but young yet.
 
     _Lady._ I had not thought to have unlocked my lips
     In this unhallowed air, but that this juggler
     Would think to charm my judgment, as mine eyes,
     Obtruding false rules pranked in reason's garb.
     I hate when vice can bolt her arguments                          760
     And virtue has no tongue to check her pride.
     Impostor! do not charge most innocent Nature,
     As if she would her children should be riotous
     With her abundance. She, good cateress,
     Means her provision only to the good,
     That live according to her sober laws,
     And holy dictate of spare Temperance.
     If every just man that now pines with want
     Had but a moderate and beseeming share
     Of that which lewdly-pampered Luxury                             770
     Now heaps upon some few with vast excess,
     Nature's full blessings would be well dispensed
     In unsuperfluous even proportions,
     And she no whit encumbered with her store;
     And then the Giver would be better thanked,
     His praise due paid: for swinish gluttony
     Ne'er looks to Heaven amidst his gorgeous feast,
     But with besotted base ingratitude
     Crams, and blasphemes his Feeder. Shall I go on?
     Or have I said enow? To him that dares                           780
     Arm his profane tongue with contemptuous words
     Against the sun-clad power of chastity
     Fain would I something say;--yet to what end?
     Thou hast nor ear, nor soul, to apprehend
     The sublime notion and high mystery
     That must be uttered to unfold the sage
     And serious doctrine of Virginity;
     And thou art worthy that thou shouldst not know
     More happiness than this thy present lot.
     Enjoy your dear wit, and gay rhetoric,                           790
     That hath so well been taught her dazzling fence;
     Thou art not fit to hear thyself convinced.
     Yet, should I try, the uncontrolled worth
     Of this pure cause would kindle my rapt spirits
     To such a flame of sacred vehemence
     That dumb things would be moved to sympathise,
     And the brute Earth would lend her nerves, and shake,
     Till all thy magic structures, reared so high,
     Were shattered into heaps o'er thy false head.
 
     _Comus._ She fables not. I feel that I do fear                   800
     Her words set off by some superior power;
     And, though not mortal, yet a cold shuddering dew
     Dips me all o'er, as when the wrath of Jove
     Speaks thunder and the chains of Erebus
     To some of Saturn's crew. I must dissemble,
     And try her yet more strongly.--Come, no more!
     This is mere moral babble, and direct
     Against the canon laws of our foundation.
     I must not suffer this; yet 'tis but the lees
     And settlings of a melancholy blood.                             810
 
     But this will cure all straight; one sip of this
     Will bathe the drooping spirits in delight
     Beyond the bliss of dreams. Be wise, and taste.
 
 _The BROTHERS rush in with swords drawn, wrest his glass out of his
 hand, and break it against the ground: his rout make sign of resistance,
 but are all driven in. The ATTENDANT SPIRIT comes in._
 
     _Spirit._ What! have you let the false enchanter scape?
     O ye mistook; ye should have snatched his wand,
     And bound him fast. Without his rod reversed,
     And backward mutters of dissevering power,
     We cannot free the Lady that sits here
     In stony fetters fixed and motionless.
     Yet stay: be not disturbed; now I bethink me,                    820
     Some other means I have which may be used,
     Which once of Meliboeus old I learnt,
     The soothest shepherd that e'er piped on plains.
       There is a gentle nymph not far from hence,
     That with moist curb sways the smooth Severn stream:
     Sabrina is her name: a virgin pure;
     Whilom she was the daughter of Locrine,
     That had the sceptre from his father Brute.
     She, guiltless damsel, flying the mad pursuit
     Of her enraged stepdame, Guendolen,                              830
     Commended her fair innocence to the flood
     That stayed her flight with his cross-flowing course.
     The water-nymphs, that in the bottom played,
     Held up their pearled wrists, and took her in,
     Bearing her straight to aged Nereus' hall;
     Who, piteous of her woes, reared her lank head,
     And gave her to his daughters to imbathe
     In nectared lavers strewed with asphodel,
     And through the porch and inlet of each sense
     Dropt in ambrosial oils, till she revived,                       840
     And underwent a quick immortal change,
     Made Goddess of the river. Still she retains
     Her maiden gentleness, and oft at eve
     Visits the herds along the twilight meadows,
     Helping all urchin blasts, and ill-luck signs
     That the shrewd meddling elf delights to make,
     Which she with precious vialed liquors heals:
     For which the shepherds, at their festivals,
     Carol her goodness loud in rustic lays,
     And throw sweet garland wreaths into her stream                  850
     Of pansies, pinks, and gaudy daffodils.
     And, as the old swain said, she can unlock
     The clasping charm, and thaw the numbing spell,
     If she be right invoked in warbled song;
     For maidenhood she loves, and will be swift
     To aid a virgin, such as was herself,
     In hard-besetting need. This will I try,
     And add the power of some adjuring verse.
 
 _Song._
 
       Sabrina fair,
         Listen where thou art sitting                                860
       Under the glassy, cool, translucent wave,
         In twisted braids of lilies knitting
       The loose train of thy amber-dropping hair;
         Listen for dear honour's sake,
         Goddess of the silver lake,
             Listen and save!
 
       Listen, and appear to us,
       In name of great Oceanus.
       By the earth-shaking Neptune's mace,
       And Tethys' grave majestic pace;                               870
       By hoary Nereus' wrinkled look,
       And the Carpathian wizard's hook;
       By scaly Triton's winding shell,
       And old soothsaying Glaucus' spell;
       By Leucothea's lovely hands,
       And her son that rules the strands;
       By Thetis' tinsel-slippered feet,
       And the songs of Sirens sweet;
       By dead Parthenope's dear tomb,
       And fair Ligea's golden comb,                                  880
       Wherewith she sits on diamond rocks
       Sleeking her soft alluring locks;
       By all the Nymphs that nightly dance
       Upon thy streams with wily glance;
       Rise, rise, and heave thy rosy head
       From thy coral-paven bed,
       And bridle in thy headlong wave,
       Till thou our summons answered have.
                             Listen and save!
 
 _SABRINA rises, attended by Water-nymphs, and sings._
 
       By the rushy-fringed bank,                                     890
       Where grows the willow and the osier dank,
         My sliding chariot stays,
       Thick set with agate, and the azurn sheen
       Of turkis blue, and emerald green,
         That in the channel strays;
       Whilst from off the waters fleet
       Thus I set my printless feet
       O'er the cowslip's velvet head,
         That bends not as I tread.
       Gentle swain, at thy request                                   900
           I am here!
 
       _Spirit._ Goddess dear,
       We implore thy powerful hand
       To undo the charmed band
       Of true virgin here distressed
       Through the force and through the wile
       Of unblessed enchanter vile.
 
       _Sabrina._ Shepherd, 'tis my office best
       To help ensnared chastity.
       Brightest Lady, look on me.                                    910
       Thus I sprinkle on thy breast
       Drops that from my fountain pure
       I have kept of precious cure;
       Thrice upon thy finger's tip,
       Thrice upon thy rubied lip:
       Next this marble venomed seat,
       Smeared with gums of glutinous heat,
       I touch with chaste palms moist and cold.
       Now the spell hath lost his hold;
       And I must haste ere morning hour                              920
       To wait in Amphitrite's bower.
 
 _SABRINA descends, and the LADY rises out of her seat._
 
       _Spirit._ Virgin, daughter of Locrine,
       Sprung of old Anchises' line,
       May thy brimmed waves for this
       Their full tribute never miss
       From a thousand petty rills,
       That tumble down the snowy hills:
       Summer drouth or singed air
       Never scorch thy tresses fair,
       Nor wet October's torrent flood                                930
       Thy molten crystal fill with mud;
       May thy billows roll ashore
       The beryl and the golden ore;
       May thy lofty head be crowned
       With many a tower and terrace round,
       And here and there thy banks upon
       With groves of myrrh and cinnamon.
         Come, Lady; while Heaven lends us grace,
       Let us fly this cursed place,
       Lest the sorcerer us entice                                    940
       With some other new device.
       Not a waste or needless sound
       Till we come to holier ground.
       I shall be your faithful guide
       Through this gloomy covert wide;
       And not many furlongs thence
       Is your Father's residence,
       Where this night are met in state
       Many a friend to gratulate
       His wished presence, and beside                                950
       All the swains that there abide
       With jigs and rural dance resort.
       We shall catch them at their sport,
       And our sudden coming there
       Will double all their mirth and cheer.
       Come, let us haste; the stars grow high,
       But Night sits monarch yet in the mid sky.
 
 _The Scene changes, presenting Ludlow Town, and the President's Castle;
 then come in Country Dancers; after them the ATTENDANT SPIRIT, with the
 Two BROTHERS and the LADY._
 
 _Song._
 
       _Spirit._ Back, shepherds, back! Enough your play
       Till next sunshine holiday.
       Here be, without duck or nod,                                  960
       Other trippings to be trod
       Of lighter toes, and such court guise
       As Mercury did first devise
       With the mincing Dryades
       On the lawns and on the leas.
 
 _This second Song presents them to their Father and Mother._
 
       Noble Lord and Lady bright,
       I have brought ye new delight.
       Here behold so goodly grown
       Three fair branches of your own.
       Heaven hath timely tried their youth,                          970
       Their faith, their patience, and their truth,
       And sent them here through hard assays
       With a crown of deathless praise,
       To triumph in victorious dance
       O'er sensual folly and intemperance.
 
 _The dances ended, the SPIRIT epiloguizes._
 
       _Spirit._ To the ocean now I fly,
       And those happy climes that lie
       Where day never shuts his eye,
       Up in the broad fields of the sky.
       There I suck the liquid air,                                   980
       All amidst the gardens fair
       Of Hesperus, and his daughters three
       That sing about the golden tree.
       Along the crisped shades and bowers
       Revels the spruce and jocund Spring;
       The Graces and the rosy-bosomed Hours
       Thither all their bounties bring.
       There eternal Summer dwells,
       And west winds with musky wing
       About the cedarn alleys fling                                  990
       Nard and cassia's balmy smells.
       Iris there with humid bow
       Waters the odorous banks, that blow
       Flowers of more mingled hue
       Than her purfled scarf can shew,
       And drenches with Elysian dew
       (List, mortals, if your ears be true)
       Beds of hyacinth and roses,
       Where young Adonis oft reposes,
       Waxing well of his deep wound,                                1000
       In slumber soft, and on the ground
       Sadly sits the Assyrian queen.
       But far above, in spangled sheen,
       Celestial Cupid, her famed son, advanced
       Holds his dear Psyche, sweet entranced
       After her wandering labours long,
       Till free consent the gods among
       Make her his eternal bride,
       And from her fair unspotted side
       Two blissful twins are to be born,                            1010
       Youth and Joy; so Jove hath sworn.
         But now my task is smoothly done,
       I can fly, or I can run
       Quickly to the green earth's end,
       Where the bowed welkin slow doth bend,
       And from thence can soar as soon
       To the corners of the moon.
       Mortals, that would follow me,
       Love Virtue; she alone is free.
       She can teach ye how to climb                                 1020
       Higher than the sphery chime;
       Or, if Virtue feeble were,
       Heaven itself would stoop to her.
 
 
 
 
 NOTES.
 
 
 ~discovers~, exhibits, displays. The usual sense of 'discover' is to find
 out or make known, but in Milton and Shakespeare the prefix _dis-_ has
 often the more purely negative force of _un-_: hence discover = uncover,
 reveal. Comp.--
 
                         "Some high-climbing hill
     Which to his eye _discovers_ unaware
     The goodly prospect of some foreign land."
 
     _Par. Lost_, iii. 546.
 
 ~Attendant Spirit descends~. The part of the attendant spirit was taken by
 Lawes (see Introduction), who, in his prologue or opening speech,
 explains who he is and on what errand he has been sent, hints at the
 plot of the whole masque, and at the same time compliments the Earl in
 whose honour the masque is being given (lines 30-36). In the ancient
 classical drama the prologue was sometimes an outline of the plot,
 sometimes an address to the audience, and sometimes introductory to the
 plot. The opening of _Comus_ prepares the audience and also directly
 addresses it (line 43). For the form of the epilogue in the actual
 performance of the masque see note, l. 975-6.
 
 1. ~starry threshold~, etc. Comp. Virgil: "The sire of gods and monarch of
 men summons a council to the starry chamber" (_sideream in sedem_),
 _Aen._ x. 2.
 
 2. ~mansion~, abode. Trench points out that this word denotes strictly "a
 place of tarrying," which might be for a longer or a shorter time: hence
 'a resting-place.' Comp. _John_, xiv. 2, "In my Father's house are many
 _mansions_"; and _Il Pens._ 93, "Her _mansion_ in this fleshly nook."
 The word has now lost the notion of tarrying, and is applied to a large
 and important dwelling-house. ~where~, in which: the antecedent is
 separated from the relative, a frequent construction in Milton (comp.
 lines 66, 821, etc.). So in Latin, where the grammatical connection
 would generally be sufficiently indicated by the inflection. ~shapes ...
 spirits~. An instance of the manner in which Milton endows spiritual
 beings with personality without making them too distinct. "Of all the
 poets who have introduced into their works the agency of supernatural
 beings Milton has succeeded best" (Macaulay). We see this in _Par. Lost_
 (_e.g._ ii. 666). Compare the use of the word 'shape' (Lat. _umbra_) in
 l. 207: also _L'Alleg._ 4, "horrid _shapes_ and shrieks"; and _Il Pens._
 6, "fancies fond with gaudy _shapes_ possess." Milton's use of the
 demonstrative ~those~ in this line is noteworthy; comp. "_that_ last
 infirmity of noble mind," _Lyc._ 71: it implies that the reference is to
 something well known, and that further particularisation is needless.
 
 3. ~insphered~. 'Sphere,' with its derivatives 'sphery,' 'insphere,' and
 'unsphere' (_Il Pens._ 88), is used by Milton with a literal reference
 to the cosmical framework as a whole (see _Hymn Nat._ 48) or to some
 portion of it. In Shakespeare 'sphere' occurs in the wider sense of 'the
 path in which anything moves,' and it is to this metaphorical use of the
 word that we owe such phrases as 'a person's sphere of life,' 'sphere of
 action,' etc. See also _Comus_, 112-4, 241-3, 1021; _Arc._ 62-7; _Par.
 Lost_, v. 618; where there are references to the music of the spheres.
 
 4. ~mild~: an attributive of the whole clause, 'regions of calm and serene
 air.' ~calm and serene~. These are not mere synonyms: the Lat. _serenus_ =
 bright or unclouded, so that the two epithets are to be respectively
 contrasted with 'smoke' and 'stir' (line 5); 'calm' being opposed to
 'stir' and 'serene' to 'smoke.' Compare Homer's description of the seat
 of the gods: "Not by wind is it shaken, nor ever wet with rain, nor doth
 the snow come nigh thereto, but _most clear_ air is spread about it
 _cloudless_, and the white light floats over it," _Odyssey_, vi.: comp.
 note, l. 977.
 
 5. ~this dim spot~. The Spirit describes the Earth as it appears to those
 immortal shapes whose presence he has just quitted.
 
 6. There are here two attributive clauses: "which men call Earth" and
 "(in which) men strive," etc. ~low-thoughted care~; narrow-minded anxiety,
 care about earthly things. Comp. the form of the adjective 'low-browed,'
 _L'Alleg._ 8: both epithets are borrowed by Pope in his _Eloisa_.
 
 7. This line is attributive to 'men.' ~pestered ... pinfold~, crowded
 together in this cramped space, the Earth. _Pester_, which has no
 connection with _pest_, is a shortened form of _impester_, Fr.
 _empetrer_, to shackle a horse by the foot when it is at pasture. The
 radical sense is that of clogging (comp. _Son._ xii. 1); hence of
 crowding; and finally of annoyance or encumbrance of any kind. 'Pinfold'
 is strictly an enclosure in which stray cattle are _pounded_ or shut up:
 etymologically, the word = _pind-fold_, a corruption of _pound-fold_.
 Comp. _impound_, sheep-_fold_, etc.
 
 8. ~frail and feverish~. Comp. "life's fitful fever" (_Macbeth_, iii. 2.
 23). This line, like several of the adjacent ones, is alliterative.
 
 9. ~crown that Virtue gives~. This is Scriptural language: comp. _Rev._
 iv. 4; 2 _Tim._ iv. 8, "Henceforth there is laid up for me the crown of
 righteousness."
 
 10. ~this mortal change~. In Milton's MS. line 7 was followed by the
 words, 'beyond the written date of mortal change,' _i.e._ beyond, or
 after, man's appointed time to die. These words were struck out, but we
 may suppose that the words 'mortal change' in line 10 have a similar
 meaning. Milton frequently uses 'mortal' in the sense of 'liable to
 death,' and hence 'human' as opposed to 'divine': the mortal change is
 therefore 'the change which occurs to all human beings.' Comp. _Job_,
 xiv. 14: "all the days of my appointed time will I wait, till my
 _change_ come": see also line 841. Prof. Masson takes it to mean 'this
 mortal state of life,' as distinguished from a future state of
 immortality. The Spirit uses 'this' as in line 8, in contrast with
 'those,' line 2.
 
 11. ~enthroned gods~, etc. In allusion to _Rev._ iv. 4, "And upon the
 thrones I saw four and twenty elders sitting, arrayed in white garments;
 and on their heads crowns of gold." Milton frequently speaks of the
 inhabitants of heaven as _enthroned_. The accent here falls on the first
 syllable of the word.
 
 12. ~Yet some there be~, etc.: 'Although men are generally so exclusively
 occupied with the cares of this life, there are nevertheless a few who
 aspire,' etc. _Be_ is here purely indicative. This usage is frequent in
 Elizabethan English, and still survives in parts of England. Comp.
 _Lines on Univ. Carrier_, ii. 25, where it occurs in a similar phrase,
 "there be that say 't": also lines 519, 668. It is employed to refer to
 a number of persons or things, regarded as a class. ~by due steps~,
 _i.e._ by the steps that are due or appointed: comp. '_due_ feet,' _Il
 Pens._ 155. _Due_, _duty_, and _debt_ are all from Lat. _debitus_, owed.
 
 13. ~their just hands~. 'Just' belongs to the predicate: 'to lay their
 just hands' = to lay their hands with justice. ~golden key~. Comp. _Matt._
 xvi. 19, "I will give unto thee the _keys_ of the kingdom of heaven";
 also _Lyc._ 111:
 
     "Two massy keys he bore of metals twain
     (The _golden_ opes, the iron shuts amain)."
 
 15. ~errand~: comp. _Par. Lost_, iii. 652, "One of the seven Who in God's
 presence, nearest to his throne, Stand ready at command, and are his
 eyes That run through all the Heavens, or down to the Earth Bear his
 swift _errands_": also vii. 579. ~but for such~, _i.e._ unless it were for
 such.
 
 16. 'I would not sully the purity of my heavenly garments with the
 noisome vapour of this sin-corrupted earth.' ~ambrosial~, heavenly; also
 used by Milton in the sense of 'conferring immortality': comp. l. 840;
 _Par. Lost_, ii. 245; iv. 219, "blooming _ambrosial_ fruit."
 'Ambrosial,' like 'amaranthus' (_Lyc._ 149), is cognate with the
 Sanskrit _amrita_, undying; and is applied by Homer to the hair of the
 gods: similarly in Tennyson's _Oenone_, 174: see also _In Memoriam_,
 lxxxvi. Ben Jonson (_Neptune's Triumph_) has 'ambrosian hands,' _i.e._
 hands fit for a deity. Ambrosia was the food of the gods. ~weeds~: now
 used chiefly in the phrase "widow's weeds," _i.e._ mourning garment.
 Milton and Shakespeare use it in the general sense of garment or
 covering: in the lines _On the Death of a Fair Infant_, it is applied to
 the human body itself; comp. also _M. N. D._ ii. 1. 255, "_Weed_ wide
 enough to wrap a fairy in." See also _Comus_, 189, 390.
 
 18. ~But to my task~, _i.e._ but I must proceed to my task: see l. 1012.
 
 19. ~every ... each~. It is usual to write _every ... every_, or _each ...
 each_, but Milton occasionally uses 'every' and 'each' together: comp.
 l. 311 and _Lyc._ 93, "_every_ gust ... off _each_ beaked promontory."
 _Every_ denotes each without exception, and can now only be used with
 reference to more than two objects; _each_ may refer to two or more.
 
 20. ~by lot~, etc. When Saturn (Kronos) was dethroned, his empire of the
 universe was distributed amongst his three sons, Jupiter ('high' Jove),
 Neptune (the god of the Sea), and Pluto ('nether' or Stygian Jove). In
 _Iliad_ xv. Neptune (Poseidon) says: "For three brethren are we, and
 sons of Kronos, whom Rhea bare ... And in three lots are all things
 divided, and each drew a domain of his own, and to me fell the hoary
 sea, to be my habitation for ever, when we shook the lots." ~nether~,
 lower: comp. the phrase 'the upper and the nether lip,' and the name
 Netherlands. Hell, the abode of Pluto, is called by Milton 'the nether
 empire' (_Par. Lost_, ii. 295). The form _nethermost_ (_Par. Lost_, ii.
 955) is, like _aftermost_ and _foremost_, a double superlative.
 
 21. ~sea-girt isles~. Ben Jonson calls Britain a 'sea-girt isle': comp. l.
 27. _Isle_ is the M.E. _ile_, in which form the _s_ has been dropped: it
 is from O.F. _isle_, Lat. _insula_. It is therefore distinct from
 _island_, where an _s_ has, by confusion, been inserted. Island = M.E.
 _iland_, A.S. _igland_ (_ig_ = island: _land_ = land). In line 50 Milton
 wrote 'iland.'
 
 22. ~like to rich and various gems~, etc. Shakespeare describes England as
 a 'precious stone set in the silver sea,' _Richard II._ ii. 1. 46: he
 also speaks of Heaven as being _inlayed_ with stars, _Cym._ v. 5. 352;
 _M. of V._ v. 1. 59, "Look how the floor of heaven Is thick _inlaid_
 with patines of bright gold." Compare also _Par. Lost_, iv. 700, where
 Milton refers to the ground as having a rich _inlay_ of flowers. But for
 its inlay of islands the sea would be bare or unadorned. ~like~: here
 followed by the preposition _to_, and having its proper force as an
 adjective: comp. _Il Pens._ 9. Whether _like_ is used as an adjective
 or an adverb, the preposition is now usually omitted: comp. l. 57.
 
 24. ~to grace~, _i.e._ to show favour to: a clause of purpose.
 
 25. ~By course commits~, etc., _i.e._ "In regular distribution he commits
 to each his distinct government." ~several~: separate or distinct.
 Radically _several_ is from the verb _sever_: it is now used only with
 plural nouns.
 
 26. ~sapphire~. This colour is again associated with the sea in line 29:
 see note there.
 
 27. ~little tridents~, in contrast with that of Neptune, who, "with his
 trident touched the stars" (_Neptune's Triumph, Proteus' Song_, Ben
 Jonson).
 
 28. ~greatest and the best~. Comp. Shakespeare's eulogy in _Rich. II._ ii.
 1: also Ben Jonson's "Albion, Prince of all his Isles," _Neptune's
 Triumph, Apollo's Song_.
 
 29. ~quarters~, divides into distinct regions. Comp. Dryden, _Georg. I._
 208:
 
     "Sailors _quarter'd_ Heaven, and found a name
     For every fixt and ev'ry wandering star."
 
 Some would take the word as strictly denoting division into _four_
 parts: "at that time the island was actually divided into four separate
 governments: for besides those at London and Edinburgh, there were Lords
 President of the North and of Wales." (Keightley). ~blue-haired deities~.
 These must be distinct from the tributary gods who wield their little
 tridents (line 27), otherwise the thought would ill accord with the
 complimentary nature of lines 30-36. Regarding the epithet 'blue-haired'
 Masson asks: "Can there be a recollection of blue as the British colour,
 inherited from the old times of blue-stained Britons who fought with
 Caesar? Green-haired is the usual epithet for Neptune and his
 subordinates": in Spenser, for example, the sea-nymphs have long green
 hair. But Ovid expressly calls the sea-deities _caerulei dii_, and
 Neptune _caeruleus deus_, thus associating blue with the sea.
 
 30. 'And all this region that looks towards the West (_i.e._ Wales) is
 entrusted to a noble peer of great integrity and power.' The peer
 referred to is the Earl of Bridgewater. As Lord President he was
 entrusted with the civil and military administration of Wales and the
 four English counties of Gloucester, Worcester, Hereford, and
 Shropshire. That he was a nobleman of high character is shown by the
 fact that from 1617, when he was nominated one of "his Majestie's
 Counsellors," he had continued to serve in various important public and
 private offices. On his monument there is the following: "He was a
 profound Scholar, an able Statesman, and a good Christian: he was a
 dutiful Son to his Mother the Church of England in her persecution, as
 well as in her great splendour; a loyal Subject to his Sovereign in
 those worst of times, when it was accounted treason not to be a traitor.
 As he lived 70 years a pattern of virtue, so he died an example of
 patience and piety." ~falling sun~: Lat. _sol occidens_. Orient and
 occident (lit. 'rising' and 'falling') are frequently used to denote the
 East and the West.
 
 31. ~mickle~ (A.S. _micel_) great. From this word comes _much_. 'Mickle'
 and 'muckle' are current in Scotland in the sense of great. Comp. _Rom.
 and Jul._ ii. 3. 15, "O, _mickle_ is the powerful grace that lies In
 herbs," etc.
 
 33. ~An old and haughty nation~. The Welsh are Kelts, an Aryan people who
 probably first entered Britain about B.C. 500: they are therefore
 rightly spoken of as an old nation. Compare Ben Jonson's piece _For the
 Honour of Wales_:
 
     "I is not come here to taulk of Brut,
     From whence the Welse does take his root," etc.
 
 That they were haughty and 'proud in arms' the Romans found, and after
 them the Saxons: the latter never really held more than the counties of
 Monmouth and Hereford. In the reign of Edward I. attempts were made by
 that king to induce the Welsh to come to terms, but the answer of the
 Barons was: "We dare not submit to Edward, nor will we suffer our prince
 to do so, nor do homage to strangers, whose tongue, ways and laws we
 know not of: we have only raised war in defence of our lands, laws and
 rights." By a statute of Henry VIII. this 'haughty' people were put in
 possession of the same rights and liberties as the English. ~proud in
 arms~: this is Virgil's _belloque superbum_, _Aen._ i. 21 (Warton).
 
 34. ~nursed in princely lore~, brought up in a manner worthy of their high
 position. It is to be noted that the Bridgewater family was by birth
 distantly connected with the royal family. Milton may allude merely to
 their connection with the court. _Lore_ is cognate with _learn_.
 
 35. ~their father's state~. This probably refers to the actual ceremonies
 connected with the installation of the Earl as Lord President. The old
 sense of 'state' is 'chair of state': comp. _Arc._ 81, and Jonson's
 _Hymenaei_, "And see where Juno ... Displays her glittering _state and
 chair_."
 
 36. ~new-intrusted~, an adjective compounded of a participle and a simple
 adverb, _new_ being = newly; comp. 'smooth-dittied,' l. 86. Contrast the
 form of the epithet "blue-haired," where the compound adjective is
 formed as if from a noun, "blue-hair": comp. "rushy-fringed," l. 890.
 Strictly speaking, the Earl's power was not 'new-intrusted,' though it
 was newly assumed. See Introduction.
 
 37. ~perplexed~, interwoven, entangled (Lat. _plecto_, to plait or
 twist). The word is here used literally and is therefore applicable to
 inanimate objects. The accent is on the first syllable.
 
 38. ~horror~. This word is meant not merely to indicate terror, but also
 to describe the appearance of the paths. Horror is from Lat. _horrere_,
 to bristle, and may be rendered 'shagginess' or 'ruggedness,' just as
 _horrid_, l. 429, means bristling or rugged. Comp. _Par. Lost_, i. 563,
 "a _horrid_ front Of dreadful length, and dazzling arms." ~shady brows~:
 this may refer to the trees and bushes overhanging the paths, as the
 brow overhangs the eyes.
 
 39. ~Threats~: not current as a verb. ~forlorn~, now used only as an
 adjective, is the past participle of the old verb _forleosen_, to lose
 utterly: the prefix _for_ has an intensive force, as in _forswear_; but
 in the latter word the sense of _from_ is more fully preserved in the
 prefix. See note, l. 234.
 
 40. ~tender age~. Lady Alice Egerton was about fourteen years of age; the
 two brothers were younger than she.
 
 41. ~But that~, etc. Grammatically, _but_ may be regarded as a
 subordinative conjunction = 'unless (it had happened) that I was
 despatched': or, taking it in its original prepositional sense, we may
 regard it as governing the substantive clause, 'that ... guard.' ~quick
 command~: the adjective has the force of an adverb, quick commands being
 commands that are to be carried quickly. ~sovran~, supreme. This is
 Milton's spelling of the modern word _sovereign_, in which the _g_ is
 due to the mistaken notion that the last syllable of the word is cognate
 with _reign_. The word is from Lat. _superanum_ = chief: comp. l. 639.
 
 43. ~And listen why~; _sc._ 'I was despatched.' The language of lines 43,
 44 is suggested by Horace's _Odes_, iii. 1, 2: "Favete linguis; carmina
 non prius Audita ... canto." The poet implies that the plot of his mask
 is original: it is not (he says) to be found in any ancient or modern
 song or tale that was ever recited either in the 'hall' (=
 banqueting-hall) or in the 'bower' (= private chamber). Or 'hall' and
 'bower' may denote respectively the room of the lord and that of his
 lady.
 
 46. Milton in his usual significant manner (comp. _L'Allegro_ and _Il
 Penseroso_), proceeds to invent a genealogy for Comus. The mask is
 designed to celebrate the victory of Purity and Reason over Desire and
 Enchantment. Comus, who represents the latter, must therefore spring
 from parents representing the pleasure of man's lower nature and the
 misuse of man's higher powers on behalf of falsehood and impurity. These
 parents are the wine-god Bacchus and the sorceress Circe. The former,
 mated with Love, is the father of Mirth (see _L'Allegro_); but, mated
 with the cunning Circe, his offspring is a voluptuary whose gay
 exterior and flattering speech hide his dangerously seductive and
 magical powers. He bears no resemblance, therefore, to Comus as
 represented in Ben Jonson's _Pleasure reconciled to Virtue_, in which
 mask "Comus" and "The Belly" are throughout synonymous. In the
 _Agamemnon_ of Aeschylus, Comus is a "drinker of human blood"; in
 Philostratus, he is a rose-crowned wine-bibber; in Dekker he is "the
 clerk of gluttony's kitchen"; in Massinger he is "the god of pleasure";
 and in the work of Erycius Puteanus he is a graceful reveller, the
 genius of love and cheerfulness. Prof. Masson says, "Milton's _Comus_ is
 a creation of his own, for which he was as little indebted intrinsically
 to Puteanus as to Ben Jonson. For the purpose of his masque at Ludlow
 Castle he was bold enough to add a brand-new god, no less, to the
 classic Pantheon, and to import him into Britain." ~Bacchus~, the god who
 taught men the preparation of wine. He is the Greek Dionysus, who, on
 one of his voyages, hired a vessel belonging to some Tyrrhenian pirates:
 these men resolved to sell him as a slave. Thereupon, he changed the
 mast and oars of the ship into serpents and the sailors into dolphins.
 The meeting of Bacchus with Circe is Milton's own invention; in the
 _Odyssey_ it is Ulysses who lights upon her island: "And we came to the
 isle AEaean, where dwelt Circe of the braided tresses, an awful goddess of
 mortal speech, own sister to the wizard AEetes," _Odys._ x. ~from out~,
 etc. Comp. _Par. Lost_, v. 345. 'From out' has the same force as the
 more common 'out from.'
 
 47. ~misused~, abused. The prefix _mis-_ was very generally used by
 Milton; _e.g._ _mislike_, _misdeem_, _miscreated_, _misthought_ (all
 obsolete).
 
 48. ~After the Tuscan mariners transformed~, _i.e._ after the
 transformation of the Tuscan mariners (see Ovid, _Met._ iii.). They are
 called Tuscan, because Tyrrhenia in Central Italy was named Etruria or
 Tuscia by the Romans: Etruria includes modern Tuscany. This grammatical
 construction is common in Latin; a passive participle combined with a
 substantive answering to an English verbal or abstract noun connected
 with another noun by the preposition _of_, and used to denote a fact in
 the past; _e.g._ "since created man" (_P. L._ i. 573) = since the
 creation of man: "this loss recovered" (_P. L._ ii. 21) = the recovery
 of this loss.
 
 49. ~as the winds listed~; at the pleasure of the winds: comp. _John_,
 iii. 8, "the wind bloweth where it _listeth_"; _Lyc._ 123. The verb
 _list_ is, in older English, generally used impersonally, and in Chaucer
 we find 'if thee lust' or 'if thee list' = if it please thee. The word
 survives in the adjective _listless_ of which the older form was
 _lustless_: the noun _lust_ has lost its original and wider sense (which
 it still has in German), and now signifies 'longing desire.'
 
 50. ~On Circe's island fell~. Circe's island = Aeaea, off the coast of
 Latium. Circe was the daughter of Helios (the Sun) by the ocean-nymph
 Perse. On 'island,' see note, l. 21; and with this use of the verb
 _fall_ comp. the Latin _incidere in_. The sudden introduction of the
 interrogative clause in this line is an example of the figure of speech
 called anadiplosis.
 
 51. ~charmed cup~, _i.e._ liquor that has been _charmed_ or rendered
 magical. _Charms_ are incantations or magic verses (Lat. _carmina_):
 comp. lines 526 and 817. Grammatically, 'cup' is the object of 'tasted.'
 
 52. ~Whoever tasted lost~, _i.e._ who tasted (he) lost. In this
 construction _whoever_ must precede both verbs; Shakespeare frequently
 uses _who_ in this sense, and Milton occasionally: comp. _Son._ xii. 12,
 "_who_ loves that must first be wise and good." See Abbott, Sec. 251. ~lost
 his upright shape~. In _Odyssey_ x. we read: "So Circe led them
 (followers of Ulysses) in and set them upon chairs and high seats, and
 made them a mess of cheese and barley-meal and yellow honey with
 Pramnian wine, and mixed harmful drugs with the food to make them
 utterly forget their own country. Now when she had given them the cup
 and they had drunk it off, presently she smote them with a wand, and in
 the styes of the swine she penned them. So they had the head and voice,
 the bristles and the shape of swine, but their mind abode even as of
 old. Thus were they penned there weeping, and Circe flung them acorns
 and mast and fruit of the cornel tree to eat, whereon wallowing swine do
 always batten." (_Butcher and Lang's translation._)
 
 54. ~clustering locks~: comp. l. 608. Milton here pictures the Theban
 Bacchus, a type of manly beauty, having his head crowned with a wreath
 of vine and ivy: both of these plants were sacred to the god. Comp.
 _L'Alleg._ 16, "ivy-crowned Bacchus"; _Par. Lost_, iv. 303; _Sams.
 Agon._ 569.
 
 55. ~his blithe youth~, _i.e._ his fresh young figure.
 
 57. 'A son much like his father, but more like his mother.' This may
 indicate that it is upon Comus's character as a sorcerer rather than as
 a reveller that the story of the mask depends. Comp. _Masque of Hymen_:
 
     "Much of the father's face,
     More of the mother's grace."
 
 58. ~Comus~: see note, l. 46. The Greek word +komos+ denoted a revel or
 merry-making; afterwards it came to mean the personification of riotous
 mirth, the god of Revel. Hence also the word _comedy_. In classical
 mythology the individuality of Comus is not well defined: this enabled
 Milton more readily to endow him with entirely new characteristics.
 
 59. ~frolic~: an instance of the original use of the word as an adjective;
 comp. _L'Alleg._ 18, "frolic wind"; Tennyson's _Ulysses_, "a frolic
 welcome." It is now chiefly used as a noun or a verb, and a new
 adjective, _frolicsome_, has taken its place; from this, again, comes
 the noun _frolicsomeness_. _Frolic_ is from the Dutch, and cognate with
 German _froehlich_, so that _lic_ in 'frolic' corresponds to _ly_ in such
 words as cleanly, godly, etc. ~of~: this use of the preposition may be
 compared with the Latin genitive in such phrases as _aeger animi_ = sick
 of soul; of = 'because of' or 'in respect of.'
 
 60. ~Roving the Celtic and Iberian fields~, _i.e._ roving through Gaul and
 Spain. 'Rove' here governs an accusative: comp. _Lyc._ 173, "walked the
 waves"; _Par. Lost_, i. 521, "roamed the utmost Isles."
 
 61. ~betakes him~. The pronoun has here a reflective force: in Elizabethan
 English, and still more often in Early English, this use of the simple
 pronouns is common (see Abbott, Sec. 223). Compare l. 163. ~ominous~;
 literally = full of omens or portents: comp. 'monstrous' = full of
 monsters (_Lyc._ 158); also l. 79. 'Ominous' has now acquired the sense
 of 'ill-omened'; compare the acquired sense of 'hapless,' 'unfortunate,'
 etc.
 
 65. ~orient~, bright. The Lat. _oriens_ = rising; hence (from being
 applied to the sun) = eastern (l. 30); and hence generally 'bright' or
 'shining': comp. _Par. Lost_, i. 546, "With _orient_ colours waving."
 
 66. ~drouth of Phoebus~, _i.e._ thirst caused by the heat of the sun.
 Phoebus is Apollo, the Sun-god. Compare l. 928, where 'drouth' = want of
 rain; the more usual spelling is _drought_. ~which~: see note, l. 2.
 'Which' is here object of 'taste,' and refers to 'liquor.'
 
 67. ~fond~, foolish (its primary sense). _Fonned_ was the participle of an
 old verb _fonnen_, to be foolish. The word is now used to express great
 liking or affection: the idea of folly being almost entirely lost.
 Chaucer has _fonne_, a fool: comp. _Il Pens._ 6, "fancies _fond_";
 _Lyc._ 56, "I _fondly_ dream"; _Sams. Agon._ 1682, "So _fond_ are mortal
 men."
 
 68. ~Soon as~, etc., _i.e._ as soon as the magical draught produces its
 effect. In line 66 _as_ is temporal. ~potion~. Radically, potion = a
 drink, but it is generally used in the sense of a medicated or poisonous
 draught. _Poison_ is the same word through the French.
 
 69. ~Express resemblance of the gods~. Comp. Shakespeare: "What a piece of
 work is man! ... in action how like an angel, in apprehension, how like a
 god!" See also _Par. Lost_, iii. 44, "human face divine."
 
 71. ~ounce~. This is the _Felis uncia_, allied to the panther and the
 cheetah. Some connect it with the Persian _yuz_, panther.
 
 72. ~All other parts~, etc. In the _Odyssey_ (see note on l. 52) the
 bodies of those transformed by Circe were entirely changed; here only
 the head. As one editor observes, this suited the convenience of the
 performers who were to appear on the stage in masks (see _Stage
 direction_, l. 92-3). Grammatically, line 72 is an example of the
 absolute construction, common in Latin. The noun ('parts') is neither
 the subject nor the object of a verb, but is used along with some
 attributive adjunct--generally a participle ('remaining')--to serve the
 purpose of an adverb or adverbial clause. The noun (or pronoun) is
 usually said to be the nominative absolute; but, in the case of
 pronouns, Milton uses the nominative and the objective indifferently. In
 Old English the dative was used.
 
 73. ~perfect~, complete (Lat. _perfectus_, done thoroughly).
 
 74. ~Not once perceive~, etc. This was not the case with the followers of
 Ulysses: see note, l. 52.
 
 76. ~friends and native home forgot~. Circe's cup has here the effect
 ascribed to the lotus in _Odyssey_ ix. "Now whosoever of them did eat
 the honey-sweet fruit of the lotus had no more wish to bring tidings nor
 to come back, but there he chose to abide with the lotus-eating men,
 ever feeding on the lotus and forgetful of his homeward way." In
 Tennyson's _Lotos-Eaters_ there is no forgetfulness of friends and home:
 "Sweet it was to dream of Fatherland, Of child, and wife and slave."
 Masson also refers to Plato's ethical application of the story (_Rep._
 viii.); "Plato speaks of the moral lotophagus, or youth steeped in
 sensuality, as accounting his very viciousness a developed manhood, and
 the so-called virtues but signs of rusticity." Compare also Spenser, _F.
 Q._ ii. 12. 86, "One above the rest in speciall, That had an hog been
 late, ... did him miscall, That had from hoggish form him brought to
 natural."
 
 77. ~sensual sty~: see note on l. 52. To those who, "with low-thoughted
 care," are "unmindful of the crown that Virtue gives," the world becomes
 little better than a sensual sty. This line is adverbial to _forget_.
 
 78. ~favoured~: compare Lat. _gratus_ = favoured (adj.).
 
 79. ~adventurous~, full of risks. The current sense of 'adventurous,'
 applied only to persons, is "enterprising." See l. 61, 609. ~glade~:
 strictly, an open space in a wood, and hence applied (as here) to the
 wood itself. It is cognate with _glow_ and _glitter_, and its
 fundamental sense is 'a passage for light' (Skeat).
 
 80. ~glancing star~, a shooting star. Comp. _Par. Lost_, iv. 556:
 
           "Swift as a shooting star
     In autumn thwarts the night."
 
 The rhythm of the line and the prevalence of sibilants suit the sense.
 
 81. ~convoy~: comp. _Par. Lost_, vi. 752, "_convoyed_ By four cherubic
 shapes." It is another form of _convey_ (Lat. _con_ = together, _via_ =
 a way).
 
 83. ~sky-robes~: the "ambrosial weeds" of line 16. ~Iris' woof~, material
 dyed in rainbow colours. The goddess Iris was a personification of the
 rainbow: comp. l. 992 and _Par. Lost_, xi. 244, "Iris had dipped the
 woof." Etymologically, _woof_ is connected with _web_ and _weave_: it is
 short for _on-wef_ = on-web, _i.e._ the cross threads laid on the warp
 of a loom.
 
 84. ~weeds~: see note, l. 16.
 
 86. ~That to the service~, etc. The part of the Spirit was acted by Lawes,
 first in "sky-robes," then in shepherd dress. In the dedication of
 _Comus_ by Lawes to Lord Brackley (anonymous edition of 1637), he
 alludes to the favours that had been shown him by the Bridgewater
 family. In the above lines Milton compliments Lawes and enables Lawes to
 compliment the Earl (see Introduction).
 
 86. ~smooth-dittied~: sweetly-worded. 'Ditty' (Lat. _dictatum_) strictly
 denotes the words of a song as distinct from the musical accompaniment;
 it is now applied to any little piece intended to be sung: comp. _Lyc._
 32. For a similar panegyric on Lawes' musical genius compare _Son._
 xiii. The musical alliteration in lines 86-88 should be noted.
 
 87. ~knows to still~, etc.: comp. _Lyc._ 10, "he knew Himself to sing."
 
 88. ~nor of less faith~, etc.; _i.e._ he is not less faithful than he is
 skilful in music; and from the nature of his occupation he is most
 likely to be at hand should any emergency arise.
 
 92. ~viewless~, invisible: comp. _The Passion_, 50, "_viewless_ wing";
 _Par. Lost_, iii. 518. Masson calls this a peculiarly Shakespearian
 word: see _M. for M._ iii. 1. 124, "To be imprisoned in the viewless
 winds." The word is obsolete, but poets use great liberty in the
 formation of adjectives in _-less_: comp. Shelley's _Sensitive Plant_,
 'windless clouds.' See note, l. 574. ~charming-rod~: see note, l. 52: also
 l. 653. ~rout~, a disorderly crowd. The word is also used in the sense of
 'defeat,' and is cognate with _route_, _rote_, and _rut_. All come from
 Lat. _ruptus_, broken: a 'rout' is the breaking up of a crowd, or a
 crowd broken up; a 'route' is a way broken through a forest; 'rote' is a
 beaten track; and a 'rut' is a track left by a wheel. See _Lyc._ 61, "by
 the _rout_ that made the hideous roar."
 
 93. ~star ... fold~, the evening star, Hesperus, an appellation of the
 planet Venus: comp. _Lyc._ 30. As the morning star (called by
 Shakespeare the 'unfolding star'), it is called Phosphorus or Lucifer,
 the light-bringer. Hence Tennyson's allusion:
 
     "Bright Phosphor, fresher for the night,...
     Sweet _Hesper-Phosphor_, double name."--
 
     _In Memoriam_, cxxi.
 
 Lines 93-144 are in rhymed couplets, and consist for the most part of
 eight syllables each. The prevailing accentuation is iambic.
 
 94. ~top of heaven~, etc., _i.e._ is far above the horizon. So in _Lyc._
 31, it is said to slope "toward heaven's _descent_," _i.e._ to sink
 towards the horizon. Comp. Virgil, _Aen._ ii. 250, "Round rolls the sky,
 and on comes Night from the ocean."
 
 95. ~gilded car~: Apollo, as the god of the Sun, rode in a golden chariot.
 Comp. Chaucer, _Test. of Creseide_, 208, "Phoebus' golden cart"; and
 "Phoebus' wain," line 190.
 
 96. ~his glowing axle doth allay~. In the _Hymn of the Nativity_ Milton
 alludes to the "burning axle-tree" of the sun: comp. _Aen._ iv. 482,
 "Atlas _Axem_ umero torquet." There is here an allusion to the opinion
 of the ancients that the setting of the sun in the Atlantic Ocean was
 accompanied with a noise, as of the sea hissing (Todd). 'Allay' would
 thus denote 'quench' or 'cool.' _His_, in this line, = _its_. _Its_
 occurs only three times in Milton's poems, _Od. Nat._ 106; _Par. Lost_,
 i. 254; _Par. Lost_, iv. 813: the word is found also in Lawes'
 dedication of _Comus_. The word does not occur in English at all until
 the end of the sixteenth century, the possessive case of the neuter
 pronoun _it_ and of the masculine _he_ being _his_. This gave rise to
 confusion when the old gender system decayed, and the form _its_
 gradually came into use, until, by the end of the seventeenth century,
 it was in general use. Milton, however, scarcely recognised it, its
 place in his involved syntax being taken by the relative pronouns and
 other connectives, or by _his_, _her_, _thereof_, etc.
 
 97. ~steep Atlantic stream~. To the ancients the Ocean was the great
 _stream_ that encompassed the earth: _Iliad_, xiv., "the deep-flowing
 Okeanos (+bathyrroos+)." With this use of 'steep' compare the phrase
 'the high seas.'
 
 98. ~slope sun~, sun sunk beneath the horizon, so that the only rays
 visible shoot up into the sky. _Slope_ = sloped; also used by Milton as
 an adverb = aslope (_Par. Lost_, iv. 591), and as a verb (_Lyc._ 31).
 
 99. ~dusky~. Milton first wrote 'northern.'
 
 100. ~Pacing toward the other goal~, etc. Comp. _Psalm_ xix. 5: "The sun
 as a bridegroom cometh out of his chamber, and rejoiceth as a strong man
 to run a race."
 
 102. The spirit of lines 102-144 may be contrasted with that of
 _L'Allegro_, 25-40. Both pieces are calls upon Mirth and Pleasure, and
 both are therefore suitably expressed in the same tripping measure and
 with many similarities of language. But the pleasures of _L'Allegro_
 begin with the sun-rise and yet are "unreproved"; those of _Comus_ and
 his crew begin with the darkness and are "unreproved" only if "these dun
 shades will ne'er report" them. The "light fantastic toe" of the one is
 not the "tipsy dance" of the other; and the laughter and liberty that
 betoken the absence of "wrinkled Care" have nothing in common with the
 "midnight shout and revelry" that can be enjoyed only when Rigour,
 Advice, strict Age, and sour Severity have "gone to bed." The "quips and
 cranks" of _L'Allegro_ have given way to the magic rites of _Comus_, and
 the wreathed smiles and dimples that adorn the face of innocent Mirth
 are ill replaced by the wine-dropping "rosy twine" of revelry.
 
 104. ~jollity~: has here its modern sense of boisterous mirth. In Milton
 occasionally the adjective 'jolly' (Fr. _joli_, pretty) has its primary
 sense of pleasing or festive.
 
 105. ~Braid your locks with rosy twine~; 'entwine your hair with wreaths
 of roses.'
 
 106. ~dropping odours~: comp. l. 862-3.
 
 108. ~Advice ... scrupulous head~. 'Advice,' now used chiefly to signify
 counsel given by another, was formerly used also of self-counsel or
 deliberation. See Chaucer, _Prologue_, 786, "granted him without more
 _advice_"; and comp. Shakespeare, _M. of V._ iv. 2. 6, "Bassanio upon
 more _advice_, Hath sent you here this ring"; also _Par. Lost_, ii. 376,
 "_Advise_, if this be worth Attempting," where 'advise' = consider. See
 also l. 755, note. _Scrupulous_ = full of scruples, conscientious.
 
 110. ~saws~, sayings, maxims. _Saw_, _say_, and _saga_ (a Norwegian
 legend) are cognate.
 
 111. ~of purer fire~, _i.e._ having a higher or diviner nature. (Or, as
 there is really no question of degree, we may render the phrase as =
 divine.) Compare the Platonic doctrine that each element had living
 creatures belonging to it, those of fire being the gods; similarly the
 Stoics held that whatever consisted of _pure fire_ was divine, _e.g._
 the stars: hence the additional significance of line 112.
 
 112. ~the starry quire~: an allusion to the music of the spheres; see
 lines 3, 1021. Pythagoras supposed that the planets emitted sounds
 proportional to their distances from the earth and formed a celestial
 concert too melodious to affect the "gross unpurged ear" of mankind:
 comp. l. 458 and _Arc._ 63-73. Shakespeare (_M. of V._ v. 1. 61) alludes
 to the music of the spheres:
 
     "There's not the smallest orb which thou behold'st
     But in his motion like an angel sings,
     Still quiring to the young-eyed cherubins," etc.
 
 _Quire_ is a form of _choir_ (Lat. _chorus_, a band of singers); in
 Greek tragedy the chorus was supposed to represent the sentiments of the
 audience. _Quire_ (of paper) is a totally different word, probably
 derived from Lat. _quatuor_, four.
 
 113. ~nightly watchful spheres~. Milton elsewhere alludes to the stars
 keeping watch: "And all the spangled host keep watch in order bright,"
 _Hymn Nat._ 21. 'Nightly,' used as an adjective in the sense of
 'nocturnal': comp. _Il Pens._ 84, "To bless the doors from _nightly_
 harm"; _Arc._ 48, "_nightly_ ill"; and Wordsworth's line: "The _nightly_
 hunter lifting up his eyes." Its ordinary sense is "night by night."
 
 114. ~Lead in swift round~. Comp. _Arc._ 71: "And the low world in
 measured motion draw, After the heavenly tune."
 
 115. ~sounds~, straits: A.S. _sund_, a strait of the sea, so called
 because it could be _swum_ across. See Skeat, _Etym. Dict._ _s.v._
 
 116. ~to the moon~, _i.e._ as affected by the moon. For similar uses of
 'to,' comp. _Lyc._ 33, "tempered _to_ the oaten flute"; _Lyc._ 44,
 "fanning their joyous leaves _to_ thy soft lays." ~morrice~. The waters
 quiver in the moonlight as if dancing. The morrice = a morris or Moorish
 dance, brought into Spain by the Moors, and thence introduced into
 England by John of Gaunt. We read also of a "morris-pike"--a weapon used
 by the Moors in Spain.
 
 117. ~shelves~, flat ledges of rock.
 
 118. ~pert~, lively. Here used in its radical sense (being a form of
 _perk_, smart): its modern sense is 'forward' or 'impertinent.' Skeat
 points out that _perk_ and _pert_ were both used as verbs; _e.g._
 "_perked_ up in a glistering grief," _Henry VIII._ ii. 3. 21: "how it (a
 child) speaks, and looks, and _perts_ up the head," Beaumont and
 Fletcher's _Knight of the Burning Pestle_, i. 1. A similar change of _k_
 into _t_ is seen in E. _mate_ from M.E. _make_. ~dapper~, quick (Du.
 _dapper_, Ger. _tapfer_, brave, quick). It is usual in the sense of
 'neat.'
 
 119. ~dimple~. _Dimple_ is a diminutive of _dip_, and cognate with
 _dingle_ and _dapple_.
 
 120. ~daisies trim~: comp. _L'Alleg._ 75, "Meadows _trim_, with daisies
 pied"; _Il Pens._ 50, "_trim_ gardens."
 
 121. ~wakes~, night-watches (A.S. _niht-wacu_, a night wake). The
 adjective _wakeful_ (A.S. _wacol_) is the exact cognate of the Latin
 _vigil_. The word was applied to the vigil kept at the dedication of a
 church, then to the feast connected therewith, and finally to an evening
 merry-making. ~prove~, test, judge of (Lat. _probare_). This is its sense
 in older writers and in the much-misunderstood phrase--"the exception
 _proves_ the rule," which means that the exception is a test of the
 rule.
 
 124. ~Venus now wakes~, etc. Spenser, _Brit. Ida_, ii. 3, has "Night is
 Love's holyday." In this line ~wakens~ is used transitively, its object
 being 'Love.'
 
 125. ~rights~. Here used, as sometimes by Spenser, where modern usage
 requires _rites_ (Lat. _ritus_, a custom): see l. 535.
 
 126. ~daylight ... sin~. Daylight makes sin by revealing it. Contrast the
 sentiment of Comus with that of Milton in _Par. Lost_, i. 500, "When
 night Darkens the streets, then wander forth the sons Of Belial."
 
 127. ~dun shades~: evidently suggested by Fairfax's _Tasso_, ix. 62, "The
 horrid darkness, and the shadows _dun_." 'Dun' is A.S. _dunn_, dark.
 
 129. ~Cotytto~, the goddess of Licentiousness: here called 'dark-veiled'
 because her midnight orgies were veiled in darkness. She was a Thracian
 divinity, and her worshippers were called Baptae ('sprinkled'), because
 the ceremony of initiation involved the sprinkling of warm water.
 
 131. ~called~, invoked. ~dragon-womb Of Stygian darkness~. The Styx (= 'the
 abhorred') was the chief river in the lower world. Milton here speaks of
 darkness as something positive, ejected from the womb of Night, Night
 being represented as a monster of the lower regions: comp. _Par. Lost_,
 i. 63. The pronoun 'her' shows that 'womb' is here used in its strict
 sense, but in _Par. Lost_, i. 673, "in his _womb_ was hid metallic ore,"
 it has the more general sense of "interior": comp. the use of Lat.
 _uterus_, _Aen._ ii. 258, vii. 499. ~dragon~: Shakespeare refers to the
 dragons or 'dragon car' of night, _Cym._ ii. 2. 48, "Swift, swift, you
 _dragons_ of the night"; _Tro. and Cress._ v. 8. 17, "The _dragon_ wing
 of night o'erspreads the earth"; see also _Il Pens._ 59, "Cynthia checks
 her dragon yoke."
 
 132. ~spets~, a form of _spits_ (as _spettle_ for _spittle_).
 
 133. ~one blot~, _i.e._ a universal blot: comp. _Macbeth_, ii. 2. 63.
 Milton first wrote, "And makes a blot of nature."
 
 134. ~Stay~, here used causally = check. The radical sense of the word is
 'to support,' as in the substantive _stay_ and its plural _stays_. ~ebon~,
 black as ebony. Ebony is so called because it is hard as a stone (Heb.
 _eben_, a stone); and the wood being of a dark colour, the name has
 become a synonym both for hardness and for blackness.
 
 135. ~Hecat'~, _i.e._ Hecate (as in line 535): a mysterious Thracian
 divinity, afterwards regarded as the goddess of witchcraft: for these
 reasons a fit companion for Cotytto and a fit patroness of Comus. Jonson
 calls her "the mistress of witches." She was supposed to send forth at
 night all kinds of demons and phantoms, and to wander about with the
 souls of the dead and amidst the howling of dogs.
 
 136. ~utmost end~, full completion. Compare _L'Alleg._ 109, "the corn
 That ten day-labourers could not _end_," where 'end' = 'complete.'
 
 137. ~dues~: see note, l. 12.
 
 138. ~blabbing eastern scout~, _i.e._ the tale-telling spy that comes from
 the East, viz. Morning.
 
 139. ~nice~; hard to please, fastidious: "a finely chosen epithet,
 expressing at once _curious_ and _squeamish_" (Hurd). It is used by
 Comus in contempt: comp. ii. _Henry IV._ iv. 1, "Hence, therefore, thou
 _nice_ crutch"; and see the index to the Globe _Shakespeare_. ~the Indian
 steep~. In his _Elegia Tertia_ Milton represents the sun as the
 "light-bringing king" whose home is on the shores of the Ganges (_i.e._
 in the far East): comp. "the Indian mount," _Par. Lost_, i. 781, and
 Tennyson's _In Memoriam_, xxvi., "ere yet the morn Breaks hither over
 _Indian_ seas."
 
 140. ~cabined loop-hole~: an allusion to the first glimpse of dawn, _i.e._
 the peep of day. Comp. "Out of her window close she blushing peeps,"
 said of the morning (P. Fletcher's _Eclogues_), as if the first rays of
 the sun struggled through some small aperture. 'Cabined,' literally
 'belonging to a cabin,' and therefore small.
 
 141. ~tell-tale Sun~. Compare Spenser, _Brit. Ida_, ii. 3,
 
     "The thick-locked boughs shut out the _tell-tale_ sun,
     For Venus hated his _all-blabbing_ light."
 
 Shakespeare refers to "the tell-tale day" (_R. of L._ 806). In
 _Odyssey_, viii., we read how Helios (the sun) kept watch and informed
 Vulcan of Venus's love for Mars. ~descry~, etc., _i.e._ make known our
 hidden rites. 'Descry' is here used in its primary sense = _describe_:
 both words are from Lat. _describere_, to write fully. In Milton and
 Shakespeare 'descry' also occurs in the sense of 'to reconnoitre.'
 
 142. ~solemnity~, ceremony, rite. The word is from Lat. _sollus_,
 complete, and _annus_, a year; 'solemn' = _solennis_ = _sollennis_.
 Hence the changes of meaning: (1) recurring at the end of a completed
 year; (2) usual; (3) religious, for sacred festivals recur at stated
 intervals; (4) that which is not to be lightly undertaken, _i.e._
 serious or important.
 
 143. ~knit hands~, etc. Comp. _Masque of Hymen_:
 
     "Now, now begin to set
     Your spirits in active heat;
     And, since your hands are met,
     Instruct your nimble feet,
     In motions swift and meet,
     The happy ground to beat."
 
 144. ~light fantastic round~: comp. _L'Alleg._ 34, "Come, and trip it, as
 you go, On the light fantastic toe." A round is a dance or 'measure' in
 which the dancers join hands, 'Fantastic' = full of fancy, unrestrained.
 So Shakespeare uses it of that which has merely been imagined, and has
 not yet happened. It is now used in the sense of grotesque. _Fancy_ is a
 form of _fantasy_ (Greek _phantasia_).
 
 At this point in the mask Comus and his rout dance a measure, after
 which he again speaks, but in a different strain. The change is marked
 by a return to blank verse: the previous lines are mostly in
 octosyllabic couplets.
 
 145. ~different~, _i.e._ different from the voluptuous footing of Comus
 and his crew.
 
 146. ~footing~: comp. _Lyc._ 103, "Camus, reverend sire, went _footing_
 slow."
 
 147. ~shrouds~, coverts, places of hiding. The word etymologically denotes
 'something cut off,' being allied to 'shred'; hence a garment; and
 finally (as in Milton) any covering or means of covering. Many of
 Latimer's sermons are described as having been "preached in The
 Shrouds," a covered place near St. Paul's Cathedral. The modern use of
 the word is restricted: comp. l. 316. ~brakes~, bushes. Shakespeare has
 "hawthorn-_brake_," _M. N. D._ iii. l. 3, and the word seems to be
 connected with _bracken_.
 
 148. ~Some virgin sure~, _sc._ 'it is.'
 
 150. ~charms ... wily trains~; _i.e._ spells ... cunning allurements.
 _Charm_ is the Lat. _carmen_, a song, also used in the sense of 'magic
 verses'; wily = full of _wile_ (etymologically the same as guile).
 _Train_ here denotes an artifice or snare as in 'venereal trains'
 (_Sams. Agon._ 533): "Oh, _train_ me not, sweet mermaid, with thy note"
 (_Com. of Errors_, iii. 2. 45). See Index, Globe _Shakespeare_. Some
 would take 'wily trains' as = trains of wiles.
 
 151. ~ere long~: _ere_ has here the force of a preposition; in A.S. it was
 an adverb as well = soon, but now it is used only as a conjunction or a
 preposition.
 
 153. ~Thus I hurl~, etc. "Conceive that at this moment of the performance
 the actor who personates Comus flings into the air, or makes a gesture
 as if flinging into the air, some powder, which, by a stage-device, is
 kindled so as to produce a flash of blue light. In the original draft
 among the Cambridge MSS. the phrase is _powdered spells_; but Milton, by
 a judicious change, concealing the mechanism of the stage-trick,
 substituted _dazzling_" (Masson).
 
 154. ~dazzling~. This implies both brightness and illusion. ~spells~. A
 _spell_ is properly a magical form of words (A.S. _spel_, a saying):
 here it refers to the whole enchantment employed. ~spongy air~: so called
 because it holds in suspension the magic powder.
 
 155. ~Of power to cheat ... and (to) give~, etc. These lines are
 attributive to 'spells.' The preposition 'of' is thus used to denote a
 characteristic; thus 'of power' = powerful; comp. l. 677. ~blear
 illusion~; deception, that which deceives by _blurring_ the vision.
 Shakespeare has 'bleared thine eye' = dimmed thy vision, deceived (_Tam.
 Shrew_, v. 1. 120). Comp. "This may stand for a pretty superficial
 argument, to _blear_ our eyes, and lull us asleep in security" (Sir W.
 Raleigh). _Blur_ is another form of _blear_.
 
 156. ~presentments~, appearances. This word is to be distinguished from
 _presentiment_. A presentiment is a "fore-feeling" (Lat. _praesentire_):
 while a presentment is something presented (Lat. _praesens_, being
 before). Shakespeare, _Ham._ iii. 4. 54, has 'presentment' in the sense
 of picture. ~quaint habits~, unfamiliar dress. Quaint is from Lat.
 _cognitus_, so that its primary sense is 'known' or 'remarkable.' In
 French it became _coint_, which was treated as if from Lat. _comptus_,
 neat; hence the word is frequent in the sense of neat, exact, or
 delicate. Its modern sense is 'unusual' or 'odd.'
 
 158. ~suspicious flight~: flight due to suspicion of danger.
 
 160. ~I, under fair pretence~, etc.: 'Under the mask of friendly
 intentions and with the plausible language of wheedling courtesy, I
 insinuate myself into the unsuspecting mind and ensnare it.'
 
 161. ~glozing~, flattering, wheedling. Compare _Par. Lost_, ix. 549,
 
     "So _glozed_ the temper, and his proem tuned:
     Into the heart of Eve his words made way."
 
 _Gloze_ is from the old word _glose_, a gloss or explanation (Gr.
 _glossa_, the tongue): hence also glossary, glossology, etc. Trench, in
 his lecture on the Morality of Words, points out how often fair names
 are given to ugly things: it is in this way that a word which merely
 denoted an explanation has come to denote a false explanation, an
 endeavour to deceive. The word has no connection with _gloss_ =
 brightness.
 
 162. ~Baited~, rendered attractive. Radically _bait_ is the causative of
 _bite_; hence a trap is said to be baited. Comp. _Sams. Ag._ 1066, "The
 _bait_ of honied words."
 
 163. ~wind me~, etc. The verbs _wind_ (_i.e._ coil) and _hug_ suggest the
 cunning of the serpent. The easy-hearted man is the person whose heart
 or mind is easily overcome: 'man' is here used generically. Burton, in
 _Anat. of Mel._, says: "The devil, being a slender incomprehensible
 spirit, can easily insinuate and _wind_ himself into human bodies."
 _Me_ is here used reflexively: see note, l. 61. This is not the ethic
 dative.
 
 165. ~virtue~, _i.e._ power or influence (Lat. _virtus_). This radical
 sense is still found in the phrase 'by virtue of' = by the power of. The
 adjective _virtuous_ is now used only of moral excellence: in line 621
 it has its older meaning.
 
 166. The reading of the text is that of the editions of 1637 and 1645.
 In the edition of 1673 the reading was:
 
     "I shall appear some harmless villager,
     And hearken, if I may, her business here.
     But here she comes, I fairly step aside."
 
 But in the errata there was a direction to omit the comma after _may_,
 and to change _here_ into _hear_. In Masson's text, accordingly, he
 reads: "And hearken, if I may her business hear."
 
 167. ~keeps up~, etc., _i.e._ keeps occupied with his country affairs even
 up to a late hour. _Gear_: its original sense is 'preparation' (A.S.
 _gearu_, ready); hence 'business' or 'property.' Comp. Spenser, _F. Q._
 vi. 3. 6, "That to Sir Calidore was _easy gear_," _i.e._ an easy matter,
 fairly, softly. _Fair_ and _softly_ were two words which went together,
 signifying _gently_ (Warton).
 
 170. ~mine ear ... My best guide~. Observe the juxtaposition of _mine_ and
 _my_ in these lines. _Mine_ is frequent before a vowel, especially when
 the possessive adjective is not emphatic. In Shakespeare 'mine' is
 almost always found before "eye," "ear," etc., where no emphasis is
 intended (Abbott, Sec. 237).
 
 171. ~Methought~, _i.e._ it seemed to me. In the verb 'methinks' _me_ is
 the dative, and _thinks_ is an impersonal verb (A.S. _thincan_, to
 appear), quite distinct from the causal verb 'I think,' which is from
 A.S. _thencan_, to make to appear.
 
 173. ~jocund~, merry. Comp. _L'Allegro_, 94, "the _jocund_ rebecks sound."
 ~gamesome~, lively. This word, like many other adjectives in _-some_, is
 now less common than it was in Elizabethan English: many such adjectives
 are obsolete, _e.g._ laboursome, joysome, quietsome, etc. (see Trench's
 _English, Past and Present_, v.).
 
 174. ~unlettered hinds~, ignorant rustics (A.S. _hina_, a domestic).
 
 175. ~granges~, granaries, barns (Lat. _granum_, grain). The word is now
 applied to a farm-house with its outhouses.
 
 176. ~Pan~, the god of everything connected with pastoral life: see _Arc._
 106, "Though Syrinx your Pan's mistress were."
 
 177. ~thank the gods amiss~. _Amiss_ stands for M.E. _on misse_ = in
 error. "Perhaps there is a touch of Puritan rigour in this. The gods
 should be thanked in solemn acts of devotion, and not by merry-making"
 (Keightley). See Introduction.
 
 178. ~swilled insolence~, etc., _i.e._ the drunken rudeness of those
 carousing at this late hour. _Swill_: to swill is to drink greedily,
 hence to drink like a pig. ~wassailers~; from 'wassail' [A.S. _waes hael_;
 from _wes_, be thou, and _hal_, whole (modern English _hale_)], a form
 of salutation, used in drinking one's health; and hence employed in the
 sense of 'revelling' or 'carousing.' The 'wassail-bowl' here referred to
 is the "spicy nutbrown ale" of _L'Allegro_, 100. In Scott's _Ivanhoe_,
 the Friar drinks to the Black Knight with the words, "_Waes hale_, Sir
 Sluggish Knight," the Knight replying "Drink _hale_, Holy Clerk."
 
 180. ~inform ... feet~. Comp. _Sams. Agon._ 335: "hither hath _informed_
 your younger _feet_." This use of 'inform' (= direct) is well
 illustrated in Spenser's _F. Q._ vi. 6: "Which with sage counsel, when
 they went astray, He could _enforme_, and then reduce aright."
 
 184. ~spreading favour~. Epithet transferred from cause to effect.
 
 187. ~kind hospitable woods~: an instance of the pathetic fallacy which
 attributes to inanimate objects the feelings of men: comp. ll. 194, 195.
 _As_ in this line (after _such_) has the force of a relative pronoun.
 
 188. ~grey-hooded Even~. Comp. "sandals grey," _Lyc._ 187; "civil-suited,"
 _Il Pens._ 122; both applied to morning.
 
 189. ~a sad votarist~, etc. A votarist is one who is bound by a vow (Lat.
 _votum_): the current form is _votary_, applied in a general sense to
 one _devoted_ to an object, _e.g._ a votary of science. In the present
 case, the votarist is a _palmer_, _i.e._ a pilgrim who carried a
 palm-branch in token of his having been to Palestine. Such would
 naturally wear sober-coloured or homely garments: comp. Drayton, "a
 palmer poor in homely russet clad." In _Par. Reg._ xiv. 426, Morning is
 a pilgrim clad in "amice grey." On ~weed~, see note, l. 16.
 
 190. ~hindmost wheels~: comp. l. 95: "If this fine image is optically
 realised, what we see is Evening succeeding Day as the figure of a
 venerable grey-hooded mendicant might slowly follow the wheels of some
 rich man's chariot" (Masson).
 
 192. ~labour ... thoughts~, the burden of my thoughts.
 
 193. ~engaged~, committed: this use of the word may be compared with that
 in _Hamlet_, iii. 3. 69, "Art more _engaged_" (= bound or entangled). To
 _engage_ is to bind by a _gage_ or pledge.
 
 195. ~stole~, stolen. This use of the past form for the participle is
 frequent in Elizabethan English. ~Else~, etc. The meaning is: 'The envious
 darkness must have stolen my brothers, _otherwise_ why should night hide
 the light of the stars?' The clause 'but for some felonious end' is
 therefore to some extent tautological.
 
 197. ~dark lantern~. The stars by a far-fetched metaphor are said to be
 concealed, though not extinguished, just as the light of a dark lantern
 is shut off by a slide. Comp. More; "Vice is like a _dark lanthorn_,
 which turns its bright side only to him that bears it."
 
 198. ~everlasting oil~. Comp. _F. Q._ i. 1. 57:
 
     "By this the eternal lamps, wherewith high Jove
     Doth light the lower world, were half yspent:"
 
 also _Macbeth_, ii. 1. 5, "There's husbandry in heaven; Their candles
 are all out." There is here an irregularity of syntax. "That Nature hung
 in heaven" is a relative clause co-ordinate _in sense_ with the next
 clause; but by a change of thought the phrase "and filled their lamps"
 is treated as a principal clause, and a new object is introduced: comp.
 l. 6.
 
 203. ~rife~, prevalent. ~perfect~, distinct; see note, l. 73.
 
 204. ~single darkness~, darkness only. _Single_ is from the same base as
 _simple_; comp. l. 369.
 
 205. ~What might this be?~ This is a direct question about a past event,
 and has the same meaning as "what should it be?" in line 482: see note
 there. ~A thousand fantasies~, etc. On this, passage Lowell says: "That
 wonderful passage in _Comus_ of the airy tongues, perhaps the most
 imaginative in suggestion he ever wrote, was conjured out of a dry
 sentence in Purchas's abstract of Marco Polo. Such examples help us to
 understand the poet." Reference may also be made to the _Anat. of Mel._:
 "Fear makes our imagination conceive what it list, ... and tyrannizeth
 over our fantasy more than all other affections, especially in the
 dark"; also to the song prefixed to the same work, "My phantasie
 presents a thousand ugly shapes," etc. On the power of imagination or
 phantasy, Shakespeare says:
 
                       "As imagination bodies forth
     The forms of things unknown, the poet's pen
     Turns them to _shapes_, and gives to _airy nothing_
     A local habitation and a name."--
 
     _M. N. D._ v. 1. 14.
 
 Compare also Ben Jonson's _Vision of Delight_:
 
     "Break, Phant'sie, from thy cave of cloud,
     And spread thy purple wings;
     Now all thy figures are allow'd,
     And various shapes of things:
     Create of _airy forms_ a stream ...
     And though it be a waking dream," etc.
 
 207. ~Of calling shapes~, etc. In Heywood's _Hierarchy of Angels_ there is
 a reference to travellers seeing strange shapes beckoning to them. Such
 words as 'shapes,' 'shadows,' 'airy tongues,' etc., illustrate Milton's
 power to create an indefinite, yet expressive picture. Comp. _Aen._ iv.
 460. ~beckoning shadows dire~. A characteristic arrangement of words in
 Milton: comp. lines 470, 945.
 
 208. ~syllable~, pronounce distinctly.
 
 210. ~may startle well~, may well startle.
 
 212. ~siding champion, Conscience~. To side is to take a side, and hence
 to assist: comp. _Cor._ iv. 2. 2: "The nobles who have _sided_ in his
 behalf." 'Conscience' (here a trisyllable) is used in its current sense:
 in _Son._ xxii. 10 it means consciousness. Comp. _Hen. VIII._ iii. 2.
 379: "A peace above all earthly dignities, A still and quiet
 Conscience."
 
 213. ~pure-eyed Faith~. Comp. _Lyc._ 81, "those pure eyes And perfect
 witness of all-judging Jove"; also the Scriptural words, "God is of
 purer eyes than to behold iniquity." The maiden, whose safeguard is her
 purity, calls on Faith, Hope, and Chastity, each being characterised by
 an epithet denoting purity of thought and act, viz. 'pure-eyed,'
 'white-handed,' and 'unblemished.' The placing of Chastity instead of
 Charity in the trio is significant: see i. _Cor._ xiii.
 
 214. ~hovering angel~. Hope hovers over the maiden to protect her. The
 word 'hover' is found frequently in the sense of 'shelter.' girt,
 surrounded. ~golden wings~. In _Il Pens._ 52, Contemplation "soars on
 golden wing."
 
 216. ~see ye visibly~, _i.e._ you are not mere shapes, but living
 presences. _Ye_: here the object of the verb. "This confusion between
 _ye_ and _you_ did not exist in old English; _ye_ was always used as a
 nominative, and _you_ as a dative or accusative. In the English Bible
 the distinction is very carefully observed, but in the dramatists of the
 Elizabethan period there is a very loose use of the two forms" (Morris).
 It is so in Milton, who has _ye_ as nominative, accusative, and dative;
 comp. lines 513, 967, 1020; also _Arc._ 40, 81, 101. It may be noted
 that _ye_ can be pronounced more rapidly than _you_, and is therefore
 frequent when an unaccented syllable is required.
 
 217. ~the Supreme Good~. God being the Supreme Good, if evil exists, it
 must exist for God's purposes. Evil exists for the sake of 'vengeance'
 or punishment.
 
 219. ~glistering guardian~, _i.e._ one clad in the 'pure ambrosial weeds'
 of l. 16. _Glister_, _glisten_, _glitter_, and _glint_ are cognate
 words.
 
 221. ~Was I deceived~? There is a break in the construction at the end of
 line 220. The girl's trust in Heaven is suddenly strengthened by a
 glimpse of light in the dark sky. Warton regards the repetition of the
 same words in lines 223, 224 as beautifully expressing the confidence of
 an unaccusing conscience.
 
 222. ~her~ = its. In Latin _nubes_, a cloud, is feminine.
 
 223. ~does ... turn ... and casts~. Comp. _Il Pens._ 46, 'doth diet' and
 'hears.' When two co-ordinate verbs are of the same tense and mood the
 auxiliary verb should apply to both. The above construction is due
 probably to change of thought.
 
 225. ~tufted grove~. Comp. _L'Alleg._ 78: "bosomed high in _tufted_
 trees."
 
 226. ~hallo~. Also _hallow_ (as in Milton's editions), _halloo_, _halloa_,
 and _holloa_.
 
 227. ~make to be heard~. Make = cause.
 
 228. ~new-enlivened spirits~, _i.e._ my spirits that have been newly
 enlivened: for the form of the compound adjective comp. note, l. 36.
 
 229. ~they~, _i.e._ the brothers.
 
 230. ~Echo~. In classical mythology she was a nymph whom Juno punished by
 preventing her from speaking before others or from being silent after
 others had spoken. She fell in love with Narcissus, and pined away until
 nothing remained of her but her voice. Compare the invocation to Echo in
 Ben Jonson's _Cynthia's Revels_, i. 1.
 
 The lady's song, which has been described as "an address to the very
 Genius of Sound," is here very naturally introduced. The lady wishes to
 rouse the echoes of the wood in order to attract her brothers' notice,
 and she does so by addressing Echo, who grieves for the lost youth
 Narcissus as the lady grieves for her lost brothers.
 
 231. ~thy airy shell~; the atmosphere. Comp. "the hollow round of
 Cynthia's seat," _Hymn Nat._ 103. The marginal reading in the MS. is
 _cell_. Some suppose that 'shell' is here used, like Lat. _concha_,
 because in classical times various musical instruments were made in the
 form of a shell.
 
 232. ~Meander's margent green~. Maeander, a river of Asia Minor,
 remarkable for the windings of its course; hence the verb 'to meander,'
 and hence also (in Keightley's opinion) the mention of the river as a
 haunt of Echo. It is more probable, however, that, as the lady addresses
 Echo as the "Sweet Queen of Parley" and the unhappy lover of the lost
 Narcissus, the river is here mentioned because of its associations with
 music and misfortune. The Marsyas was a tributary of the Maeander, and
 the legend was that the flute upon which Marsyas played in his rash
 contest with Apollo was carried into the Maeander and, after being
 thrown on land, dedicated to Apollo, the god of song. Comp. _Lyc._
 58-63, where the Muses and misfortune are similarly associated by a
 reference to Orpheus, whose 'gory visage' and lyre were carried "down
 the swift Hebrus to the Lesbian shore." Further, the Maeander is
 associated with the sorrows of the maiden Byblis, who seeks her lost
 brother Caunus (called by Ovid _Maeandrius juvenis_). [Since the above
 was written, Prof. J. W. Hales has given the following explanation of
 Milton's allusion: "The real reason is that the Meander was a famous
 haunt of swans, and the swan was a favourite bird with the Greek and
 Latin writers--one to whose sweet singing they perpetually allude"
 (_Athenaeum_, April 20, 1889).] 'Margent.' _Marge_ and _margin_ are
 forms of the same word.
 
 233. ~the violet-embroidered vale~. The notion that flowers _broider_ or
 ornament the ground is common in poetry: comp. _Par. Lost_, iv. 700:
 "Under foot the violet, Crocus, and hyacinth, with rich inlay
 _Broidered_ the ground." In _Lyc._ 148, the flowers themselves wear
 'embroidery.' The nightingale is made to haunt a violet-embroidered vale
 because these flowers are associated with love (see Jonson's _Masque of
 Hymen_) and with innocence (see _Hamlet_, iv. 5. 158: "I would give you
 some violets, but they withered all when my father died"). Prof. Hales,
 however, thinks that some particular vale is here alluded to, and
 argues, with much acumen, that the poet referred to the woodlands close
 by Athens to the north-west, through which the Cephissus flowed, and
 where stood the birthplace of Sophocles, who sings of his native Colonus
 as frequented by nightingales. The same critic regards the epithet
 'violet-embroidered' as a translation of the Greek +iostephanos+ (=
 crowned with violets), frequently applied by Aristophanes to Athens, of
 which Colonus was a suburb. Macaulay also refers to Athens as "the
 violet-crowned city." It is, at least, very probable that Milton might
 here associate the nightingale with Colonus, as he does in _Par. Reg._
 iv. 245: see the following note.
 
 234. ~love-lorn nightingale~, the nightingale whose loved ones are lost:
 comp. Virgil, _Georg._ iv. 511: "As the nightingale wailing in the
 poplar shade plains for her lost young, ... while she weeps the night
 through, and sitting on a bough, reproduces her piteous melody, and
 fills the country round with the plaints of her sorrow." _Lorn_ and
 _lost_ are cognate words, the former being common in the compound
 _forlorn_: see note, l. 39. Milton makes frequent allusion to the
 nightingale: in _Il Penseroso_ it is 'Philomel'; in _Par. Reg._ iv. 245,
 it is 'the Attic bird'; and in _Par. Lost_ viii. 518, it is 'the amorous
 bird of night.' He calls it the Attic bird in allusion to the story of
 Philomela, the daughter of Pandion, King of Athens. Near the Academy was
 Colonus, which Sophocles has celebrated as the haunt of nightingales
 (Browne). Philomela was changed, at her own prayer, into a nightingale
 that she might escape the vengeance of her brother-in-law Tereus. The
 epithet 'love-lorn,' however, seems to point to the legend of A{=e}don
 (Greek +aedon+, a nightingale), who, having killed her own son by
 mistake, was changed into a nightingale, whose mournful song was
 represented by the Greek poets as the lament of the mother for her
 child.
 
 235. ~her sad song mourneth~, _i.e._ sings her plaintive melody. 'Sad
 song' forms a kind of cognate accusative.
 
 237. ~likest thy Narcissus~. Narcissus, who failed to return the love of
 Echo, was punished by being made to fall in love with his own image
 reflected in a fountain: this he could never approach, and he
 accordingly pined away and was changed into the flower which bears his
 name. See the dialogue between Mercury and Echo in _Cynthia's Revels_,
 i. 1. Grammatically, _likest_ is an adjective qualified adverbially by
 "(to) thy Narcissus": comp. _Il Pens._ 9, "likest hovering dreams."
 
 238. ~have hid~. This is not a grammatical inaccuracy (as Warton thinks),
 but the subjunctive mood.
 
 240. ~Tell me but where~, _i.e._ 'Only tell me where.'
 
 241. ~Sweet Queen of Parley~, etc. 'Parley is conversation (Fr. _parler_,
 to speak): _parlour_, _parole_, _palaver_, _parliament_, _parlance_.
 etc., are cognate. ~Daughter of the Sphere~, _i.e._ of the sphere which is
 her "airy shell" (l. 231): comp. "Sphere-born harmonious sisters, Voice
 and Verse" (_At a Solemn Music_, 2).
 
 243. ~give resounding grace~, etc., _i.e._ add the charm of echo to the
 music of the spheres.
 
 The metrical structure of this song should be noted: the lines vary in
 length from two to six feet. The rhymes are few, and the effect is more
 striking owing to the consonance of _shell_, _well_ with _vale_,
 _nightingale_; also of _pair_, _where_ with _are_ and _sphere_; and of
 _have_ with _cave_. Masson regards this song as a striking illustration
 of Milton's free use of imperfect rhymes, even in his most musical
 passages.
 
 244. ~mortal mixture ... divine enchanting ravishment~. The words _mortal_
 and _divine_ are in antithesis: comp. _Il Pens._ 91, 92, "The immortal
 mind that hath forsook Her mansion in this fleshly nook." The lines
 embody a compliment to the Lady Alice: read in this connection lines 555
 and 564. 'Ravishment,' rapture (a cognate word) or ecstasy: comp. _Il
 Pens._ 40, "Thy rapt soul sitting in thine eyes"; also l. 794.
 
 246. ~Sure~, used adverbially: comp. line 493, and 'certain,' l. 266.
 
 247. ~vocal~, used proleptically.
 
 248. ~his~ = its: see note, l. 96. The pronoun refers to 'something holy.'
 
 251. ~smoothing the raven down~. As the nightingale's song smooths the
 rugged brow of Night (_Il Pens._ 58), so here the song of the lady
 smooths the raven plumage of darkness. In classical mythology Night is a
 winged goddess.
 
 252. ~it~, _i.e._ darkness.
 
 253. ~Circe ... Sirens three~. In the _Odyssey_ the Sirens are two in
 number and have no connection with Circe. They lived on a rocky island
 off the coast of Sicily and near the rock of Scylla (l. 257), and lured
 sailors to destruction by the charm of their song. Circe was also a
 sweet singer and had the power of enchanting men; hence the combined
 allusion: see also Horace's _Epist._ i. 2, 23, _Sirenum voces, et Circes
 pocula nosti_. Besides, the Sirens were daughters of the river-god
 Achelous, and Circe had Naiads or fountain-nymphs among her maids.
 
 254. ~flowery-kirtled Naiades~: fresh-water nymphs dressed in flowers, or
 having their skirts decorated with flowers. A _kirtle_ is a gown; Skeat
 suggests that it is a diminutive of _skirt_.
 
 255. ~baleful~, injurious (A.S. _balu_, evil).
 
 256. ~sung~. "The verbs _swim_, _begin_, _run_, _drink_, _shrink_, _sink_,
 _ring_, _sing_, _spring_, have for their proper past tenses _swam_,
 _began_, _ran_, etc., preserving the original _a_; but in older writers
 (sixteenth and seventeenth centuries) and in colloquial English we find
 forms with _u_, which have come from the passive participles." (Morris).
 ~take the prisoned soul~, _i.e._ would take the soul prisoner; 'prisoned'
 being used proleptically.
 
 257. ~lap it in Elysium~. _Lap_ is a form of wrap: comp. _L'Alleg._ 136,
 "_Lap_ me in soft Lydian airs." Elysium: the abode of the spirits of the
 blessed; comp. _L'Alleg._ 147, "heaped Elysian flowers." ~Scylla ...
 Charybdis~. The former, a rival of Circe in the affections of the sea-god
 Glaucus, was changed into a monster, surrounded by barking dogs. She
 threw herself into the sea and became a rock, the noise of the
 surrounding waves ("multis circum latrantibus undis," _Aen._ vii. 588)
 resembling the barking of dogs. The latter was a daughter of Poseidon,
 and was hurled by Zeus into the sea, where she became a whirlpool.
 
 260. ~slumber~: comp. _Pericles_, v. 1. 335, "thick slumber Hangs upon
 mine eyes."
 
 261. ~madness~, ecstasy. The same idea is expressed in _Il Pens._ 164: "As
 may with sweetness, through mine ear, Dissolve me into _ecstasies_, And
 bring all heaven before mine eyes." In Shakespeare 'ecstasy' occurs in
 the sense of madness; see _Hamlet_, iii. 1. 167, "That unmatched form
 and feature of blown youth, Blasted with _ecstasy_"; _Temp._ iii. 3.
 108, "hinder them from what this _ecstasy_ May now provoke them to":
 comp. also "the pleasure of that madness," _Wint. Tale_, v. 3. 73. See
 also l. 625.
 
 262. ~home-felt~, deeply felt. Compare "The _home_ thrust of a friendly
 sword is sure" (Dryden); "This is a consideration that comes _home_ to
 our interest" (Addison): see also Index to Globe _Shakespeare_.
 
 263. ~waking bliss~, as opposed to the ecstatic slumber induced by the
 song of Circe.
 
 265. ~Hail, foreign wonder!~ Warton notes that _Comus_ is universally
 allowed to have taken some of its tints from the _Tempest_, and quotes,
 "O you wonder! If you be maid, or no?" i. 2. 426.
 
 266. ~certain~: see note, l. 246.
 
 267. ~Unless the goddess~, etc. = unless _thou be_ the goddess that in
 rural shrine _dwells_ here. Here, as often in Latin, we have 'unless'
 (Lat. _nisi_, etc.) used with a single word instead of a clause: and,
 also as in Latin, the verb in the relative clause has the person of the
 antecedent.
 
 268. ~Pan or Sylvan~: see l. 176: also _Il Pens._ 134, "shadows brown that
 Sylvan loves," and _Arc._ 106, "Though Syrinx your Pan's mistress were."
 Sylvanus, the god of fields and forests, as denoted by his name which is
 corrupted from Silvan (Lat. _silva_, a wood).
 
 269. ~Forbidding~, etc. These lines recall the language of _Arcades_, in
 which also a lady is complimented as "a _deity_," "a _rural_ Queen," and
 "mistress of yon princely shrine" in the land of Pan. There is a
 reference also to her protecting the woods through her servant, the
 Genius: _Arc._ 36-53, 91-95.
 
 271. ~ill is lost~. A Latin idiom (as Keightley points out) = _male
 perditur_: Prof. Masson, however, would regard it as equivalent to
 "there is little loss in losing."
 
 273. ~extreme shift~; last resource. Comp. l. 617.
 
 274. ~my severed company~: a condensed expression = the companions
 separated from me. Comp. l. 315: this figure of speech is called
 Synecdoche.
 
 277. ~What chance~, etc. In lines 277-290 we have a reproduction of that
 form of dialogue employed in Greek tragedy in which question and answer
 occupy alternate lines: it is called _stichomythia_, and is admirable
 when there is a gradual rise in excitement towards the end (as in the
 _Supplices_ of Euripides). In _Samson Agonistes_, which is modelled on
 the Greek pattern, Milton did not employ it.
 
 278. An alliterative line.
 
 279. ~near ushering~, closely attending. To usher is to introduce (Lat.
 _ostium_, a door).
 
 284. ~twain~: thus frequently used as a predicate. It is also used after
 its substantive as in _Lyc._ 110, "of metals _twain_," and as a
 substantive.
 
 285. ~forestalling~, anticipating. 'Forestall,' originally a marketing
 term, is to buy up goods before they have been displayed at a _stall_ in
 the market in order to sell them again at a higher price: hence 'to
 anticipate.' ~prevented~. 'Prevent,' now used in the sense of 'hinder,'
 seems in this line to have something of its older meaning, viz., to
 anticipate (in which case 'forestalling' would be proleptic). Comp. l.
 362; _Par. Lost_, vi. 129, "half-way he met His daring foe, at this
 _prevention_ more Incensed."
 
 286. ~to hit~. This is the gerundial infinitive after an adjective: comp.
 "good to eat," "deadly to hear," etc.
 
 287. ~Imports their loss~, etc.: 'Apart from the present emergency, is the
 loss of them important?'
 
 289. ~manly prime~, etc.: 'Were they in the prime of manhood, or were they
 merely youths?' With Milton the 'prime of manhood' is where 'youth'
 ends: comp. _Par. Lost_, xi. 245, "_prime_ in manhood where youth
 ended"; iii. 636, "a stripling Cherub he appears, Not of the prime, yet
 such as in his face Youth smiled celestial." Spenser has 'prime' =
 Spring.
 
 290. ~Hebe~, the goddess of youth. "The down of manhood" had not appeared
 on the lips of the brothers.
 
 291. ~what time~: common in poetry for 'when' (Lat. _quo tempore_).
 Compare Horace, _Od._ iii. 6: "what time the sun shifted the shadows of
 the mountains, and took the yokes from the wearied oxen." ~laboured~:
 wearied with labour.
 
 292. ~loose traces~. Because no longer taut from the draught of the
 plough.
 
 293. ~swinked~, overcome with toil, fatigued (A.S. _swincan_, to toil).
 Skeat points out that this was once an extremely common word; the sense
 of toil is due to that of constant movement from the _swinging_ of the
 labourer's arms. In Chaucer 'swinker' = ploughman.
 
 294. ~mantling~, spreading. To mantle is strictly to cloak or cover: comp.
 _Temp._ v. 1. 67, "fumes that _mantle_ Their clearer reason."
 
 297. ~port~, bearing, mien.
 
 298. ~faery~. This spelling is nearer to that of the M.E. _faerie_ than
 the current form.
 
 299. ~the element~; the air. Since the time of the Greek philosopher
 Empedocles, fire, earth, air, and water have been popularly called the
 four elements; when used alone, however, 'the element' commonly means
 'the air.' Comp. _Hen. V._ iv. 1. 107, "The _element_ shows him as it
 doth to me"; _Par. Lost_, ii. 490, "the louring _element_ Scowls o'er
 the darkened landscape snow or shower," etc.
 
 301. ~plighted~, interwoven or _plaited_. The verb 'plight' (or more
 properly _plite_) is a variant of _plait_: see _Il Pens._ 57, "her
 sweetest saddest _plight_." The word has no connection with 'plight,' l.
 372. ~awe-strook~. Milton uses three forms of the participle, viz.
 'strook,' 'struck,' and 'strucken.'
 
 302. ~worshiped~. The final consonant is now doubled in such verbs before
 _-ed_.
 
 303. ~were~ = would be: subjunctive. ~like the path to Heaven~; _i.e._ it
 would be a pleasure to help, etc. There is (probably) no allusion to the
 Scripture parable of the narrow and difficult way to Heaven (_Matt._
 vii.) as in _Son._ ix., "labours up the hill of heavenly Truth."
 
 304. ~help you find~: comp. l. 623. The simple infinitive is here used
 without _to_ where _to_ would now be inserted. This omission of the
 preposition now occurs with so few verbs that 'to' is often called the
 sign of the infinitive, but in Early English the only sign of the
 infinitive was the termination _en_ (_e.g._ he can _speken_). The
 infinitive, being used as a noun, had a dative form called the gerund,
 which was preceded by the preposition _to_, and when this became
 confused with the simple infinitive the use of _to_ became general.
 Comp. _Son._ xx. 4, "_Help_ waste a sullen day."
 
 305. ~readiest way~. Here 'readiest' logically belongs to the predicate.
 
 311. ~each ... every~: see note, l. 19. ~alley~, a walk or avenue.
 
 312. ~Dingle ... bushy dell ... bosky bourn~. 'Dingle' = dimble (see Ben
 Jonson's _Sad Shepherd_) = dimple = a little dip or depression; hence a
 narrow valley. 'Dell' = dale, literally a cleft; hence a valley, not so
 deep as a dingle. 'Bosky bourn,' a stream whose banks are bushy or
 thickly grown with bushes. 'Bourn,' a boundary, is a distinct word
 etymologically, but the phrase "from side to side," as used by Comus,
 might well imply that the valley as well as the stream is here referred
 to. 'Bosky,' bushy. The noun 'boscage' = jungle or _bush_ (M.E. _busch_,
 _bush_, _bush_). 'See Tennyson's _Dream of F. W._ 243, "the sombre
 _boscage_ of the wood."
 
 315. ~stray attendance~ = strayed attendants; abstract for concrete, as in
 line 274. Comp. _Par. Lost_, x. 80, "_Attendance_ none shall need, nor
 train"; xii. 132, "Of herds, and flocks, and numerous _servitude_" (=
 servants).
 
 316. ~shroud~, etc. Milton first wrote "within these shroudie limits": see
 note, l. 147.
 
 317. ~low-roosted lark~, _i.e._ the lark that has roosted on the ground.
 This is certainly Milton's meaning, as he refers to the bird as rising
 from its "thatched pallet" = its nest, which is built on the ground.
 'Roost' has, however, no radical connection with _rest_, but denotes a
 perch for fowls, and Keightley's remark that Milton is guilty of
 supposing the lark to sleep, like a hen, upon a perch or roost, may
 therefore be noticed. But the poets' meaning is obvious. Prof. Masson
 takes 'thatched' as referring to the texture of the nest or to the
 corn-stalks or rushes over it.
 
 318. ~rouse~. Here used intransitively = awake.
 
 322. ~honest-offered~: see notes, ll. 36, 228.
 
 323. ~sooner~, more readily.
 
 324. ~tapestry halls~. Halls hung with tapestry, tapestry being "a kind of
 carpet work, with wrought figures, especially used for decorating
 walls." The word is said to be from the Persian.
 
 325. ~first was named~. The meaning is: '_Courtesy_ which is derived from
 _court_, and which is still nominally most common in high life, is
 nevertheless most readily found amongst those of humble station.' This
 sentiment is becoming in the mouth of Lady Alice when addressed to a
 humble shepherd. 'Courtesy' (or, as Milton elsewhere writes,
 _courtship_) has, like _civility_, lost much of its deeper significance.
 Comp. Spenser, _F. Q._ vi. 1. 1:
 
     "Of Court it seems men Courtesy do call,
     For that it there most useth to abound."
 
 327. ~less warranted~, _i.e._ when I have less _guarantee_ of safety.
 _Guarantee_ and _warrant_, like _guard_ and _ward_, _guile_ and _wile_,
 are radically the same.
 
 329. ~Eye me~, _i.e._ look on me. To _eye_ a person now usually implies
 watching narrowly or suspiciously. ~square~, accommodate, adjust. The adj.
 'proportioned' is here used proleptically, denoting the result of the
 action indicated by the verb 'square.' Comp. _M. for M._ v. 1: "Thou 'rt
 said to have a stubborn soul, ... And _squar'st_ thy life accordingly."
 ~Exeunt~, _i.e._ they go out, they leave the stage.
 
 331. ~Unmuffle~, uncover yourselves. To _muffle_ is to cover up, _e.g._
 'to _muffle_ the throat,' 'a _muffled_ sound,' etc. _Muffle_ (subst.) is
 a diminutive of _muff_.
 
 332. ~wont'st~, _i.e._ art wont. _Wont'st_ is here apparently the 2nd
 person singular, present tense, of a verb _to wont_ = to be accustomed;
 hence also the participle _wonted_ (_Il Pens._ 37, "keep thy _wonted_
 state"). But the M.E. verb was _wonen_, to dwell or be accustomed, and
 its participle _woned_ or _wont_. The fact that _wont_ was a participle
 being forgotten, it was treated as a distinct verb, and a new participle
 formed, viz., _wonted_ (= won-ed-ed); from this again comes the noun
 _wontedness_. Milton, however, uses _wont_ as a present only twice in
 his poetry: as in modern English he uses it as a noun (= custom) or as a
 participial adj. with the verb _to be_ (_Il Pens._ 123, "As she was
 wont"). ~benison~, blessing: radically the same as 'benediction' (Lat.
 _benedictio_).
 
 333. ~Stoop thy pale visage~, etc. Comp. l. 1023 and _Il Pens._ 72,
 "_Stooping_ through a fleecy cloud." 'Visage,' a word now mostly used
 with a touch of contempt, in Milton simply denotes 'face': see _Il
 Pens._ 13, "saintly _visage_"; _Lyc._ 62, "His gory _visage_ down the
 stream was sent." ~amber~: comp. _L'Alleg._ 61, "Robed in flames and
 _amber_ light," and Tennyson:
 
     "What time the _amber_ morn
     Forth gushes from beneath a low-hung cloud."
 
 334. ~disinherit~, drive out, dispossess. Comp. _Two Gent._ iii. 2. 87,
 "This or else nothing, will _inherit_ (_i.e._ obtain possession of)
 her."
 
 336. ~Influence ... dammed up~. The verb here shows that influence is
 employed in its strict sense, = a flowing in (Lat. _in_ and _fluo_): it
 was thus used in astrology to denote "an _influent_ course of the
 planets, their virtue being infused into, or their course working on,
 inferior creatures"; comp. _L'Alleg._ 112, "whose bright eyes Rain
 _influence_"; _Par. Lost_, iv. 669, "with kindly heat Of various
 _influence_." Astrology has left many traces upon the English language,
 _e.g._ influence, disastrous, ill-starred, ascendant, etc. See also l.
 360.
 
 337. ~taper~; here a vocative, the verb being "visit (thou)."
 
 338. ~though a rush candle~, _i.e._ 'though it be only a rush-candle'; a
 rush light, obtained from the pith of a rush dipped in oil.
 
 340. ~long levelled rule~; straight horizontal beam of light: comp. _Par.
 Lost_, iv. 543, "the setting sun ... _Levelled_ his evening rays." The
 instrument with which straight lines are drawn is called a _rule_ or
 ruler.
 
 341. ~star of Arcady Or Tyrian Cynosure~; here put by synecdoche for
 'lode-star.' More particularly, the star of Arcady signifies any of the
 stars in the constellation of the Great Bear, by which Greek sailors
 steered; and 'Tyrian Cynosure' signifies the stars comprising that part
 of the constellation of the Lesser Bear which, from its shape, was
 called _Cynosura_, the dog's tail (Greek +kynos oura+), and by which
 Phoenician or Tyrian sailors steered. See _L'Alleg._ 80, "The _cynosure_
 of neighbouring eyes," where the word is used as a common noun = point
 of attraction. Both constellations are connected in Greek mythology with
 the Arcadian nymph Callisto, who was turned by Zeus into the Great Bear
 while her son Arcas became the Lesser Bear. Milton follows the Roman
 poets in associating these stars with Arcadia on this account.
 
 343. ~barred~, debarred or barred _from_.
 
 344. ~wattled cotes~: enclosures made of hurdles, _i.e._ frames of
 plaited twigs. _Cote_, _cot_, and _coat_ are varieties of the same word
 = a covering or enclosure.
 
 345. ~oaten stops~: see _Lyc._ 33, "the _oaten_ flute"; 88, "But now my
 _oat_ proceeds"; 188, "the tender stops of various _quills_." The
 shepherd's pipe, being at first a row of oaten stalks, "the oaten pipe,"
 "oat," etc., came to denote any instrument of this kind and even to
 signify "pastoral poetry." The 'stops' are the holes over which the
 player's fingers are placed, also called vent-holes or "ventages"
 (_Ham._ iii. 2. 372). See also note on 'azurn,' l. 893.
 
 346. ~whistle ... lodge~, _i.e._ the sound of the shepherd calling his dog
 by whistling. Or it may be used in the same sense as in _L'Alleg._ 63,
 "the ploughman _whistles_ o'er the furrowed land."
 
 347. ~Count ... dames~: comp. _L'Alleg._ 52, "the cock ... Stoutly struts
 his _dames_ before"; 114, "Ere the first cock his matin rings."
 Grammatically, 'count' (infinitive) forms with 'cock' the complex object
 of 'might hear.'
 
 349. ~innumerous~, innumerable (Lat. _innumerus_). Comp. _Par. Lost_, vii.
 455, "_Innumerous_ living creatures"; ix. 1089.
 
 350. ~hapless~, unfortunate. Many words, such as happy, lucky, fortunate,
 etc., which strictly refer to a person's hap or chance, whether good or
 bad, have become restricted to good hap: in order to give them an
 unfavourable meaning a negative prefix or suffix is necessary.
 
 With reference to the word _fortune_, Max Mueller says: "We speak of good
 and evil fortune, so did the French, and so did the Romans. By itself
 _fortuna_ was taken either in a good or a bad sense, though it generally
 meant good fortune. Whenever there could be any doubt, the Romans
 defined _fortuna_ by such adjectives as _bona_, _secunda_, _prospera_,
 for good; _mala_ or _adversa_ for bad fortune ... _Fortuna_ came to mean
 something like chance."
 
 351. ~her~, herself. On the reflexive use of _her_, see note, l. 163.
 
 352. ~burs~; burrs, prickly seed-vessels of certain plants, _e.g._ the
 burr-thistle, the burdock (= the burr-dock), etc.
 
 355. ~leans~. As Milton frequently omits the nominative, we may supply
 _she_: otherwise _leans_ would be intransitive and its nominative
 'head': see note, l. 715. ~fraught~, freighted, filled. _Freight_ is
 itself a later form of _fraught_: in _Sams. Agon._, 1075, _fraught_ is a
 noun (Ger. _fracht_, a load). See line 732.
 
 356. ~What~, etc. The ellipses may be supplied thus: "What (shall be done)
 if (she be) in wild amazement?"
 
 358. ~savage hunger~. 'Hunger' is put by synecdoche for hungry animals.
 
 359. ~over-exquisite~, _i.e._ too curious, over-inquisitive. _Exquisite_
 is here used in the sense of _inquisitive_; in modern English
 'exquisite' has a passive sense only, while 'inquisitive' has an active
 sense (Lat. _quaero_, to seek): see note, l. 714.
 
 "The dialogue between the two brothers is an amicable contest between
 fact and philosophy. The younger draws his arguments from common
 apprehension, and the obvious appearance of things; the elder proceeds
 on a profounder knowledge, and argues from abstracted principles. Here
 the difference of their ages is properly made subservient to a contrast
 of character" (Warton).
 
 360. ~To cast the fashion~, _i.e._ to prejudge the form. 'To cast' was
 common in the sense of to calculate or compute; see Shakespeare, ii.
 _Henry IV._ i. 1. 166, "You _cast_ the event of war." Some think,
 however, that the word has here its still more restricted sense as used
 in astrology, _e.g._ "to _cast_ a nativity"; others see in it a
 reference to the founder's art; and others to medical diagnosis.
 
 361. ~Grant they be so~: a concessive clause = granted that the evils turn
 out to be what you imagined. The alternative is given in l. 364.
 
 362. ~What need~, etc., _i.e._ why should a man anticipate his hour of
 sorrow. 'What' = for what (Lat. _quid_): comp. l. 752; also _On
 Shakespeare_, 6, "_What need'st_ thou such weak witness of thy name?" On
 the verb _need_ Abbott, Sec. 297, says: "It is often found with 'what,'
 where it is sometimes hard to say whether 'what' is an adverb and 'need'
 a verb, or 'what' an adjective and 'need' a noun. 'What need the bridge
 much broader than the flood?' _M. Ado_, i. 1. 318; either '_why need_
 the bridge (be) broader?' or '_what need_ is there (that) the bridge
 (be) broader?'"
 
 363. Compare Hamlet's famous soliloquy, "rather bear those ills we
 have," etc.; and Pope's _Essay on Man_, "Heaven from all creatures hides
 the book of fate," etc.
 
 366. ~to seek~, at a loss. Compare _Par. Lost_, viii. 197: "Unpractised,
 unprepared, and still _to seek_." Bacon, in _Adv. of Learning_, has:
 "Men bred in learning are perhaps _to seek_ in points of convenience."
 
 367. ~unprincipled in virtue's book~, _i.e._ ignorant of the elements of
 virtue. A principle (Lat. _principium_, beginning) is a fundamental
 truth; hence the current sense of 'unprincipled,' implying that the man
 who has no fixed rules of life is the one who will readily fall into
 evil. Comp. _Sams. Agon._ 760, "wisest and best men ... with goodness
 _principled_."
 
 368. ~bosoms~, holds within itself. The nom. is 'goodness.' 'Peace' is
 governed by 'in,' l. 367.
 
 369. ~As that~, etc. This is an adverbial clause of consequence to
 'unprincipled'; in modern English such a clause would be introduced by
 'that,' and in Elizabethan English either by 'as' or 'that.' Here we
 have both connectives together. ~single~: see note, l. 204. noise, sound.
 
 370. ~Not being in danger~, _i.e._ she not being in danger: absolute
 construction. This parenthetical line is equivalent to a conditional
 clause--'if she be not in danger, the mere want of light and noise need
 not disquiet her.'
 
 371. ~constant~, steadfast.
 
 372. ~misbecoming~: see note on 'misused,' l. 47. ~plight~, condition.
 Skeat derives this word from A.S. _pliht_, danger; others connect it
 with _pledge_. It is distinct from _plight_, l. 301.
 
 373. ~Virtue could see~, etc. The best commentary on this line is in lines
 381-5: comp. Spenser: "Virtue gives herself light through darkness for
 to wade," _F. Q._ i. 1. 12.
 
 375. ~flat sea~: comp. _Lyc._ 98, "level brine": Lat. _aequor_, a flat
 surface, used of the sea.
 
 376. ~seeks to~, applies herself to. This use of seek is common in the
 English Bible: see _Deut._ xii. 5, "_unto_ his habitation shall ye
 _seek_"; _Isaiah_, viii. 19, xi. 10, xix. 3; i. _Kings_, x. 24.
 
 377. ~her best nurse, Contemplation~. The wise man loves contemplation and
 solitude: comp. _Il Penseroso_, 51, where "the Cherub Contemplation" is
 the "first and chiefest" of Melancholy's companions. In Sidney's
 _Arcadia_, "Solitariness" is "the nurse of these contemplations."
 
 378. ~plumes~. Some would read _prunes_, both words being used of a bird's
 smoothing or trimming its feathers--or (more strictly) picking out
 damaged feathers. See Skeat's _Dictionary_, and compare Pope's line,
 "Where Contemplation _prunes_ her ruffled wings."
 
 379. ~various~, varied: comp. l. 22. The 'bustle of resort' is in
 _L'Allegro_ the 'busy hum of men.'
 
 380. ~all to-ruffled~. Milton wrote "all to ruffled," which may be
 interpreted in various ways: (1) all to-ruffled, (2) all too ruffled,
 (3) all-to ruffled. The first of these is given in the text as it is
 etymologically correct: _to_ is an intensive prefix as in 'to-break' =
 to break in pieces; 'to-tear' = to tear asunder, etc.; while _all_ (=
 quite) is simply an adverb modifying _to-ruffled_. But about 1500 A.D.
 this idiom was misunderstood, and the prefix _to_ was detached from the
 verb and either read along with _all_ (thus all-to = altogether), or
 confused with _too_ (thus all-to = too too, decidedly too). It is
 doubtful in which sense Milton used the phrase; like Shakespeare, he may
 have disregarded its origin. See Morris, Sec. 324; Abbott, Sec.Sec. 28, 436.
 
 381. ~He that has light~, etc. Comp. _Par. Lost_, i. 254: 'The mind is
 its own place,' etc.
 
 382. ~centre~, _i.e._ centre of the earth: comp. _Par. Lost_ i. 686, "Men
 also ... Ransacked the _centre_"; and _Hymn Nat._ 162, "The aged Earth
 ... Shall from the surface to the _centre_ shake." Sometimes the word
 'centre' was used of the Earth itself, the _fixed_ centre of the whole
 universe according to the Ptolemaic system. The idea here conveyed,
 however, is not that of immovability (as in _Par. Reg._ iv. 534, "as a
 _centre_ firm") but of utter darkness.
 
 385. ~his own dungeon~: comp. _Sams. Agon._ 156, "Thou art become (O worst
 imprisonment!) The _dungeon_ of thyself."
 
 386. ~most affects~: has the greatest liking for. It now generally denotes
 rather a feigned than a real liking: comp. _pretend_. Lines 386-392 may
 be compared with _Il Pens._ 167-174.
 
 393. ~Hesperian tree~. An allusion to the tree on which grew the golden
 apples of Juno, which were guarded by the Hesperides and the sleepless
 dragon Ladon. Hence the reference to the 'dragon watch': comp.
 Tennyson's _Dream of Fair Women_, 255, "Those dragon eyes of anger'd
 Eleanor Do hunt me, day and night." See also ll. 981-983.
 
 395. ~unenchanted~, superior to all the powers of enchantment, not to be
 enchanted. Similarly Milton has 'unreproved' for 'not reprovable,'
 'unvalued' for 'invaluable,' etc.; and Shakespeare has 'unavoided' for
 'inevitable,' 'imagined' for 'imaginable,' etc. Abbott (Sec. 375) says: The
 passive participle is often used to signify, not that which _was_ and
 _is_, but that which _was_ and therefore _can be hereafter_; in other
 words _-ed_ is used for _-able_.
 
 396. Compare Chaucer, _Doctor's Tale_, 44, "She flowered in virginity,
 With all humility and abstinence."
 
 398. ~unsunned~, hidden. Comp. _Cym._ ii. 5. 13, "As chaste as _unsunned_
 snow"; _F. Q._ ii. 7, "Mammon ... _Sunning_ his treasure hoar."
 
 400. ~as bid me hope~, etc. The construction is, 'as (you may) bid me (to)
 hope (that) Danger will wink on Opportunity and (that Danger will) let a
 single helpless maiden pass uninjured.'
 
 401. ~Danger will wink on~, etc., _i.e._ danger will shut its eyes to an
 opportunity. To _wink on_ or _wink at_ is to connive, to refuse to see
 something: comp. _Macbeth_, i. 4. 52, "The eye _wink_ at the hand";
 _Acts_, xvii. 30. Warton notes a similar argument by Rosalind in _As You
 Like It_, i. 3. 113: "Beauty provoketh thieves sooner than gold."
 
 403. ~surrounding~. Milton is said to be the first author of any note who
 uses this word in its current sense of 'encompassing,' which it has
 acquired through a supposed connection with _round_. Shakespeare does
 not use it. Its original sense is 'to overflow' (Lat. _superundare_).
 
 404. ~it recks me not~, _i.e._ I do not heed: an impersonal use of the old
 verb _reck_ (A.S. _recan_, to care). Comp. _Lyc._ 122, "What _recks_ it
 them."
 
 405. ~dog them both~, _i.e._ follow closely upon night and loneliness.
 Comp. _All's Well_, iii. 4. 15, "death and danger _dogs_ the heels of
 worth."
 
 407. ~unowned~, _i.e._ 'thinking her to be unowned,' or 'as if unowned.'
 Milton thus, as in Latin, frequently condenses a clause into a
 participle.
 
 408. ~infer~, reason, argue. This use of the word is obsolete. See
 Shakespeare, iii. _Hen. VI._ ii. 2. 44, "_Inferring_ arguments of mighty
 force"; _K. John_, iii. 1. 213, "Need must needs _infer_ this
 principle": also _Par. Lost_, viii. 91, "great or bright _infers_ not
 excellence."
 
 409. ~without all doubt~, _i.e._ beyond all doubt: a Latinism = _sine omni
 dubitatione_.
 
 411. ~arbitrate the event~, judge of the result. The meaning is 'Where the
 result depends equally upon circumstances to be hoped and to be dreaded
 I incline to hope.'
 
 413. ~squint suspicion~. Compare Quarles: "Heart-gnawing Hatred, and
 squint-eyed Suspicion." To look askance or sideways frequently indicates
 suspicion.
 
 419. ~if Heaven gave it~, _i.e._ even _although_ Heaven gave it.
 
 420. ~'Tis chastity~. "The passage which begins here and ends at line 475
 is a concentrated expression of the moral of the whole Masque, and an
 exposition also of a cardinal idea of Milton's philosophy" (Masson).
 
 421. ~clad in complete steel~, _i.e._ completely armed; comp. _Hamlet_, i.
 4. 52, where the phrase occurs. The accent is on the first syllable.
 
 422. ~quivered nymph~. The chaste Diana of the Romans was armed with bow
 and quiver; and Shakespeare makes virginity "Diana's livery." So in
 Spenser, Belphoebe, the personification of Chastity, has "at her back a
 bow and quiver gay." 'Quivered' is the Latin _pharetrata_.
 
 423. ~trace~, traverse, track. ~unharboured~, affording no shelter.
 Radically, a harbour is a lodging or shelter.
 
 424. ~Infamous~, having a bad name, ill-famed: a Latinism. The word now
 implies disgrace or guilt. It is here accented on the penult.
 
 425. ~sacred rays~: comp. l. 782.
 
 426. ~bandite or mountaineer~. 'Bandite' (in Shakespeare _bandetto_, and
 now _bandit_) is borrowed from the Italian _bandito_, outlawed or
 _banned_. 'Mountaineer,' here used in a bad sense. In modern English it
 has reverted to its original sense--a dweller in mountains. The dwellers
 in mountains are often fierce and readily become freebooters: hence the
 changes of meaning. See _Temp._ iii. 3. 44, "Who would believe that
 there were _mountaineers_ Dew-lapp'd like bulls"; also _Cym._ iv. 2.
 120, "Who called me traitor, _mountaineer_."
 
 428. ~very desolation~. Very (as an adj.) = true or real and may be traced
 to Lat. _verus_ = true: comp. l. 646.
 
 429. ~shagged ... shades~. 'Shagged' is rugged or shaggy, and 'horrid' is
 probably used in the Latin sense of 'rough': see note, l. 38.
 
 430. ~unblenched~, undaunted, unflinching. This word, sometimes confounded
 with 'unblanched,' is from _blench_, a causal of _blink_.
 
 431. ~Be it not~: a conditional clause = on condition that it be not.
 
 432. ~Some say~, etc. Compare _Hamlet_, i. 1. 158:
 
     "Some say that, ever against that season comes
     Wherein our Saviour's birth is celebrated,
     The bird of dawning singeth all night long:
     And then, they say, no spirit dares stir abroad."
 
 433. ~In fog or fire~, etc. Comp. _Il Pens._ 93, "those demons that are
 found In fire, air, flood, or underground": an allusion to the different
 orders and powers of demons as accepted in the Middle Ages. Burton, in
 his _Anat. of Mel._, quotes from a writer who thus enumerates the kinds
 of sublunary spirits--"fiery, aerial, terrestrial, watery, and
 subterranean, besides fairies, satyrs, nymphs, etc."
 
 434. ~meagre hag~, lean witch. _Hag_ is from A.S. _haegtesse_, a
 prophetess or witch. Comp. _Par. Lost_, ii. 662; _M. W. of W._ iv. 2.
 188, "Come down, you witch, you _hag_." ~unlaid ghost~, unpacified or
 wandering spirit. It was a superstition that ghosts left the world of
 spirits and wandered on the earth from the hour of curfew (see _Temp._
 v. 1. 40; _King Lear_, iii. 4. 120, "This is the foul fiend
 Flibbertigibbet; he begins at curfew," etc.) until "the first cock his
 matin rings" (_L'Alleg._ 14). 'Curfew' (Fr. _couvre-feu_ = fire-cover),
 the bell that was rung at eight or nine o'clock in the evening as a
 signal that all fires and lights were to be extinguished.
 
 436. ~swart faery of the mine~. In Burton's _Anat. of Mel._ we read,
 "Subterranean devils are as common as the rest, and do as much harm.
 Olaus Magnus makes six kinds of them, some bigger, some less. These are
 commonly seen about mines of metals," etc. Warton quotes from an old
 writer: "Pioneers or diggers for metal do affirm that in many mines
 there appear strange shapes and spirits who are apparelled like unto the
 labourers in the pit." 'Swart' (also _swarty_, _swarth_, and _swarthy_)
 here means black: in Scandinavian mythology these subterranean spirits
 were called the _Svartalfar_, or black elves. Comp. _Lyc._ 138, "the
 _swart_ star," where 'swart' = swart making.
 
 438. ~Do ye believe~. _Ye_ is properly a second person plural, but (like
 _you_) is frequently used as a singular: for examples, see Abbott, Sec.
 236.
 
 439. ~old schools of Greece~. The brother now turns for his arguments from
 the mediaeval mythology of Northern Europe to the ancient legends of
 Greece.
 
 440. ~to testify~, to bear witness to: comp. l. 248, 421.
 
 441. ~Dian~. Diana was the huntress among the immortals: she was
 insensible to the bolts of Cupid, _i.e._ to the power of love. She was
 the protectress of the flocks and game from beasts of prey, and at the
 same time was believed to send plagues and sudden deaths among men and
 animals. Comp. the song to Cynthia (Diana) in _Cynthia's Revels_, v. 1,
 "Queen and huntress, chaste and fair," etc.
 
 442. ~silver-shafted queen~. The epithet is applicable to Diana both as
 huntress and goddess of the moon: as the former she bore arrows which
 were frequently called _shafts_, and as the latter she bore shafts or
 rays of light. _Shaft_ is etymologically 'a _shaven_ rod.' In Chaucer,
 _C. T._ 1364, 'shaft' = arrow.
 
 443. ~brinded lioness~. 'Brinded' = brindled or streaked. Comp. "_brinded_
 cat," _Macb._ iv. 1. 1: _brind_ is etymologically connected with
 _brand_.
 
 444. ~mountain-pard~, _i.e._ panther or other spotted wild beast. _Pard_,
 originally a Persian word, is common in the compounds leo-_pard_ and
 camelo-_pard_.
 
 445. ~frivolous ... Cupid~. See the speech of Oberon, _M. N. D._ ii. 1.
 65. The epithet 'frivolous' applies to Cupid in his lower character as
 the wanton god of sensual love, not in his character as the fair Eros
 who unites all the discordant elements of the universe: see note, l.
 1004.
 
 447. ~snaky-headed Gorgon shield~. Medusa was one of the three Gorgons,
 frightful beings, whose heads were covered with hissing serpents, and
 who had wings, brazen claws, and huge teeth. Whoever looked at Medusa
 was turned into stone, but Perseus, by the aid of enchantment, slew her.
 Minerva (Athene) placed the monster's head in the centre of her shield,
 which confounded Cupid: see _Par. Lost_, ii. 610.
 
 449. ~freezed~, froze. The adjective 'congealed' is used proleptically,
 the meaning being 'froze into a stone so that it was congealed.'
 
 450. ~But~, except: a preposition.
 
 451. ~dashed~, confounded: this meaning of the word is obsolete.
 
 452. ~blank awe~: the awe of one amazed. Comp. the phrase, 'blank
 astonishment,' and see _Par. Lost_, ix. 890.
 
 454. ~so~, _i.e._ chaste.
 
 455. ~liveried angels lackey her~, _i.e._ ministering angels attend her.
 So, in _L'Alleg._ 62, "the clouds in thousand _liveries_ dight"; a
 servant's livery being the distinctive dress _delivered_ to him by his
 master. 'Lackey,' to wait upon, from 'lackey' (or lacquey), a footboy,
 who runs by the side of his master. The word is here used in a good
 sense, without implying servility (as in _Ant. and Cleop._ i. 4. 46,
 "_lackeying_ the varying tide"). 'Her': the soul. Milton is fond of the
 feminine personification: see line 396.
 
 457. ~vision~: a trisyllable.
 
 458. ~no gross ear~. See notes, l. 112 and 997.
 
 459. ~oft converse~, frequent communion. _Oft_ is here used adjectively:
 this use is common in the English Bible, _e.g._ i. _Tim._ v. 23, "thine
 _often_ infirmities."
 
 460. ~Begin to cast ... turns~. 'Begin' is subjunctive; 'turns' is
 indicative: the latter may be used to convey greater certainty and
 vividness.
 
 461. ~temple of the mind~, _i.e._ the body. This metaphor is common: see
 Shakespeare, _Temp._ i. 2. 57, "There's nothing ill can dwell in such a
 _temple_"; and the Bible, _John_, ii. 21, "He spake of the _temple_ of
 his body."
 
 462. ~the soul's essence~. As if, by a life of purity, the body gradually
 became spiritualised, and therefore partook of the soul's immortality.
 
 465. ~most~, above all.
 
 467. ~soul grows clotted~. This doctrine is expounded in Plato's _Phaedo_,
 in a conversation between Socrates and Cebes:
 
      _Socrates_ (speaking of the pure soul). That soul, I say, herself
      invisible, departs to the invisible world--to the divine and
      immortal and rational: thither arriving, she is secure of bliss,
      and is released from the error and folly of men, their fears and
      wild passions and all other human ills, and for ever dwells, as
      they say of the initiated, in company with the gods. Is not this
      true, Cebes?
 
      _Cebes._ Yes; beyond a doubt.
 
      _Soc._ But the soul which has been polluted, and is impure at the
      time of her departure, and is the companion and servant of the body
      always, and is in love with and fascinated by the body and by the
      desires and pleasures of the body, until she is led to believe that
      the truth only exists in a bodily form, which a man may touch and
      see and taste, and use for the purposes of his lusts--the soul, I
      mean, accustomed to hate and fear and avoid the intellectual
      principle, which to the bodily eye is dark and invisible and can be
      attained only by philosophy;--do you suppose that such a soul will
      depart pure and unalloyed?
 
      _Ceb._ That is impossible.
 
      _Soc._ She is held fast by the corporeal, which the continual
      association and constant care of the body have wrought into her
      nature.
 
      _Ceb._ Very true.
 
      _Soc._ And this corporeal element, my friend, is heavy and weighty
      and earthy, and is that element by which such a soul is depressed
      and dragged down again into the visible world, because she is
      afraid of the invisible and of the world below--prowling about
      tombs and sepulchres, in the neighbourhood of which, as they tell
      us, are seen certain ghostly apparitions of souls which have not
      departed pure, but are cloyed with sight and therefore visible.
 
      _Ceb._ That is very likely, Socrates.
 
      _Soc._ Yes, that is very likely, Cebes; and these must be the
      souls, not of the good, but of the evil, who are compelled to
      wander about such places in payment of the penalty of their former
      evil way of life; and they continue to wander until through the
      craving after the corporeal which never leaves them, they are
      imprisoned finally in another body. And they may be supposed to
      find their prisons in the same natures which they have had in their
      former lives.
 
 Further on in the same dialogue, Socrates says:
 
      Each pleasure and pain is a sort of nail which nails and rivets the
      soul to the body, until she becomes like the body, and believes
      that to be true which the body affirms to be true; and from
      agreeing with the body, and having the same delights, she is
      obliged to have the same habits and haunts, and is not likely ever
      to be pure at her departure, but is always infected by the
      body.--_Extracted from Jowett's Translation of the Dialogues._
 
 468. ~imbodies and imbrutes~, _i.e._ becomes materialised and brutish.
 _Imbody_, ordinarily used as a transitive verb, is here intransitive.
 _Imbrute_ (said to have been coined by Milton) is also intransitive; in
 _Par. Lost_, ix. 166, it is transitive. The use of the word may have
 been suggested by the _Phaedo_, where the souls of the wicked are said
 to "find their prisons in the same natures which they have had in their
 former lives," those of gluttons and drunkards passing into asses and
 animals of that sort.
 
 469. ~divine property~. In his prose works Milton calls the soul 'that
 divine particle of God's breathing': comp. Horace, _Sat._ ii. 2. 79,
 "affigit humo _divinae particulam aurae_"; and Plato's _Phaedo_, "The
 soul resembles the divine, and the body the mortal."
 
 470. ~gloomy shadows damp~: see note, l. 207.
 
 471. ~charnel-vaults~, burial vaults. 'Charnel' (O.F. _charnel_, Lat.
 _carnalis_; _caro_, flesh): comp. 'carnal,' l. 474.
 
 473. ~As loth~, etc. The construction is: 'As (being) loth to leave the
 body that it loved, and (as having) linked itself to a degenerate and
 degraded state.' ~it~: by syntax this pronoun refers to 'shadows,' or (in
 thought) '_such_ shadow.' It seems best, however, to connect it with
 'soul,' line 467.
 
 474. ~sensualty~. The modern form of the word is _sensuality_.
 
 475. ~degenerate and degraded~: the former because 'imbodied,' the latter
 because 'imbruted.'
 
 476. ~divine Philosophy~, _i.e._ such philosophy as is to be found in "the
 divine volume of Plato" (as Milton has called it).
 
 477. ~crabbed~, sour or bitter: comp. crab-apple. _Crab_ (a shell-fish)
 and _crab_ (a kind of apple) are radically connected, both conveying the
 idea of scratching or pinching (Skeat).
 
 478. ~Apollo's lute~: Apollo being the god of song and music. Comp. _Par.
 Reg._ i. 478-480; _L. L. L._ iv. 3. 342, "as sweet and musical As bright
 _Apollo's lute_, strung with his hair."
 
 479. ~nectared sweets~. Nectar (Gk. +nektar+, the drink of the gods) is
 repeatedly used by Milton to express the greatest sweetness: see l. 838;
 _Par. Lost_, iv. 333, "Nectarine fruits"; v. 306, 426.
 
 482. ~Methought~: see note, l. 171. ~what should it be?~ This is a direct
 question about a past event, and means 'What was it likely to be?' "It
 seems to increase the emphasis of the interrogation, since a doubt about
 the past (time having been given for investigation) implies more
 perplexity than a doubt about the future" (Abbott, Sec. 325). ~For certain~,
 _i.e._ for certain truth, certainly.
 
 483. ~night-foundered~; benighted, lost in the darkness. Radically, 'to
 founder' is to go to the bottom (Fr. _fondrer_; Lat. _fundus_, the
 bottom), hence applied to ships; it is also applied to horses sinking in
 a slough. The compound is Miltonic (see _Par. Lost_, i. 204), and is
 sometimes stigmatised as meaningless; on the contrary, it is very
 expressive, implying that the brothers are swallowed up in night and
 have lost their way. 'Founder' is here used in the secondary sense of
 'to be lost' or 'to be in distress.'
 
 484. ~neighbour~. An adjective, as in line 576, and frequently in
 Shakespeare. Neighbour = nigh-boor, _i.e._ a peasant dwelling near.
 
 487. ~Best draw~: we had best draw our swords.
 
 489. ~Defence is a good cause~, etc., _i.e._ 'in defending ourselves we
 are engaged in a good cause, and may Heaven be on our side.'
 
 490. ~That hallo~. We are to understand that the Attendant Spirit has
 halloed just before entering; this is shown by the stage-direction given
 in the edition of _Comus_ printed by Lawes in 1637: _He hallos; the
 Guardian Daemon hallos again, and enters in the habit of a shepherd._
 
 491. ~you fall~, etc., _i.e._ otherwise you will fall on our swords.
 
 493. ~sure~: see note, l. 246.
 
 494. ~Thyrsis~, Like Lycidas, this name is common in pastoral poetry. In
 Milton's _Epitaphium Damonis_ it stands for Milton himself; in _Comus_
 it belongs to Lawes, who now receives additional praise for his musical
 genius. In lines 86-88 the compliment is enforced by alliterative
 verses, and here by the aid of rhyme (495-512). Masson thinks that the
 poet, having spoken of the madrigals of Thyrsis, may have introduced
 this rhymed passage in order to prolong the feeling of Pastoralism by
 calling up the cadence of known English pastoral poems.
 
 495. ~sweetened ... dale~; poetical exaggeration or hyperbole, implying
 that fragrant flowers became even more fragrant from Thyrsis' music.
 
 496. ~huddling~. This conveys the two ideas of hastening and crowding:
 comp. Horace, _Ars Poetica_, 19, "Et _properantis_ aquae per amoenos
 ambitus agros." ~madrigal~: a pastoral or shepherd's song (Ital. _mandra_,
 a flock): such compositions, then in favour, had been made by Lawes and
 by Milton's father.
 
 497. ~swain~: a word of common use in pastoral poetry. It denotes strictly
 a peasant or, more correctly, a young man: comp. the compounds
 boat-_swain_, cox-_swain_. See _Arc._ 26, "Stay, gentle _swains_," etc.
 
 499. ~pent~, penned, participle of _pen_, to shut up (A.S. _pennan_, which
 is connected with _pin_, seen in _pin_-fold, l. 7). ~forsook~: a form of
 the past tense used for the participle.
 
 501. ~and his next joy~, _i.e._ 'and (thou), his next joy'--words
 addressed to the second brother.
 
 502. ~trivial toy~, ordinary trifle. The phrase seems redundant, but
 'trivial' may here be used in the strict sense of common or well-known.
 Compare _Il Pens._ 4, "fill the fixed mind with all your _toys_"; and
 Burton's _Anat. of Mel._, "complain of _toys_, and fear without a
 cause."
 
 503. ~stealth of~, things stolen by.
 
 506. ~To this my errand~, etc., _i.e._ in comparison with this errand of
 mine and the anxiety it involved. 'To' = in comparison with; an idiom
 common in Elizabethan English, _e.g._ "There is no woe _to_ this
 correction," _Two Gent._ ii. 4. 138. See Abbott, Sec. 187.
 
 508. ~How chance~. _Chance_ is here a verb followed by a substantive
 clause: 'how does it chance that,' etc. This idiom is common in
 Shakespeare (Abbott, Sec. 37), where it sometimes has the force of an
 adverb (= perchance): compare _Par. Lost_, ii. 492: "If chance the
 radiant sun, with farewell sweet," etc.
 
 509. ~sadly~, seriously. Radically, sad = sated or full (A.S. _saed_);
 hence the two meanings, 'serious' and 'sorrowful,' the former being
 common in Spenser, Bacon, and Shakespeare. Comp. 'some _sad_ person of
 known judgment' (Bacon); _Romeo and Jul._ i. 1. 205, "Tell me in
 _sadness_, who is that you love"; _Par. Lost_, vi. 541, "settled in his
 face I see _Sad_ resolution." See also Swinburne's _Miscellanies_
 (1886), page 170.
 
 510. ~our neglect~, _i.e._ neglect on our part.
 
 511. ~Ay me~! Comp. _Lyc._ 56, "Ay me! I fondly dream"; 154. This
 exclamatory phrase = ah me! Its form is due to the French _aymi_ = alas,
 for me! and has no connection with _ay_ or _aye_ = yes. In this line
 _true_ rhymes with _shew_: comp. _youth_ and _shew'th_, _Sonnet on his
 having arrived at the age of twenty-three_.
 
 512. ~Prithee~. A familiar fusion of _I pray thee_, sometimes written
 'pr'ythee.' Lines 495-512 form nine rhymed couplets.
 
 513. ~ye~: a dative. See note on l. 216.
 
 514. ~shallow~. Comp. _Son._ i. 6, "_shallow_ cuckoo's bill," xii_a_. 12;
 _Arc._ 41, "_shallow_-searching Fame."
 
 515. ~sage poets~. Homer and Virgil are meant; both of these mention the
 chimera. Milton (_Par. Lost_, iii. 19) afterwards speaks of himself as
 "taught by the heavenly Muse." Comp. _L'Alleg._ 17; _Il Pens._ 117,
 "great bards besides In sage and solemn tunes have sung."
 
 516. ~storied~, related: 'To story' is here used actively: the past
 participle is frequent in the sense of 'bearing a story or picture'; _Il
 Pens._ 159, "storied windows"; Gray's _Elegy_, 41, "storied urn";
 Tennyson's "storied walls." _Story_ is an abbreviation of _history_.
 
 517. ~Chimeras~, monsters. Comp. the sublime passage in _Par. Lost_, ii.
 618-628. The Chimera was a fire-breathing monster, with the head of a
 lion, the tail of a dragon, and the body of a goat. It was slain by
 Bellerophon. As a common name 'chimera' is used by Milton to denote a
 terrible monster, and is now current (in an age which rejects such
 fabulous creatures) in the sense of a wild fancy; hence the adj.
 _chimerical_ = wild or fanciful. ~enchanted isles~, _e.g._ those of Circe
 and Calypso, mentioned in the _Odyssey_.
 
 518. ~rifted rocks~: rifted = riven. Orpheus, in search of Eurydice,
 entered the lower world through the rocky jaws of Taenarus, a cape in
 the south of Greece (see Virgil _Georg._ iv. 467, _Taenarias fauces_);
 here also Hercules emerged from Hell with the captive Cerberus.
 
 519. ~such there be~. See note on l. 12 for this indicative use of _be_.
 
 520. ~navel~, centre, inmost recess. Shakespeare (_Cor._ iii. l. 123)
 speaks of the 'navel of the state'; and in Greek Calypso's island was
 'the navel of the sea,' while Apollo's temple at Delphi was 'the navel
 of the earth.'
 
 521. ~Immured~, enclosed. Here used generally: radically it = shut up
 within walls (Lat. _murus_, a wall).
 
 523. ~witcheries~, enchantments.
 
 526. ~murmurs~. The incantations or spells of evil powers were sung or
 murmured over the doomed object; sometimes they were muttered (as here)
 over the enchanted food or drink prepared for the victim. Comp. l. 817
 and _Arc._ 60, "With puissant words and _murmurs_ made to bless."
 
 529. ~unmoulding reason's mintage charactered~, _i.e._ defacing those
 signs of a rational soul that are stamped on the human face. The figure
 is taken from the process of melting down coins in order to restamp
 them. 'Charactered': here used in its primary sense (Gk. +charakter+, an
 engraven or stamped mark), as in the phrase 'printed characters.' The
 word is here accented on the second syllable; in modern English on the
 first.
 
 531. ~crofts that brow~ = crofts that overhang. Croft = a small field,
 generally adjoining a house. Brow = overhang: comp. _L'Alleg._ 8,
 "low-browed rocks."
 
 532. ~bottom glade~: the glade below. The word _bottom_, however, is
 frequent in Shakespeare in the sense of 'valley'; hence 'bottom glade'
 might be interpreted 'glade in the valley.'
 
 533. ~monstrous rout~; see note on the stage-direction after l. 92. Comp.
 'the bottom of the monstrous world,' _Lyc._ 158. In _Aen._ vii. 15, we
 read that when Aeneas sailed past Circe's island he heard "the growling
 noise of lions in wrath, ... and shapes of huge wolves fiercely howling."
 
 534. ~stabled wolves~, wolves in their dens. _Stable_ (= a standing-place)
 is used by Milton in the general sense of abode, _e.g._ in _Par. Lost_,
 xi. 752, "sea-monsters whelped and _stabled_." Comp. "Stable for
 camels," _Ezek._ xxv. 5, and the Latin _stabulum_, _Aen._ vi. 179,
 _stabula alta ferarum_.
 
 535. ~Hecate~: see l. 135.
 
 536. ~bowers~: see note, l. 45.
 
 539. ~unweeting~; unwitting, unknowing. This spelling is found in
 Spenser's _Faerie Queene_, both in the compounds and in the simple verb
 _weet_, a corruption of _wit_ (A.S. _witan_, to know). Compare _Par.
 Reg._ i. 126, "_unweeting_, he fulfilled The purposed counsel." _Sams.
 Agon._ 1680; Chaucer, _Doctor's Tale_, "Virginius came _to weet_ the
 judge's will."
 
 540. ~by then~, _i.e._ by the time when. The demonstrative adverb thus
 implies a relative adverb: comp. the Greek, where the demonstrative is
 generally omitted, though in Homer occasionally the demonstrative alone
 is used. Another rendering is to make line 540 parenthetical.
 
 542. ~knot-grass~. A grass with knotted or jointed stem: some, however,
 suppose marjoram to be intended here. ~dew-besprent~, _i.e._ besprinkled
 with dew: comp. _Lyc._ 29. _Be_ is an intensive prefix; _sprent_ is
 connected with M.E. _sprengen_, to scatter, of which _sprinkle_ is the
 frequentative form.
 
 543. ~sat me down~: see note, l. 61.
 
 544. ~canopied, and interwove~. Comp. _M. N. D._ ii. 2. 49, 'I know a
 bank,' etc. In sense 'canopied' refers to 'bank,' and 'interwove' to
 'ivy.' There are two forms of the past participle of _weave_, viz.
 _wove_ and _woven_: see _Arc._ 47.
 
 545. ~flaunting~, showy, garish. In _Lyc._ 146, the poet first wrote
 'garish columbine,' then 'well-attired woodbine.'
 
 547. ~meditate ... minstrelsy~, _i.e._ to sing a pastoral song: comp.
 _Lyc._ 32. 66. _To meditate the muse_ is a Virgilian phrase: see _Ecl._
 i. and vi. The Lat. _meditor_ has the meaning of 'to apply one's self
 to,' and does not mean merely to ponder.
 
 548. ~had~, should have: comp. l. 394. ~ere a close~, _i.e._ before he had
 finished his song (Masson). _Close_ occurs in the technical sense of
 'the final cadence of a piece of music.'
 
 549. ~wonted~: see note, l. 332.
 
 550. ~barbarous~: comp. _Son._ xii. 3, "a _barbarous_ noise environs me Of
 owls and cuckoos, etc."
 
 551. ~listened them~. The omission of _to_ after verbs of hearing is
 frequent in Shakespeare and others: comp. "To listen our purpose"; "List
 a brief tale"; "hearken the end"; etc. (see Abbott, Sec. 199). 'Them': this
 refers to the _sounds_ implied in 'dissonance.'
 
 552. ~unusual stop~. This refers to what happened at l. 145, and the "soft
 and solemn-breathing sound" to l. 230.
 
 553. ~drowsy frighted~, _i.e._ drowsy and frighted. The noise of Comus's
 rout is here supposed to have kept the horses of night awake and in a
 state of drowsy agitation until the sudden calm put an end to their
 uneasiness. In Milton's corrected MS. we read 'drowsy flighted,' where
 the two words are not co-ordinate epithets but must be regarded as
 expressing one idea = flying drowsily; to express this some insert a
 hyphen. Comp. 'dewy-feathered,' _Il Pens._ 146, and others of Milton's
 remarkable compound adjectives. The reading in the text is that of the
 printed editions of 1637, '45, and '73.
 
 554. ~Sleep~ (or Night) is represented as drawn by horses in a chariot
 with its curtains closely drawn. Comp. _Macbeth_, ii. l. 51, "curtained
 sleep."
 
 555. 'The lady's song rose into the air so sweetly and imperceptibly
 that silence was taken unawares and so charmed that she would gladly
 have renounced her nature and existence for ever if her place could
 always be filled by such music.' Comp. _Par. Lost_, iv. 604, "She all
 night long her amorous descant sung; _Silence was pleased_"; also
 Jonson's _Vision of Delight_:
 
     "Yet let it like an odour rise
     To all the senses here,
     And fall like sleep upon their eyes,
     Or music in their ear."
 
 558. ~took~, taken. Comp. l. 256 for a similar use of _take_, and compare
 'forsook,' line 499, for the form of the word.
 
 560. ~Still~, always. This use of _still_ is frequent in Elizabethan
 writers (Abbott, Sec. 69). ~I was all ear~. Warton notes this expressive
 idiom (still current) in Drummond's 'Sonnet to the Nightingale,' and in
 _Tempest_, iv. l. 59, "all eyes." _All_ is an attribute of _I_.
 
 561. ~create a soul~, etc., _i.e._ breathe life even into the dead: comp.
 _L'Alleg._ 144. Warton supposes that Milton may have seen a picture in
 an old edition of Quarles' _Emblems_, in which "a soul in the figure of
 an infant is represented within the ribs of a skeleton, as in its
 prison." _Rom._ vii. 24, "Who shall deliver me out of the body of this
 death?"
 
 565. ~harrowed~, distracted, torn as by a _harrow_. This is probably the
 meaning, but there is a verb 'harrow' corrupted from 'harry,' to subdue;
 hence some read "harried with grief and fear."
 
 567. ~How sweet ... how near~. This sentence contains two exclamations:
 this is a Greek construction. In English the idiom is "How sweet ...
 _and_ how near," etc. We may, however, render the line thus: "How
 sweet..., how near the deadly snare _is_!"
 
 568. ~lawns~. 'Lawn' is always used by Milton to denote an open stretch of
 grassy ground, whereas in modern usage it is applied generally to a
 smooth piece of grass-grown land in front of a house. The origin of the
 word is disputed, but it seems radically to denote 'a clear space'; it
 is said to be cognate with _llan_ used as a prefix in the names of
 certain Welsh towns, _e.g._ Llandaff, Llangollen. In Chaucer it takes
 the form launde.
 
 569. ~often trod by day~, which I have often trod by day, and therefore
 know well.
 
 570. ~mine ear~: see note, l. 171.
 
 571. ~wizard~. Here used in contempt, like many other words with the
 suffix _-ard_, or _-art_, as braggart, sluggard, etc. Milton
 occasionally, however, uses the word merely in the sense of magician or
 magical, without implying contempt: see _Lyc._ 55, "Deva spreads her
 _wizard_ stream."
 
 572. ~certain signs~: see l. 644.
 
 574. ~aidless~: an obsolete word. See Trench's _English Past and Present_
 for a list of about 150 words in _-less_, all now obsolete: comp. l. 92,
 note. ~wished~: wished for. Comp. l. 950 for a similar transitive use of
 the verb.
 
 575. ~such two~: two persons of such and such description.
 
 577. ~durst not stay~. _Durst_ is the old past tense of _dare_, and is
 used as an auxiliary: the form _dared_ is much more modern, and may be
 used as an independent verb.
 
 578. ~sprung~: see note, l. 256.
 
 579. ~till I had found~. The language is extremely condensed here, the
 meaning being, 'I began my flight, and continued to run till I _had
 found_ you'; the pluperfect tense is used because the speaker is looking
 back upon his meeting with the brothers after completing a long
 narration of the circumstances that led up to it. If, however, 'had
 found' be regarded as a subjunctive, the meaning is, 'I began my flight,
 and determined to continue it until I had found (_i.e._ should have
 found) you.' Comp. Abbott Sec. 361.
 
 581. ~triple knot~, a three-fold alliance of Night, Shades, and Hell.
 
 584. "This confidence of the elder brother in favour of the final
 efficacy of virtue, holds forth a very high strain of philosophy,
 delivered in as high strains of eloquence and poetry" (Warton). And Todd
 adds: "Religion here gave energy to the poet's strains."
 
 585. ~safely~, confidently. ~period~, sentence.
 
 586. ~for me~, _i.e._ for my part, so far as I am concerned: see note, l.
 602.
 
 588. ~Which erring men call Chance~. 'Erring' belongs to the predicate;
 "which men erroneously call Chance." Comp. Pope, _Essay on Man_:
 
     "All nature is but art, unknown to thee;
     All chance, direction, which thou canst not see."
 
 588. ~this I hold firm~. 'This' is explained by the next line: "this
 belief, namely, that Virtue may be assailed, etc., I hold firmly."
 
 590. ~enthralled~, enslaved. Comp. l. 1022.
 
 591. ~which ... harm~, which the Evil Power intended to be most harmful.
 
 595-7. ~Gathered like scum~, etc. According to one editor, this image is
 "taken from the conjectures of astronomers concerning the dark spots
 which from time to time appear on the surface of the sun's body and
 after a while disappear again; which they suppose to be the scum of that
 fiery matter which first breeds it, and then breaks through and consumes
 it."
 
 598. ~pillared firmament~. The firmament (Lat. _firmus_, firm or solid) is
 here regarded as the roof of the earth and supported on pillars. The
 ancients believed the stars to be fixed in the solid firmament: comp.
 _Par. Reg._ iv. 55; also _Wint. Tale_, ii. l. 100, "If I mistake In
 those foundations which I build upon, The centre is not big enough to
 bear A schoolboy's top."
 
 602. ~for~, as regards. ~let ... girt~, though he be surrounded.
 
 603. ~grisly legions~. 'Grisly,' radically the same as _grue-some_ =
 horrible, causing terror. In _Par. Lost_, iv. 821, Satan is called "the
 grisly king." 'Legions' is here a trisyllable.
 
 604. ~sooty flag of Acheron~. Acheron, at first the name of a river of the
 lower world, came to be used as a name for the whole of the lower world
 generally. Todd quotes from P. Fletcher's _Locusts_ (1627): "All hell
 run out and sooty flags display."
 
 605. ~Harpies and Hydras~. The Harpies (lit. 'spoilers') were unclean
 monsters, being birds with the heads of maidens, with long claws and
 gaunt faces. _Hydras_, here used as a general name for monstrous
 water-serpents (Gk. _hyd{=o}r_, water); the name was first given to the
 nine-headed monster slain by Hercules. See _Son._ xv. 7, "new rebellions
 raise Their _Hydra_ heads"; the epithet 'hydra-headed' being applied to
 a rebellion, an epidemic, or other evil that seems to gain strength from
 every endeavour to repress it.
 
 607. ~return his purchase back~, _i.e._ 'give up his spoil,' or (as in the
 MS.) 'release his new-got prey.' To purchase (Fr. _pour-chasser_)
 originally meant to pursue eagerly, hence to acquire by fair means or
 foul: it thus came to mean 'to steal' (as frequently in Spenser, Jonson,
 and Shakespeare), and 'to buy' (its current sense). See Trench, _Study
 of Words_; _Hen. V._ iii. 2. 45, "They will steal anything, and call it
 _purchase_"; i. _Hen. IV._ ii. l. 101, "thou shalt have share in our
 _purchase_."
 
 609. ~venturous~, ready to venture. See note, l. 79.
 
 610. ~yet~, nevertheless. The meaning is: '_Though_ thy courage is
 useless, _yet_ I love it.' ~emprise~: an obsolete form (common in Spenser)
 of _enterprise_. It is literally that which is undertaken; hence
 'readiness to undertake'; hence 'daring.'
 
 611. ~can do thee little stead~, _i.e._ can help thee little. _Stead_,
 both as noun and verb, is obsolete except in certain phrases, _e.g._ 'to
 stand in good stead,' and in composition, _e.g._ _stead_fast,
 home_stead_, in_stead_, Hamp_stead_, etc. Its strict sense is place or
 position: comp. _Il Pens._ 3, "How little you _bested_."
 
 612. ~Far other arms~, _i.e._ very different arms. 'Other' has here its
 radical sense of 'different,' and can therefore be modified by an
 adverb.
 
 615. ~unthread~, loosen. Comp. _Temp._ iv. l. 259, "Go charge my goblins
 that they grind their joints With dry convulsions, shorten up their
 sinews With aged cramps."
 
 617. ~As to make this relation~, _i.e._ as to be able to tell this.
 
 619. ~a certain shepherd lad~. This is supposed to refer to Charles
 Diodati, Milton's dearest friend, to whom he addressed his 1st and 6th
 elegies, and after whose death he wrote the touching poem _Epitaphium
 Damonis_, in which he alludes to his friend's medical and botanical
 skill:
 
     "There thou shalt cull me simples, and shalt teach
     Thy friend the name and healing powers of each."
 
     (_Cowper's translation._)
 
 620. ~Of small regard to see to~: in colloquial English, 'not much to
 look at.' This is an old idiom: comp. Greek +kalos idein+: see English
 Bible, "goodly to look to," i. _Sam._ xvi. 12; _Ezek._ xxiii. 15; _Jer._
 xlvii. 3.
 
 621. ~virtuous~, of healing power: see note, l. 165. Comp. _Il Pens._ 113,
 "the virtuous ring and glass."
 
 623. ~beg me sing~: see note, l. 304.
 
 625. ~ecstasy~: see note, l. 261. The Greek _ekstasis_ = standing out of
 one's self.
 
 626. ~scrip~, wallet.
 
 627. ~simples~, medicinal herbs. 'Simple' (Lat. _simplicem_, 'one-fold,'
 'not compound') was used of a single ingredient in a medicine; hence its
 popular use in the sense of 'herb' or 'drug.'
 
 630. ~me~, _i.e._ for me: the ethic dative.
 
 633. ~bore~. The nom. of this verb is, in sense, some such word as the
 plant or the root.
 
 634. ~unknown and like esteemed~: known and esteemed to a like extent,
 _i.e._ in both cases not at all. _Like_ here corresponds to the prefix
 _un_ in _unknown_. On the description of the plant, see Introduction,
 reference to Ascham's _Scholemaster_.
 
 635. ~clouted shoon~, patched shoes. The expression is found in
 Shakespeare, ii. _Hen. VI._ iv. 2. 195, "Spare none but such as go in
 _clouted shoon_"; _Cym._ iv. 2. 214, "put My _clouted brogues_ from off
 my feet, whose rudeness Answer'd my steps too loud": see examples in
 Mayhew and Skeat's _M. E. Dictionary_. There are instances, however, of
 _clout_ in the sense of a plate of iron fastened on the sole of a shoe.
 In either sense of the word 'clouted shoon' would be heavy and coarse.
 _Shoon_ is an old plural (O.E. _scon_); comp. _hosen_, _eyen_ (= eyes),
 _dohtren_ (= daughters), _foen_ (= foes), etc.
 
 636. ~more med'cinal~, of greater virtue. The line may be scanned thus:
 And yet | more med | 'cinal is | it than | that Mo | ly. ~Moly~. When
 Ulysses was approaching the abode of Circe he was met by Hermes, who
 said: "Come then, I will redeem thee from thy distress, and bring
 deliverance. Lo, take this herb of virtue, and go to the dwelling of
 Circe, that it may keep from thy head the evil day. And I will tell thee
 all the magic sleight of Circe. She will mix thee a potion and cast
 drugs into the mess; but not even so shall she be able to enchant thee;
 so helpful is this charmed herb that I shall give thee ... Therewith the
 slayer of Argos gave me the plant that he had plucked from the ground,
 and he showed me the growth thereof. It was black at the root, but the
 flower was like to milk. _Moly_ the gods call it, but it is hard for
 mortal men to dig; howbeit with the gods all things are possible"
 (_Odyssey_, x. 280, etc., _Butcher and Lang's translation_). In his
 first Elegy Milton alludes to M{=o}ly as the counter-charm to the spells
 of Circe: see also Tennyson's _Lotos-Eaters_, "beds of amaranth and
 _moly_."
 
 638. ~He called it Haemony~. _He_ is the shepherd lad of line 619.
 _Haemony_: Milton invents the plant, both name and thing. But the
 adjective _Haemonian_ is used, in Latin poetry as = _Thessalian_,
 Haemonia being the old name of Thessaly. And as Thessaly was regarded as
 a land of magic, 'Haemonian' acquired the sense of 'magical' (see Ovid,
 _Met._ vii 264, "_Haemonia_ radices valle resectas," etc.), and Milton's
 Haemony is simply "the magical plant." Coleridge supposes that by the
 prickles and gold flower of the plant Milton signified the sorrows and
 triumph of the Christian life.
 
 639. ~sovran use~: see note, l. 41. The use of this adjective with charms,
 medicines, or remedies of any kind was so very common that the word came
 to imply 'all-healing,' 'supremely efficacious'; see _Cor._ ii. 1. 125,
 "The most _sovereign_ prescription in Galen."
 
 640. ~mildew blast~: comp. _Arc._ 48-53, _Ham._ iii. 4. 64, "Here is your
 husband; Like a _mildew'd_ ear _Blasting_ his wholesome brother." A
 mildew blast is one giving rise to that kind of blight called mildew
 (A.S. meledeaw, honey-dew), it being supposed that the prevalence of dry
 east winds was favourable to its formation.
 
 642. ~pursed it up~, etc., _i.e._ put it in my wallet, though I did not
 attach much importance to it. ~little reckoning~: comp. _Lyc._ 116, where
 the very same phrase occurs.
 
 643. ~Till now that~. Here _that_ = when, the clause introduced by it
 being explanatory of _now_ (see Abbott, Sec. 284).
 
 646-7. ~Entered ... came off~. 'I entered into the very midst of his
 treacherous enchantments, and yet escaped.' _Lime-twigs_ = snares; in
 allusion to the practice of catching birds by means of twigs smeared
 with a viscous substance (called on that account 'birdlime').
 Shakespeare makes repeated allusion to this practice: see _Macbeth_, iv.
 2. 34; _Two Gent._ ii. 2. 68; ii. _Hen. VI._ i. 3. 91; etc.
 
 649. ~necromancer's hall~. Warton supposes that Milton here thought of a
 magician's castle which has an enchanted hall invaded by Christian
 knights, as we read of in the romances of chivalry. _Necromancer_, lit.
 one who by magical power can commune with the dead (Gk. +nekros+, a
 corpse); hence a sorcerer. From confusion of the first syllable with
 that of the Lat. _niger_, black, the art of necromancy came to be called
 "the black art."
 
 650. ~Where if he be~, Lat. _ubi si sit_: in English the relative adverb
 in such cases is best rendered by a conjunction + a demonstrative
 adverb; thus, '_and_ if he be _there_.'
 
 651. ~brandished blade~. Comp. Hermes' advice to Ulysses: "When it shall
 be that Circe smites thee with her long wand, even then draw thy sharp
 sword from thy thigh, and spring on her, as one eager to slay her,"
 _Odyssey_, x. ~break his glass~. An imitation of Spenser, who makes Sir
 Guyon break the golden cup of the enchantress Excess, _F. Q._ i. 12,
 stanza 56.
 
 652. ~luscious~, delicious. The word is a corruption of _lustious_ from
 O.E. _lust_ = pleasure: see note, l. 49.
 
 653. ~But seize his wand~. The force of this injunction is shown by lines
 815-819.
 
 654. ~menace high~, violent threat. _High_ is thus used in a number of
 figurative senses, _e.g._ a high wind, a high hand, high passions (_Par.
 Lost_, ix. 123), high descent, high design, etc.
 
 655. ~Sons of Vulcan~. In the _Aeneid_ (Bk. viii. 252) we are told that
 Cacus, son of Vulcan (the Roman God of Fire), "vomited from his throat
 huge volumes of smoke" when pursued by Hercules, "_Faucibus ingentem
 fumum_," etc.
 
 657. ~apace~; quickly, at a great pace. This word has changed its
 meaning: in Chaucer it means 'at a foot pace,' _i.e._ slowly. The first
 syllable is the indefinite article '_a_' = one (Skeat).
 
 658. ~bear~: the subjunctive used optatively (Abbott, Sec. 365). (_Stage
 Direction_) ~puts by~: puts on one side, refuses. ~goes about to rise~,
 _i.e._ endeavours to rise. This idiomatic use of _go about_ still
 lingers in the phrase 'to _go about_ one's business'; comp. 'to _set
 about_' anything.
 
 659. ~but~, merely: comp. l. 656. After the conditional clause we have
 here a verb in the present tense ('are chained'), a construction which
 well expresses the certainty and immediate action of the sorcerer's
 spell (see Abbott, Sec. 371).
 
 660. ~your nerves ... alabaster~. Comp. _Tempest_, i. 2. 471-484. Milton
 has the word alabaster three times, twice incorrectly spelled
 _alablaster_ (in this passage and _Par. Lost_, iv. 544) and once
 correctly, as now entered in the text (_Par. Reg._ iv. 548). Alabaster
 is a kind of marble: comp. _On Shak._ 14, "make us _marble_ with too
 much conceiving."
 
 661. ~or, as Daphne was~, etc. The construction is: 'if I merely wave
 this wand, you (become) a marble statue, or (you become) root-bound, as
 Daphne was, that fled Apollo.' Milton inserts the adverbial clause in
 the predicate, which is not unusual; he then adds an attributive clause,
 which is not usual in English, though common in Greek and Latin. Daphne,
 an Arcadian goddess, was pursued by Apollo, and having prayed for aid,
 she was changed into a laurel tree (Gk. +daphne+): comp, the story of
 Syrinx and Pan, referred to in _Arc._ 106.
 
 662. ~fled~. Comp. the transitive use of the verb in l. 829, 939, _Son._
 xviii. 14, "_fly_ the Babylonian woe"; _Sams. Agon._ 1541, "_fly_ The
 sight of this so horrid spectacle."
 
 663. ~freedom of my mind~, etc. Comp. Cowper's noble passage, "He is the
 freeman whom the truth makes free," etc. (_Task_, v. 733).
 
 665. ~corporal rind~: the body, called in _Il Pens._ 92, "this fleshly
 nook."
 
 668. ~here be all~. See note, l. 12.
 
 669. ~fancy can beget~: comp. _Il Pens._ 6.
 
 672. ~cordial julep~, heart-reviving drink. _Cordial_, lit. hearty (Lat.
 _cordi_, stem of _cor_, the heart): _julep_, Persian _gul{=a}b_,
 rose-water.
 
 673. ~his~ = its: see note, l. 96.
 
 674. ~syrups~: Arab, _shar{=a}b_, a drink, wine.
 
 675. ~that Nepenthes~, etc. The allusion is explained by the following
 lines of the _Odyssey_: "Then Helen, daughter of Zeus, turned to new
 thoughts. Presently she cast a drug into the wine whereof they drank, a
 drug to lull all pain and anger, and bring forgetfulness of every
 sorrow. Whoso should drink a draught thereof, when it is mingled in the
 bowl, on that day he would let no tear fall down his cheeks, not though
 his father and his mother died ... Medicines of such virtue and so
 helpful had the daughter of Zeus, which Polydamna, the wife of Thon, had
 given her, a woman of Egypt, where earth the grain-giver yields herbs in
 greatest plenty, many that are healing in the cup, and many baneful"
 (_Butcher and Lang's translation_, iv. 219-230). 'Nepenthes,' a Greek
 adj. = sorrow-dispelling (+ne+, privative; +penthos+, grief). It is here
 used by Milton as the name of an opiate and it is now occasionally used
 as a general name for drugs that relieve pain.
 
 677. ~Is of such power~, etc.: see note, l. 155. The construction is,
 'That Nepenthes is not of such power to stir up joy as this (julep is,
 nor is it) so friendly to life (nor) so cool to thirst.'
 
 679. ~Why ... to yourself~. Comp. Shakespeare, _Son._ i. 8, "Thyself thy
 foe, to thy sweet self too cruel."
 
 680. 'Nature gave you your beautiful person to be held in trust on
 certain conditions, of which the most obligatory is that the body should
 have refreshment after toil, ease after pain. Yet this very condition
 you disregard, and deal harshly with yourself by refusing my proferred
 glass at a time when you are in need of food and rest.' Comp.
 Shakespeare, _Son._ iv. "Unthrifty loveliness, why dost thou spend Upon
 thyself thy beauty's legacy," etc.
 
 685. ~unexempt condition~, _i.e._ a condition binding on all and at all
 times, a law of human nature.
 
 687. ~mortal frailty~, _i.e._ weak mortals: abstract for concrete.
 
 688. ~That~. The antecedent of this relative is _you_, l. 682. See note,
 l. 2.
 
 689. ~timely~, seasonable. So 'timeless' = unseasonable (Scott's
 _Marmion_, iii. 223, "gambol rude and _timeless_ joke"): comp. _Son._
 ii. 8, "_timely_-happy spirits"; and l. 970.
 
 693. ~Was this ... abode~? The verb is singular, because 'cottage' and
 'safe abode' convey one idea: see Comus's words, l. 320. Notice also
 that the past tense is used as referring to the past act of telling.
 
 694. ~aspects~: accent on final syllable.
 
 695. ~oughly-headed~: so spelt in Milton's MS. = ugly-headed. _Ugly_ is
 radically connected with _awe_.
 
 698. ~with visored falsehood and base forgery~. A vizor (also spelt
 _visor_, _visard_, _vizard_) is a mask, "a false face." The allusion is
 to Comus's disguise: see l. 166. _With_ in this line, as in lines 672
 and 700, denotes _by means of_.
 
 700. ~liquorish baits~: see note on _baited_, l. 162. 'Liquorish,' by
 catachresis for _lickerish_ = tempting to the appetite, causing one to
 _lick_ one's lips. The student should carefully distinguish the three
 words _lickerish_ (as above), _liquorish_ (which is really meaningless)
 and _liquorice_ (= licorice = Lat. _glycyrrhiza_), a plant with a sweet
 root.
 
 702. ~treasonous~; an obsolete word. The current form 'treasonable' has
 usually a more restricted sense: Milton and Shakespeare use _treasonous_
 in the more general sense of _traitorous_ (a cognate word). In this line
 'offer' = the thing offered.
 
 703. ~good men ... good things~. This noble sentiment Milton has
 borrowed from Euripides, _Medea_, 618, +Kakou gar andros dor' onesin ouk
 echei+ "the gifts of the bad man are without profit." (Newton).
 
 704. ~that which is not good~, etc. This is Platonic: the soul has a
 rational principle and an irrational or appetitive, and when the former
 controls the latter, the desires are for what is good only (_Rep._ iv.
 439).
 
 707. ~budge doctors of the Stoic fur~. Budge is lambskin with the wool
 dressed outwards, worn on the edge of the hoods of bachelors of arts,
 etc. Therefore, if both _budge_ and _fur_ be taken literally the line is
 tautological. But 'budge' has the secondary sense of 'solemn,' like a
 doctor in his robes; and 'fur' may be used figuratively in the sense of
 _sect_, just as "the cloth" is used to denote the clergy. The whole
 phrase would thus be equivalent to 'solemn doctors of the Stoic sect.'
 It is possible that Milton makes equivocal reference to the two senses
 of 'budge.'
 
 708. ~the Cynic tub~ = the tub of Diogenes the Cynic, here put in contempt
 for the Cynic school of Greek philosophy, which was the forerunner of
 the Stoic system. Diogenes, one of the early Cynics, lived in a tub, and
 was fond of calling himself +ho kyon+ (the dog).
 
 709. ~the~: here used generically.
 
 711. ~unwithdrawing~. In this participle the termination _-ing_ seems
 almost equivalent to that of the past participle: comp. "_all-obeying_
 breath" (= obeyed by all), _A. and C._ iii. 13, 77. Nature's gifts are
 not only full but continuous.
 
 714. ~all to please ... curious taste~. _All_ = entirely, here modifies
 the infinitives please and sate. _Curious_ = fastidious: its original
 sense is 'careful' or 'anxious.' Compare the two senses of _exquisite_,
 note l. 359.
 
 715. ~set~, _i.e._ she set. The pronominal subject is omitted.
 
 717. ~To deck~: infinitive of purpose.
 
 718. ~in her own loins~, _i.e._ in the bowels of the earth.
 
 719. ~hutched~ = stored up, enclosed. _Hutch_ is an old word for chest or
 coffer, chiefly used now in the compound 'rabbit-hutch.'
 
 720. ~To store her children with~, _i.e._ _wherewith_ to store her
 children. Or we may read, 'in order to store her children with (them).'
 'Store' = provide.
 
 721. ~pet of temperance~, _i.e._ a sudden and transitory fit of
 temperance. ~pulse~. So Daniel and his three companions refused the
 dainties of the King of Babylon and fed on pulse and water; _Dan._ i.
 
 722. ~frieze~, coarse woollen cloth.
 
 723. ~All-giver~. Comp. Gk. +pandora+, an epithet applied to the earth
 as the giver of all.
 
 725. 'And we should serve him as (if he were) a grudging master and a
 penurious niggard of his wealth, and (we should) live like Nature's
 bastards': see _Hebrews_ xii. 8, "If ye are without chastening, whereof
 all have been made partakers, then are ye _bastards, and not sons_."
 
 728. ~Who~. The pronoun here relates not to the word immediately preceding
 it, but to the substantive implied in the possessive pronoun _her_,
 _i.e._ the sons of her who. His, her, etc., in such constructions have
 their full force as genitives: comp. _L'Alleg._ 124, "her grace whom" =
 the grace of her whom. ~surcharged~: overloaded, 'overfraught' (l. 732).
 ~waste fertility~, wasted or unused abundance. This participial use of
 'waste' seems to be due to the similarity in sound to such participles
 as 'elevate' (= elevated), 'instruct' (= instructed), etc., which occur
 in Milton (comp. _English Past and Present_, vi.).
 
 729. ~strangled~, suffocated.
 
 730. ~winged air darked with plumes~, _i.e._ the air being darkened by the
 flight of innumerable birds. Spenser also has _dark_ as a verb. Both
 clauses in this line are absolute.
 
 731. ~over-multitude~, outnumber. This line and the preceding one
 illustrate the freedom with which, in earlier English, one part of
 speech was used for another.
 
 732. ~o'erfraught~: see note, l. 355.
 
 733. ~emblaze~, make to blaze, make splendid. There is perhaps a reference
 to the sense of _emblazon_, which is from M.E. _blazen_, to blaze
 abroad, to proclaim.
 
 734. ~bestud with stars~. In Milton's MS. it is 'bestud the centre with
 their star-light,' _centre_ being the 'centre of the earth.'
 
 735. ~inured~, accustomed, by custom rendered less sensitive. _Inure_ is
 from the old phrase 'in ure' = in operation (Fr. _oeuvre_, work).
 
 737. ~coy~: shy or reserved. ~cozened~: cheated, beguiled. The origin of
 this word is interesting: a cozener is one who, for selfish ends, claims
 kindred or _cousinship_ with another, and hence a flatterer or cheat.
 
 739-755. ~Beauty is Nature's coin~, etc. "The idea that runs through these
 seventeen lines is a favourite one with the old poets; and Warton and
 Todd cite parallel passages from Shakespeare, Daniel, Fletcher, and
 Drayton. Thus, from Shakespeare (_M. N. D._ i. 1. 76-8):
 
     "Earthlier happy is the rose distilled
     Than that which, withering on the virgin thorn,
     Grows, lives, and dies, in single blessedness."
 
 See also Shakespeare's first six sonnets, which are pervaded by the idea
 in all its subtleties" (Masson).
 
 743. ~let slip time~, _i.e._ allow time _to_ slip: see note, l. 304. Comp.
 _Par. Lost_, i. 178. "Let us not _slip_ the occasion."
 
 744. ~It~ = beauty. ~languished~, languid or languishing: comp. _Par.
 Lost_, vi. 496, "their languished hope revived"; _Epitaph on M. of W._
 33. The suffix _-ed_ is frequent in Elizabethan English where we now
 have _-ing_ (Abbott, Sec. 374).
 
 747. ~most~, as many as possible.
 
 748. ~homely ... home~. There is here a play upon words as in _Two Gent._
 i. 1. 2: "_Home-keeping_ youth have ever _homely_ wits." _Homely_ is
 derived from _home_.
 
 749. Women with coarse complexions and dull cheeks are good enough for
 household occupations.
 
 750. ~of sorry grain~, not brilliant, of poor colour. 'Grain' is from Lat.
 _granum_, a seed, applied to small objects, and hence to the coccus or
 cochineal insect which yields a variety of red dyes. Hence _grain_ came
 to denote certain colours, _e.g._ Tyrian purple, violet, etc., and is so
 used by Milton: see _Il Pens._ 33, "a robe of darkest _grain_"; _Par.
 Lost_, v. 285, "sky-tinctured _grain_"; xi. 242, "A military vest of
 purple ... Livelier than ... the _grain_ Of Sarra," etc. And as these
 were fast or durable colours we have such phrases as 'to dye in grain,'
 'a rogue in grain,' 'an ingrained habit.' (See further in Marsh's _Lect.
 on Eng. Lang._ p. 55).
 
 751. ~sampler~, a sample or pattern piece of needlework. It is a doublet
 of _exemplar_. ~tease the huswife's wool~. To _tease_ is to comb or card:
 comp. the Lat. _vexare_. 'Huswife' = house-wife, further corrupted into
 _hussy_. _Hussif_ (a case for needles, etc.) is a different word.
 
 752. ~What need a vermeil-tinctured lip~? See note, l. 362, on 'what
 need.' _Vermeil_: a French spelling of _vermilion_. The name is from
 Lat. _vermis_, a worm (the cochineal insect, from which the colour used
 to be got); and as _vermis_ is cognate with Sansk. _krimi_, a worm, it
 follows that _vermilion_, _crimson_, and _carmine_ are cognate.
 
 753. ~tresses~. Homer (_Odyssey_, v. 390) speaks of "the fair-tressed
 Dawn," +euplokamos Eos+.
 
 755. ~advised~. Contrast with 'Advice,' l. 108.
 
 756. Lines 756-761 are not addressed to Comus.
 
 757. ~but that~: were it not that.
 
 758. ~as mine eyes~: as he has already charmed mine eyes; see note, l.
 170.
 
 759. ~rules pranked in reason's garb~, _i.e._ specious arguments.
 _Pranked_ = decked in a showy manner: Milton (Prose works, i. 147, ed.
 1698) speaks of the Episcopal church service _pranking_ herself in the
 weeds of the Popish mass. Comp. _Wint. Tale_, iv. 4. 10, "Most
 goddess-like _prank'd_ up"; _Par. Lost_, ii. 226, "Belial, with words
 clothed in _reason's garb_."
 
 760-1. I hate when Vice brings forward refined arguments, and Virtue
 allows them to pass unchallenged. ~bolt~ = to sift or separate, as the
 _boulting-mill_ separates the meal from the bran; in this sense the word
 (also spelt _boult_) is used by Chaucer, Spenser (_F. Q._ ii. 4. 24),
 Shakespeare (_Cor._ iii. 1. 322, _Wint. Tale_, iv. 4. 375, "the fanned
 snow that's _bolted_ By the northern blasts twice o'er," etc.). The
 spelling _bolt_ has confused the word with 'bolt,' to shoot or start
 out. See Index to Globe _Shakespeare_.
 
 763. ~she would her children~, etc., _i.e._ she wished (that) her children
 should be wantonly luxurious: comp. l. 172; _Par. Lost_, i. 497-503.
 
 764. ~cateress~, stewardess, provider: lit. 'a buyer.' _Cateress_ is
 feminine: the masculine is _caterer_, where the final _-er_ of the agent
 is unnecessarily repeated.
 
 765. ~Means ... to the good~: intends ... for the good.
 
 767. ~dictate~. The accent in Milton's time was on the first syllable,
 both in noun and verb. ~spare Temperance~. For Milton's praises of
 Temperance comp. _Il Pens._ 46, "Spare Fast that oft with gods doth
 diet"; also the 6th Elegy, 56-66; _Son._ xx., etc. "There is much in the
 Lady which resembles the youthful Milton himself--he, the Lady of his
 college--and we may well believe that the great debate concerning
 temperance was not altogether dramatic (where, indeed, is Milton truly
 dramatic?), but was in part a record of passages in the poet's own
 spiritual history." Dowden's _Transcripts and Studies_.
 
 768. If Nature's blessings were equally distributed instead of being
 heaped upon a luxurious few, then (as Shakespeare says, _King Lear_, iv.
 1. 73) "distribution should undo excess, And each man have enough."
 
 769. ~beseeming~, suitable. The original sense of _seem_ is 'to be
 fitting,' as in the words _beseem_ and _seemly_.
 
 770. ~lewdly-pampered~; one of Milton's most expressive compounds =
 wickedly gluttonous. _Lewd_ has passed through several changes of
 meaning: (1) the lay-people as distinct from the clergy; (2) ignorant or
 unlearned; and finally (2) base or licentious.
 
 774. ~she no whit encumbered~, _i.e._ Nature would not be in the least
 surcharged (as Comus represented in l. 728). _No whit_, used adverbially
 = not in the least, lit. 'not a particle.' Etymologically _aught_ = a
 whit, _naught_ = no whit.
 
 776. ~His praise due paid~, _i.e._ would be duly paid. On _due_, see note,
 l. 12. ~gluttony~: abstract for concrete.
 
 779. ~Crams~, _i.e._ crams himself. There are many verbs in English that
 may be thus used reflexively without having the pronoun expressed,
 _e.g._ _feed_, _prepare_, _change_, _pour_, _press_, etc.
 
 780. ~enow~. 'Enow' conveys the notion of a number, as in early English:
 it is also spelt _anow_, and in Chaucer _ynowe_, and is the plural of
 _enough_. It still occurs as a provincialism in England. On lines
 780-799 Masson says: "A recurrence, by the sister, with much more mystic
 fervour, to that Platonic and Miltonic doctrine which had already been
 propounded by the Elder Brother (see lines 420-475)."
 
 782. ~sun-clad power of chastity~. With 'sun-clad' compare 'the sacred
 rays of chastity,' l. 425. Similarly in the _Faerie Queene_, iii. 6,
 Spenser says of Belphoebe, who represents Chastity, "And Phoebus with
 fair beams did her adorn."
 
 783. ~yet to what end?~ A rhetorical question, = it would be to no
 purpose.
 
 784. ~nor ... nor~. These correlatives are often used in poetry for
 _neither ... nor_ (Shakespeare often omitting the former altogether),
 and are equally correct. _Nor_ is only a contraction of _neither_, and
 the first may as well be contracted as the second.
 
 785. ~sublime notion and high mystery~. In the _Apology for Smectymnuus_
 Milton tells of his study of the "divine volume of Plato," wherein he
 learned of the "abstracted sublimities" of Chastity and Love: also of
 his study of the Holy Scripture "unfolding these chaste and high
 mysteries, with timeless care infused, that the body is for the Lord,
 and the Lord for the body."
 
 790. ~dear wit~. 'Dear' is here used in contempt: its original sense is
 'precious' (A.S. _deore_), but in Elizabethan English it has a variety
 of meanings, _e.g._ intense, serious, grievous, great, etc. Comp. "sad
 occasion _dear_," _Lyc._ 6; "_dear_ groans," _L. L. L._ v. 2. 874. Craik
 suggests "that the notion properly involved in it of love, having first
 become generalised into that of a strong affection of any kind, had
 thence passed on to that of such an emotion the very reverse of love,"
 as in my _dearest_ foe. ~gay rhetoric~: here so named in contempt, as
 being the instrument of sophistry.
 
 791. ~fence~, argumentation, _Fence_ is an abbreviation of _defence_:
 comp. "tongue-fence" (Milton), "fencer in wits' school" (Fuller), _Much
 Ado_, v. 1. 75.
 
 794. ~rapt spirits~. 'Rapt' = enraptured, as if the mind or soul had been
 _carried out of itself_ (Lat. _raptus_, seized): comp. _Il Pens._ 40,
 "Thy _rapt_ soul sitting in thine eyes." Milton also uses the word of
 the actual snatching away of a person: "What accident hath _rapt_ him
 from us," _Par. Lost_, ii. 40.
 
 797. ~the brute Earth~, etc., _i.e._ the senseless Earth would become
 sensible and assist me. 'Brute' = Lat. _brutus_, dull, insensible: comp.
 Horace, _Odes_, i. 34. 9, "_bruta tellus_."
 
 800. ~She fables not~: she speaks truly. This line is alliterative.
 
 801. ~set off~: comp. _Lyc._ 80, "_set off_ to the world."
 
 802. ~though not mortal~: _sc._ 'I am.' ~shuddering dew~. The epithet
 is, by hypallage, transferred from the person to the dew or cold sweat
 which 'dips' or moistens his body.
 
 804. ~Speaks thunder and the chains of Erebus~, etc.; in allusion to the
 _Titanomachia_ or contest between Zeus and the Titans. Zeus, having been
 provided with thunder and lightning by the Cyclops, cast the Titans into
 Tartarus or Erebus, a region as far below Hell as Heaven is above the
 Earth. The leader of the Titans was Cronos (Saturn). There is a zeugma
 in _speaks_ as applied to 'thunder' and 'chains,' unless it be taken as
 in both cases equivalent to _denounces_.
 
 806. ~Come, no more!~ Comus now addresses the lady.
 
 808. ~canon laws of our foundation~, _i.e._ the established rules of our
 society. "A humorous application of the language of universities and
 other foundations" (Keightley).
 
 809. ~'tis but the lees~, etc. _Lees_ and _settlings_ are synonymous =
 dregs. The allusion is to the old physiological system of the four
 primary humours of the body, viz. blood, phlegm, choler, and melancholy
 (see Burton's _Anat. of Mel._ i. 1, Sec. ii. 2): "Melancholy, cold and dry,
 thick, black, and sour, begotten of the more feculent part of
 nourishment, and purged from the spleen"; Gk. +melancholia+, black bile.
 See _Sams. Agon._ 600, "_humours black_ That mingle with thy fancy";
 and Nash's _Terrors of the Night_ (1594): "(Melancholy) sinketh down to
 the bottom like the lees of the wine, corrupteth the blood, and is the
 cause of lunacy."
 
 811. ~straight~, immediately. The adverb _straight_ is now chiefly used of
 direction; to indicate time _straightway_ (= in a straight way) is more
 usual: comp. _L'Alleg._ 69: "Straight mine eye hath caught new
 pleasures."
 
 814. ~scape~, a mutilated form of 'escape,' occurs both as a noun and a
 verb in Shakespeare and Milton: see _Par. Lost_, x. 5, "what can _scape_
 the eye of God?"; _Par. Reg._ ii. 189, "then lay'st thy _scapes_ on
 names adored."
 
 816. ~without his rod reversed~. This use of the participle is a Latinism:
 see note, l. 48. At the same time it is to be noted that a phrase of
 this kind introduced by 'without' is in Latin frequently rendered by the
 ablative absolute: such construction is here inadmissible because
 'without' also governs 'mutters.'
 
 817. ~backward mutters~. The notion of a counter-charm produced by
 reversing the magical wand and by repeating the charm backwards occurs
 in Ovid (_Met._ xiv. 300), who describes Circe as thus restoring the
 followers of Ulysses to their human forms. Milton skilfully makes the
 neglect of the counter-charm the occasion for introducing the legend of
 Sabrina, which was likely to interest an audience assembled in the
 neighbourhood of the River Severn. On 'mutters,' see note, l. 526.
 
 820. ~bethink me~. The pronoun after this verb is reflexive. "The
 deliverance of their sister would be impossible but for supernatural
 interposition, the aid afforded by the Attendant Spirit from Jove's
 court. In other words, Divine Providence is asserted. Not without higher
 than human aid is the Lady rescued, and through the weakness of the
 mortal instruments of divine grace but half the intended work is
 accomplished." Dowden's _Transcripts and Studies_.
 
 821. In this line and the next the attributive clauses are separated
 from the antecedent: see note, l. 2.
 
 822. ~Meliboeus~. The name of a shepherd in Virgil's _Eclogue_ i.
 Possibly the poet Spenser is here meant, as the tale of Sabrina is given
 in the _Faerie Queene_, ii. 10, 14. The tale is also told by Geoffrey of
 Monmouth and by Sackville, Drayton and Warner. As Milton refers to a
 'shepherd,' _i.e._ a poet, and to 'the soothest shepherd,' _i.e._ the
 truest poet, and as he follows Spenser's version of the story in this
 poem, we need not hesitate to identify Meliboeus with Spenser.
 
 823. ~soothest~, truest. The A.S. _soth_ meant _true_; hence also 'a true
 thing' = truth. It survives in _soothe_ (lit. to affirm to be true),
 _soothsay_ (see l. 874), and _forsooth_ (= for a truth).
 
 824. ~from hence~. _Hence_ represents an A.S. word _heonan_, _-an_ being
 a suffix = from: so that in the phrase 'from hence' the force of the
 preposition is twice introduced. Yet the idiom is common: it arises from
 forgetfulness of the origin of the word. Comp. _Arc._ 3: "which _we from
 hence_ descry."
 
 825. ~with moist curb sways~: comp. l. 18. Sabrina was a _numen fluminis_
 or river-deity.
 
 826. ~Sabrina~: The following is Milton's version of the legend:--"After
 this, Brutus, in a chosen place, builds Troja Nova, changed in time to
 Trinovantum, now London; and began to enact laws (Heli being then High
 Priest in Judea); and, having governed the whole isle twenty-four years,
 died, and was buried in his new Troy. His three sons--Locrine, Albanact,
 and Camber--divide the land by consent. Locrine had the middle part,
 Loegria; Camber possessed Cambria or Wales; Albanact, Albania, now
 Scotland. But he, in the end, by Humber, King of the Huns, who, with a
 fleet, invaded that land, was slain in fight, and his people driven back
 into Loegria. Locrine and his brother go out against Humber; who now
 marching onward was by them defeated, and in a river drowned, which to
 this day retains his name. Among the spoils of his camp and navy were
 found certain young maids, and Estrilidis, above the rest, passing fair,
 the daughter of a king in Germany, from whence Humber, as he went wasting
 the sea-coast, had led her captive; whom Locrine, though before
 contracted to the daughter of Corineus, resolves to marry. But being
 forced and threatened by Corineus, whose authority and power he feared,
 Gwendolen the daughter he yields to marry, but in secret loves the other;
 and, ofttimes retiring as to some sacrifice, through vaults and passages
 made underground, and seven years thus enjoying her, had by her a
 daughter equally fair, whose name was Sabra. But when once his fear was
 off by the death of Corineus, not content with secret enjoyment,
 divorcing Gwendolen, he makes Estrilidis his Queen. Gwendolen, all in
 rage, departs into Cornwall; where Pladan, the son she had by Locrine,
 was hitherto brought up by Corineus, his grandfather; and gathering an
 army of her father's friends and subjects, gives battle to her husband by
 the river Sture, wherein Locrine, shot with an arrow, ends his life. But
 not so ends the fury of Gwendolen, for Estrilidis and her daughter Sabra
 she throws into a river, and, to have a monument of revenge, proclaims
 that the stream be thenceforth called after the damsel's name, which by
 length of time is changed now to _Sabrina_ or Severn."--_History of
 Britain_ (1670).
 
 827. ~Whilom~, of old. An obsolete word, lit. 'at time'; A.S. _hwilum_,
 instr. or dat. plur. of _hwil_, time.
 
 830. ~step-dame~. For the actual relationship, see note, l. 826. The
 prefix _step_ (A.S. _steop-_) means 'orphaned,' and applies properly to
 a child whose parent has re-married: it was afterwards used in the words
 'step-father,' etc. _Dame_ (Fr. _dame_, a lady) retains the sense of
 mother in the form _dam_.
 
 832. ~his~ = its: see note, l. 96.
 
 834. ~pearled wrists~, wrists adorned with pearls. An appropriate epithet,
 as pearls were said to exist in the waters of the Severn.
 
 835. ~aged Nereus' hall~, the abode of old Nereus, _i.e._ the bottom of
 the sea. Nereus, the father of the Nereids, or sea nymphs, is described
 as the wise and unerring old man of the sea; in Virgil, _grandaevus
 Nereus_. See also, l. 871, and compare Jonson's _Neptune's Triumph_,
 last song: "Old Nereus, with his fifty girls, From aged Indus laden home
 with pearls."
 
 836. ~piteous of~, _i.e._ full of pity for; comp. Lat. _miseret te
 aliorum_ (genitive). Milton occasionally uses the word in this passive
 sense; its active sense is 'causing pity,' _i.e._ pitiful. Comp. Abbott,
 Sec. 3. ~reared her lank head~, _i.e._ raised up her drooping head: comp.
 _Par. Lost_, viii.: "In adoration at his feet I fell Submiss: he
 _reared_ me." 'Lank,' lit. slender; hence weak. The adjective _lanky_ is
 in common use = tall and thin.
 
 837. ~imbathe~, to bathe in: the force of the preposition being
 reduplicated, as in Lat. _incidere in_.
 
 838. ~nectared lavers~, etc., baths sweetened with nectar and scented
 with asphodel flowers. On 'nectar,' see note, l. 479. ~asphodel~; the
 same, both name and thing, as 'daffodil' (see _Lyc._ 150, where it takes
 the form 'daffadillies'): Gk. +asphodelos+, M.E. _affodille_. The
 initial _d_ in daffodil has not been satisfactorily explained: see l.
 851.
 
 839. ~the porch~. So Quintilian calls the ear the vestibule of the mind:
 comp. _Haml._ i. 5. 63: "the porches of mine ear"; also the phrase, "the
 five gateways of knowledge."
 
 840. ~ambrosial oils~, oils of heavenly fragrance: see note, l. 16, and
 compare Virgil's use of _ambrosia_ in _Georg._ iv. 415, _liquidum
 ambrosiae diffundit odorem_.
 
 841. ~quick immortal change~: comp. l. 10.
 
 842. ~Made Goddess~, etc. This participial construction is frequent in
 Milton as in Latin: it is equivalent to an explanatory clause.
 
 844. ~twilight meadows~: comp. "twilight groves," _Il Pens._ 133;
 "twilight ranks," _Arc._ 99; _Hymn Nat._ 188.
 
 845. ~Helping all urchin blasts~, remedying or preventing the blighting
 influence of evil spirits. 'Urchin blasts' is probably here used
 generally for what in _Arcades_, 49-53, are called "noisome winds and
 blasting vapours chill," 'urchin' being common in the sense of 'goblin'
 (_M. W. of W._ iv. 4. 49). Strictly the word denotes the hedgehog, which
 for various reasons was popularly regarded with great dread, and hence
 mischievous spirits were supposed to assume its form: comp. Shakespeare,
 _Temp_, i. 2. 326, ii. 2. 5, "Fright me with _urchin_-shows"; _Titus
 And._ ii. 3. 101; _Macbeth_, iv. 1. 2, "Thrice and once the _hedge-pig_
 whined," etc. Compare the protecting duties of the Genius in _Arcades_.
 ~Helping~: comp. the phrases, "I cannot _help_ it," _i.e._ prevent it; "it
 cannot be _helped_," _i.e._ remedied, etc.
 
 846. ~shrewd~. Here used in its radical sense = _shrew-ed_, malicious,
 like a shrew. Comp. _M. N. D._ ii. 1, "That _shrewd_ and knavish sprite
 called Robin Goodfellow." Chaucer has the verb _shrew_ = to curse; the
 current verb is _beshrew_.
 
 847. ~vialed~, contained in _phials_.
 
 850. ~garland wreaths~. A garland is a wreath, but we may take the phrase
 to mean 'wreathed garlands': comp. "twisted braids," l. 862.
 
 852. ~old swain~, _i.e._ Meliboeus (l. 862). "But neither Geoffrey of
 Monmouth nor Spenser has the development of the legend" (Masson).
 
 853. ~clasping charm~: see l. 613, 660.
 
 854. ~warbled song~: comp. _Arc._ 87, "touch the _warbled_ string"; _Son._
 xx. 12, "_Warble_ immortal notes."
 
 857. ~This will I try~, _i.e._ to invoke her rightly in song.
 
 858. ~adjuring~, charging by something sacred and venerable. The
 adjuration is contained in lines 867-889, which, in Milton's MS., are
 directed "to be said," not sung, and in the Bridgewater MS. "to sing or
 not." From the latter MS. it would appear that these lines were sung as
 a kind of trio by Lawes and the two brothers.
 
 863. ~amber-dropping~: see note, l. 333; and comp. l. 106, where the idea
 is similar, warranting us in taking 'amber-dropping' as a compound
 epithet = dropping amber, and not (as some read) 'amber' and 'dropping.'
 _Amber_ conveys the ideas of luminous clearness and fragrance: see
 _Sams. Agon._ 720, "_amber_ scent of odorous perfume."
 
 865. ~silver lake~, the Severn. Virgil has the Lat. _lacus_ in the sense
 of 'a river.'
 
 868. ~great Oceanus~, Gk. +Okeanon te megan+. The early Greeks regarded
 the earth as a flat disc, surrounded by a perpetually flowing river
 called Oceanus: the god of this river was also called Oceanus, and
 afterwards the name was applied to the Atlantic. Hesiod, Drayton, and
 Jonson have all applied the epithet 'great' to the god Oceanus; in fact,
 throughout these lines Milton uses what may be called the "permanent
 epithets" of the various divinities.
 
 869. ~earth-shaking Neptune's mace~, _i.e._ the trident of Poseidon
 (Neptune). Homer calls him +ennosigaios+ = earth-shaking: comp. _Iliad_,
 xii. 27, "And the Shaker of the Earth with his trident in his hands,"
 etc. In _Par. Lost_, x. 294, Milton provides Death with a "mace
 petrifick."
 
 870. ~Tethys' ... pace~. Tethys, wife of Oceanus, their children being
 the Oceanides and river-gods. In Hesiod she is 'the venerable' (+potnia
 Tethys+), and in Ovid 'the hoary.'
 
 871. ~hoary Nereus~: see note, l. 835.
 
 872. ~Carpathian wizard's hook~. See Virgil's _Georg._ iv. 387, "In the
 sea-god's Carpathian gulf there lives a seer, Proteus, of the sea's own
 hue ... all things are known to him, those which are, those which have
 been, and those which drag their length through the advancing future."
 _Wizard_ = diviner, without the depreciatory sense of line 571; see note
 there. _Hook_: Proteus had a shepherd's hook, because he tended "the
 monstrous herds of loathly sea-calves": _Odyssey_, iv. 385-463.
 
 873. ~scaly Triton's ... shell~. In _Lycidas_, 89, he is "the Herald of
 the Sea." He bore a 'wreathed horn' or shell which he blew at the
 command of Neptune in order to still the restless waves of the sea. He
 was 'scaly,' the lower part of his body being like that of a fish.
 
 874. ~soothsaying Glaucus~. He was a Boeotian fisherman who had been
 changed into a marine deity, and was regarded by fishermen and sailors
 as a soothsayer or oracle: see note, l. 823.
 
 875. ~Leucothea~: lit. "the white goddess" (Gk. +leuke+, +thea+), the
 name by which Ino, the daughter of Cadmus, was worshipped after she had
 thrown herself into the sea to avoid her enraged husband Athamas.
 
 876. ~her son~, _i.e._ Melisertes, drowned and deified along with his
 mother: as a sea-deity he was called Palaemon, identified by the Romans
 with their god of harbours, Portumnus.
 
 877. ~tinsel-slippered~. The 'permanent epithet' of Thetis, a daughter
 of Nereus and mother of Achilles, is "silver-footed" (Gk. +argyropeza+).
 Comp. _Neptune's Triumph_ (Jonson):
 
     "And all the silver-footed nymphs were drest
     To wait upon him, to the Ocean's feast."
 
 'Tinsel-slippered' is a paraphrase of this, for 'tinsel' is a cloth
 worked with silver (or gold): the notion of cheap finery is not radical.
 Etymologically, _tinsel_ is that which glitters or _scintillates_. On
 the beauty of this epithet, and of Milton's compound epithets generally,
 see Trench, _English Past and Present_, p. 296.
 
 878-80. ~Sirens ... Parthenope's ... Ligea's~. The three Sirens (see
 note, l. 253) were Parthenope, Lig{=e}a, and Lucosia. The tomb of the
 first was at Naples (see Milton's _Ad Leonaram_, iii., "Credula quid
 liquidam Sirena, Neapoli, jactas, Claraque Parthenopes fana
 Acheloeiados," etc.). Ligea, described by Virgil (_Georg._ iv. 336) as a
 sea-nymph, is here represented as seated, like a mermaid, in the act of
 smoothing her hair with a golden comb.
 
 881. ~Wherewith~ = with which. The true adjective clause is "sleeking ...
 locks" = with which she sleeks, etc.; and the true participial clause is
 "she sits ... rocks" = seated on ... rocks.
 
 882. ~Sleeking~, making sleek or glossy. The original sense of 'sleek' is
 greasy: comp. _Lyc._ 99, "On the level brine _Sleek_ Panope with all her
 sisters played."
 
 885. ~heave~, raise. Comp. the similar use of the word in _L'Alleg._ 145,
 "Orpheus' self may heave his head."
 
 887. ~bridle in~, _i.e._ restrain.
 
 888. ~have~: subjunctive after _till_, as frequently in Milton.
 
 890. ~rushy-fringed~, fringed with rushes. The more usual form would be
 rush-fringed: we may regard Milton's form as a participle formed from
 the compound noun "rushy-fringe": comp. 'blue-haired,' l. 29;
 "false-played," Shakespeare, _A. and C._ iv. 14.
 
 891. ~grows~. A singular with two nominatives connected by _and_: the verb
 is to be taken with each. But the compound subject is really equivalent
 to "the willow with its osiers dank," osiers being water-willows or
 their branches. ~dank~, damp: comp. _Par. Lost_, vii. 441, "oft they quit
 the _dank_" (= the water).
 
 893. ~Thick set~, etc., _i.e._ thickly inlaid with agate and beautified
 with the azure sheen of turquoise, etc. There is a zeugma in _set_.
 ~azurn sheen~. Sheen = brightness: it occurs again in l. 1003; see note
 there. 'Azurn': modern English has a tendency to use the noun itself as
 an adjective in cases where older English used an adjective with the
 suffix _-en_ = made of. Most of the adjectives in _-en_ that still
 survive do not now denote "made of," but simply "like," _e.g._ golden
 hair, etc. _Azurn_ and _cedarn_ (l. 990), _hornen_, _treen_, _corden_,
 _glassen_, _reeden_, etc., are practically obsolete; see Trench,
 _English Past and Present_. Comp. 'oaten' (_Lyc._ 33), 'oaken' (_Arc._
 45). As the words 'azurn' and 'cedarn' are peculiar to Milton some hold
 that he adopted them from the Italian _azzurino_ and _cedrino_.
 
 894. ~turkis~; also spelt turkoise, turquois, and turquoise: lit. 'the
 Turkish stone,' a Persian gem so called because it came through Turkey
 (Pers. _turk_, a Turk).
 
 895. ~That ... strays~. Milton does not imply that these stones were
 found in the Severn, nor does he in lines 932-937 imply that cinnamon
 grows on its banks.
 
 897. ~printless feet~. Comp. _Temp._ v. i. 34: "Ye that on the sands with
 _printless foot_ Do chase the ebbing Neptune"; also _Arc._ 85: "Where no
 print of step hath been."
 
 902. It will be noticed that the Spirit takes up the rhymes of Sabrina's
 song ('here,' 'dear'; 'request,' 'distressed'), and again Sabrina
 continues the rhymes of the Spirit's song ('distressed,' 'best').
 
 913. ~of precious cure~, of curative power. See note on this use of 'of,'
 l. 155.
 
 914. References to the efficacy of sprinkling are frequent, _e.g._ in
 the English Bible, in Spenser, in Virgil (_Aen._ vi. 229), in Ovid
 (_Met._ iv. 479), in _Par. Lost_, xi. 416.
 
 916. ~Next~: an adverb modifying 'touch.'
 
 917. ~glutinous~, sticky, viscous. The epithet is transferred from the
 effect to the cause.
 
 921. ~Amphitrite~: the wife of Neptune (Poseidon) and goddess of the Sea.
 
 923. ~Anchises line~: see note, l. 827. Locrine was the son of Brutus, who
 was the son of Silvius, who was the grandson of the great Aeneas, who
 was the son of old Anchises.
 
 924. ~may ... miss~. This verb is optative: so are '(may) scorch,' '(may)
 fill,' 'may roll,' and 'may be crowned.'
 
 925. ~brimmed~. The passive participle is so often used where we now use
 the active that 'brimmed' may mean 'brimming' = full to the brim. On the
 other hand, 'brim' is frequent in the sense of _bank_ (comp. l. 119), so
 that some regard 'brimmed' as = enclosed within banks.
 
 928. ~singed~, scorched. We should rather say 'scorching.' On the good
 wishes expressed in lines 924-937 Masson's comment is: "The whole of
 this poetic blessing on the Severn and its neighbourhood, involving the
 wish of what we should call 'solid commercial prosperity,' would go to
 the heart of the assemblage at Ludlow."
 
 933. ~beryl~: in the Bible (_Rev._ xxi. 20) this precious stone forms one
 of the foundations of the New Jerusalem. The word is of Eastern origin:
 comp. Arab, _billaur_, crystal. ~golden ore~. As a matter of fact gold has
 been found in the Welsh mountains.
 
 934. ~May thy lofty head~, etc. The grammatical construction is: 'May
 thy lofty head be crowned round with many a tower and terrace, and here
 and there (may thy lofty head be crowned) with groves of myrrh and
 cinnamon (growing) upon thy banks.' This makes 'banks' objective, and
 'upon' a preposition: the only objection to this reading is that the
 notion of crowning the head upon the banks is peculiar. The difficulty
 vanishes when we recollect that Milton frequently connects two clauses
 with one subject rather loosely: the subject of the second clause is
 'thou,' implied in 'thy lofty head.' An exact parallel to this is found
 in _L'Alleg._ 121, 122: 'whose bright eyes rain influence and _judge_
 the prize'; also in _Il Pens._ 155-7; 'let my due feet never fail to
 _walk ... and love_, etc.': also in _Lyc._ 88, 89. The explanation
 adopted by Prof. Masson is that Milton had in view two Greek
 verbs--+peristephanoo+, 'to put a crown round,' and +epistephanoo+, "to
 put a crown upon": thus, "May thy lofty head be _crowned round_ with
 many a tower and terrace, and thy banks here and there be _crowned upon_
 with groves of myrrh and cinnamon." This makes 'banks' nominative, and
 'upon' an adverb.
 
 In the Bridgewater MS. the stage direction here is, _Song ends_.
 
 942. ~Not a waste~, etc., _i.e._ 'Let there not be a superfluous or
 unnecessary sound until we come.' 'waste' is an attributive: see note,
 l. 728.
 
 945. ~gloomy covert wide~: see note, l. 207.
 
 946. ~not many furlongs~. These words are deliberately inserted to keep up
 the illusion. It is probable that, in the actual representation of the
 mask, the scene representing the enchanted palace was removed when
 Comus's rout was driven off the stage, and a woodland scene redisplayed.
 This would give additional significance to these lines and to the change
 of scene after l. 957. 'Furlong' = furrow-long: it thus came to mean the
 length of a field, and is now a measure of length.
 
 949. ~many a friend~. 'Many a' is a peculiar idiom, which has been
 explained in different ways. One view is that 'many' is a corruption of
 the French _mesnie_, a train or company, and 'a' a corruption of the
 preposition 'of,' the singular noun being then substituted for the
 plural through confusion of the preposition with the article. A more
 correct view seems to be that 'many' is the A.S. _manig_, which was in
 old English used with a singular noun and without the article, _e.g._
 _manig mann_ = many men. In the thirteenth century the indefinite
 article began to be inserted; thus _mony enne thing_ = many a thing,
 just as we say 'what _a_ thing,' 'such _a_ thing.' This would seem to
 show that 'a' is not a corruption of 'of,' and that there is no
 connection with the French word _mesnie_. Milton, in this passage, uses
 'many a friend' with a plural verb. ~gratulate~. The simple verb is now
 replaced by the compound _congratulate_ (Lat. _gratulari_, to wish joy
 to a person).
 
 950. ~wished~, _i.e._ wished for; see note, l. 574. ~and beside~, _i.e._
 'and where, besides,' etc.
 
 952. ~jigs~, lively dances.
 
 958. ~Back, shepherds, back!~ On the rising of the curtain, the stage is
 occupied by peasants engaged in a merry dance. Soon after the attendant
 Spirit enters with the above words. ~Enough your play~, _i.e._ we have had
 enough of your dancing, which must now give way to 'other trippings.'
 
 959. ~sunshine holiday~. Comp. _L'Alleg._ 98, where the same expression is
 used. There is a close resemblance between the language of this song and
 lines 91-99 of _L'Allegro_. Milton's own spelling of 'holiday' is
 'holyday,' which shows the origin of the word. The accent in such
 compounds (comp. blue-bell, blackbird, etc.) falls on the adjective: it
 is only in this way that the ear can tell whether the compound forms
 (_e.g._ holiday) or the separate words (_e.g._ holy day) are being used.
 
 960. ~Here be~: see note, l. 12. ~without duck or nod~: words used to
 describe the ungraceful dancing and awkward courtesy of the country
 people.
 
 961. ~trippings ... lighter toes ... court guise~: words used to describe
 the graceful movements of the Lady and her brothers: comp. _L'Alleg._
 33: "trip it, as you go, On the light fantastic toe." _Trod_ (or
 trodden), past participle of _tread_: 'to tread a measure' is a common
 expression, meaning 'to dance.' 'Court guise,' _i.e._ courtly mien;
 _guise_ is a doublet of _wise_ = way, _e.g._ 'in this wise,'
 'like_wise_,' 'other_wise_.' In such pairs of words as _guise_ and
 _wise_, _guard_ and _ward_, _guile_ and _wile_, the forms in _gu_ have
 come into English through the French.
 
 963. ~Mercury~ (the Greek Hermes) was the herald of the gods, and as
 such was represented as having winged ankles (Gk. +ptenopedilos+): his
 name is here used as a synonym both for agility and refinement.
 
 964. ~mincing Dryades~. The Dryades are wood-nymphs (Gk. +drys+, a
 tree), here represented as mincing, _i.e._ tripping with short steps,
 unlike the clumsy striding of the country people. Comp. _Merch. of V._
 iii. 4. 67: "turn two _mincing_ steps Into a manly stride." Applied to a
 person's gait (or speech), the word now implies affectation.
 
 965. ~lawns ... leas~. On 'lawn,' see note, l. 568: a 'lea' is a meadow.
 
 966. This song is sung by Lawes while presenting the three young persons
 to the Earl and Countess of Bridgewater.
 
 967. ~ye~: see note, l. 216.
 
 968. ~so goodly grown~, _i.e._ grown so goodly. _Goodly_ = handsome (A.S.
 _godlic_ = goodlike).
 
 970. ~timely~. Here an adverb: in l. 689 it is an adjective. Comp. the two
 phrases in _Macbeth_: "To gain the _timely_ inn," iii. 3. 7; and "To
 call _timely_ on him," ii. 3. 51.
 
 972. ~assays~, trials, temptations. _Assay_ is used by Milton in the
 sense of 'attempt' as well as of 'trial': see _Arc._ 80, "I will
 _assay_, her worth to celebrate." The former meaning is now confined to
 the form _essay_ (radically the same word); and the use of _assay_ has
 been still further restricted from its being used chiefly of the testing
 of metals. Comp. _Par. Lost_, iv. 932, "hard _assays_ and ill
 successes"; _Par. Reg._ i. 264, iv. 478.
 
 974, 5. ~To triumph~. The whole purpose of the poem is succinctly
 expressed in these lines. _Stage Direction_: ~Spirit epiloguizes~, _i.e._
 sings the epilogue or concluding stanzas. In one of Lawes' manuscripts
 of the mask, the epilogue consists of twelve lines only, those numbered
 1012-1023. From the same copy we find that line 976 had been altered by
 Lawes in such a manner as to convert the first part of the epilogue into
 a prologue which, in his character as Attendant Spirit, he sang whilst
 descending upon the stage:--
 
     _From the heavens_ now I fly,
     And those happy climes that lie
     Where day never shuts his eye,
     Up in the broad _field_ of the sky.
     There I suck the liquid air
     All amidst the gardens fair
     Of Hesperus, and his daughters three
     That sing about the golden tree.
     There eternal summer dwells,
     And west winds, with musky wing,
     About the cedarn alleys fling
     Nard and cassia's balmy smells.
     Iris there with humid bow
     Waters the odorous banks, that blow
     Flowers of more mingled hue
     Than her purfled scarf can show,
     _Yellow, watchet, green, and blue_,
     And drenches oft with _Manna_ dew
     Beds of hyacinth and roses,
     Where _many a cherub soft_ reposes.
 
 Doubtless this was the arrangement in the actual performance of the
 mask.
 
 976. ~To the ocean~, etc. The resemblance of this song, in rhythm and
 rhyme, to the song of Ariel in the _Tempest_, v. 1. 88-94, has been
 frequently pointed out: "Where the bee sucks, there suck I," etc.
 Compare also the song of Johphiel in _The Fortunate Isles_ (Ben Jonson):
 "Like a lightning from the sky," etc. The epilogue as sung by Lawes (ll.
 1012-1023) may also be compared with the epilogue of the _Tempest_: "Now
 my charms are all o'erthrown," etc.
 
 977. ~happy climes~. Comp. _Odyssey_, iv. 566: "The deathless gods will
 convey thee to the Elysian plain and the world's end ... where life is
 easiest for men. No snow is there, nor yet great storm, nor any rain;
 but always ocean sendeth forth the breeze of the shrill west to blow
 cool on men": see also l. 14. 'Clime,' radically the same as _climate_,
 is still used in its literal sense = a region of the earth; while
 'climate' has the secondary meaning of 'atmospheric conditions.' Comp.
 _Son._ viii. 8: "Whatever _clime_ the sun's bright circle warms."
 
 978. ~day ... eye~. Comp. _Son._ i. 5: "the _eye_ of day"; and _Lyc._ 26:
 "the opening _eyelids_ of the Morn."
 
 979. ~broad fields of the sky~. Comp. Virgil's "_Aeris in campis latis_,"
 _Aen._ vi. 888.
 
 980. ~suck the liquid air~, inhale the pure air. 'Liquid' (lit. flowing)
 is used figuratively and generally in the sense of pure and sweet: comp.
 _Son._ i. 5, "thy liquid notes."
 
 981. ~All amidst~. For this adverbial use of _all_ (here modifying the
 following prepositional phrase), compare _Il Pens._ 33, "_all_ in a robe
 of darkest grain."
 
 982. ~Hesperus~: see note, l. 393. Hesperus, the brother of Atlas, had
 three daughters--Aegle, Cynthia, and Hesperia. They were famed for their
 sweet song. In Milton's MS. _Hesperus_ is written over _Atlas_: Spenser
 makes them daughters of Atlas, as does Jonson in _Pleasure reconciled to
 Virtue_.
 
 984. ~crisped shades~. 'Crisped,' like 'curled' (comp. "curl the grove,"
 _Arc._ 46) is a common expression in the poetry of the time, and has the
 same meaning. The original form is the adjective 'crisp' (Lat. _crispus_
 = curled), from which comes the verb _to crisp_ and the participle
 _crisped_. Compare "the _crisped_ brooks ... ran nectar," _Par. Lost_,
 iv. 237, where the word is best rendered 'rippled'; also Tennyson's
 _Claribel_, 19, "the babbling runnel _crispeth_." In the present case
 the reference is to the foliage of the trees.
 
 985. ~spruce~, gay. This word, now applied to persons with a touch of
 levity, was formerly used both of things and persons in the sense of gay
 or neat. Compare the present and earlier uses of the word _jolly_, on
 which Pattison says:--"This is an instance of the disadvantage under
 which poetry in a living language labours. No knowledge of the meaning
 which a word bore in 1631 can wholly banish the later and vulgar
 associations which may have gathered round it since. Apart from direct
 parody and burlesque, the tendency of living speech is gradually to
 degrade the noble; so that as time goes on the range of poetical
 expression grows from generation to generation more and more
 restricted." The origin of the word _spruce_ is disputed: Skeat holds
 that it is a corruption of Pruce (old Fr. _Pruce_, mod. Fr. _Prusse_) =
 Prussia; we read in the 14th century of persons dressed after the
 fashion of Prussia or Spruce, and Prussia was called Sprussia by some
 English writers up to the beginning of the 17th century. See also
 Trench, _Select Glossary_.
 
 986. ~The Graces~. The three Graces of classical mythology were
 Euphrosyne (the light-hearted one), Aglaia (the bright one), and Thalia
 (the blooming one). See _L'Alleg._ 12: "Euphrosyne ... Whom lovely
 Venus, at a birth, With two sister Graces more, To ivy-crowned Bacchus
 bore." They were sometimes represented as daughters of Zeus, and as the
 goddesses who purified and enhanced all the innocent pleasures of life.
 ~rosy-bosomed Hours~. The Hours (Horae) of classical mythology were the
 goddesses of the Seasons, whose course was described as the dance of the
 Horae. The Hora of Spring accompanied Persephone every year on her ascent
 from the lower world, and the expression "The chamber of the Horae opens"
 is equivalent to "The Spring is coming." 'Rosy-bosomed'; the Gk.
 +rhodokolpos+: compare the epithets 'rosy-fingered' (applied by Homer to
 the dawn), 'rosy-armed,' etc.
 
 989. ~musky ... fling~. Compare _Par. Lost_, viii. 515: "Fresh gales and
 gentle airs Whispered it to the woods, and from their wings Flung rose,
 flung odours from the spicy shrub." In this passage the verb _fling_ is
 similarly used. 'Musky' = fragrant: comp. 'musk-rose,' l. 496.
 
 990. ~cedarn alleys~, _i.e._ alleys of cedar trees. For 'alley,' comp. l.
 311. For the form of 'cedarn,' see note on 'azurn,' l. 893. Tennyson
 uses the word 'cedarn' in _Recoll. of Arab. Nights_, 115.
 
 991. ~Nard and cassia~; two aromatic plants. Cassia is a name sometimes
 applied to the wild cinnamon: nard is also called _spike-nard_; see
 allusion in the Bible, _Mark_, xiv. 3; _Exod._ xxx. 24, etc.
 
 992. ~Iris ... humid bow~: see note, l. 83. The allusion is, of course, to
 the rainbow.
 
 993. ~blow~, here used actively = cause to blossom: comp. Jonson, _Mask at
 Highgate_, "For thee, Favonius, here shall _blow_ New flowers."
 
 995. ~purfled~ = having an embroidered edge (O.F. _pourfiler_): the verb
 _to purfle_ survives in the contracted form _to purl_, and is cognate
 with profile = a front line or edge. ~shew~: here rhymes with _dew_; comp.
 l. 511, 512. This points to the fact that in Milton's time the present
 pronunciation of _shew_, though familiar, was not the only one
 recognised.
 
 996. ~drenches with Elysian dew~, _i.e._ soaks with heavenly dew. The
 Homeric Elysium is described in _Odyssey_, iv.: see note, l. 977; it
 was afterwards identified with the abode of the blessed, l. 257.
 _Drench_ is the causative of _drink_: here the nominative of the verb is
 'Iris' and the object 'beds.'
 
 997. ~if your ears be true~, _i.e._ if your ears be pure: the poet is
 about to speak of that which cannot be understood by those with "gross
 unpurged ear" (_Arc._ 73, and _Com._ l. 458). He alludes to that pure
 Love which "leads up to Heaven," _Par. Lost_, viii. 612.
 
 998. ~hyacinth~. This is the "sanguine flower inscribed with woe" of
 _Lycidas_, 106: it sprang from the blood of Hyacinthus, a youth beloved
 by Apollo.
 
 999. ~Adonis~, the beloved of Venus, died of a wound which he received
 from a boar during the chase. The grief of Venus was so great that the
 gods of the lower world allowed him to spend six months of every year on
 earth. The story is of Asiatic origin, and is supposed to be symbolic of
 the revival of nature in spring and its death in winter. Comp. _Par.
 Lost_, ix. 439, "those gardens feigned Or of revived Adonis," etc.
 
 1000. ~waxing well of~, _i.e._ recovering from. The A.S. _weaxan_ = to
 grow or increase: Shakespeare has 'man of wax' = adult, _Rom. and Jul._
 i. 3. 76; see also Index to Globe _Shakespeare_.
 
 1002. ~Assyrian queen~, _i.e._ Venus, whose worship came from the East,
 probably from Assyria. She was originally identical with Astarte, called
 by the Hebrews Ashteroth: see _Par. Lost_, i. 438-452, where Adonis
 appears as Thammuz.
 
 1003, 4. ~far above ... advanced~. These words are to be read together:
 'advanced' is an attribute to 'Cupid,' and is modified by 'far above.'
 
 1003. ~spangled sheen~, glittering brightness. 'Spangled': _spangle_ is a
 diminutive of _spang_ = a metal clasp, and hence 'a shining ornament.'
 In poetry it is common to speak of the stars as 'spangles' and of the
 heavens as 'spangled': comp. Addison's well-known lines:
 
     "The spacious firmament on high,
     With all the blue ethereal sky,
     And _spangled_ heavens, a shining frame,
     Their great Original proclaim."
 
 Comp. also _Lyc._ 170, "with _new-spangled_ ore." 'Sheen' is here used
 as a noun, as in line 893; also in _Hymn Nat._ 145, "throned in
 celestial _sheen_": _Epitaph on M. of W._ 73, "clad in radiant _sheen_."
 The word occurs in Spenser as an adjective also: comp. "her dainty corse
 so fair and _sheen_," _F. Q._ ii. 1. 10. In the line "By fountain clear
 or spangled starlight _sheen_" (_M. N. D._ ii. l. 29) it is doubtful
 whether the word is a noun or an adjective. Milton uses the adjective
 _sheeny_ (_Death of Fair Infant_, 48).
 
 1004. ~Celestial Cupid~. The ordinary view of Cupid is given in the
 note to line 445; here he is the lover of Psyche (the human soul) to
 whom he is united after she has been purified by a life of trial and
 misfortune. The myth of Cupid and Psyche is as follows: Cupid was in
 love with Psyche, but warned her that she must not seek to know who he
 was. Yielding to curiosity, however, she drew near to him with a lamp
 while he was asleep. A drop of the hot oil falling on him, he awoke, and
 fled from her. She now wandered from place to place, persecuted by
 Venus; but after great sorrow, during which she was secretly supported
 by Cupid, she became immortal and was united to him for ever. In this
 story Psyche represents the human soul (Gk. +psyche+), which is
 disciplined and purified by earthly misfortune and so fitted for the
 enjoyment of true happiness in heaven. Further, in Milton's Allegory it
 is only the soul so purified that is capable of knowing true love: in
 his _Apology for Smectymnuus_ he calls it that Love "whose charming cup
 is only virtue," and whose "first and chiefest office ... begins and
 ends in the soul, producing those happy twins of her divine generation,
 Knowledge and Virtue." To this high and mystical love Milton again
 alludes in _Epitaphium Damonis_:
 
     "In other part, the expansive vault above,
     And there too, even there the god of love;
     With quiver armed he mounts, his torch displays
     A vivid light, his gem-tipt arrows blaze,
     Around his bright and fiery eyes he rolls,
     Nor aims at vulgar minds or little souls,
     Nor deigns one look below, but aiming high
     Sends every arrow to the lofty sky;
     Hence forms divine, and minds immortal, learn
     The power of Cupid, and enamoured burn."
 
     _Cowper's translation._
 
 1007. ~among~: preposition governing 'gods.'
 
 1008. ~make~: subjunctive after 'till.' Its nominative is 'consent.'
 
 1010. ~blissful~, blest. _Bliss_ is cognate with _bless_ and _blithe_.
 Comp. "the _blest_ kingdoms meek of joy and love," _Lyc._ 177. ~are to be
 born~. There seems to be here a confusion of constructions between the
 subjunctive co-ordinate with _make_ and the indicative dependent in
 meaning on "Jove hath sworn" in the following line.
 
 1011. ~Youth and Joy~. Everlasting youth and joy are found only after the
 trials of earth are past. So Spenser makes Pleasure the daughter of
 Cupid and Psyche, but she is "the daughter late," _i.e._ she is possible
 only to the purified soul. See also note on l. 1004.
 
 1012. ~my task~, _i.e._ the task alluded to in line 18. This line is an
 adverbial clause = Now that (or _because_) my task is smoothly done.
 
 1013. The Spirit's task being finished he is free to soar where he
 pleases. There seems to be implied the injunction that mankind can by
 virtue alone attain to the same spiritual freedom.
 
 1014. ~green earth's end~. The world as known to the ancients did not
 extend much beyond the Straits of Gibraltar. The Cape Verd Islands,
 which lie outside these straits, may be here referred to: comp. _Par.
 Lost_, viii. 630:
 
     "But I can now no more; the parting sun
     Beyond the earth's green Cape and Verdant Isles
     Hesperean sets, my signal to depart."
 
 1015. ~bowed welkin~: the meaning of the line is, "Where the arched sky
 curves slowly towards the horizon." _Welkin_ is, radically, "the region
 of clouds," A.S. _wolcnu_, clouds.
 
 1017. ~corners of the moon~, _i.e._ its horns. The crescent moon is said
 to be 'horned' (Lat. _cornu_, a horn). Comp. the lines in _Macbeth_,
 iii. 5. 23, 24: "Upon the corners of the moon There hangs a vaporous
 drop profound."
 
 1020. ~She can teach ye how to climb~, etc. Compare Jonson's song to
 Virtue:
 
         "Though a stranger here on earth
     In heaven she hath her right of birth.
         There, there is Virtue's seat:
         Strive to keep her your own;
         'Tis only she can make you great,
     Though place here make you known."
 
 1021. ~sphery chime~, _i.e._ the music of the spheres. "To climb higher
 than the sphery chime" means to ascend beyond the spheres into the
 empyrean or true heaven--the abode of God and the purest Spirits. Milton
 therefore implies that by virtue alone can we come into God's presence.
 See note on "the starry quire," line 112. 'Chime' is strictly 'harmony,'
 as in "silver _chime_," _Hymn Nat._ 128: the word is cognate with
 _cymbal_.
 
 1022, 3. ~if Virtue feeble were~, etc. A triumphant expression of that
 confidence in the invincibleness of virtue, when aided by Divine
 Providence, and therefore a fitting conclusion of the whole masque.
 Milton's whole life reveals his unshaken belief in the truth expressed
 in the last two lines of his _Comus_.
 
 
 
 
 INDEX TO THE NOTES.
 
 
 A.
 
 Acheron, 604.
 
 Adonis, 999.
 
 Adventurous, 79.
 
 Advice, 108;
   advised, 755.
 
 Affects, 386.
 
 Alabaster, 660.
 
 All, 714, 981.
 
 All ear, 560.
 
 Alley, 311, 990.
 
 All-giver, 723.
 
 All to-ruffled, 380.
 
 Amber-dropping, 863.
 
 Ambrosial, 16.
 
 Amiss, 177.
 
 Apace, 657.
 
 Arbitrate, 411.
 
 Asphodel, 838.
 
 Assays, 972.
 
 Assyrian Queen, 1002.
 
 Ay me, 511.
 
 Azurn, 893.
 
 
 B.
 
 Backward, 817.
 
 Baited, 162.
 
 Bandite, 426.
 
 Be, 12, 519.
 
 Benison, 332.
 
 Beryl, 933.
 
 Beseeming, 769.
 
 Blank, 452.
 
 Blissful, 1010.
 
 Blue-haired, 29.
 
 Blow, 993.
 
 Bolt, 760.
 
 Bosky, 313.
 
 Bourn, 313.
 
 Brakes, 147.
 
 Brimmed, 925.
 
 Brinded, 443.
 
 Brute, 797.
 
 Budge, 707.
 
 Burs, 352.
 
 
 C.
 
 Cassia, 991.
 
 Cast, 360.
 
 Cateress, 764.
 
 Cedarn, 990.
 
 Centre, 382.
 
 Certain, 266.
 
 Chance, 508.
 
 Charactered, 530.
 
 Charmed, 51.
 
 Charnel, carnal, 471.
 
 Charybdis, 257.
 
 Chime, 1021.
 
 Chimeras, 517.
 
 Circe, 50.
 
 Clime, 977.
 
 Close, 548.
 
 Clouted, 635.
 
 Company, 274.
 
 Comus, 46, 58.
 
 Convoy, 81.
 
 Cordial, 672.
 
 Corners, 1017.
 
 Cotes, 344.
 
 Cotytto, 129.
 
 Courtesy, 325.
 
 Cozened, 737.
 
 Crabbed, 477.
 
 Crisped, 984.
 
 Crofts, 531.
 
 Crowned, 934.
 
 Curfew, 435.
 
 Curious, 714.
 
 Cynic, 708.
 
 Cynosure, 342.
 
 
 D.
 
 Dapper, 118.
 
 Darked, 730.
 
 Dear, 790.
 
 Dell, 312.
 
 Descry, 141.
 
 Dew-besprent, 542.
 
 Dimple, 119.
 
 Dingle, 312.
 
 Disinherit, 334.
 
 Ditty, 86.
 
 Drench, 996.
 
 Drouth, 66.
 
 Drowsy frighted, 553.
 
 Due, 12.
 
 Dun, 127.
 
 Durst, 577.
 
 
 E.
 
 Each ... every, 19, 311.
 
 Earth-shaking, 869.
 
 Ebon, 134.
 
 Ecstasy, 261, 625.
 
 Element, 299.
 
 Elysium, 257.
 
 Emblaze, 732.
 
 Emprise, 610.
 
 Engaged, 193.
 
 Enow, 780.
 
 Erebus, 804.
 
 Every ... each, 19, 311.
 
 Eye, 329.
 
 
 F.
 
 Faery, 298.
 
 Fairly, 168.
 
 Fantastic, 144, 205.
 
 Fence, 791.
 
 Firmament, 598.
 
 Fond, 67.
 
 For, 586, 602.
 
 Forestalling, 285.
 
 Forlorn, 39.
 
 Fraught, 355, 732.
 
 Freezed, 449.
 
 Frighted, 553.
 
 Frolic, 59.
 
 
 G.
 
 Gear, 167.
 
 Glistering, 219.
 
 Glozing, 161.
 
 Goodly, 968.
 
 Graces, 986.
 
 Grain, 750.
 
 Granges, 175.
 
 Gratulate, 949.
 
 Grisly, 603.
 
 Guise, 961.
 
 
 H.
 
 Haemony, 638.
 
 Hag, 434.
 
 Hallo, 226.
 
 Hapless, 350.
 
 Harpies, 605.
 
 Harrowed, 565.
 
 Heave, 885.
 
 Hecate, 135.
 
 Help, 304, 845.
 
 Hence, 824.
 
 Her, 351, 455.
 
 Hesperian, 393.
 
 High, 654.
 
 Hinds, 174.
 
 Holiday, 959.
 
 Home-felt, 262.
 
 Homely, 748.
 
 Horror, 38.
 
 Hours, 986.
 
 How chance, 508.
 
 Huswife, 751.
 
 Hutched, 719.
 
 Hyacinth, 998.
 
 Hydras. 605.
 
 
 I.
 
 Imbathe, 837.
 
 Imbodies, 468.
 
 Imbrutes, 468.
 
 Immured, 521.
 
 Infamous, 424.
 
 Infer, 408.
 
 Influence, 336.
 
 Inlay, 22.
 
 Innumerous, 349.
 
 Insphered, 3.
 
 Interwove, 544.
 
 Inured, 735.
 
 Iris, 83.
 
 Isle, 21.
 
 
 J.
 
 Jocund, 172.
 
 Jollity, 104.
 
 Julep, 672.
 
 
 K.
 
 Knot-grass, 542.
 
 
 L.
 
 Lackey, 455.
 
 Lake, 865.
 
 Languished, 744.
 
 Lank, 836.
 
 Lap, 257.
 
 Lawn, 568.
 
 Lees, 809.
 
 Leucothea, 875.
 
 Lewdly-pampered, 770.
 
 Like, 22, 634.
 
 Lime-twigs, 646.
 
 Liquid, 980.
 
 Liquorish, 700.
 
 Listed, 49.
 
 Listened, 551.
 
 Liveried, 455.
 
 Lore, 34.
 
 Love-lorn, 234.
 
 Luscious, 652.
 
 
 M.
 
 Madness, 261.
 
 Madrigal, 495.
 
 Mansion, 2.
 
 Mantling, 294.
 
 Many a, 949.
 
 Margent, 232.
 
 Me, 163, 630.
 
 Meander, 232.
 
 Meditate, 547.
 
 Melancholy, 810.
 
 Methought, 171.
 
 Meliboeus, 822.
 
 Mickle, 31.
 
 Mildew, 640.
 
 Mincing, 964.
 
 Mintage, 529.
 
 Misused, 47.
 
 Moly, 636.
 
 Monstrous, 533.
 
 Mountaineer, 426.
 
 Morrice, 116.
 
 Mortal, 10.
 
 Murmurs, 526.
 
 Mutters, 817.
 
 My, mine, 170.
 
 
 N.
 
 Naiades, 254.
 
 Nard, 991.
 
 Navel, 520.
 
 Necromancer, 649.
 
 Nectar, 479.
 
 Neighbour, 484.
 
 Nepenthes, 675.
 
 Nereus, 835.
 
 Nether, 20.
 
 New-intrusted, 36.
 
 Nice, 139.
 
 Night-foundered, 483.
 
 Nightingale, 234.
 
 Nightly, 113.
 
 Nor ... nor, 784.
 
 
 O.
 
 Oaten, 345, 893.
 
 Oceanus, 97, 868.
 
 Of, 59, 155, 836, 1000.
 
 Ominous, 61.
 
 Orient, 65.
 
 Other, 612.
 
 Oughly-headed, 695.
 
 Ounce, 71.
 
 Over-exquisite, 359.
 
 Over-multitude, 731.
 
 
 P.
 
 Palmer, 189.
 
 Pan, 176.
 
 Pard, 444.
 
 Parley, 241.
 
 Pent, 499.
 
 Perfect, 73, 203.
 
 Perplexed, 37.
 
 Pert, 118.
 
 Pestered, 7.
 
 Pinfold, 7.
 
 Plight, 372.
 
 Plighted, 301
 
 Plumes, 378.
 
 Potion, 68.
 
 Pranked, 759.
 
 Presentments, 156.
 
 Prime, 289.
 
 Prithee, 615.
 
 Prove, 123.
 
 Purchase, 607.
 
 Purfled, 995.
 
 Psyche, 1004.
 
 
 Q.
 
 Quaint, 157.
 
 Quarters, 29.
 
 Quire, 112.
 
 Quivered, 422.
 
 
 R.
 
 Rapt, 794.
 
 Ravishment, 244.
 
 Reared, 836.
 
 Recks, 404.
 
 Regard, 620.
 
 Rifted, 518.
 
 Rite, 125.
 
 Roost, 317.
 
 Rosy-bosomed, 986.
 
 Rout, 92-93.
 
 Rule, 340.
 
 Rushy-fringed, 890.
 
 
 S.
 
 Sabrina, 826.
 
 Sadly, 509.
 
 Sampler, 751.
 
 Saws, 110.
 
 Scape, 814.
 
 Scylla, 257.
 
 Serene, 4.
 
 Several, 25.
 
 Shagged, 429.
 
 Shapes, 2.
 
 Sheen, 893, 1003.
 
 Shell, 231, 837.
 
 Shew, 995.
 
 Shoon, 635.
 
 Should, 482.
 
 Shrewd, 846.
 
 Shrouds, 147.
 
 Shuddering, 802.
 
 Siding, 212.
 
 Simples, 627.
 
 Single, 204.
 
 Sirens, 253, 878.
 
 Sleeking, 882.
 
 Slope, 98.
 
 Solemnity, 142.
 
 Soothest, 823.
 
 Sooth-saying, 874.
 
 Sounds, 115.
 
 Sovran, 41, 639.
 
 Spangled, 1003.
 
 Spell, 154.
 
 Spets, 132.
 
 Sphery, 1021.
 
 Spruce, 985.
 
 Square, 329.
 
 Squint, 413.
 
 Stabled, 534.
 
 Star of Arcady, 341.
 
 State, 35.
 
 Stead, 611.
 
 Step-dame, 830.
 
 Still, 560.
 
 Stoic, 707.
 
 Stops, 345.
 
 Storied, 516.
 
 Straight, 811.
 
 Strook, 301.
 
 Stygian, 132.
 
 Sun-clad, 782.
 
 Sung, 256.
 
 Sure, 148.
 
 Surrounding, 403.
 
 Swain, 497.
 
 Swart, 436.
 
 Swinked, 293.
 
 Sylvan, 268.
 
 Syrups, 674.
 
 
 T.
 
 Tapestry, 324.
 
 Temple, 461.
 
 Thyrsis, 494.
 
 Timely, 689, 970.
 
 Tinsel-slippered, 877.
 
 To-ruffled, 380.
 
 To seek, 366.
 
 Toy, 502.
 
 Trains, 151.
 
 Treasonous, 702.
 
 Trippings, 961.
 
 Turkis, 894.
 
 Tuscan, 48.
 
 Twain, 284.
 
 Tyrrhene, 49.
 
 
 U.
 
 Unblenched, 430.
 
 Unenchanted, 395.
 
 Unmuffle, 331.
 
 Unprincipled, 367.
 
 Unweeting, 539.
 
 Unwithdrawing, 711.
 
 Urchin, 845.
 
 
 V.
 
 Various, 379.
 
 Venturous, 609.
 
 Vermeil-tinctured, 752.
 
 Very, 427.
 
 Vialed, 847.
 
 Viewless, 92.
 
 Violet-embroidered, 233.
 
 Virtue, 165, 621.
 
 Visage, 333.
 
 Vizored, 698.
 
 Votarist, 189.
 
 
 W.
 
 Wakes, 121.
 
 Warranted, 327.
 
 Wassailers, 179.
 
 Waste, 728, 942.
 
 Weeds, 16.
 
 Welkin, 1015.
 
 What need, 362.
 
 Whilom, 827.
 
 Whit, 774.
 
 Who, 728.
 
 Wily, 151.
 
 Wink, 401.
 
 Wished, 574, 950.
 
 Wizard, 571, 872.
 
 Wont, 332, 549.
 
 Woof, 83.
 
 
 Y.
 
 Ye, 216.
 
 
 
 
 GLASGOW: PRINTED BY ROBERT MACLEHOSE AT THE UNIVERSITY PRESS.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Donal O'Danachair
 
 
 
 
 
 THE POETICAL WORKS OF JOHN MILTON
 
 By John Milton
 
 
 Transcriber's Notes:
 
 This e-text contains all of Milton's poems in English and Italian. Poems
 in Latin have been omitted.
 
 The original spelling, capitalisation and punctuation have been retained
 as far as possible. Characters not in the ANSI standard set have been
 replaced by their nearest equivalent.  The AE & OE digraphs have been
 transcribed as two letters.  Accented letters in the Italian poems have
 been replaced by the unaccented letter.
 
 No italics have been retained.
 
 Footnotes have been moved to the end of the poem to which they refer; in
 Paradise Lost and Paradise Regained they have been moved to the end of
 the book.
 
 
 
 
 Contents:
 
 PREFACE by the Rev. H. C. Beeching, M. A.
 
 THE STATIONER TO THE READER.
 
 MISCELLANEOUS POEMS.
 
 THE PASSION.
 
 ON TIME.
 
 UPON THE CIRCUMCISION.
 
 AT A SOLEMN MUSICK.
 
 AN EPITAPH ON THE MARCHIONESS OF WINCHESTER.
 
 SONG ON MAY MORNING.
 
 ON SHAKESPEAR. 1630.
 
 ANOTHER ON THE SAME.
 
 L'ALLEGRO.
 
 IL PENSEROSO.
 
 SONNETS.
 
 ARCADES.
 
 LYCIDAS.
 
 A MASK PRESENTED At LUDLOW-Castle, 1634. &c.
 
 POEMS ADDED IN THE 1673 EDITION.
 
 ANNO AETATIS 17. ON THE DEATH OF A FAIR INFANT DYING OF A COUGH.
 
 THE FIFTH ODE OF HORACE. LIB. I.
 
 SONNETS.
 
 ON THE NEW FORCERS OF CONSCIENCE UNDER THE LONG PARLIAMENT.
 
 ON THE LORD GEN. FAIRFAX AT THE SEIGE OF COLCHESTER.
 
 TO THE LORD GENERALL CROMWELL MAY 1652.
 
 TO SR HENRY VANE THE YOUNGER.
 
 TO MR. CYRIACK SKINNER UPON HIS BLINDNESS.
 
 PSAL. I. Done into Verse, 1653.
 
 PSAL. II Done Aug. 8. 1653. Terzetti.
 
 PSAL. III. Aug. 9. 1653
 
 PSAL. IV. Aug. 10.1653.
 
 PSAL. V. Aug. 12.1653.
 
 PSAL. VI Aug. 13. 1653.
 
 PSAL. VII. Aug. 14. 1653.
 
 PSAL. VIII. Aug. 14. 1653.
 
 APRIL, 1648. J. M. NINE OF THE PSALMS DONE INTO METRE,
 
 PSAL. LXXX.
 
 PSAL. LXXXI.
 
 PSAL. LXXXII.
 
 PSAL. LXXXIV.
 
 PSAL LXXXV.
 
 PSAL. LXXXVI.
 
 PSAL. LXXXVII
 
 PSAL. LXXXVIII
 
 COLLECTION OF PASSAGES TRANSLATED IN THE PROSE WRITINGS.
 
 [From Of Reformation in England, 1641.]
 
 [From Reason of Church Government, 1641.]
 
 [From Apology for Smectymnuus, 1642.]
 
 [From Areopagitica, 1644.]
 
 [From Tetrachordon, 1645.]
 
 [From The Tenure of Kings and Magistrates, 1649.]
 
 [From History of Britain, 1670.]
 
 
 PARADISE LOST.
 
 ON Paradise Lost.
 
 THE VERSE.
 
 BOOK I.
 
 BOOK II.
 
 BOOK III.
 
 BOOK IV.
 
 BOOK V.
 
 BOOK VI.
 
 BOOK VII.
 
 BOOK VIII.
 
 BOOK IX.
 
 BOOK X.
 
 BOOK XI.
 
 BOOK XII.
 
 
 PARADISE REGAIN'D.
 
 The First Book.
 
 The Second Book.
 
 The Third Book.
 
 The Fourth Book.
 
 
 SAMSON AGONISTES
 
 Of that sort of Dramatic Poem which is call'd Tragedy.
 
 The Argument.
 
 APPENDIX.
 
 ON TIME
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE by the Rev. H. C. Beeching, M. A.
 
 
 This edition of Milton's Poetry is a reprint, as careful as Editor and
 Printers have been able to make it, from the earliest printed copies of
 the several poems.  First the 1645 volume of the Minor Poems has been
 printed entire; then follow in order the poems added in the reissue of
 1673; the Paradise Lost, from the edition of 1667; and the Paradise
 Regain'd and Samson Agonistes from the edition of 1671.
 
 The most interesting portion of the book must be reckoned the first
 section of it, which reproduces for the first time the scarce small
 octavo of 1645.  The only reprint of the Minor Poems in the old
 spelling, so far as I know, is the one edited by Mitford, but that
 followed the edition of 1673, which is comparatively uninteresting since
 it could not have had Milton's oversight as it passed through the press.
 We know that it was set up from a copy of the 1645 edition, because it
 reproduces some pointless eccentricities such as the varying form of the
 chorus to Psalm cxxxvi; but while it corrects the errata tabulated in
 that edition it commits many more blunders of its own.  It is valuable,
 however, as the editio princeps of ten of the sonnets and it contains
 one important alteration in the Ode on the Nativity. This and all other
 alterations will be found noted where they occur.  I have not thought it
 necessary to note mere differences of spelling between the two editions
 but a word may find place here upon their general character.  Generally
 it may be said that, where the two editions differ, the later spelling
 is that now in use.  Thus words like goddess, darkness, usually written
 in the first edition with one final s, have two, while on the  other
 hand words like vernall, youthfull, and monosyllables like hugg, farr,
 lose their double letter.  Many monosyllables, e.g. som, cours, glimps,
 wher, vers, aw, els, don, ey, ly, so written in 1645, take on in 1673 an
 e mute, while words like harpe, windes, onely, lose it. By a reciprocal
 change ayr and cipress become air and cypress; and the vowels in daign,
 vail, neer, beleeve, sheild, boosom, eeven, battail, travailer, and many
 other words are similarly modernized.  On the other hand there are a few
 cases where the 1645 edition exhibits the spelling which has succeeded
 in fixing itself, as travail (1673, travel) in the sense of labour; and
 rob'd, profane, human, flood and bloody, forest, triple, alas, huddling,
 are found where the 1673 edition has roab'd, prophane, humane, floud and
 bloudy, forrest, tripple, alass and hudling.  Indeed the spelling in
 this later edition is not untouched by seventeenth century
 inconsistency.  It retains here and there forms like shameles, cateres,
 (where 1645 reads cateress), and occasionally reverts to the
 older-fashioned spelling of monosyllables without the mute e.  In the
 Epitaph on the Marchioness of Winchester, it reads--' And som flowers
 and some bays.'  But undoubtedly the impression on the whole is of a
 much more modern text.
 
 In the matter of small or capital letters I have followed the old copy,
 except in one or two places where a personification seemed not plainly
 enough marked to a modern reader without a capital. Thus in Il
 Penseroso, l. 49, I print Leasure, although both editions read leasure;
 and in the Vacation Exercise, l. 71, Times for times. Also where the
 employment or omission of a capital is plainly due to misprinting, as
 too frequently in the 1673 edition, I silently make the correction.
 Examples are, notes for Notes in Sonnet xvii. l. 13; Anointed for
 anointed in Psalm  ii. l.12.
 
 In regard to punctuation I have followed the old printers except in
 obvious misprints, and followed them also, as far as possible, in their
 distribution of roman and italic type and in the grouping of words and
 lines in the various titles. To follow them exactly was impossible, as
 the  books are so very different in size.
 
 At this point the candid reader may perhaps ask what advantage is gained
 by presenting these poems to modern readers in the dress of a bygone
 age.  If the question were put to me I should probably evade it by
 pointing out that Mr. Frowde is issuing an edition based upon this, in
 which the spelling is frankly that of to-day.  But if the question were
 pressed, I think a sufficient answer might be found.  To begin with, I
 should point out that even Prof. Masson, who in his excellent edition
 argues the point and decides in favour of modern spelling, allows that
 there are peculiarities of Milton's spelling which are really
 significant, and ought therefore to be noted or preserved.  But who is
 to determine exactly which words are spelt according to the poet's own
 instructions, and which according to the printer's whim?  It is
 notorious that in Paradise Lost some words were spelt upon a deliberate
 system, and it may very well happen that in the volume of minor poems
 which the poet saw through the press in 1645, there were spellings no
 less systematic.  Prof. Masson makes a great point of the fact that
 Milton's own spelling, exhibited in the autograph manuscript of some of
 the minor poems preserved in Trinity College, Cambridge, does not
 correspond with that of the printed copy. [Note: This manuscript,
 invaluable to all students of Milton, has lately been facsimiled under
 the superintendence of Dr. Aldis Wright, and published at the Cambridge
 University press].  This is certainly true, as the reader may see for
 himself by comparing the passage from the manuscript given in the
 appendix with the corresponding place in the text.  Milton's own
 spelling revels in redundant e's, while the printer of the 1645 book is
 very sparing of them.  But in cases where the spelling affects the
 metre, we find that the printed text and Milton's manuscript closely
 correspond; and it is upon its value in determining the metre, quite as
 much as its antiquarian interest, that I should base a justification of
 this reprint.  Take, for instance, such a line as the eleventh of Comus,
 which Prof. Masson gives as:--
 
         Amongst the enthroned gods on sainted seats.
 
 A reader not learned in Miltonic rhythms will certainly read this
 
         Amongst th' enthroned gods
 
 But the 1645 edition reads:
 
         Amongst the enthron'd gods
 
 and so does Milton's manuscript.  Again, in line 597, Prof.
 Masson reads:
 
         It shall be in eternal restless change
         Self-fed and self-consumed.  If this fail,
         The pillared firmament is rottenness,  &c.
 
 But the 1645 text and Milton's manuscript read self-consum'd; after
 which word there is to be understood a metrical pause to mark the
 violent transition of the thought.
 
 Again in the second line of the Sonnet to a Nightingale Prof. Masson
 has:
 
         Warblest at eve when all the woods are still
 
 but the early edition, which probably follows Milton's spelling though
 in this case we have no manuscript to compare, reads 'Warbl'st.' So the
 original text of Samson, l. 670, has 'temper'st.'
 
 The retention of the old system of punctuation may be less defensible,
 but I have retained it because it may now and then be of use in
 determining a point of syntax.  The absence of a comma, for example,
 after the word hearse in the 58th line of the Epitaph on the Marchioness
 of Winchester, printed by Prof. Masson thus:--
 
         And some flowers, and some bays
         For thy hearse to strew thy ways,
 
 but in the 1645 edition:--
 
         And som Flowers, and som Bays,
         For thy Hears to strew the ways,
 
 goes to prove that for here must be taken as 'fore.
 
 Of the Paradise Lost there were two editions issued during Milton's
 lifetime, and while the first has been taken as our text, all the
 variants in the second, not being simple misprints, have been recorded
 in the notes.  In one respect, however, in the distribution of the poem
 into twelve books instead of ten, it has seemed best, for the sake of
 practical convenience, to follow the second edition.  A word may be
 allowed here on the famous correction among the Errata prefixed to the
 first edition:  'Lib. 2. v. 414, for we read wee.'  This correction
 shows not only that Milton had theories about spelling, but also that he
 found means, though his sight was gone, to ascertain whether his rules
 had been carried out by his printer; and in itself this fact justifies a
 facsimile reprint.  What the principle in the use of the double vowel
 exactly was (and it is found to affect the other monosyllabic pronouns)
 it is not so easy to discover, though roughly it is clear the
 reduplication was intended to mark emphasis.  For example, in the speech
 of the Divine Son after the battle in heaven (vi. 810-817) the pronouns
 which the voice would naturally emphasize are spelt with the double
 vowel:
 
                                  Stand onely and behold
         Gods indignation on these Godless pourd
         By mee; not you but mee they have despis'd,
         Yet envied; against mee is all thir rage,
         Because the Father, t'whom in Heav'n supream
         Kingdom and Power and Glorie appertains,
         Hath honourd me according to his will.
         Therefore to mee thir doom he hath assign'd.
 
 In the Son's speech offering himself as Redeemer (iii. 227-249) where
 the pronoun all through is markedly emphasized, it is printed mee the
 first four times, and afterwards me; but it is noticeable that these
 first four times the emphatic word does not stand in the stressed place
 of the verse, so that a careless reader might not emphasize it, unless
 his attention were specially led by some such sign:
 
         Behold mee then, mee for him, life for life
         I offer, on mee let thine anger fall;
         Account mee man.
 
 In the Hymn of Creation (v.160-209) where ye occurs fourteen times, the
 emphasis and the metric stress six times out of seven coincide, and the
 pronoun is spelt yee; where it is unemphatic, and in an unstressed
 place, it is spelt ye. Two lines are especially instructive:
 
 Speak yee who best can tell, ye Sons of light (l. 160);
 
 and
 
         Fountains and yee, that warble, as ye flow,
         Melodious murmurs, warbling tune his praise (l. 195).
 
 In v. 694 it marks, as the voice by its emphasis would mark in
 reading, a change of subject:
 
         So spake the false Arch-Angel, and infus'd
         Bad influence into th' unwarie brest
         Of his Associate; hee (i. e. the associate) together calls,
 &c.
 
 An examination of other passages, where there is no antithesis, goes to
 show that the lengthened form of the pronoun is most frequent before a
 pause (as vii. 95); or at the end of a line (i. 245, 257); or when a
 foot is inverted (v. 133); or when as object it  precedes its verb (v.
 612; vii. 747), or as subject follows it (ix. 1109; x. 4).  But as we
 might expect under circumstances where a purist could not correct his
 own proofs, there are not a few inconsistencies.  There does not seem,
 for example, any special emphasis in the second wee of the following
 passage:
 
                                         Freely we serve.
         Because wee freely love, as in our will
         To love or not; in this we stand or fall  (v. 538).
 
 
 On the other hand, in the passage (iii. 41) in which the poet
 speaks of his own blindness:
 
                                 Thus with the Year
         Seasons return, but not to me returns
         Day, &c.
 
 where, if anywhere, we should expect mee, we do not find it, though it
 occurs in the speech eight lines below.  It should be added that this
 differentiation of the pronouns is not found in any printed poem of
 Milton's before Paradise Lost, nor is it found in the Cambridge
 autograph. In that manuscript the constant forms are me, wee, yee.
 There is one place where there is a difference in the spelling of she,
 and it is just possible that this may not be due to accident.  In the
 first verse of the song in Arcades, the MS. reads:
 
         This, this is shee;
 
 and in the third verse:
 
         This, this is she alone.
 
 This use of the double vowel is found a few times in Paradise Regain'd:
 in ii. 259 and iv. 486, 497 where mee begins a line, and in iv. 638
 where hee is specially emphatic in the concluding lines of the poem.  In
 Samson Agonistes it is more frequent (e.g. lines 124, 178, 193, 220,
 252, 290, 1125).  Another word the spelling of which in Paradise Lost
 will be observed to vary is the pronoun their, which is spelt sometimes
 thir.  The spelling in the Cambridge manuscript is uniformly thire,
 except once when it is thir; and where their once occurs in the writing
 of an amanuensis the e is struck through.  That the difference is not
 merely a printer's device to accommodate his line may be seen by a
 comparison of lines 358 and 363 in the First Book, where the shorter
 word  comes in the shorter line.  It is probable that the lighter form
 of the word was intended to be used when it was quite unemphatic.
 Contrast, for example, in Book iii. l.59: His own works and their works
 at once to view with line 113: Thir maker and thir making and thir Fate.
 But the use is not consistent, and the form thir is not found at all
 till the 349th line of the First Book.  The distinction is kept up in
 the Paradise Regain'd and Samson Agonistes, but, if possible, with even
 less consistency.  Such passages, however, as Paradise Regain'd, iii.
 414-440; Samson Agonistes, 880-890, are certainly spelt upon a method,
 and it is noticeable that in the choruses the lighter form is universal.
 
 Paradise Regain'd and Samson Agonistes were published in 1671, and no
 further edition was called for in the remaining three years of the
 poet's lifetime, so that in the case of these poems there are no new
 readings to record; and the texts were so carefully revised, that only
 one fault (Paradise Regain'd, ii. 309) was left for correction later.
 In these and the other poems I have corrected the misprints catalogued
 in the tables of Errata, and I have silently corrected any other unless
 it might be mistaken for a various reading, when I have called attention
 to it in a note.  Thus I have not recorded such blunders as Lethian for
 Lesbian in the 1645 text of Lycidas, line 63; or hallow for hollow in
 Paradise Lost, vi. 484; but I have noted content for concent, in At a
 Solemn Musick, line 6.
 
 In conclusion I have to offer my sincere thanks to all who have
 collaborated with me in preparing this Edition; to the Delegates of the
 Oxford Press for allowing me to undertake it and decorate it with so
 many facsimiles; to the Controller of the Press for his unfailing
 courtesy; to the printers and printer's reader for their care and pains.
 Coming nearer home I cannot but acknowledge the help I have received in
 looking over proof-sheets from my sister, Mrs. P. A. Barnett, who has
 ungrudgingly put at the service of this book both time and eyesight.  In
 taking leave of it, I may be permitted to say that it has cost more of
 both these inestimable treasures than I had anticipated.  The last proof
 reaches me just a year after the first, and the progress of the work has
 not in the interval been interrupted. In tenui labor et tenuis gloria.
 Nevertheless I cannot be sorry it was undertaken.
 
 H. C. B.
 
 YATTENDON RECTORY,
 November 8, 1899.
 
 
 
 Transcriber's note: Facsimile of Title page of 1645 edition
 follows:
 
 
                            POEMS
                             OF
                       Mr John Milton,
                            BOTH
                      ENGLISH and LATIN
                   Compos'd at several times.
                ------------------------------
                 Printed by his true copies.
                ------------------------------
                The SONGS were set in Musick by
                 Mr. HENRY LAWES Gentleman of
                  the KINGS Chappel, and one
                       of His MAIESTIES
                        Private Musick.
 
                  --------Baccare frontem
          Cingite, ne vace noceat mala lingua futuro,
               Virgil, Eclog. 7.
          -----------------------------------------
             Printed, and Publish'd according to
                            ORDER.
          -----------------------------------------
                           LONDON,
         Printed by Ruth Raworth for Humphrey Moseley,
         and are to be sold at the signe of the Princes
             Arms in S. Pauls Church-yard. 1645.
 
 
 
 Transcriber's note: Facsimile of Title page of 1673 edition
 follows:
 
 
                           POEMS, &c.
                             UPON
                       Several Occasions.
                   --------------------------
                              BY
                        Mr. John Milton:
                   --------------------------
                   Both ENGLISH and LATIN &c.
                   Composed at several times.
                   --------------------------
                    With a small tractate of
                          EDUCATION
                        To Mr. HARTLIB
                   --------------------------
                   --------------------------
                           LONDON.
          Printed for Tho. Dring at the Blew Anchor
            next Mitre Court over against Fetter
                Lane in Fleet-street.  1673.
 
 
 
 
 THE STATIONER TO THE READER.
 
 
 It is not any Private respect of gain, Gentle Reader, for the slightest
 Pamphlet is now adayes more vendible then the Works of learnedest men;
 but it is the love I have to our own Language that hath made me diligent
 to collect, and set forth such Peeces in Prose and Vers as may renew the
 wonted honour and esteem of our tongue: and it's the worth of these both
 English and Latin poems, not the flourish of any prefixed encomions that
 can invite thee to buy them, though these are not without the highest
 Commendations and Applause of the learnedst Academicks, both domestic
 and forrein: And amongst those of our own Countrey, the unparalleled
 attestation of that renowned Provost of Eaton, Sir Henry Wootton: I know
 not thy palat how it relishes such dainties, nor  how harmonious thy
 soul is; perhaps more trivial Airs may please thee better.  But
 howsoever thy opinion is spent upon these, that incouragement I have
 already received from the most ingenious men in their clear and
 courteous entertainment of Mr. Wallers late choice Peeces, hath once
 more made me adventure into the World, presenting it with these
 ever-green, and not to be blasted Laurels. The Authors more peculiar
 excellency in these studies, was too well known to conceal his Papers,
 or to keep me from attempting to sollicit them from him. Let the event
 guide it self which way it will, I shall deserve of the age, by bringing
 into the Light as true a Birth, as the Muses have brought forth since
 our famous Spencer wrote; whose Poems in these English ones are as
 rarely imitated, as sweetly excell'd.  Reader, if thou art Eagle-eied to
 censure their worth, I am not fearful to expose them to thy exactest
 perusal.
 
 Thine to Command
 
 HUMPH. MOSELEY.
 
 
 
 
 MISCELLANEOUS POEMS.
 
 
 
 
 ON THE MORNING OF CHRISTS NATIVITY.
   Compos'd 1629.
 
   I
 
   This is the Month, and this the happy morn
   Wherin the Son of Heav'ns eternal King,
   Of wedded Maid, and Virgin Mother born,
   Our great redemption from above did bring;
   For so the holy sages once did sing,
   That he our deadly forfeit should release,
   And with his Father work us a perpetual peace.
 
   II
 
   That glorious Form, that Light unsufferable,
   And that far-beaming blaze of Majesty,
   Wherwith he wont at Heav'ns high Councel-Table,                      10
   To sit the midst of Trinal Unity,
   He laid aside; and here with us to be,
   Forsook the Courts of everlasting Day,
   And chose with us a darksom House of mortal Clay.
 
   III
 
   Say Heav'nly Muse, shall not thy sacred vein
   Afford a present to the Infant God?
   Hast thou no vers, no hymn, or solemn strein,
   To welcom him to this his new abode,
   Now while the Heav'n by the Suns team untrod,
   Hath took no print of the approching light,                          20
   And all the spangled host keep watch in squadrons bright?
 
   IV
 
   See how from far upon the Eastern rode
   The Star-led Wisards haste with odours sweet,
   O run,  prevent them with thy humble ode,
   And lay it lowly at his blessed feet;
   Have thou the honour first, thy Lord to greet,
   And joyn thy voice unto the Angel Quire,
   From out his secret Altar toucht with hallow'd fire.
 
 
   The Hymn.
 
   I
 
   IT was the Winter wilde,
   While the Heav'n-born-childe,                                        30
   All meanly wrapt in the rude manger lies;
   Nature in aw to him
   Had doff't her gawdy trim,
   With her great Master so to sympathize:
   It was no season then for her
   To wanton with the Sun her lusty Paramour.
 
   II
 
   Only with speeches fair
   She woo'd the gentle Air
   To hide her guilty front with innocent Snow,
   And on her naked shame,                                              40
   Pollute with sinfull blame,
   The Saintly Vail of Maiden white to throw,
   Confounded, that her Makers eyes
   Should look so near upon her foul deformities.
 
   III
 
   But he her fears to cease,
   Sent down the meek-eyd Peace,
   She crown'd with Olive green, came softly sliding
   Down through the turning sphear
   His ready Harbinger,
   With Turtle wing the amorous clouds dividing,                        50
   And waving wide her mirtle wand,
   She strikes a universall Peace through Sea and Land.
 
   IV
 
   No War, or Battails sound
   Was heard the World around,
   The idle spear and shield were high up hung;
   The hooked Chariot stood
   Unstain'd with hostile blood,
   The Trumpet spake not to the armed throng,
   And Kings sate still with awfull eye,
   As if they surely knew their sovran Lord was by.                     60
 
   V
 
   But peacefull was the night
   Wherin the Prince of light
   His raign of peace upon the earth began:
   The Windes with wonder whist,
   Smoothly the waters kist,
   Whispering new joyes to the milde Ocean,
   Who now hath quite forgot to rave,
   While Birds of Calm sit brooding on the charmed wave.
 
   VI
 
   The Stars with deep amaze
   Stand fit in steadfast gaze,                                         70
   Bending one way their pretious influence,
   And will not take their flight,
   For all the morning light,
   Or Lucifer that often warned them thence;
   But in their glimmering Orbs did glow,
   Until their Lord himself bespake, and bid them go.
 
   VII
 
   And though the shady gloom
   Had given day her room,
   The Sun himself with-held his wonted speed,
   And hid his head for shame,                                          80
   As his inferior flame,
   The new enlightened world no more should need;
   He saw a greater Sun appear
   Then his bright Throne, or burning Axletree could bear.
 
   VIII
 
   The Shepherds on the Lawn,
   Or ere the point of dawn,
   Sate simply chatting in a rustic row;
   Full little thought they than,
   That the mighty Pan
   Was kindly com to live with them below;                              90
   Perhaps their loves, or els their sheep,
   Was all that did their silly thoughts so busie keep.
 
   IX
 
   When such Musick sweet
   Their hearts and ears did greet,
   As never was by mortal finger strook,
   Divinely-warbled voice
   Answering the stringed noise,
   As all their souls in blisfull rapture took:
   The Air such pleasure loth to lose,
   With  thousand echo's still prolongs each heav'nly close.           100
 
   X
 
   Nature that heard such  sound
   Beneath  the hollow round
   of Cynthia's seat the Airy region thrilling,
   Now was almost won
   To think her part was don
   And that her raign had here its last fulfilling;
   She knew such harmony alone
   Could hold all Heav'n and Earth in happier union.
 
   XI
 
   At last surrounds their sight
   A globe of circular light,                                          110
   That with long beams the shame faced night arrayed
   The helmed Cherubim
   And sworded Seraphim,
   Are seen in glittering ranks with wings displaid,
   Harping in loud and solemn quire,
   With unexpressive notes to Heav'ns new-born Heir.
 
   XII
 
   Such Musick (as 'tis said)
   Before was never made,
   But when of old the sons of morning sung,
   While the Creator Great
   His constellations set,                                             120
   And the well-ballanc't world on hinges hung,
   And cast the dark foundations deep,
   And bid the weltring waves their oozy channel keep.
 
   XIII
 
   Ring out ye Crystall sphears,
   Once bless our human ears,
   (If ye have power to touch our senses so)
   And let your silver chime
   Move in melodious time;
   And let the Base of Heav'ns deep Organ blow,                        130
   And with your ninefold harmony
   Make up full consort to th'Angelike symphony.
 
   XIV
 
   For if such holy Song
   Enwrap our fancy long,
   Time will run back, and fetch the age of gold,
   And speckl'd vanity
   Will sicken soon and die,
   And leprous sin will melt from earthly mould,
   And Hell it self will pass away
   And leave her dolorous mansions to the peering day.                 140
 
   XV
 
   Yea Truth, and Justice then
   Will down return to men,
   Th'enameld Arras of the Rain-bow wearing,
   And Mercy set between
   Thron'd in Celestiall sheen,
   With radiant feet the tissued clouds down stearing,
   And Heav'n as at som festivall,
   Will open wide the gates of her high Palace Hall.
 
   XVI
 
   But wisest Fate sayes  no,
   This must not yet be so,                                            150
   The Babe lies yet in smiling Infancy,
   That on the bitter cross
   Must redeem our loss;
   So both himself and us to glorifie:
   Yet first to those ychain'd in sleep,
   The Wakeful trump of doom must thunder through the deep,
 
   XVII
 
   With such a horrid clang
   As on Mount Sinai rang
   While the red fire, and smouldring clouds out brake:
   The aged Earth agast                                                160
   With terrour of that blast,
   Shall from the surface to the center shake;
   When at the worlds last session,
   The dreadfull Judge in middle Air shall spread his throne.
 
   XVIII
 
   And then at last  our bliss
   Full and perfect is,
   But now begins; for from this happy day
   Th'old Dragon under ground
   In straiter limits bound,
   Not half so far casts his usurped sway,                             170
   And wrath to see his Kingdom fail,
   Swindges the scaly Horrour of his foulded tail.
 
   XIX
 
   The Oracles are dumm,
   No voice or hideous humm
   Runs through the arched roof in words deceiving.
   Apollo from his shrine
   Can no more divine,
   With hollow shreik the steep of Delphos leaving.
   No nightly trance, or breathed spell,
   Inspire's the pale-ey'd Priest from the prophetic cell.             180
 
   XX
 
   The lonely mountains o're,
   And the resounding shore,
   A voice of weeping heard, and loud lament;
   From haunted spring, and dale
   Edg'd with poplar pale
   The parting Genius is with sighing sent,
   With flowre-inwov'n tresses torn
   The Nimphs in twilight shade of tangled thickets mourn.
 
   XXI
 
   In consecrated Earth,
   And on the holy Hearth,                                             190
   The Lars, and Lemures moan with midnight plaint,
   In Urns, and Altars round,
   A drear, and dying sound
   Affrights the Flamins at their service quaint;
   And the chill Marble seems to sweat,
   While each peculiar power forgoes his wonted seat.
 
   XXII
 
   Peor, and Baalim,
   Forsake their Temples dim,
   With that twise-batter'd god of Palestine,
   And mooned Ashtaroth,                                               200
   Heav'ns Queen and Mother both,
   Now sits not girt with Tapers holy shine,
   The Libyc Hammon shrinks his horn,
   In vain the Tyrian Maids their wounded Thamuz mourn.
 
   XXIII
 
   And sullen Moloch fled,
   Hath left in shadows dred,
   His burning Idol all of blackest hue,
   In vain with Cymbals ring,
   They call the grisly king,
   In dismall dance about the furnace Blue;                            210
   And Brutish gods of Nile as fast,
   lsis and Orus, and the Dog Anubis hast.
 
 
 
 
 THE PASSION.
 
 
   I
 
   ERE-while of Musick, and Ethereal mirth,
   Wherwith the stage of Ayr and Earth did ring,
   And joyous news of heav'nly Infants birth,
   My muse with Angels did divide to sing;
   But headlong joy is ever on the wing,
   In Wintry solstice like the shortn'd light
   Soon swallow'd up in dark and long out-living night.
 
   II
 
   For now to sorrow must I tune my song,
   And set my Harpe to notes of saddest wo,
   Which on our dearest Lord did sease er'e long,
   Dangers, and snares, and wrongs, and worse then so,                  10
   Which he for us did freely undergo.
   Most perfect Heroe, try'd in heaviest plight
   Of labours huge and hard, too hard for human wight.
 
   III
 
   He sov'ran Priest stooping his regall head
   That dropt with odorous oil down his fair eyes,
   Poor fleshly Tabernacle entered,
   His starry front low-rooft beneath the skies;
   O what a Mask was there, what a disguise!
   Yet more; the stroke of death he must abide,                         20
   Then lies him meekly down fast by his Brethrens side.
 
   IV
 
   These latter scenes confine my roving vers,
   To this Horizon is my Phoebus bound,
   His Godlike acts, and his temptations fierce,
   And former sufferings other where are found;
   Loud o're the rest Cremona's Trump doth sound;
   Me softer airs befit, and softer strings
   Of Lute, or Viol still, more apt for mournful things.
 
   Note: 22 latter] latest 1673.
 
   V
 
   Befriend me night best Patroness of grief,
   Over the Pole thy thickest mantle throw,                             30
   And work my flatterd fancy to belief,
   That Heav'n and Earth are colour'd with my wo;
   My sorrows are too dark for day to know:
   The leaves should all be black wheron I write,
   And letters where my tears have washt a wannish white.
 
   VI
 
   See see the Chariot, and those rushing wheels,
   That whirl'd the Prophet up at Chebar flood,
   My spirit som transporting Cherub feels,
   To bear me where the Towers of Salem stood,
   Once glorious Towers, now sunk in guiltles blood;                    40
   There doth my soul in holy vision sit
   In pensive trance, and anguish, and ecstatick fit.
 
   VII
 
   Mine eye hath found that sad Sepulchral rock
   That was the Casket of Heav'ns richest store,
   And here though grief my feeble hands up-lock,
   Yet on the softned Quarry would I score
   My plaining vers as lively as before;
   For sure so well instructed are my tears,
   They would fitly fall in order'd Characters.
 
   VIII
 
   I thence hurried on viewles wing,                                    50
   Take up a weeping on the Mountains wilde,
   The gentle neighbourhood of grove and spring
   Would soon unboosom all their Echoes milde,
   And I (for grief is easily beguild)
   Might think th'infection of my sorrows bound,
   Had got a race of mourners on som pregnant cloud.
 
   Note: This subject the Author finding to be above the yeers he had,
   when he wrote it, and nothing satisfi'd with what was begun,
   left it unfinish'd.
 
 
 
 
 ON TIME.
 
 
   FLY envious Time, till thou run out thy race,
   Call on the lazy leaden-stepping hours,
   Whose speed is but the heavy Plummets pace;
   And glut thy self with what thy womb devours,
   Which is no more then what is false and vain,
   And meerly mortal dross;
   So little is our loss,
   So little is thy gain.
   For when as each thing bad thou hast entomb'd,
   And last of all, thy greedy self consum'd,                           10
   Then long Eternity shall greet our bliss
   With an individual kiss;
   And Joy shall overtake us as a flood,
   When every thing that is sincerely good
   And perfectly divine,
   With Truth, and Peace, and Love shall ever shine
   About the supreme Throne
   Of him, t'whose happy-making sight alone,
   When once our heav'nly-guided soul shall clime,
   Then all this Earthy grosnes quit,                                   20
   Attir'd with Stars, we shall for ever sit,
   Triumphing over Death, and Chance, and thee O Time.
 
   Note: See the appendix for the manuscript version.
 
 
 
 
 UPON THE CIRCUMCISION.
 
 
   YE flaming Powers, and winged Warriours bright,
   That erst with Musick, and triumphant song
   First heard by happy watchful Shepherds ear,
   So sweetly sung your Joy the Clouds along
   Through the soft silence of the list'ning night;
   Now mourn, and if sad share with us to bear
   Your fiery essence can distill no tear,
   Burn in your sighs, and borrow
   Seas wept from our deep sorrow,
   He who with all Heav'ns heraldry whileare                            10
   Enter'd the world, now bleeds to give us ease;
   Alas, how soon our sin
   Sore doth begin
   His Infancy to sease!
 
   O more exceeding love or law more just?
   Just law indeed, but more exceeding love!
   For we by rightfull doom remediles
   Were lost in death, till he that dwelt above
   High thron'd in secret bliss, for us frail dust
   Emptied his glory, ev'n to nakednes;                                 20
   And that great Cov'nant which we still transgress
   Intirely satisfi'd,
   And the full wrath beside
   Of vengeful Justice bore for our excess,
   And seals obedience first with wounding smart
   This day, but O ere long
   Huge pangs and strong
   Will pierce more neer his heart.
 
 
 
 
 AT A SOLEMN MUSICK.
 
 
   BLEST pair of Sirens, pledges of Heav'ns joy,
   Sphear-born harmonious Sisters, Voice, and Vers,
   Wed your divine sounds, and mixt power employ
   Dead things with inbreath'd sense able to pierce,
   And to our high-rais'd phantasie present,
   That undisturbed Song of pure content,
   Ay sung before the saphire-colour'd throne
   To him that sits theron
   With Saintly shout, and solemn Jubily,
   Where the bright Seraphim in burning row                             10
   Their loud up-lifted Angel trumpets blow,
   And the Cherubick host in thousand quires
   Touch their immortal Harps of golden wires,
   With those just Spirits that wear victorious Palms,
   Hymns devout and holy Psalms
   Singing everlastingly;
   That we on Earth with undiscording voice
   May rightly answer that melodious noise;
   As  once we did, till disproportion'd sin
   Jarr'd against natures chime, and with harsh din                     20
   The fair musick that all creatures made
   To their great Lord, whose love their motion sway'd
   In perfect Diapason, whilst they stood
   In first obedience, and their state of good.
   O may we soon again renew that Song,
   And keep in tune with Heav'n, till God ere long
   To his celestial consort us unite,
   To live with him, and sing in endles morn of light.
 
   Note: 6 content]  Manuscript reads concent as does the Second
   Edition; so that content is probably a misprint.
 
 
 
 
 AN EPITAPH ON THE MARCHIONESS OF WINCHESTER.
 
 
   THIS rich Marble doth enterr
   The honour'd Wife of Winchester,
   A Vicounts daughter, an Earls heir,
   Besides what her vertues fair
   Added to her noble birth,
   More then she could own from Earth.
   Summers three times eight save one
   She had told, alas too soon,
   After so short time of breath,
   To house with darknes, and with death.                               10
   Yet had the number of her days
   Bin as compleat as was her praise,
   Nature and fate had had no strife
   In giving limit to her life.
   Her high birth, and her graces sweet,
   Quickly found a lover meet;
   The Virgin quire for her request
   The God that sits at marriage feast;
   He at their invoking came
   But with a scarce-wel-lighted flame;                                 20
   And in his Garland as he stood,
   Ye might discern a Cipress bud.
   Once had the early Matrons run
   To greet her of a lovely son,
   And now with second hope she goes,
   And calls Lucina to her throws;
   But whether by mischance or blame
   Atropos for Lucina came;
   And with remorsles cruelty,
   Spoil'd at once both fruit and tree:                                 30
   The haples Babe before his birth
   Had burial, yet not laid in earth,
   And the languisht Mothers Womb
   Was not long a living Tomb.
   So have I seen som tender slip
   Sav'd with care from Winters nip,
   The pride of her carnation train,
   Pluck't up by som unheedy swain,
   Who onely thought to crop the flowr
   New shot up from vernall showr;                                      40
   But the fair blossom hangs the head
   Side-ways as on a dying bed,
   And those Pearls of dew she wears,
   Prove to be presaging tears
   Which the sad morn had let fall
   On her hast'ning funerall.
   Gentle Lady may thy grave
   Peace and quiet ever have;
   After this thy travail sore
   Sweet rest sease thee evermore,                                      50
   That to give the world encrease,
   Shortned hast thy own lives lease;
   Here besides the sorrowing
   That thy noble House doth bring,
   Here be tears of perfect moan
   Weept for thee in Helicon,
   And som Flowers, and som Bays,
   For thy Hears to strew the ways,
   Sent thee from the banks of Came,
   Devoted to thy vertuous name;                                        60
   Whilst thou bright Saint high sit'st in glory,
   Next her much like to thee in story,
   That fair Syrian Shepherdess,
   Who after yeers of barrennes,
   The highly favour'd Joseph bore
   To him that serv'd for her before,
   And at her next birth much like thee,
   Through pangs fled to felicity,
   Far within the boosom bright
   of blazing Majesty and Light,                                        70
   There with thee, new welcom Saint,
   Like fortunes may her soul acquaint,
   With thee there clad in radiant sheen,
   No Marchioness, but now a Queen.
 
 
 
 
 SONG ON MAY MORNING.
 
 
   Now the bright morning Star, Dayes harbinger,
   Comes dancing from the East, and leads with her
   The Flowry May, who from her green lap throws
   The yellow Cowslip, and the pale Primrose.
   Hail bounteous May that dost inspire
   Mirth and youth, and warm desire,
   Woods and Groves, are of thy dressing,
   Hill and Dale, doth boast thy blessing.
   Thus we salute thee with our early Song,
   And welcom thee, and wish thee long.                                 10
 
 
 
 
 ON SHAKESPEAR.  1630.
 
 
   WHAT needs my Shakespear for his honour'd Bones,
   The labour of an age in piled Stones,
   Or that his hallow'd reliques should be hid
   Under a Star-ypointing Pyramid?
   Dear son of memory, great heir of Fame,
   What need'st thou such weak witnes of thy name?
   Thou in our wonder and astonishment
   Hast built thy self a live-long Monument.
   For whilst to th'sharne of slow-endeavouring art,
   Thy easie numbers flow, and that each heart                          10
   Hath from the Leaves of thy unvalu'd Book,
   Those Delphick lines with deep impression took,
   Then thou our fancy of it self bereaving,
   Dost make us Marble with too much conceaving;
   And so Sepulcher'd in such pomp dost lie,
   That Kings for such a Tomb would wish to die.
 
   Notes: On Shakespear.  Reprinted 1632 in the second folio
   Shakespeare:
   Title] An epitaph on the admirable dramaticke poet W.
   Shakespeare
   1 needs] neede
   6 weak] dull
   8 live-long] lasting
   10 heart] part
   13 it] her
 
 
 
 
 ON THE UNIVERSITY CARRIER WHO SICKN'D IN THE TIME OF HIS
   VACANCY, BEING FORBID TO GO TO LONDON, BY REASON OF THE
   PLAGUE.
 
 
   HERE lies old Hobson, Death hath broke his girt,
   And here alas, hath laid him in the dirt,
   Or els the ways being foul, twenty to one,
   He's here stuck in a slough, and overthrown.
   'Twas such a shifter, that if truth were known,
   Death was half glad when he had got him down;
   For he had any time this ten yeers full,
   Dodg'd with him, betwixt Cambridge and the Bull.
   And surely, Death could never have prevail'd,
   Had not his weekly cours of carriage fail'd;                         10
   But lately finding him so long at home,
   And thinking now his journeys end was come,
   And that he had tane up his latest Inne,
   In the kind office of a Chamberlin
   Shew'd him his room where he must lodge that night,
   Pull'd off his Boots, and took away the light:
   If any ask for him, it shall be sed,
   Hobson has supt, and 's newly gon to bed.
 
 
 
 
 ANOTHER ON THE SAME.
 
 
   HERE lieth one who did most truly prove,
   That he could never die while he could move,
   So hung his destiny never to rot
   While he might still jogg on, and keep his trot,
   Made of sphear-metal, never to decay
   Untill his revolution was at stay.
   Time numbers motion, yet (without a crime
   'Gainst old truth) motion number'd out his time:
   And like an Engin mov'd with wheel and waight,
   His principles being ceast, he ended strait.                         10
   Rest that gives all men life, gave him his death,
   And too much breathing put him out of breath;
   Nor were it contradiction to affirm
   Too long vacation hastned on his term.
   Meerly to drive the time away he sickn'd,
   Fainted, and died, nor would with Ale be quickn'd;
   Nay, quoth he, on his swooning bed out-stretch'd,
   If I may not carry, sure Ile ne're be fetch'd,
   But vow though the cross Doctors all stood hearers,
   For one Carrier put down to make six bearers.                        20
   Ease was his chief disease, and to judge right,
   He di'd for heavines that his Cart went light,
   His leasure told him that his time was com,
   And lack of load, made his life burdensom
   That even to his last breath (ther be that say't)
   As he were prest to death, he cry'd more waight;
   But had his doings lasted as they were,
   He had bin an immortall Carrier.
   Obedient to the Moon he spent his date
   In cours reciprocal, and had his fate                                30
   Linkt to the mutual flowing of the Seas,
   Yet (strange to think) his wain was his increase:
   His Letters are deliver'd all and gon,
   Onely remains this superscription.
 
 
 
 
 L'ALLEGRO.
 
 
   HENCE loathed Melancholy
   Of Cerberus, and blackest midnight born,
   In Stygian Cave forlorn
   'Mongst horrid shapes, and shreiks, and sights unholy,
   Find out som uncouth cell,
   Where brooding darknes spreads his jealous wings,
   And the night-Raven sings;
   There under Ebon shades and low-brow'd Rocks,
   As ragged as thy Locks,
   In dark Cimmerian desert ever dwell.                                 10
   But com thou Goddes fair and free,
   In Heav'n ycleap'd Euphrosyne,
   And by men, heart-easing Mirth,
   Whom lovely Venus at a birth
   With two sister Graces more
   To Ivy-crowned Bacchus bore;
   Or whether (as som Sager sing)
   The frolick Wind that breathes the Spring,
   Zephir with Aurora playing,
   As he met her once a Maying,                                         20
   There on Beds of Violets blew,
   And fresh-blown Roses washt in dew,
   Fill'd her with thee a daughter fair,
   So bucksom, blith, and debonair.
   Haste thee nymph, and bring with thee
   Jest and youthful Jollity,
   Quips and Cranks, and wanton Wiles,
   Nods, and Becks, and Wreathed Smiles,
   Such as hang on Hebe's cheek,
   And love to live in dimple sleek;                                    30
   Sport that wrincled Care derides,
   And Laughter holding both his sides.
   Com, and trip it as ye go
   On the light fantastick toe,
   And in thy right hand lead with thee,
   The Mountain Nymph, sweet Liberty;
   And if I give thee honour due,
   Mirth, admit me of thy crue
   To live with her, and live with thee,
   In unreproved pleasures free;                                        40
   To hear the Lark begin his flight,
   And singing startle the dull night,
   From his watch-towre in the skies,
   Till the dappled dawn doth rise;
   Then to com in spight of sorrow,
   And at my window bid good morrow,
   Through the Sweet-Briar, or the Vine,
   Or the twisted Eglantine.
   While the Cock with lively din,
   Scatters the rear of darknes thin,                                   50
   And to the stack, or the Barn dore,
   Stoutly struts his Dames before,
   Oft list'ning how the Hounds and horn
   Chearly rouse the slumbring morn,
   From the side of som Hoar Hill,
   Through the high wood echoing shrill.
   Som time walking not unseen
   By Hedge-row Elms, on Hillocks green,
   Right against the Eastern gate,
   Wher the great Sun begins his state,                                 60
   Rob'd in flames, and Amber light,
   The clouds in thousand Liveries dight.
   While the Plowman neer at hand,
   Whistles ore the Furrow'd Land,
   And the Milkmaid singeth blithe,
   And the Mower whets his sithe,
   And every Shepherd tells his tale
   Under the Hawthorn in the dale.
   Streit mine eye hath caught new pleasures
   Whilst the Lantskip round it measures,                               70
   Russet Lawns, and Fallows Gray,
   Where the nibling flocks do stray,
   Mountains on whose barren brest
   The labouring clouds do often rest:
   Meadows trim with Daisies pide,
   Shallow Brooks, and Rivers wide.
   Towers, and Battlements it sees
   Boosom'd high in tufted Trees,
   Wher perhaps som beauty lies,
   The Cynosure of neighbouring eyes.                                   80
   Hard by, a Cottage chimney smokes,
   From betwixt two aged Okes,
   Where Corydon and Thyrsis met,
   Are at their savory dinner set
   Of Hearbs, and other Country Messes,
   Which the neat-handed Phillis dresses;
   And then in haste her Bowre she leaves,
   With Thestylis to bind the Sheaves;
   Or if the earlier season lead
   To the tann'd Haycock in the Mead,                                   90
   Som times with secure delight
   The up-land Hamlets will invite,
   When the merry Bells ring round,
   And the jocond rebecks sound
   To many a youth, and many a maid,
   Dancing in the Chequer'd shade;
   And young and old com forth to play
   On a Sunshine Holyday,
   Till the live-long day-light fail,
   Then to the Spicy Nut-brown Ale,                                    100
   With stories told of many a feat,
   How Faery Mab the junkets eat,
   She was pincht, and pull'd she sed,
   And he by Friars Lanthorn led
   Tells how the drudging Goblin swet,
   To ern his Cream-bowle duly set,
   When in one night, ere glimps of morn,
   His shadowy Flale hath thresh'd the Corn
   That ten day-labourers could not end,
   Then lies him down the Lubbar Fend.                                 110
   And stretch'd out all the Chimney's length,
   Basks at the fire his hairy strength;
   And Crop-full out of dores he flings,
   Ere the first Cock his Mattin rings.
   Thus don the Tales, to bed they creep,
   By whispering Windes soon lull'd asleep.
   Towred Cities please us then,
   And the busie humm of men,
   Where throngs of Knights and Barons bold,
   In weeds of Peace high triumphs hold,                               120
   With store of Ladies, whose bright eies
   Rain influence, and judge the prise
   Of Wit, or Arms, while both contend
   To win her Grace, whom all commend.
   There let Hymen oft appear
   In Saffron robe, with Taper clear,
   And pomp, and feast, and revelry,
   With mask, and antique Pageantry,
   Such sights as youthfull Poets dream
   On Summer eeves by haunted stream.                                  130
   Then to the well-trod stage anon,
   If Jonsons learned Sock be on,
   Or sweetest Shakespear fancies childe,
   Warble his native Wood-notes wilde,
   And ever against eating Cares,
   Lap me in soft Lydian Aires,
   Married to immortal verse
   Such as the meeting soul may pierce
   In notes, with many a winding bout
   Of lincked sweetnes long drawn out,                                 140
   With wanton heed, and giddy cunning,
   The melting voice through mazes running;
   Untwisting all the chains that ty
   The hidden soul of harmony.
   That Orpheus self may heave his head
   From golden slumber on a bed
   Of heapt Elysian flowres, and hear
   Such streins as would have won the ear
   Of Pluto, to have quite set free
   His half regain'd Eurydice.                                         150
   These delights, if thou canst give,
   Mirth with thee, I mean to live.
 
   Notes:
   33 Ye] You 1673
   104 And he by] And by the 1673
 
 
 
 
 IL PENSEROSO.
 
 
   Hence vain deluding joyes,
   The brood of folly without father bred,
   How little you bested,
   Or fill the fixed mind with all your toyes;
   Dwell in som idle brain
   And fancies fond with gaudy shapes possess,
   As thick and numberless
   As the gay motes that people the Sun Beams,
   Or likest hovering dreams
   The fickle Pensioners of Morpheus train.                             10
   But hail thou Goddess, sage and holy,
   Hail divinest Melancholy
   Whose Saintly visage is too bright
   To hit the Sense of human sight;
   And therefore to our weaker view,
   Ore laid with black staid Wisdoms hue.
   Black, but such as in esteem,
   Prince Memnons sister might beseem,
   Or that Starr'd Ethiope Queen that strove
   To set her beauties praise above                                     20
   The Sea Nymphs, and their powers offended.
   Yet thou art higher far descended,
   Thee bright-hair'd Vesta long of yore,
   To solitary Saturn bore;
   His daughter she (in Saturns raign,
   Such mixture was not held a stain)
   Oft in glimmering Bowres, and glades
   He met her, and in secret shades
   Of woody Ida's inmost grove,
   While yet there was no fear of Jove.                                 30
   Com pensive Nun, devout and pure,
   Sober, stedfast, and demure,
   All in a robe of darkest grain,
   Flowing with majestick train,
   And sable stole of Cipres Lawn,
   Over thy decent shoulders drawn.
   Com, but keep thy wonted state,
   With eev'n step, and musing gate,
   And looks commercing with the skies,
   Thy rapt soul sitting in thine eyes:                                 40
   There held in holy passion still,
   Forget thy self to Marble, till
   With a sad Leaden downward cast,
   Thou fix them on the earth as fast.
   And joyn with thee calm Peace, and Quiet,
   Spare Fast, that oft with gods doth diet,
   And hears the Muses in a ring,
   Ay round about Joves Altar sing.
   And adde to these retired Leasure,
   That in trim Gardens takes his pleasure;                             50
   But first, and chiefest, with thee bring,
   Him that yon soars on golden wing,
   Guiding the fiery-wheeled throne,
   The Cherub Contemplation,
   And the mute Silence hist along,
   'Less Philomel will daign a Song,
   In her sweetest, saddest plight,
   Smoothing the rugged brow of night,
   While Cynthia checks her Dragon yoke,
   Gently o're th'accustom'd Oke;                                       60
   Sweet Bird that shunn'st the noise of folly
   Most musical!, most melancholy!
   Thee Chauntress oft the Woods among
   I woo to hear thy eeven-Song;
   And missing thee, I walk unseen
   On the dry smooth-shaven Green,
   To behold the wandring Moon,
   Riding neer her highest noon,
   Like one that had bin led astray
   Through the Heav'ns wide pathles way;                                70
   And oft, as if her head she bow'd,
   Stooping through a fleecy cloud.
   Oft on a Plat of rising ground,
   I hear the far-off Curfeu sound,
   Over som wide-water'd shoar,
   Swinging slow with sullen roar;
   Or if the Ayr will not permit,
   Som still removed place will fit,
   Where glowing Embers through the room
   Teach light to counterfeit a gloom                                   80
   Far from all resort of mirth,
   Save the Cricket on the hearth,
   Or the Belmans drowsie charm,
   To bless the dores from nightly harm:
   Or let my Lamp at midnight hour,
   Be seen in som high lonely Towr,
   Where I may oft out-watch the Bear,
   With thrice great Hermes, or unsphear
   The spirit of Plato to unfold
   What Worlds, or what vast Regions hold                               90
   The immortal mind that hath forsook
   Her mansion in this fleshly nook:
   And of those Daemons that are found
   In fire, air, flood, or under ground,
   Whose power hath a true consent
   With planet or with Element.
   Som time let Gorgeous Tragedy
   In Scepter'd Pall com sweeping by,
   Presenting Thebs, or Pelops line,
   Or the tale of Troy divine.                                         100
   Or what (though rare) of later age,
   Ennobled hath the Buskind stage.
   But, O sad Virgin, that thy power
   Might raise Musaeus from his bower,
   Or bid the soul of Orpheus sing
   Such notes as warbled to the string,
   Drew Iron tears down Pluto's cheek,
   And made Hell grant what Love did seek.
   Or call up him that left half told
   The story of Cambuscan bold,                                        110
   Of Camball, and of Algarsife,
   And who had Canace to wife,
   That own'd the vertuous Ring and Glass,
   And of the wondrous Hors of Brass,
   On which the Tartar King did ride;
   And if ought els, great Bards beside,
   In sage and solemn tunes have sung,
   Of Turneys and of Trophies hung;
   Of Forests, and inchantments drear,
   Where more is meant then meets the ear.                             120
   Thus night oft see me in thy pale career,
   Till civil-suited Morn appeer,
   Not trickt and frounc't as she was wont,
   With the Attick Boy to hunt,
   But Cherchef't in a comly Cloud,
   While rocking Winds are Piping loud,
   Or usher'd with a shower still,
   When the gust hath blown his fill,
   Ending on the russling Leaves,
   With minute drops from off the Eaves.                               130
   And when the Sun begins to fling
   His flaring beams, me Goddes bring
   To arched walks of twilight groves,
   And shadows brown that Sylvan loves
   Of Pine, or monumental Oake,
   Where the rude Ax with heaved stroke,
   Was never heard the Nymphs to daunt,
   Or fright them from their hallow'd haunt.
   There in close covert by som Brook,
   Where no profaner eye may look,                                     140
   Hide me from Day's garish eie,
   While the Bee with Honied thie,
   That at her flowry work doth sing,
   And the Waters murmuring
   With such consort as they keep,
   Entice the dewy-feather'd Sleep;
   And let som strange mysterious dream,
   Wave at his Wings in Airy stream,
   Of lively portrature display'd,
   Softly on my eye-lids laid.                                         150
   And as I wake, sweet musick breath
   Above, about, or underneath,
   Sent by som spirit to mortals good,
   Or th'unseen Genius of the Wood.
   But let my due feet never fail,
   To walk the studious Cloysters pale,
   And love the high embowed Roof
   With antick Pillars massy proof,
   And storied Windows richly dight,
   Casting a dimm religious light.                                     160
   There let the pealing Organ blow,
   To the full voic'd Quire below,
   In Service high, and Anthems cleer,
   As may with sweetnes, through mine ear,
   Dissolve me into extasies,
   And bring all Heav'n before mine eyes.
   And may at last my weary age
   Find out the peacefull hermitage,
   The Hairy Gown and Mossy Cell,
   Where I may sit and rightly spell                                   170
   Of every Star that Heav'n doth shew,
   And every Herb that sips the dew;
   Till old  experience do attain
   To somthing like prophetic strain.
   These pleasures Melancholy give,
   And I with thee will choose to live.
 
 
 
 
 SONNETS.
 
 
   I
 
   O Nightingale, that on yon bloomy Spray
   Warbl'st at eeve, when all the Woods are still,
   Thou with fresh hope the Lovers heart dost fill,
   While the jolly hours lead on propitious May,
   Thy liquid notes that close the eye of Day,
   First heard before the shallow Cuccoo's bill
   Portend success in love; O if Jove's will
   Have linkt that amorous power to thy soft lay,
   Now timely sing, ere the rude Bird of Hate
   Foretell my hopeles doom in som Grove ny:                            10
   As thou from yeer to yeer hast sung too late
   For my relief; yet hadst no reason why,
   Whether the Muse, or Love call thee his mate,
   Both them I serve, and of their train am I.
 
   II
 
   Donna leggiadra il cui bel nome honora
   L'herbosa val di Rheno, e il nobil varco,
   Ben e colui d'ogni valore scarco
   Qual tuo spirto gentil non innamora,
   Che dolcemente mostra si di fuora
   De suoi atti soavi giamai parco,
   E i don', che son d'amor saette ed arco,
   La onde l' alta tua virtu s'infiora.
   Quando tu vaga parli, O lieta canti
   Che mover possa duro alpestre legno,                                 10
   Guardi ciascun a gli occhi ed a gli orecchi
   L'entrata, chi di te si truova indegno;
   Gratia sola di su gli vaglia, inanti
   Che'l disio amoroso al cuor s'invecchi.
 
   III
 
   Qual in colle aspro, al imbrunir di sera
   L'avezza giovinetta pastorella
   Va bagnando l'herbetta strana e bella
   Che mal si spande a disusata spera
   Fuor di sua natia alma primavera,
   Cosi Amor meco insu la lingua snella
   Desta il fior novo di strania favella,
   Mentre io di te, vezzosamente altera,
   Canto, dal mio buon popol non inteso
   E'l bel Tamigi cangio col bel Arno                                   10
   Amor lo volse, ed io a l'altrui peso
   Seppi ch' Amor cosa mai volse indarno.
   Deh!  foss' il mio cuor lento e'l duro seno
   A chi pianta dal ciel si buon terreno.
 
   Canzone.
 
   Ridonsi donne e giovani amorosi
   M' occostandosi attorno, e perche scrivi,
   Perche tu scrivi in lingua ignota e strana
   Verseggiando d'amor, e come t'osi?
   Dinne, se la tua speme sia mai vana
   E de pensieri lo miglior t' arrivi;
   Cosi mi van burlando, altri rivi
   Altri lidi t' aspettan, & altre onde
   Nelle cui verdi sponde
   Spuntati ad hor, ad hor a la tua chioma                              10
   L'immortal guiderdon d 'eterne frondi
   Perche alle spalle tue soverchia soma?
   Canzon dirotti, e tu per me rispondi
   Dice mia Donna, e'l suo dir, e il mio cuore
   Questa e lingua di cui si vanta Amore.
 
   IV
 
   Diodati, e te'l diro con maraviglia,
   Quel ritroso io ch'amor spreggiar solea
   E de suoi lacci spesso mi ridea
   Gia caddi, ov'huom dabben talhor s'impiglia.
   Ne treccie d'oro, ne guancia vermiglia
   M' abbaglian si, ma sotto nova idea
   Pellegrina bellezza che'l cuor bea,
   Portamenti alti honesti, e nelle ciglia
   Quel sereno fulgor d' amabil nero,
   Parole adorne di lingua piu d'una,                                   10
   E'l cantar che di mezzo l'hemispero
   Traviar ben puo la faticosa Luna,
   E degil occhi suoi auventa si gran fuoco
   Che l 'incerar gli oreechi mi fia poco.
 
   V
 
   Per certo i bei vostr'occhi Donna mia
   Esser non puo che non fian lo mio sole
   Si mi percuoton forte, come ci suole
   Per l'arene di Libia chi s'invia,
   Mentre un caldo vapor (ne senti pria)
   Da quel lato si spinge ove mi duole,
   Che forsi amanti nelle lor parole
   Chiaman sospir; io non so che si sia:
   Parte rinchiusa, e turbida si cela
   Scosso mi il petto, e poi n'uscendo poco                             10
   Quivi d' attorno o s'agghiaccia, o s'ingiela;
   Ma quanto a gli occhi giunge a trovar loco
   Tutte le notti a me suol far piovose
   Finche mia Alba rivien colma di rose.
 
   VI
 
   Giovane piano, e semplicetto amante
   Poi che fuggir me stesso in dubbio sono,
   Madonna a voi del mio cuor l'humil dono
   Faro divoto; io certo a prove tante
   L'hebbi fedele, intrepido, costante,
   De pensieri leggiadro, accorto, e buono;
   Quando rugge il gran mondo, e scocca il tuono,
   S 'arma di se, e d' intero diamante,
   Tanto del forse, e d' invidia sicuro,
   Di timori, e speranze al popol use                                   10
   Quanto d'ingegno, e d' alto valor vago,
   E di cetra sonora, e delle muse:
   Sol troverete in tal parte men duro
   Ove amor mise l 'insanabil ago.
 
   VII
   How soon hath Time the suttle theef of youth,
   Stoln on his wing my three and twentith yeer!
   My hasting dayes flie on with full career,
   But my late spring no bud or blossom shew'th,
   Perhaps my semblance might deceive the truth,
   That I to manhood am arriv'd so near,
   And inward ripenes doth much less appear,
   That som more timely-happy spirits indu'th.
   Yet be it less or more, or soon or slow.
   It shall be still in strictest measure eev'n,                        10
   To that same lot, however mean, or high,
   Toward which Time leads me, and the will of Heav'n;
   All is, if I have grace to use it so,
   As ever in my great task Masters eye.
 
 
   VIII
 
   Captain or Colonel, or Knight in Arms,
   Whose chance on these defenceless dores may sease,
   If ever deed of honour did thee please,
   Guard them, and him within protect from harms,
   He can requite thee, for he knows the charms
   That call Fame on such gentle acts as these,
   And he can spred thy Name o're Lands and Seas,
   What ever clime the Suns bright circle warms.
   Lift not thy spear against the Muses Bowre,
   The great Emathian Conqueror bid spare                               10
   The house of Pindarus, when Temple and Towre
   Went to the ground: And the repeated air
   Of sad Electra's Poet had the power
   To save th' Athenian Walls from ruine bare.
 
   Notes:
   Camb. autograph supplies title, When the assault was intended
   to the city.
   3 If deed of honour did thee ever please,  1673.
 
   IX
 
   Lady that in the prime of earliest youth,
   Wisely hath shun'd the broad way and the green,
   And with those few art eminently seen,
   That labour up the Hill of heav'nly Truth,
   The better part with Mary and with Ruth,
   Chosen thou hast, and they that overween,
   And at thy growing vertues fret their spleen,
   No anger find in thee, but pity and ruth.
   Thy care is fixt and zealously attends
   To fill thy odorous Lamp with deeds of light,
   And Hope that reaps not shame.  Therefore be sure
   Thou, when the Bridegroom with his feastfull friends
   Passes to bliss at the mid hour of night,
   Hast gain'd thy entrance, Virgin wise and pure.
 
   Note: 5 with Ruth] the Ruth  1645.
 
   X
 
   Daughter to that good Earl, once President
   Of Englands Counsel, and her Treasury,
   Who liv'd in both, unstain'd with gold or fee,
   And left them both, more in himself content,
   Till the sad breaking of that Parlament
   Broke him, as that dishonest victory
   At Chaeronea, fatal to liberty
   Kil'd with report that Old man eloquent,
   Though later born, then to have known the dayes
   Wherin your Father flourisht, yet by you                             10
   Madam, me thinks I see him living yet;
   So well your words his noble vertues praise,
   That all both judge you to relate them true,
   And to possess them, Honour'd Margaret.
 
   Note: Camb. autograph supplies title, To the Lady Margaret
   Ley.
 
 
 
 
 ARCADES.
 
 
   Part of an entertainment presented to the Countess Dowager of
   Darby at Harefield, by som Noble persons of her Family, who
   appear on the Scene in pastoral habit, moving toward the seat
   of State with this Song.
 
   I. SONG.
 
   LOOK Nymphs, and Shepherds look,
   What sudden blaze of majesty
   Is that which we from hence descry
   Too divine to be mistook:
   This this is she
   To whom our vows and wishes bend,
   Heer our solemn search hath end.
 
   Fame that her high worth to raise,
   Seem'd erst so lavish and profuse,
   We may justly now accuse                                             10
   Of detraction from her praise,
   Less then half we find exprest,
   Envy bid conceal the rest.
 
   Mark what radiant state she spreds,
   In circle round her shining throne,
   Shooting her beams like silver threds,
   This this is she alone,
   Sitting like a Goddes bright,
   In the center of her light.
   Might she the wise Latona be,                                        20
   Or the towred Cybele,
   Mother of a hunderd gods;
   Juno dare's not give her odds;
   Who had thought this clime had held
   A deity so unparalel'd?
 
   As they com forward, the genius of the Wood appears, and
   turning toward them, speaks.
 
   GEN. Stay gentle Swains, for though in this disguise,
   I see bright honour sparkle through your eyes,
   Of famous Arcady ye are, and sprung
   Of that renowned flood, so often sung,
   Divine Alpheus, who by secret sluse,                                 30
   Stole under Seas to meet his Arethuse;
   And ye the breathing Roses of the Wood,
   Fair silver-buskind Nymphs as great and good,
   I know this quest of yours, and free intent
   Was all in honour and devotion ment
   To the great Mistres of yon princely shrine,
   Whom with low reverence I adore as mine,
   And with all helpful service will comply
   To further this nights glad solemnity;
   And lead ye where ye may more neer behold                            40
   What shallow-searching Fame hath left untold;
   Which I full oft amidst these shades alone
   Have sate to wonder at, and gaze upon:
   For know by lot from Jove I am the powr
   Of this fair wood, and live in Oak'n bowr,
   To nurse the Saplings tall, and curl the grove
   With Ringlets quaint, and wanton windings wove.
   And all my Plants I save from nightly ill,
   Of noisom winds, and blasting vapours chill.
   And from the Boughs brush off the evil dew,                          50
   And heal the harms of thwarting thunder blew,
   Or what the cross dire-looking Planet smites,
   Or hurtfull Worm with canker'd venom bites.
   When Eev'ning gray doth rise, I fetch my round
   Over the mount, and all this hallow'd ground,
   And early ere the odorous breath of morn
   Awakes the slumbring leaves, or tasseld horn
   Shakes the high thicket, haste I all about,
   Number my ranks, and visit every sprout
   With puissant words, and murmurs made to bless,                      60
   But els in deep of night when drowsines
   Hath lockt up mortal sense, then listen I
   To the celestial Sirens harmony,
   That sit upon the nine enfolded Sphears,
   And sing to those that hold the vital shears,
   And turn the Adamantine spindle round,
   On which the fate of gods and men is wound.
   Such sweet compulsion doth in musick ly,
   To lull the daughters of Necessity,
   And keep unsteddy Nature to her law,                                 70
   And the low world in measur'd motion draw
   After the heavenly tune, which none can hear
   Of human mould with grosse unpurged ear;
   And yet such musick worthiest were to blaze
   The peerles height of her immortal praise,
   Whose lustre leads us, and for her most fit,
   If my inferior hand or voice could hit
   Inimitable sounds, yet as we go,
   What ere the skill of lesser gods can show,
   I will assay, her worth to celebrate,                                80
   And so attend ye toward her glittering state;
   Where ye may all that are of noble stemm
   Approach, and kiss her sacred vestures hemm.
 
 
   2. SONG.
 
   O're the smooth enameld green
   Where no print of step hath been,
   Follow me as I sing,
   And touch the warbled string.
   Under the shady roof
   Of branching Elm Star-proof,
   Follow me,                                                           90
   I will bring you where she sits
   Clad in splendor as befits
   Her deity.
   Such a rural Queen
   All Arcadia hath not seen.
 
 
   3. SONG.
 
   Nymphs and Shepherds dance no more
   By sandy Ladons Lillied banks.
   On old Lycaeus or Cyllene hoar,
   Trip no more in twilight ranks,
   Though Erynanth your loss deplore,                                  100
   A better soyl shall give ye thanks.
   From the stony Maenalus,
   Bring your Flocks, and live with us,
   Here ye shall have greater grace,
   To serve the Lady of this place.
   Though Syrinx your Pans Mistres were,
   Yet Syrinx well might wait on her.
   Such a rural Queen
   All Arcadia hath not seen.
 
   Note: 22 hunderd]  Milton's own spelling here is hundred.  But in
   the Errata to Paradise Lost (i. 760) he corrects hundred to hunderd.
 
 
 
 Transcriber's note: Facsimile of Title page of Lycidas follows:
 
 
                              JUSTA
                          EDOVARDO KING
                            naufrago,
                                ab
                       Amicis Moerentibus,
                              amoris
                                &
                          mneias chaein
   ------------------------------------------------------------
   ------------------------------------------------------------
          Sirecte calculam ponas, ubique naufragium est.
                            Pet. Arb.
   ------------------------------------------------------------
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                          CANTABRIGIAE:
         Apud Thomam Buck, & Rogerum Daniel, celeberrimae
                  Academiae typographos.  1638.
 
 
 
 
 LYCIDAS.
 
 
   In this Monody the Author bewails a learned Friend,
   unfortunatly drown'd in his Passage from Chester on the Irish
   Seas, 1637.  And by occasion foretels the ruine of our
   corrupted Clergy then in their height.
 
   YET once more, O ye Laurels, and once more
   Ye Myrtles brown, with Ivy never-sear,
   I com to pluck your Berries harsh and crude,
   And with forc'd fingers rude,
   Shatter your leaves before the mellowing year.
   Bitter constraint, and sad occasion dear,
   Compels me to disturb your season due:
   For Lycidas is dead, dead ere his prime
   Young Lycidas, and hath not left his peer:
   Who would not sing for Lycidas? he knew
   Himself to sing, and build the lofty rhyme.                          10
   He must not flote upon his watry bear
   Unwept, and welter to the parching wind,
   Without the meed of som melodious tear.
 
   Begin then, Sisters of the sacred well,
   That from beneath the seat of Jove doth spring,
   Begin, and somwhat loudly sweep the string.
   Hence with denial vain, and coy excuse,
   So may som gentle Muse
   With lucky words favour my destin'd Urn,                             20
   And as he passes turn,
   And bid fair peace be to my sable shrowd.
   For we were nurst upon the self-same hill,
   Fed the same flock by fountain, shade, and rill.
 
   Together both, ere the high Lawns appear'd
   Under the opening eye-lids of the morn,
   We drove a field and both together heard
   What time the Gray-fly winds her sultry horn,
   Batt'ning our flocks with the fresh dews of night,
   Oft till the Star that rose, at Ev'ning, bright                      30
   Toward Heav'ns descent had slop'd his westering wheel.
   Mean while the Rural ditties were not mute,
   Temper'd to th'Oaten Flute;
   Rough Satyrs danc'd, and Fauns with clov'n heel,
   From the glad sound would not be absent long,
   And old Damoetas lov'd to hear our song.
 
   But O the heavy change, now thou art gon,
   Now thou art gon, and never must return!
   Thee Shepherd, thee the Woods, and desert Caves,
   With wilde Thyme and the gadding Vine o'regrown,                     40
   And all their echoes mourn.
   The Willows, and the Hazle Copses green,
   Shall now no more be seen,
   Fanning their joyous Leaves to thy soft layes.
   As killing as the Canker to the Rose,
   Or Taint-worm to the weanling Herds that graze,
   Or Frost to Flowers, that their gay wardrop wear,
   When first the White thorn blows;
   Such, Lycidas, thy loss to Shepherds ear.
 
   Where were ye Nymphs when the remorseless deep                       50
   Clos'd o're the head of your lov'd Lycidas?
   For neither were ye playing on the steep,
   Where your old Bards, the famous Druids ly,
   Nor on the shaggy top of Mona high,
   Nor yet where Deva spreads her wisard stream:
   Ay me, I fondly dream!
   Had ye bin there--for what could that have don?
   What could the Muse her self that Orpheus bore,
   The Muse her self, for her inchanting son
   Whom Universal nature did lament,                                    60
   When by the rout that made the hideous roar,
   His goary visage down the stream was sent,
   Down the swift Hebrus to the Lesbian shore.
 
   Alas! What boots it with uncessant care
   To tend the homely slighted Shepherds trade,
   And strictly meditate the thankles Muse,
   Were it not better don as others use,
   To sport with Amaryllis in the shade,
   Or with the tangles of Neaera's hair?
   Fame is the spur that the clear spirit doth raise                    70
   (That last infirmity of Noble mind)
   To scorn delights, and live laborious dayes:
   But the fair Guerdon when we hope to find,
   And think to burst out into sudden blaze.
   Comes the blind Fury with th'abhorred shears,
   And slits the thin spun life.  But not the praise,
   Phoebus repli'd, and touch'd my trembling ears;
   Fame is no plant that grows on mortal soil,
   Nor in the glistering foil
   Set off to th'world, nor in broad rumour lies,                       80
   But lives and spreds aloft by those pure eyes,
   And perfet witnes of all judging Jove;
   As he pronounces lastly on each deed,
   Of so much fame in Heav'n expect thy meed.
 
   O Fountain Arethuse, and thou honour'd floud,
   Smooth-sliding Mincius, crown'd with vocall reeds,
   That strain I heard was of a higher mood:
   But now my Oate proceeds,
   And listens to the Herald of the Sea
   That came in Neptune's plea,                                         90
   He ask'd the Waves, and ask'd the Fellon winds,
   What hard mishap hath doom'd this gentle swain?
   And question'd every gust of rugged wings
   That blows from off each beaked Promontory,
   They knew not of his story,
   And sage Hippotades their answer brings,
   That not a blast was from his dungeon stray'd,
   The Ayr was calm, and on the level brine,
   Sleek Panope with all her sisters play'd.
   It was that fatall and perfidious Bark                              100
   Built in th'eclipse, and rigg'd with curses dark,
   That sunk so low that sacred head of thine.
 
   Next Camus, reverend Sire, went footing slow,
   His Mantle hairy, and his Bonnet sedge,
   Inwrought with figures dim, and on the edge
   Like to that sanguine flower inscrib'd with woe.
   Ah; Who hath reft (quoth he) my dearest pledge?
   Last came, and last did go,
   The Pilot of the Galilean lake,
   Two massy Keyes he bore of metals twain,                            110
   (The Golden opes, the Iron shuts amain)
   He shook his Miter'd locks, and stern bespake,
   How well could I have spar'd for thee, young swain,
   Anow of such as for their bellies sake,
   Creep and intrude, and climb into the fold?
   Of other care they little reck'ning make,
   Then how to scramble at the shearers feast,
   And shove away the worthy bidden guest.
   Blind mouthes! that scarce themselves know how to hold
   A Sheep-hook, or have learn'd ought els the least                   120
   That to the faithfull Herdmans art belongs!
   What recks it them? What need they? They are sped;
   And when they list, their lean and flashy songs
   Grate on their scrannel Pipes of wretched straw,
   The hungry Sheep look up, and are not fed,
   But swoln with wind, and the rank mist they draw,
   Rot inwardly, and foul contagion spread:
   Besides what the grim Woolf with privy paw
   Daily devours apace, and nothing sed,
   But that two-handed engine at the door,                             130
   Stands ready to smite once, and smite no more.
 
   Return Alpheus, the dread voice is past,
   That shrunk thy streams; Return Sicilian Muse,
   And call the Vales, and bid them hither cast
   Their Bels, and Flourets of a thousand hues.
   Ye valleys low where the milde whispers use,
   Of shades and wanton winds, and gushing brooks,
   On whose fresh lap the swart Star sparely looks,
   Throw hither all your quaint enameld eyes,
   That on the green terf suck the honied showres,                     140
   And purple all the ground with vernal flowres.
   Bring the rathe Primrose that forsaken dies.
   The tufted Crow-toe, and pale Gessamine,
   The white Pink, and the Pansie freakt with jeat,
   The glowing Violet.
   The Musk-rose, and the well attir'd Woodbine.
   With Cowslips wan that hang the pensive hed,
   And every flower that sad embroidery wears:
   Bid Amaranthus all his beauty shed,
   Daffadillies fill their cups with tears,                            150
   And strew the Laureat Herse where Lycid lies.
   For so to interpose a little ease,
   Let our frail thoughts dally with false surmise.
   Ah me! Whilst thee the shores, and sounding Seas
   Wash far away, where ere thy bones are hurl'd
   Whether beyond the stormy Hebrides.
   Where thou perhaps under the whelming tide
   Visit'st the bottom of the monstrous world;
   Or whether thou to our moist vows deny'd,
   Sleep'st by the fable of Bellerus old,                              160
   Where the great vision of the guarded Mount
   Looks toward Namancos and Bayona's hold;
   Look homeward Angel now, and melt with ruth.
   And, O ye Dolphins, waft the haples youth.
 
   Weep no more, woful Shepherds weep no more,
   For Lycidas your sorrow is not dead,
   Sunk though he be beneath the watry floar,
   So sinks the day-star in the Ocean bed,
   And yet anon repairs his drooping head,
   And tricks his beams, and with new spangled Ore,                    170
   Flames in the forehead of the morning sky:
   So Lycidas sunk low, but mounted high,
   Through the dear might of him that walk'd the waves
   Where other groves, and other streams along,
   With Nectar pure his oozy Lock's he laves,
   And hears the unexpressive nuptiall Song,
   In the blest Kingdoms meek of joy and love.
   There entertain him all the Saints above,
   In solemn troops, and sweet Societies
   That sing, and singing in their glory move,                         180
   And wipe the tears for ever from his eyes.
   Now Lycidas the Shepherds weep no more;
   Hence forth thou art the Genius of the shore,
   In thy large recompense and shalt be good
   To all that wander in that perilous flood.
 
   Thus sang the uncouth Swain to th'Okes and rills,
   While the still morn went out with Sandals gray,
   He touch'd the tender stops of various Quills,
   With eager thought warbling his Dorick lay:
   And now the Sun had stretch'd out all the hills,                    190
   And now was dropt into the Western bay;
   At last he rose, and twitch'd his Mantle blew:
   To morrow to fresh Woods, and Pastures new.
 
   Notes:
    64  uncessant] Manuscript reads incessant, so that uncessant
   is probably a misprint; though that spelling is retained in the Second
   Edition.
    82  perfet] So in Comus, line 203. In both these places
   the manuscript has perfect, as elsewhere where the word occurs. In
   the Solemn Music, line 23, where the First Edition reads perfect,
   the second reads perfet.
   149 Amaranthus] Amarantus
 
 
 
 Transcriber's note: Facsimile of Title page of Comus follows:
 
                             A MASKE
                            PRESENTED
                        At Ludlow Castle,
                              1634:
 
                 On Michalemasse night, before the
                         RIGHT HONORABLE,
           IOHN Earle of Bridgewater, Viscount Brackly,
               Lord President of WALES, and one of
                  His MAIESTIES most honorable
                         Privie Counsell.
 
   ------------------------------------------------------------
      Eheu quid volui misero mihi! floribus austrum
      Perditus ------------------
   ------------------------------------------------------------
 
                             LONDON
                  Printed for HYMPHREY ROBINSON
              at the signe of the Three Pidgeons in
                    Pauls Church-yard.  1637.
 
 
 
 
 To the Right Honourable, John Lord Vicount Bracly, Son and
   Heir apparent to the Earl of Bridgewater, &c.
 
 
   My LORD,
 
   This Poem, which receiv'd its first occasion of Birth from your
   Self, and others of your Noble Family, and much honour from
   your own Person in the performance, now returns again to
   make a finall Dedication of it self to you.  Although not openly
   acknowledg'd by the Author, yet it is a legitimate off-spring, so
   lovely, and so much desired, that the often Copying of it hath
   tired my Pen to give my several friends satisfaction, and brought
   me to a necessity of producing it to the publike view; and now
   to offer it up in all rightfull devotion to those fair Hopes, and
   rare endowments of your much-promising Youth, which give a
   full assurance, to all that know you, of a future excellence.  Live
   sweet Lord to be the honour of your Name, and receive this as
   your own, from the hands of him, who hath by many favours
   been long oblig'd to your most honour'd Parents, and as in this
   representation your attendant Thyrsis, so now in all reall
   expression
 
   Your faithfull, and most humble Servant
 
   H. LAWES.
 
 
   Note: Dedication to Vicount Bracly: Omitted in 1673.
 
 
 
 
 The Copy of a Letter writt'n by Sir HENRY WOOTTON, to
   the Author, upon the following Poem.
 
 
   From the Colledge, this 13. of April, 1638.
 
   SIR,
   It was a special favour, when you lately bestowed upon me
   here, the first taste of your acquaintance, though no longer then
   to make me know that I wanted more time to value it, and  to
   enjoy it rightly; and in truth, if  I could then have imagined your
   farther stay in these parts, which I understood afterwards by
   Mr. H. I would have been bold in our vulgar phrase to mend my
   draught (for you left me with an extreme thirst) and to have
   begged your conversation again, joyntly with your said learned
   Friend, at a poor meal or two, that we might have banded
   together som good Authors of the antient time: Among which, I
   observed you to have been familiar.
 
   Since your going, you have charg'd me with new Obligations,
   both for a very kinde Letter from you dated the sixth of this
   Month, and for a dainty peece of entertainment which came
   therwith.  Wherin I should much commend the Tragical part, if
   the Lyrical did not ravish me with a certain Dorique delicacy in
   your Songs and Odes, wherunto I must plainly confess to have
   seen yet nothing parallel in our Language: Ipsa mollities.
   But I must not omit to tell you, that I now onely owe you
   thanks for intimating unto me (how modestly soever) the true
   Artificer. For the work it self I had view'd som good while
   before, with singular delight, having receiv'd it from our
   common Friend Mr. R. in the very close of the late R's Poems,
   Printed at Oxford, wherunto it was added (as I now suppose)
   that the Accessory might help out the Principal, according to
   the Art of Stationers, and to leave the Reader Con la bocca
   dolce.
 
   Now Sir, concerning your travels, wherin I may challenge a
   little more priviledge of Discours with you; I suppose you will
   not blanch Paris in your way; therfore I have been bold to
   trouble you with a few lines to Mr. M. B. whom you shall easily
   find attending the young Lord S. as his Governour, and you
   may surely receive from him good directions for the shaping of
   your farther journey into Italy, where he did reside by my choice
   som time for the King, after mine own recess from Venice.
 
   I should think that your best Line will be thorow the whole
   length of France to Marseilles, and thence by Sea to Genoa,
   whence the passage into Tuscany is as Diurnal as a Gravesend
   Barge: I hasten as you do to Florence, or Siena, the rather tell
   you a short story from the interest you have given me in your
   safety.
 
   At Siena I was tabled in the House of one Alberto Scipioni, an
   old Roman Courtier in dangerous times, having bin Steward to
   the Duca di Pagliano, who with all his Family were strangled
   save this onely man that escap'd by foresight of the Tempest:
   With him I  had often much chat of those affairs; Into which he
   took pleasure to look back from his Native Harbour: and at my
   departure toward Rome (which had been the center of    his
   experience) I had wonn confidence enough to beg his advice,
   how I might carry my self securely there, without offence of
   mine own conscience.  Signor Arrigo mio (sayes he) I pensieri
   stretti, & il viso sciolto, will go safely over the whole World: Of
   which Delphian Oracle (for so I have found it) your judgement
   doth need no commentary; and therfore (Sir) I will commit you
   with it to the best of all securities, Gods dear love, remaining
 
   Your Friend as much at command as any of longer date,
 
   Henry Wootton.
 
   Postscript.
 
   SIR, I have expressly sent this my Foot-boy to prevent your
   departure without som acknowledgement from me of the
   receipt of your obliging Letter, having myself through som
   busines, I know not how, neglected the ordinary conveyance.
   In any part where I shall understand you fixed, I shall be glad,
   and diligent to entertain you with Home-Novelties; even for
   som fomentation of our friendship, too soon interrupted in the
   Cradle.
 
   Note: Letter from Sir Henry Wootton: Omitted in 1673
 
 
 
 
 A MASK PRESENTED At LUDLOW-Castle, 1634. &c.
 
 
   The Persons.
 
   The attendant Spirit afterwards in the habit of Thyrsis.
   Comus with his crew.
   The Lady.
   1. Brother.
   2. Brother.
   Sabrina the Nymph.
 
   The cheif persons which presented, were
   The Lord Bracly.
   Mr. Thomas Egerton his Brother,
   The Lady Alice Egerton.
 
 
   The first Scene discovers a wilde Wood.
 
   The attendant Spirit descends or enters.
 
   Spir: Before the starry threshold of Joves Court
   My mansion is, where those immortal shapes
   Of bright aereal Spirits live insphear'd
   In Regions milde of calm and serene Ayr,
   Above the smoak and stirr of this dim spot,
   Which men call Earth, and with low-thoughted care
   Confin'd, and pester'd in this pin-fold here,
   Strive to keep up a frail, and Feaverish being
   Unmindfull of the crown that Vertue gives
   After this mortal change, to her true Servants                       10
   Amongst the enthron'd gods on Sainted seats.
   Yet som there he that by due steps aspire
   To lay their just hands on that Golden Key
   That ope's the Palace of Eternity:
   To such my errand is, and but for such,
   I would not soil these pure Ambrosial weeds,
   With the rank vapours of this Sin-worn mould.
   But to my task.  Neptune besides the sway
   Of every salt Flood, and each ebbing Stream,
   Took in by lot 'twixt high, and neather Jove,                        20
   Imperial rule of all the Sea-girt Iles
   That like to rich, and various gemms inlay
   The unadorned boosom of the Deep,
   Which he to grace his tributary gods
   By course commits to severall government,
   And gives them leave to wear their Saphire crowns,
   And weild their little tridents, but this Ile
   The greatest, and the best of all the main
   He quarters to his blu-hair'd deities,
   And all this tract that fronts the falling Sun                       30
   A noble Peer of mickle trust, and power
   Has in his charge, with temper'd awe to guide
   An old, and haughty Nation proud in Arms:
   Where his fair off-spring nurs't in Princely lore,
   Are coming to attend their Fathers state,
   And new-entrusted Scepter, but their way
   Lies through the perplex't paths of this drear Wood,
   The nodding horror of whose shady brows
   Threats the forlorn and wandring Passinger.
   And here their tender age might suffer perill,                       40
   But that by quick command from Soveran Jove
   I was dispatcht for their defence, and guard;
   And listen why, for I will tell ye now
   What never yet was heard in Tale or Song
   From old, or modern Bard in Hall, or Bowr.
   Bacchus that first from out the purple Grape,
   Crush't the sweet poyson of mis-used Wine
   After the Tuscan Mariners transform'd
   Coasting the Tyrrhene shore, as the winds listed,
   On Circes Hand fell (who knows not Circe                             50
   The daughter of the Sun?  Whose charmed Cup
   Whoever tasted, lost his upright shape,
   And downward fell into a groveling Swine)
   This Nymph that gaz'd upon his clustring locks,
   With Ivy berries wreath'd, and his blithe youth,
   Had by him, ere he parted thence, a Son
   Much like his Father, but his Mother more,
   Whom therfore she brought up and Comus named,
   Who ripe, and frolick of his full grown age,
   Roving the Celtic, and Iberian fields,                               60
   At last betakes him to this ominous Wood,
   And in thick shelter of black shades imbowr'd,
   Excells his Mother at her mighty Art,
   Offring to every weary Travailer,
   His orient liquor in a Crystal Glasse,
   To quench the drouth of Phoebus, which as they taste
   (For most do taste through fond intemperate thirst )
   Soon as the Potion works,  their human count'nance,
   Th' express resemblance of the gods, is chang'd
   Into som brutish form of Woolf, or Bear,                             70
   Or Ounce, or Tiger, Hog, or bearded Goat,
   All other parts remaining as they were,
   And they, so perfect is their misery,
   Not once perceive their foul disfigurement,
   But boast themselves more comely then before
   And all their friends, and native home forget
   To roule with pleasure in a sensual stie.
   Therfore when any favour'd of high Jove,
   Chances to pass through this adventrous glade,
   Swift as the Sparkle of a glancing Star,                             80
   I shoot from Heav'n to give him safe convoy,
   As now I do: But first I must put off
   These my skie robes spun out of Iris Wooff,
   And take the Weeds and likenes of a Swain,
   That to the service of this house belongs,
   Who with his soft Pipe, and smooth-dittied Song,
   Well knows to still the wilde winds when they roar,
   And hush the waving Woods, nor of lesse faith,
   And in this office of his Mountain watch,
   Likeliest, and neerest to the present ayd                            90
   Of this occasion.  But I hear the tread
   Of hatefull steps, I must be viewles now.
 
   Comus enters with a Charming Rod in one hand, his Glass in
   the other, with him a rout of monsters, headed like sundry sorts
   of wilde Beasts, but otherwise like Men and Women, their
   Apparel glistring, they come in making a riotous and unruly
   noise, with Torches in their hands.
 
   Co: The Star that bids the Shepherd fold,
   Now the top of Heav'n doth hold,
   And the gilded Car of Day,
   His glowing Axle doth allay
   In the steep Atlantick stream,
   And the slope Sun his upward beam
   Shoots against the dusky Pole,
   Pacing toward the other gole                                        100
   Of his Chamber in the East.
   Meanwhile welcom Joy, and Feast,
   Midnight shout, and revelry,
   Tipsie dance, and Jollity.
   Braid your Locks with rosie Twine
   Dropping odours, dropping Wine.
   Rigor now is gon to bed,
   And Advice with scrupulous head,
   Strict Age, and sowre Severity,
   With their grave Saws in slumber ly.                               110
   We that are of purer fire
   Imitate the Starry Quire,
   Who in their nightly watchfull Sphears,
   Lead in swift round the Months and Years.
   The Sounds, and Seas with all their finny drove
   Now to the Moon in wavering Morrice move,
   And on the Tawny Sands and Shelves,
   Trip the pert Fairies and the dapper Elves;
   By dimpled Brook, and Fountain brim,
   The Wood-Nymphs deckt with Daisies trim,                            120
   Their merry wakes and pastimes keep:
   What hath night to do with sleep?
   Night hath better sweets to prove,
   Venus now wakes, and wak'ns Love.
   Com let us our rights begin,
   'Tis onely day-light that makes Sin
   Which these dun shades will ne're report.
   Hail Goddesse of Nocturnal sport
   Dark vaild Cotytto, t' whom the secret flame
   Of mid-night Torches burns; mysterious Dame                        130
   That ne're art call'd, but when the Dragon woom
   Of Stygian darknes spets her thickest gloom,
   And makes one blot of all the ayr,
   Stay thy cloudy Ebon chair,
   Wherin thou rid'st with Hecat', and befriend
   Us thy vow'd Priests, til utmost end
   Of all thy dues be done, and none left out,
   Ere the blabbing Eastern scout,
   The nice Morn on th' Indian steep
   From her cabin'd loop hole peep,                                    140
   And to the tel-tale Sun discry
   Our conceal'd Solemnity.
   Com, knit hands, and beat the ground,
   In a light fantastick round.
 
   The Measure.
 
   Break off; break off, I feel the different pace,
   Of som chast footing neer about this ground.
   Run to your shrouds, within these Brakes and Trees,
   Our number may affright: Som Virgin sure
   (For so I can distinguish by mine Art)
   Benighted in these Woods.  Now to my charms,                        150
   And to my wily trains, I shall e're long
   Be well stock't with as fair a herd as graz'd
   About my Mother Circe.  Thus I hurl
   My dazling Spells into the spungy ayr,
   Of power to cheat the eye with blear illusion,
   And give it false presentments, lest the place
   And my quaint habits breed astonishment,
   And put the Damsel to suspicious flight,
   Which must not be, for that's against my course;
   I under fair pretence of friendly ends,                             160
   And well plac't words of glozing courtesie
   Baited with reasons not unplausible
   Wind me into the easie-hearted man,
   And hugg him into snares.  When once her eye
   Hath met the vertue of this Magick dust,
   I shall appear som harmles Villager
   Whom thrift keeps up about his Country gear,
   But here she comes, I fairly step aside,
   And hearken, if I may, her busines here.
 
   The Lady enters.
 
   La: This way the noise was, if mine ear be true,                    170
   My best guide now, me thought it was the sound
   Of Riot, and ill manag'd Merriment,
   Such as the jocond Flute, or gamesom Pipe
   Stirs up among the loose unleter'd Hinds,
   When for their teeming Flocks, and granges full
   In wanton dance they praise the bounteous Pan,
   And thank the gods amiss.  I should be loath
   To meet the rudenesse, and swill'd insolence
   of such late Wassailers; yet O where els
   Shall I inform my unacquainted feet                                 180
   In the blind mazes of this tangl'd Wood?
   My Brothers when they saw me wearied out
   With this long way, resolving here to lodge
   Under the spreading favour of these Pines,
   Stept as they se'd to the next Thicket side
   To bring me Berries, or such cooling fruit
   As the kind hospitable Woods provide.
   They left me then, when the gray-hooded Eev'n
   Like a sad Votarist in Palmers weed
   Rose from the hindmost wheels of Phoebus wain.                      190
   But where they are, and why they came not back,
   Is now the labour of my thoughts, 'tis likeliest
   They had ingag'd their wandring steps too far,
   And envious darknes, e're they could return,
   Had stole them from me, els O theevish Night
   Why shouldst thou, but for som fellonious end,
   In thy dark lantern thus close up the Stars,
   That nature hung in Heav'n, and fill'd their Lamps
   With everlasting oil, to give due light
   To the misled and lonely Travailer?                                 200
   This is the place as well as I may guess,
   Whence eev'n now the tumult of loud Mirth
   Was rife and perfect in my list'ning ear,
   Yet nought but single darknes do I find.
   What might this be? A thousand fantasies
   Begin to throng into my memory
   Of calling shapes, and beckning shadows dire,
   And airy tongues, that syllable mens names
   On Sands and Shoars and desert Wildernesses.
   These thoughts may startle well, but not astound                    210
   The vertuous mind that ever walks attended
   By a strong siding champion Conscience.--
   O welcom pure-ey'd Faith, white-handed Hope,
   Thou hovering Angel girt with golden wings.
   And thou unblemish't form of Chastity,
   I see ye visibly and now beleeve
   That he, the Supreme good t'whom all things ill
   Are but as slavish  officers of vengeance,
   Would send a glistring Guardian if need were
   To keep my life and honour unassail'd.                              220
   Was I deceiv'd, or did a sable cloud
   Turn forth her silver lining on the night?
   I did not err, there does a sable cloud
   Turn forth her silver lining on the night,
   And casts a gleam over this tufted Grove.
   I cannot hallow to my Brothers, but
   Such noise as I can make to be heard farthest
   Ile venter, for my new enliv'nd spirits
   Prompt me; and they perhaps are not far off.
 
   SONG.
 
   Sweet Echo, sweetest Nymph that liv'st unseen                       230
   Within thy airy shell
   By slow Meander's margent green,
   And in the violet imbroider'd vale
   Where the love-lorn Nightingale
   Nightly to thee her sad Song mourneth well.
   Canst thou not tell me of a gentle Pair
   That likest thy Narcissus are?
   O if thou have
   Hid them in som flowry Cave,
   Tell me but where                                                   240
   Sweet Queen of  Parly, Daughter of the Sphear,
   So maist thou be translated to the skies,
   And give resounding grace to all Heav'ns Harmonies.
 
   Co: Can any mortal mixture of Earths mould
   Breath such Divine inchanting ravishment?
   Sure somthing holy lodges in that brest,
   And with these raptures moves the vocal air
   To testifie his hidd'n residence;
   How sweetly did they float upon the wings
   Of silence, through the empty-vaulted night                         250
   At every fall smoothing the Raven doune
   Of darknes till it smil'd: I have oft heard
   My mother Circe with the Sirens three,
   Amid'st the flowry-kirtl'd Naiades
   Culling their Potent hearbs, and balefull drugs.
   Who as they sung, would take the prison'd soul,
   And lap it in Elysium, Scylla wept,
   And chid her barking waves into attention.
   And fell Charybdis murmur'd soft applause:
   Yet they in pleasing slumber lull'd the sense,                      260
   And in sweet madnes rob'd it of it self,
   But such a sacred, and home-felt delight,
   Such sober certainty of waking bliss
   I never heard till now.  Ile speak to her
   And she shall be my Queen.  Hail forren wonder
   Whom certain these rough shades did never breed
   Unlesse the Goddes that in rurall shrine
   Dwell'st here with Pan, or Silvan, by blest Song
   Forbidding every bleak unkindly Fog
   To touch the prosperous growth of this tall Wood.                   270
 
   La: Nay gentle Shepherd ill is lost that praise
   That is addrest to unattending Ears,
   Not any boast of skill, but extreme shift
   How to regain my sever'd company
   Compell'd me to awake the courteous Echo
   To give me answer from her mossie Couch.
 
   Co: What chance good Lady hath bereft you thus?
 
   La: Dim darknes, and this heavy Labyrinth.
 
   Co: Could that divide you from neer-ushering guides?
 
   La: They left me weary on a grassie terf.                           280
 
   Co: By falshood, or discourtesie, or why?
 
   La: To seek in vally som cool friendly Spring.
 
   Co: And left your fair side all unguarded Lady?
 
   La: They were but twain, and purpos'd quick return.
 
   Co: Perhaps fore-stalling night prevented them.
 
   La: How easie my misfortune is to hit!
 
   Co:  Imports their loss, beside the present need?
 
   La:  No less then if I should my brothers loose.
 
   Co: Were they of manly prime, or youthful bloom?
 
   La:  As smooth as Hebe's their unrazor'd lips.                      290
 
   Co: Two such I saw, what time the labour'd Oxe
   In his loose traces from the furrow came,
   And the swink't hedger at his Supper sate;
   I saw them under a green mantling vine
   That crawls along the side of yon small hill,
   Plucking ripe clusters from the tender shoots,
   Their port was more then human, as they stood;
   I took it for a faery vision
   Of som gay creatures of the element
   That in the colours of the Rainbow live                             300
   And play i'th plighted clouds.  I was aw-strook,
   And as I past, I worshipt: if those you seek
   It were a journey like the path to Heav'n,
   To help you find them.  La:  Gentle villager
   What readiest way would bring me to that place?
 
   Co:  Due west it rises from this shrubby point.
 
   La: To find out that, good Shepherd, I suppose,
   In such a scant allowance of Star-light,
   Would overtask the best Land-Pilots art,
   Without the sure guess of well-practiz'd feet,                      310
 
   Co: I know each lane, and every alley green
   Dingle, or bushy dell of this wilde Wood,
   And every bosky bourn from side to side
   My daily walks and ancient neighbourhood,
   And if your stray attendance be yet lodg'd,
   Or shroud within these limits, I shall know
   Ere morrow wake, or the low roosted lark
   From her thatch't pallat rowse, if otherwise
   I can conduct you Lady to a low
   But loyal cottage, where you may be safe                            320
   Till further quest.
                       La: Shepherd I take thy word,
   And trust thy honest offer'd courtesie,
   Which oft is sooner found in lowly sheds
   With smoaky rafters, then in tapstry Halls
   And Courts of Princes, where it first was nam'd,
   And yet is most pretended: In a place
   Less warranted then this, or less secure
   I cannot be, that I should fear to change it.
   Eie me blest Providence, and square my triall
   To my proportion'd strength.  Shepherd lead on.--                   330
 
   The Two Brothers.
 
   Eld. Bro: Unmuffle ye faint stars, and thou fair Moon
   That wontst to love the travailers benizon,
   Stoop thy pale visage through an amber cloud,
   And disinherit Chaos, that raigns here
   In double night of darknes, and of shades;
   Or if your influence be quite damm'd up
   With black usurping mists, som gentle taper
   Though a rush Candle from the wicker hole
   Of som clay habitation visit us
   With thy long levell'd rule of streaming light.                     340
   And thou shalt be our star of Arcady,
   Or Tyrian Cynosure.
                       2. Bro: Or if our eyes
   Be barr'd that happines, might we but hear
   The folded flocks pen'd in their watled cotes,
   Or sound of pastoral reed with oaten stops,
   Or whistle from the Lodge, or village cock
   Count the night watches to his feathery Dames,
   'Twould be som solace yet, som little chearing
   In this close dungeon of innumerous bowes.
   But O that haples virgin our lost sister                            350
   Where may she wander now, whether betake her
   From the chill dew, amongst rude burrs and thistles?
   Perhaps som cold bank is her boulster now
   Or 'gainst the rugged bark of som broad Elm
   Leans her unpillow'd head fraught with sad fears.
   What if in wild amazement, and affright,
   Or while we speak within the direfull grasp
   Of Savage hunger, or of Savage heat?
 
   Eld. Bro: Peace brother, be not over-exquisite
   To cast the fashion of uncertain evils;                             360
   For grant they be so, while they rest unknown,
   What need a man forestall his date of grief
   And run to meet what he would most avoid?
   Or if they be but false alarms of Fear,
   How bitter is such self delusion?
   I do not think my sister so to seek,
   Or so unprincipl'd in vertues book,
   And the sweet peace that goodnes boosoms ever,
   As that the single want of light and noise
   (Not being in danger, as I trust she is not)                        370
   Could stir the constant mood of her calm thoughts,
   And put them into mis-becoming plight.
   Vertue could see to do what vertue would
   By her own radiant light, though Sun and Moon
   Were in the salt sea sunk.  And Wisdoms self
   Oft seeks to sweet retired Solitude,
   Where with her best nurse Contemplation
   She plumes her feathers and lets grow her wings
   That in the various bustle of resort
   Were all too ruffled and sometimes impaired.                        380
   He that has light within his own deer brest
   May sit i'th center, and enjoy bright day,
   But he that hides a dark soul, and foul thoughts
   Benighted walks under the mid-day Sun;
   Himself is his own dungeon.
 
   2. Bro: Tis most true
   That musing meditation most affects
   The pensive secrecy of desert cell,
   Far from the cheerfull haunt of men, and herds,
   And sits as safe as in a Senat house,
   For who would rob a Hermit of his Weeds,                            390
   His few Books, or his Beads, or Maple Dish,
   Or do his gray hairs any violence?
   But beauty like the fair Hesperian Tree
   Laden with blooming gold, had need the guard
   Of dragon watch with uninchanted eye,
   To save her blossoms, and defend her fruit
   From the rash hand of bold Incontinence.
   You may as well spred out the unsun'd heaps
   Of Misers treasure by an out-laws den,
   And tell me it is safe, as bid me hope                              400
   Danger will wink on Opportunity,
   And let a single helpless maiden pass
   Uninjur'd in this wilde surrounding wast.
   Of night, or lonelines it recks me not,
   I fear the dred events that dog them both,
   Lest som ill greeting touch attempt the person
   Of our unowned sister.
 
   Eld. Bro: I do not, brother,
   Inferr, as if I thought my sisters state
   Secure without all doubt, or controversie:
   Yet where an equall poise of hope and fear                          410
   Does arbitrate th'event, my nature is
   That I encline to hope, rather then fear,
   And gladly banish squint suspicion.
   My sister is not so defenceless left
   As you imagine, she has a hidden strength
   Which you remember not.
 
   2. Bro: What hidden strength,
   Unless the strength of Heav'n, if you mean that?
 
   ELD Bro: I mean that too, but yet a hidden strength
   Which if Heav'n gave it, may be term'd her own:
   'Tis chastity, my brother, chastity:                               420
   She that has that, is clad in compleat steel,
   And like a quiver'd Nymph with Arrows keen
   May trace huge Forests, and unharbour'd Heaths,
   Infamous Hills, and sandy perilous wildes,
   Where through the sacred rayes of Chastity,
   No savage fierce, Bandite, or mountaneer
   Will dare to soyl her Virgin purity,
   Yea there, where very desolation dwels
   By grots, and caverns shag'd with horrid shades,
   She may pass on with unblench't majesty,                            430
   Be it not don in pride, or in presumption.
   Som say no evil thing that walks by night
   In fog, or fire, by lake, or moorish fen,
   Blew meager Hag, or stubborn unlaid ghost,
   That breaks his magick chains at curfeu time,
   No goblin, or swart faery of the mine,
   Hath hurtfull power o're true virginity.
   Do ye beleeve me yet, or shall I call
   Antiquity from the old Schools of Greece
   To testifie the arms of Chastity?                                   440
   Hence had the huntress Dian her dred bow
   Fair silver-shafted Queen for ever chaste,
   Wherwith she tam'd the brinded lioness
   And spotted mountain pard, but set at nought
   The frivolous bolt of Cupid, gods and men
   Fear'd her stern frown, and she was queen oth' Woods.
   What was that snaky-headed Gorgon sheild
   That wise Minerva wore, unconquer'd Virgin,
   Wherwith she freez'd her foes to congeal'd stone?
   But rigid looks of Chast austerity,                                 450
   And noble grace that dash't brute violence
   With sudden adoration, and blank aw.
   So dear to Heav'n is Saintly chastity,
   That when a soul is found sincerely so,
   A thousand liveried Angels lacky her,
   Driving far off each thing of sin and guilt,
   And in cleer dream, and solemn vision
   Tell her of things that no gross ear can hear,
   Till oft convers with heav'nly habitants
   Begin to cast a beam on th'outward shape,                           460
   The unpolluted temple of the mind.
   And turns it by degrees to the souls essence,
   Till all be made immortal: but when lust
   By unchaste looks, loose gestures, and foul talk,
   But most by leud and lavish act of sin,
   Lets in defilement to the inward parts,
   The soul grows clotted by contagion,
   Imbodies, and imbrutes, till she quite loose
   The divine property of her first being.
   Such are those thick and gloomy shadows damp                        470
   Oft seen in Charnell vaults, and Sepulchers
   Lingering, and sitting by a new made grave,
   As loath to leave the body that it lov'd,
   And link't it self by carnal sensualty
   To a degenerate and degraded state.
 
   2. Bro: How charming is divine Philosophy!
   Not harsh, and crabbed as dull fools suppose,
   But musical as is Apollo's lute,
   And a perpetual feast of nectar'd sweets,
   Where no crude surfet raigns.
                                 Eld. Bro: List, list, I hear          480
   Som far off hallow break the silent Air.
 
   2.  Bro: Me thought so too; what should it be?
 
   Eld. Bro: For certain
   Either som one like us night-founder'd here,
   Or els som neighbour Wood-man, or at worst,
   Som roaving robber calling to his fellows.
 
   2. Bro: Heav'n keep my sister, agen agen and neer,
   Best draw, and stand upon our guard.
 
   Eld. Bro: Ile hallow,
   If he be friendly he comes well, if not,
   Defence is a good cause, and Heav'n be for us.
 
   [Enter] The attendant Spirit habited like a Shepherd.
 
   That hallow I should know, what are you? speak;                     490
   Com not too neer, you fall on iron stakes else.
 
   Spir: What voice is that, my young Lord? speak agen.
 
   2. Bro: O brother, 'tis my father Shepherd sure.
 
   Eld. Bro: Thyrsis? Whose artful strains have oft delaid
   The huddling brook to hear his madrigal,
   And sweeten'd every muskrose of the dale,
   How cam'st thou here good Swain? hath any ram
   Slip't from the fold, or young Kid lost his dam,
   Or straggling weather the pen't flock forsook?
   How couldst thou find this dark sequester'd nook?                   500
 
   Spir: O my lov'd masters heir, and his next joy,
   I came not here on such a trivial toy
   As a stray'd Ewe, or to pursue the stealth
   Of pilfering Woolf, not all the fleecy wealth
   That doth enrich these Downs, is worth a thought
   To this my errand, and the care it brought.
   But O my Virgin Lady, where is she?
   How chance she is not in your company?
 
   Eld. Bro: To tell thee sadly Shepherd, without blame
   Or our neglect, we lost her as we came.                             510
 
   Spir: Ay me unhappy then my fears are true.
 
   Eld. Bro: What fears good Thyrsis? Prethee briefly shew.
 
   Spir: Ile tell ye, 'tis not vain or fabulous,
   (Though so esteem'd by shallow ignorance)
   What the sage Poets taught by th' heav'nly Muse,
   Storied of old in high immortal vers
   Of dire Chimera's and inchanted Iles,
   And rifted Rocks whose entrance leads to hell,
   For such there be, but unbelief is blind.
   Within the navil of this hideous Wood,                              520
   Immur'd in cypress shades a Sorcerer dwels
   Of Bacchus, and of Circe born, great Comus,
   Deep skill'd in all his mothers witcheries,
   And here to every thirsty wanderer,
   By sly enticement gives his banefull cup,
   With many murmurs mixt, whose pleasing poison
   The visage quite transforms of him that drinks,
   And the inglorious likenes of a beast
   Fixes instead, unmoulding reasons mintage
   Character'd in the Face; this have I learn't                        530
   Tending my flocks hard by i'th hilly crofts,
   That brow this bottom glade, whence night by night
   He and his monstrous rout are heard to howl
   Like stabl'd wolves, or tigers at their prey,
   Doing abhorred rites to Hecate
   In their obscured haunts of inmost bowres.
   Yet have they many baits, and guilefull spells
   To inveigle and invite th' unwary sense
   Of them that pass unweeting by the way.
   This evening late by then the chewing flocks                        540
   Had ta'n their supper on the savoury Herb
   Of Knot-grass dew-besprent, and were in fold,
   I sate me down to watch upon a bank
   With Ivy canopied, and interwove
   With flaunting Hony-suckle, and began
   Wrapt in a pleasing fit of melancholy
   To meditate my rural minstrelsie,
   Till fancy had her fill, but ere a close
   The wonted roar was up amidst the Woods,
   And fill'd the Air with barbarous dissonance,                       550
   At which I ceas' t, and listen'd them a while,
   Till an unusuall stop of sudden silence
   Gave respit to the drowsie frighted steeds
   That draw the litter of close-curtain'd sleep.
   At last a soft and solemn breathing sound
   Rose like a steam of rich distill'd Perfumes,
   And stole upon the Air, that even Silence
   Was took e're she was ware, and wish't she might
   Deny her nature, and be never more
   Still to be so displac't.  I was all eare,                          560
   And took in strains that might create a soul
   Under the ribs of Death, but O ere long
   Too well I did perceive it was the voice
   Of my most honour'd Lady, your dear sister.
   Amaz'd I stood, harrow'd with grief and fear,
   And O poor hapless Nightingale thought I,
   How sweet thou sing'st, how neer the deadly snare!
   Then down the Lawns I ran with headlong hast
   Through paths, and turnings oft'n trod by day,
   Till guided by mine ear I found the place                           570
   Where that damn'd wisard hid in sly disguise
   (For so by certain signes I knew) had met
   Already, ere my best speed could praevent,
   The aidless innocent Lady his wish't prey,
   Who gently ask't if he had seen such two,
   Supposing him som neighbour villager;
   Longer I durst not stay, but soon I guess't
   Ye were the two she mean't, with that I sprung
   Into swift flight, till I had found you here,
   But furder know I not.
                         2. Bro: O night and shades,                   580
   How are ye joyn'd with hell in triple knot
   Against th'unarmed weakness of one Virgin
   Alone, and helpless!  Is this the confidence
   You gave me Brother?
                        Eld. Bro: Yes, and keep it still,
   Lean on it safely, not a period
   Shall be unsaid for me: against the threats
   Of malice or of sorcery, or that power
   Which erring men call Chance, this I hold firm,
   Vertue may be assail'd, but never hurt,
   Surpriz'd by unjust force, but not enthrall'd,                      590
   Yea even that which mischief meant most harm,
   Shall in the happy trial prove most glory.
   But evil on it self shall back recoyl,
   And mix no more with goodness, when at last
   Gather'd like scum, and setl'd to it self
   It shall be in eternal restless change
   Self-fed, and self-consum'd, if this fail,
   The pillar'd firmament is rott'nness,
   And earths base built on stubble.  But corn let's on.
   Against th' opposing will and arm of Heav'n                         600
   May never this just sword be lifted up,
   But for that damn'd magician, let him be girt
   With all the greisly legions that troop
   Under the sooty flag of Acheron,
   Harpyies and Hydra's, or all the monstrous forms
   'Twixt Africa and Inde, Ile find him out,
   And force him to restore his purchase back,
   Or drag him by the curls, to a foul death,
   Curs'd as his life.
 
   Spir: Alas good ventrous youth,
   I love thy courage yet, and bold Emprise,                           610
   But here thy sword can do thee little stead,
   Farr other arms, and other weapons must
   Be those that quell the might of hellish charms,
   He with his bare wand can unthred thy joynts,
   And crumble all thy sinews.
 
   Eld. Bro: Why prethee Shepherd
   How durst thou then thy self approach so neer
   As to make this relation?
 
   Spir: Care and utmost shifts
   How to secure the lady from surprisal,
   Brought to my mind a certain Shepherd Lad
   Of small regard to see to, yet well skill'd                         620
   In every vertuous plant and healing herb
   That spreds her verdant leaf to th'morning ray,
   He lov'd me well, and oft would beg me sing,
   Which when I did, he on the tender grass
   Would sit, and hearken even to extasie,
   And in requitall ope his leather'n scrip,
   And shew me simples of a thousand names
   Telling their strange and vigorous faculties;
   Amongst the rest a small unsightly root,
   But of divine effect, he cull'd me out;                             630
   The leaf was darkish, and had prickles on it,
   But in another Countrey, as he said,
   Bore a bright golden flowre, but not in this soyl:
   Unknown, and like esteem'd, and the dull swayn
   Treads on it daily with his clouted shoon,
   And yet more med'cinal is it then that Moly
   That Hermes once to wise Ulysses gave;
   He call'd it Haemony, and gave it me,
   And bad me keep it as of sov'ran use
   'Gainst all inchantments, mildew blast, or damp                     640
   Or gastly furies apparition;
   I purs't it up, but little reck'ning made,
   Till now that this extremity compell'd,
   But now I find it true; for by this means
   I knew the foul inchanter though disguis'd,
   Enter'd the very lime-twigs of his spells,
   And yet came off: if you have this about you
   (As I will give you when we go) you may
   Boldly assault the necromancers hall;
   Where if he be, with dauntless hardihood,                           650
   And brandish't blade rush on him, break his glass,
   And shed the lushious liquor on the ground,
   But sease his wand, though he and his curst crew
   Feirce signe of battail make, and menace high,
   Or like the sons of Vulcan vomit smoak,
   Yet will they soon retire, if he but shrink.
 
   Eld. Bro: Thyrsis lead on apace, Ile follow thee,
   And som good angel bear a sheild before us.
 
   The scene changes to a stately Palace, set out with all manner of
   deliciousness; Soft Musick, Tables spred with all dainties.
   Comus appears with his rabble, and the Lady set in an inchanted
   Chair, to whom he offers his Glass, which she puts by, and goes
   about to rise.
 
   COMUS: Nay Lady sit; if I but wave this wand
   Your nerves are all chain'd up in Alablaster,                       660
   And you a statue; or as Daphne was
   Root-bound, that fled Apollo.
 
   La:  Fool do not boast,
   Thou canst not touch the freedom of my minde
   With all thy charms, although this corporal rinde
   Thou haste immanacl'd, while Heav'n sees good.
 
   Co: Why are you vext Lady? why do you frown
   Here dwell no frowns, nor anger, from these gates
   Sorrow flies farr: See here be all the pleasures
   That fancy can beget on youthfull thoughts,
   When the fresh blood grows lively, and returns                      670
   Brisk as the April buds in Primrose-season.
   And first behold this cordial Julep here
   That flames, and dances in his crystal bounds
   With spirits of balm, and fragrant Syrops mixt.
   Not that Nepenthes which the wife of Thone,
   In Egypt gave to Jove-born Helena
   Is of such power to stir up joy as this,
   To life so friendly, or so cool to thirst.
   Why should you be so cruel to your self,
   And to those dainty limms which nature lent                         680
   For gentle usage, and soft delicacy?
   But you invert the cov'nants of her trust,
   And harshly deal like an ill borrower
   With that which you receiv'd on other terms,
   Scorning the unexempt condition
   By which all mortal frailty must subsist,
   Refreshment after toil, ease after pain,
   That have been tir'd all day without repast,
   And timely rest have wanted, but fair Virgin
   This will restore all soon.
 
   La: 'Twill not false traitor,                                       690
   'Twill not restore the truth and honesty
   That thou hast banish't from thy tongue with lies
   Was this the cottage, and the safe abode
   Thou told'st me of? What grim aspects are these
   These oughly-headed Monsters? Mercy guard me!
   Hence with thy brew'd inchantments, foul deceit
   Hast thou betrai'd my credulous innocence
   With visor'd falshood, and base forgery,
   And wouldst thou seek again to trap me here
   With lickerish baits fit to ensnare a brute?                        700
   Were it a draft for Juno when she banquets,
   I would not taste thy treasonous offer; none
   But such as are good men can give good things,
   And that which is not good, is not delicious
   To a well-govern'd and wise appetite.
 
   Co: O foolishnes of men! that lend their ears
   To those budge doctors of the Stoick Furr,
   And fetch their precepts from the Cynick Tub,
   Praising the lean and sallow Abstinence.
   Wherefore did Nature powre her bounties forth,                      710
   With such a full and unwithdrawing hand,
   Covering the earth with odours, fruits, and flocks,
   Thronging the Seas with spawn innumerable,
   But all to please, and sate the curious taste?
   And set to work millions of spinning Worms,
   That in their green shops weave the smooth-hair'd silk
   To deck her Sons, and that no corner might
   Be vacant of her plenty, in her own loyns
   She hutch't th'all-worshipt ore, and precious gems
   To store her children with; if all the world                       720
   Should in a pet of temperance feed on Pulse,
   Drink the clear stream, and nothing wear but Freize,
   Th'all-giver would be unthank't, would be unprais'd,
   Not half his riches known, and yet despis'd,
   And we should serve him as a grudging master,
   As a penurious niggard of his wealth,
   And live like Natures bastards, not her sons,
   Who would be quite surcharged with her own weight,
   And strangl'd with her waste fertility;
   Th'earth cumber'd, and the wing'd air dark't with plumes.           730
   The herds would over-multitude their Lords,
   The Sea o'refraught would swell, and th'unsought diamonds
   Would so emblaze the forhead of the Deep,
   And so bested with Stars, that they below
   Would grow inur'd to light, and com at last
   To gaze upon the Sun with shameless brows.
   List Lady be not coy, and be not cosen'd
   With that same vaunted name Virginity,
   Beauty is natures coyn, must not be hoorded,
   But must be currant, and the good thereof                           740
   Consists in mutual and partak'n bliss,
   Unsavoury in th'injoyment of it self
   If you let slip time, like a neglected rose
   It withers on the stalk with languish't head.
   Beauty is natures brag, and must be shown
   In courts, at feasts, and high solemnities
   Where most may wonder at the workmanship;
   It is for homely features to keep home,
   They had their name thence; course complexions
   And cheeks of sorry grain will serve to ply                         750
   The sampler, and to teize the huswifes wooll.
   What need a vermeil-tinctured lip for that
   Love-darting eyes, or tresses like the Morn?
   There was another meaning in these gifts,
   Think what, and be adviz'd, you are but young yet.
 
   La: I had not thought to have unlockt my lips
   In this unhallow'd air, but that this Jugler
   Would think to charm my judgement, as mine eyes,
   Obtruding false rules pranckt in reasons garb.
   I hate when vice can bolt her arguments,                            760
   And vertue has no tongue to check her pride:
   Impostor do not charge most innocent nature,
   As if she would her children should be riotous
   With her abundance, she good cateress
   Means her provision onely to the good
   That live according to her sober laws,
   And holy dictate of spare Temperance:
   If every just man that now pines with want
   Had but a moderate and heseeming share
   Of that which lewdly-pamper'd Luxury                                770
   Now heaps upon som few with vast excess,
   Natures full blessings would be well dispenc't
   In unsuperfluous eeven proportion,
   And she no whit encomber'd with her store,
   And then the giver would be better thank't,
   His praise due paid, for swinish gluttony
   Ne're looks to Heav'n amidst his gorgeous feast,
   But with besotted base ingratitude
   Cramms, and blasphemes his feeder. Shall I go on?
   Or have I said anough? To him that dares                            780
   Arm his profane tongue with contemptuous words
   Against the Sun-clad power of Chastity,
   Fain would I somthing say, yet to what end?
   Thou hast nor Eare, nor Soul to apprehend
   The sublime notion, and high mystery
   That must be utter'd to unfold the sage
   And serious doctrine of Virginity,
   And thou art worthy that thou shouldst not know
   More happiness then this thy present lot.
   Enjoy your deer Wit, and gay Rhetorick                              790
   That hath so well been taught her dazling fence,
   Thou art not fit to hear thy self convinc't;
   Yet should I try, the uncontrouled worth
   Of this pure cause would kindle my rap't spirits
   To such a flame of sacred vehemence
   That dumb things would be mov'd to sympathize,
   And the brute Earth would lend her nerves, and shake,
   Till all thy magick structures rear'd so high,
   Were shatter'd into heaps o're thy false head.
 
   Co:  She fables not, I feel that I do fear                          800
   Her words set off by som superior power;
   And though not mortal, yet a cold shuddring dew
   Dips me all o're, as when the wrath of Jove
   Speaks thunder, and the chains of Erebus
   To som of Saturns crew.  I must dissemble,
   And try her yet more strongly.  Com, no more,
   This is meer moral babble, and direct
   Against the canon laws of our foundation;
   I must not suffer this, yet 'tis but the lees
   And setlings of a melancholy blood;                                 810
   But this will cure all streight, one sip of this
   Will bathe the drooping spirits in delight
   Beyond the bliss of dreams.  Be wise, and taste.--
 
   The brothers rush in with Swords drawn, wrest his Glass out of
   his hand, and break it against the ground; his rout make signe of
   resistance, but are all driven in; The attendant Spirit comes in.
 
   Spir: What, have you let the false enchanter scape?
   O ye mistook, ye should have snatcht his wand
   And bound him fast; without his rod revers't,
   And backward mutters of dissevering power,
   We cannot free the Lady that sits here
   In stony fetters fixt, and motionless;
   Yet stay, be not disturb'd, now I bethink me                        820
   Som other means I have which may he us'd
   Which once of Meliboeus old I learnt
   The soothest Shepherd that ere pip't on plains.
   There is a gentle Nymph not farr from hence,
   That with moist curb sways the smooth Severn stream,
   Sabrina is her name, a Virgin pure,
   Whilom she was the daughter of Locrine,
   That had the Scepter from his father Brute.
   The guiltless damsel flying the mad pursuit
   Of her enraged stepdam Guendolen,                                   830
   Commended her fair innocence to the flood
   That stay'd her flight with his cross-flowing course,
   The water Nymphs that in the bottom plaid,
   Held up their pearled wrists and took her in,
   Bearing her straight to aged Nereus Hall,
   Who piteous of her woes, rear'd her lank head,
   And gave her to his daughters to imbathe
   In nectar'd lavers strew'd with Asphodil,
   And through the porch and inlet of each sense
   Dropt in Ambrosial Oils till she reviv'd,                           840
   And underwent a quick immortal change
   Made Goddess of the River; still she retains
   Her maid'n gentlenes, and oft at Eeve
   Visits the herds along the twilight meadows,
   Helping all urchin blasts, and ill luck signes
   That the shrewd medling Elfe delights to make,
   Which she with pretious viold liquors heals.
   For which the Shepherds at their festivals
   Carrol her goodnes lowd in rustick layes,
   And throw sweet garland wreaths into her stream                     850
   Of pancies, pinks, and gaudy Daffadils.
   And, as the old Swain said, she can unlock
   The clasping charms, and thaw the numming spell,
   If she be right invok't in warbled Song,
   For maid'nhood she loves, and will be swift
   To aid a Virgin, such as was her self
   In hard besetting need, this will I try
   And adde the power of som adjuring verse.
 
   SONG.
 
   Sabrina fair
   Listen when thou art sitting                                        860
   Under the glassie, cool, translucent wave,
   In twisted braids of Lillies knitting
   The loose train of thy amber-dropping hair,
   Listen for dear honour's sake,
   Goddess of the silver lake,
   Listen and save.
 
   Listen and appear to us
   In name of great Oceanus,
   By the earth-shaking Neptune's mace,
   And Tethys grave majestick pace,                                    870
   By hoary Nereus wrincled look,
   And the Carpathian wisards hook,
   By scaly Tritons winding shell,
   And old sooth-saying Glaucus spell,
   By Leucothea's lovely hands,
   And her son that rules the strands,
   By Thetis tinsel-slipper'd feet,
   And the Songs of Sirens sweet,
   By dead Parthenope's dear tomb,
   And fair Ligea's golden comb,                                       880
   Wherwith she sits on diamond rocks
   Sleeking her soft alluring locks,
   By all the Nymphs that nightly dance
   Upon thy streams with wily glance,
   Rise, rise, and heave thy rosie head
   From thy coral-pav'n bed,
   And bridle in thy headlong wave,
   Till thou our summons answered have.
   Listen and save.
 
   Sabrina rises, attended by water-Nymphes, and sings.
 
   Sab: By the rushy-fringed bank,                                     890
   Where grows the Willow and the Osier dank,
   My sliding Chariot stayes,
   Thick set with Agat, and the azurn sheen
   Of Turkis blew, and Emrauld green
   That in the channell strayes,
   Whilst from off the waters fleet
   Thus I set my printless feet
   O're the Cowslips Velvet head,
   That bends not as I tread,
   Gentle swain at thy request                                         900
   I am here.
 
   Spir: Goddess dear
   We implore thy powerful hand
   To undo the charmed band
   Of true Virgin here distrest,
   Through the force, and through the wile
   Of unblest inchanter vile.
 
   Sab: Shepherd 'tis my office best
   To help insnared chastity;
   Brightest Lady look on me,                                          910
   Thus I sprinkle on thy brest
   Drops that from my fountain pure,
   I have kept of pretious cure,
   Thrice upon thy fingers tip,
   Thrice upon thy rubied lip,
   Next this marble venom'd seat
   Smear'd with gumms of glutenous heat
   I touch with chaste palms moist and cold,
   Now the spell hath lost his hold;
   And I must haste ere morning hour                                   920
   To wait in Amphitrite's bowr.
 
   Sabrina descends, and the Lady rises out of her seat.
 
   Spir: Virgin, daughter of Locrine
   Sprung of old Anchises line,
   May thy brimmed waves for this
   Their full tribute never miss
   From a thousand petty rills,
   That tumble down the snowy hills:
   Summer drouth, or singed air
   Never scorch thy tresses fair,
   Nor wet Octobers torrent flood                                      930
   Thy molten crystal fill with mudd,
   May thy billows rowl ashoar
   The beryl, and the golden ore,
   May thy lofty head be crown'd
   With many a tower and terrass round,
   And here and there thy banks upon
   With Groves of myrrhe, and cinnamon.
 
   Com Lady while Heaven lends us grace,
   Let us fly this cursed place,
   Lest the Sorcerer us intice                                         940
   With som other new device.
   Not a waste, or needless sound
   Till we com to holier ground,
   I shall be your faithfull guide
   Through this gloomy covert wide,
   And not many furlongs thence
   Is your Fathers residence,
   Where this night are met in state
   Many a friend to gratulate
   His wish't presence, and beside                                     950
   All the Swains that there abide,
   With Jiggs, and rural dance resort,
   We shall catch them at their sport,
   And our sudden coming there
   Will double all their mirth and chere;
   Com let us haste, the Stars grow high,
   But night sits monarch yet in the mid sky.
 
   The Scene changes, presenting Ludlow Town and the President
   Castle, then com in Countrey-Dancers, after them the attendant
   Spirit, with the two Brothers and the Lady.
 
   SONG.
 
   Spir: Back Shepherds, back, anough your play,
   Till next Sun-shine holiday,
   Here be without duck or nod                                         960
   Other trippings to be trod
   Of lighter toes, and such Court guise
   As Mercury did first devise
   With the mincing Dryades
   On the Lawns, and on the Leas.
 
   This second Song presents them to their father and mother.
 
   Noble Lord, and Lady bright,
   I have brought ye new delight,
   Here behold so goodly grown
   Three fair branches of your own,
   Heav'n hath timely tri'd their youth.                               970
   Their faith, their patience, and their truth
   And sent them here through hard assays
   With a crown of deathless Praise,
   To triumph in victorious dance
   O're sensual folly, and Intemperance.
 
   The dances ended, the Spirit Epiloguizes.
 
   Spir: To the Ocean now I fly,
   And those happy climes that ly
   Where day never shuts his eye,
   Up in the broad fields of the sky:
   There I suck the liquid ayr                                         980
   All amidst the Gardens fair
   Of Hesperus, and his daughters three
   That sing about the golden tree:
   Along the crisped shades and bowres
   Revels the spruce and jocond Spring,
   The Graces, and the rosie-boosom'd Howres,
   Thither all their bounties bring,
   That there eternal Summer dwels,
   And West winds, with musky wing
   About the cedar'n alleys fling                                      990
   Nard, and Cassia's balmy smels.
   Iris there with humid bow,
   Waters the odorous banks that blow
   Flowers of more mingled hew
   Then her purfl'd scarf can shew,
   And drenches with Elysian dew
   (List mortals, if your ears be true)
   Beds of Hyacinth, and roses
   Where young Adonis oft reposes,
   Waxing well of his deep wound                                      1000
   In slumber soft, and on the ground
   Sadly sits th' Assyrian Queen;
   But far above in spangled sheen
   Celestial Cupid her fam'd son advanc't,
   Holds his dear Psyche sweet intranc't
   After her wandring labours long,
   Till free consent the gods among
   Make her his eternal Bride,
   And from her fair unspotted side
   Two blissful twins are to be born,
   Youth and Joy; so Jove hath sworn.                                 1010
   But now my task is smoothly don,
   I can fly, or I can run
   Quickly to the green earths end,
   Where the bow'd welkin slow doth bend,
   And from thence can soar as soon
   To the corners of the Moon.
   Mortals that would follow me,
   Love vertue, she alone is free,
   She can teach ye how to clime                                      1020
   Higher then the Spheary chime;
   Or if Vertue feeble were,
   Heav'n it self would stoop to her.
 
   Notes:
   43 ye] you  1673
   167 omitted 1673
   168, 9 Thus 1637. Manuscript reads--
   but heere she comes I fairly step aside
   & hearken, if I may, her buisnesse heere.
   1673 reads--
   And hearken, if I may her business hear.
   But here she comes, I fairly step aside.
   474 sensualty] sensuality 1673. Manuscript also reads sensualtie,
   as the metre requires.
   493 father] So also 1673. Manuscript reads father's
   547 meditate] meditate upon 1673
   553 drowsie frighted] Manuscript reads drowsie flighted.
   556 steam] stream 1673
   580 furder] further 1673
   743 In the manuscript, which reads--
   If you let slip time like an neglected rose
   a circle has been drawn round the an, but probably not by Milton.
   780 anough] anow 1673
 
 
 
 
 POEMS ADDED IN THE 1673 EDITION.
 
 
 
 
 ANNO AETATIS 17. ON THE DEATH OF A FAIR INFANT DYING OF A COUGH.
 
 
   I
 
   O FAIREST flower no sooner blown but blasted,
   Soft silken Primrose fading timelesslie,
   Summers chief honour if thou hadst outlasted
   Bleak winters force that made thy blossome drie;
   For he being amorous on that lovely die
   That did thy cheek envermeil, thought to kiss
   But kill'd alas, and then bewayl'd his fatal bliss.
 
   II
 
   For since grim Aquilo his charioter
   By boistrous rape th' Athenian damsel got,
   He thought it toucht his Deitie full neer,                           10
   If likewise he some fair one wedded not,
   Thereby to wipe away th' infamous blot,
   Of long-uncoupled bed, and childless eld,
   Which 'mongst the wanton gods a foul reproach was held.
 
   III
 
   So mounting up in ycie-pearled carr,
   Through middle empire of the freezing aire
   He wanderd long, till thee he spy'd from farr,
   There ended was his quest, there ceast his care
   Down he descended from his Snow-soft chaire,
   But all unwares with his cold-kind embrace                           20
   Unhous'd thy Virgin Soul from her fair hiding place.
 
   IV
 
   Yet art thou not inglorious in thy fate;
   For so Apollo, with unweeting hand
   Whilome did slay his dearly-loved mate
   Young Hyacinth born on Eurotas' strand,
   Young Hyacinth the pride of Spartan land;
   But then transform'd him to a purple flower
   Alack that so to change thee winter had no power.
 
   V
 
   Yet can I not perswade me thou art dead
   Or that thy coarse corrupts in earths dark wombe,                    30
   Or that thy beauties lie in wormie bed,
   Hid from the world in a low delved tombe;
   Could Heav'n for pittie thee so strictly doom?
   O no! for something in thy face did shine
   Above mortalitie that shew'd thou wast divine.
 
   VI
 
   Resolve me then oh Soul most surely blest
   (If so it be that thou these plaints dost hear)
   Tell me bright Spirit where e're thou hoverest
   Whether above that high first-moving Spheare
   Or in the Elisian fields (if such there were.)                       40
   Oh say me true if thou wert mortal wight
   And why from us so quickly thou didst take thy flight.
 
   VII
 
   Wert thou some Starr which from the ruin'd roofe
   Of shak't Olympus by mischance didst fall;
   Which carefull Jove in natures true behoofe
   Took up, and in fit place did reinstall?
   Or did of late earths Sonnes besiege the wall
   Of sheenie Heav'n, and thou some goddess fled
   Amongst us here below to hide thy nectar'd head
 
   VIII
 
   Or wert thou that just Maid who once before                          50
   Forsook the hated earth, O tell me sooth
   And cam'st again to visit us once more?
   Or wert thou that sweet smiling Youth!
   Or that c[r]own'd Matron sage white-robed Truth?
   Or any other of that heav'nly brood
   Let down in clowdie throne to do the world some good.
 
   Note: 53 Or wert thou] Or wert thou Mercy--conjectured by
   John Heskin Ch. Ch. Oxon. from Ode on Nativity, st. 15.
 
   IX
 
   Or wert thou of the golden-winged boast,
   Who having clad thy self in humane weed,
   To earth from thy praefixed seat didst poast,
   And after short abode flie back with speed,                          60
   As if to shew what creatures Heav'n doth breed,
   Thereby to set the hearts of men on fire
   To scorn the sordid world, and unto Heav'n aspire.
 
   X
 
   But oh why didst thou not stay here below
   To bless us with thy heav'n-lov'd innocence,
   To slake his wrath whom sin hath made our foe
   To turn Swift-rushing black perdition hence,
   Or drive away the slaughtering  pestilence,
   To stand 'twixt us and our deserved smart
   But thou canst best perform that office where thou art.              70
 
   XI
 
   Then thou the mother of so sweet a child
   Her false imagin'd loss cease to lament,
   And wisely learn to curb thy sorrows wild;
   Think what a present thou to God hast sent,
   And render him with patience what he lent;
   This if thou do he will an off-spring give,
   That till the worlds last-end shall make thy name to live.
 
 
 
 
 Anno Aetatis 19.  At a Vacation Exercise in the Colledge, part
   Latin, part English. The Latin  speeches ended, the English thus
   began.
 
 
   HAIL native Language, that by sinews weak
   Didst move my first endeavouring tongue to speak,
   And mad'st imperfect words with childish tripps,
   Half unpronounc't, slide through my infant-lipps,
   Driving dum silence from the portal dore,
   Where he had mutely sate two years before:
   Here I salute thee and thy pardon ask,
   That now I use thee in my latter task:
   Small loss it is that thence can come unto thee,
   I know my tongue but little Grace can do thee:                       10
   Thou needst not be ambitious to be first,
   Believe me I have thither packt the worst:
   And, if it happen as I did forecast,
   The daintest dishes shall be serv'd up last.
   I pray thee then deny me not thy aide
   For this same small neglect that I have made:
   But haste thee strait to do me once a Pleasure,
   And from thy wardrope bring thy chiefest treasure;
   Not those new fangled toys, and triming slight
   Which takes our late fantasticks with delight,                       20
   But cull those richest Robes, and gay'st attire
   Which deepest Spirits, and choicest Wits desire:
   I have some naked thoughts that rove about
   And loudly knock to have their passage out;
   And wearie of their place do only stay
   Till thou hast deck't them in thy best aray;
   That so they may without suspect or fears
   Fly swiftly to this fair Assembly's ears;
   Yet I had rather if I were to chuse,
   Thy service in some graver subject use,                              30
   Such as may make thee search thy coffers round
   Before thou cloath my fancy in fit sound:
   Such where the deep transported mind may scare
   Above the wheeling poles, and at Heav'ns dore
   Look in, and see each blissful Deitie
   How he before the thunderous throne doth lie,
   Listening to what unshorn Apollo sings
   To th'touch of golden wires, while Hebe brings
   Immortal Nectar to her Kingly Sire:
   Then passing through the Spherse of watchful fire,                   40
   And mistie Regions of wide air next under,
   And hills of Snow and lofts of piled Thunder,
   May tell at length how green-ey'd Neptune raves,
   In Heav'ns defiance mustering all his waves;
   Then sing of secret things that came to pass
   When Beldam Nature in her cradle was;
   And last of Kings and Queens and Hero's old,
   Such as the wise Demodocus once told
   In solemn Songs at King Alcinous feast,
   While sad Ulisses soul and all the rest                              50
   Are held with his melodious harmonie
   In willing chains and sweet captivitie.
   But fie my wandring Muse how thou dost stray!
   Expectance calls thee now another way,
   Thou know'st it must be now thy only bent
   To keep in compass of thy Predicament:
   Then quick about thy purpos'd business come,
   That to the next I may resign my Roome
 
   Then Ens is represented as Father of the Predicaments his ten
   Sons, whereof the Eldest stood for Substance with his Canons,
   which Ens thus speaking, explains.
 
   Good luck befriend thee Son; for at thy birth
   The Faiery Ladies daunc't upon the hearth;                           60
   Thy drowsie Nurse hath sworn she did them spie
   Come tripping to the Room where thou didst lie;
   And sweetly singing round about thy Bed
   Strew all their blessings on thy sleeping Head.
   She heard them give thee this, that thou should'st still
   From eyes of mortals walk invisible,
   Yet there is something that doth force my fear,
   For once it was my dismal hap to hear
   A Sybil old, bow-bent with crooked age,
   That far events full wisely could presage,
   And in Times long and dark Prospective Glass
   Fore-saw what future dayes should bring to pass,
   Your Son, said she, (nor can you it prevent)
   Shall subject be to many an Accident.
   O're all his Brethren he shall Reign as King,
   Yet every one shall make him underling,
   And those that cannot live from him asunder
   Ungratefully shall strive to keep him under,
   In worth and excellence he shall out-go them,
   Yet being above them, he shall be below them;                        80
   From others he shall stand in need of nothing,
   Yet on his Brothers shall depend for Cloathing.
   To find a Foe it shall not be his hap,
   And peace shall lull him in her flowry lap;
   Yet shall he live in strife, and at his dore
   Devouring war shall never cease to roare;
   Yea it shall be his natural property
   To harbour those that are at enmity.
   What power, what force, what mighty spell, if not
   Your learned hands, can loose this Gordian knot?                     90
 
   The next Quantity and Quality, spake in Prose, then Relation
   was call'd by his Name.
 
   Rivers arise; whether thou be the Son,
   Of utmost Tweed, or Oose, or gulphie Dun,
   Or Trent, who like some earth-born Giant spreads
   His thirty Armes along the indented Meads,
   Or sullen Mole that runneth underneath,
   Or Severn swift, guilty of Maidens death,
   Or Rockie Avon, or of Sedgie Lee,
   Or Coaly Tine, or antient hallowed Dee,
   Or Humber loud that keeps the Scythians Name,
   Or Medway smooth, or Royal Towred Thame.                           100
 
   The rest was Prose.
 
 
 
 
 THE FIFTH ODE OF HORACE. LIB. I.
 
   Quis multa gracilis te puer in Rosa
   Rendred almost word for word without Rhyme according to the
   Latin Measure, as near as the Language permit.
 
   WHAT slender Youth bedew'd with liquid odours
   Courts thee on Roses in some pleasant Cave,
   Pyrrha for whom bind'st thou
   In wreaths thy golden Hair,
   Plain in thy neatness; O how oft shall he
   On Faith and changed Gods complain: and Seas
   Rough with black winds and storms
   Unwonted shall admire:
   Who now enjoyes thee credulous, all Gold,
   Who alwayes vacant, alwayes amiable                                  10
   Hopes thee; of flattering gales
   Unmindfull.  Hapless they
   To whom thou untry'd seem'st fair.  Me in my vow'd
   Picture the sacred wall declares t' have hung
   My dank and dropping weeds
   To the stern God of Sea.
   [The Latin text follows.]
 
 
 
 
 SONNETS.
 
 
   XI
 
   A Book was writ of late call'd Tetrachordon;
   And wov'n close, both matter, form and stile;
   The Subject new: it walk'd the Town a while,
   Numbring good intellects; now seldom por'd on.
   Cries the stall-reader, bless us! what a word on
   A title page is this! and some in file
   Stand spelling fals, while one might walk to Mile-
   End Green.  Why is it harder Sirs then Gordon,
   Colkitto, or Macdonnel, or Galasp?
   Those rugged names to our like mouths grow sleek                     10
   That would have made Quintilian stare and gasp.
   Thy age, like ours, O Soul of Sir John Cheek,
   Hated not Learning wors then Toad or Asp;
   When thou taught'st Cambridge, and King Edward Greek.
 
   Note: Camb. Autograph supplies title, On the Detraction which
   followed my writing certain Treatises.
 
 
   XII. On the same.
 
   I did but prompt the age to quit their cloggs
   By the known rules of antient libertie,
   When strait a barbarous noise environs me
   Of Owles and Cuckoes, Asses, Apes and Doggs.
   As when those Hinds that were transform'd to Froggs
   Raild at Latona's twin-born progenie
   Which after held the Sun and Moon in fee.
   But this is got by casting Pearl to Hoggs;
   That bawle for freedom in their senceless mood,
   And still revolt when truth would set them free.                     10
   Licence they mean when they cry libertie;
   For who loves that, must first be wise and good;
   But from that mark how far they roave we see
   For all this wast of wealth, and loss of blood.
 
 
   XIII
 
   To Mr. H. Lawes, on his Aires.
 
   Harry whose tuneful and well measur'd Song
   First taught our English Musick how to span
   Words with just note and accent, not to scan
   With Midas Ears, committing short and long;
   Thy worth and skill exempts thee from the throng,
   With praise enough for Envy to look wan;
   To after age thou shalt be writ the man,
   That with smooth aire couldst humor best our tongue
   Thou honour'st Verse, and Verse must send her wing
   To honour thee, the Priest of Phoebus Quire                          10
   That tun'st their happiest lines in Hymn or Story
   Dante shall give Fame leave to set thee higher
   Then his Casella, whom he woo'd to sing
   Met in the milder shades of Purgatory.
 
   Note: 9 send] lend  Cambridge Autograph MS.
 
 
   XIV
 
   When Faith and Love which parted from thee never,
   Had ripen'd thy just soul to dwell with God,
   Meekly thou didst resign this earthy load
   Of Death, call'd Life; which us from Life doth sever
   Thy Works and Alms and all thy good Endeavour
   Staid not behind, nor in the grave were trod;
   But as Faith pointed with her golden rod,
   Follow'd thee up to joy and bliss for ever.
   Love led them on, and Faith who knew them best
   Thy hand-maids, clad them o're with purple beams                     10
   And azure wings, that up they flew so drest,
   And speak the truth of thee on glorious Theams
   Before the Judge, who thenceforth bid thee rest
   And drink thy fill of pure immortal streams.
 
   Note: Camb. Autograph supplies title, On the Religious
   Memory of Catherine Thomson, my Christian Friend, deceased
   16 Decemb., 1646.
 
 
   XV
 
   ON THE LATE MASSACHER IN PIEMONT.
 
   Avenge O lord thy slaughter'd Saints, whose bones
   Lie scatter'd on the Alpine mountains cold,
   Ev'n them who kept thy truth so pure of old
   When all our Fathers worship't Stocks and Stones,
   Forget not: in thy book record their groanes
   Who were thy Sheep and in their antient Fold
   Slayn by the bloody Piemontese that roll'd
   Mother with Infant down the Rocks.  Their moans
   The Vales redoubl'd to the Hills, and they
   To Heav'n.  Their martyr'd blood and ashes sow                       10
   O're all th'Italian fields where still doth sway
   The triple Tyrant: that from these may grow
   A hunder'd-fold, who having learnt thy way
   Early may fly the Babylonian wo.
 
 
   XVI
 
 
   When I consider how my light is spent,
   E're half my days, in this dark world and wide,
   And that one Talent which is death to hide,
   Lodg'd with me useless, though my Soul more bent
   To serve therewith my Maker, and present
   My true account, least he returning chide,
   Doth God exact day-labour, light deny'd,
   I fondly ask; But patience to prevent
   That murmur, soon replies, God doth not need
   Either man's work or his own gifts, who best                         10
   Bear his milde yoak, they serve him best, his State
   Is Kingly.  Thousands at his bidding speed
   And post o're Land and Ocean without rest:
   They also serve who only stand and waite.
 
 
   XVII
 
 
   Lawrence of vertuous Father vertuous Son,
   Now that the Fields are dank, and ways are mire,
   Where shall we sometimes meet, and by the fire
   Help wast a sullen day; what may be Won
   From the hard Season gaining: time will run
   On smoother, till Favonius re-inspire
   The frozen earth; and cloth in fresh attire
   The Lillie and Rose, that neither sow'd nor spun.
   What neat repast shall feast us, light and choice,
   Of Attick tast, with Wine, whence we may rise                        10
   To hear the Lute well toucht, or artfull voice
   Warble immortal Notes and Tuskan Ayre?
   He who of those delights can judge, and spare
   To interpose them oft, is not unwise.
 
 
   XVIII
 
 
   Cyriack, whose Grandsire on the Royal Bench
   Of Brittish Themis, with no mean applause
   Pronounc't and in his volumes taught our Lawes,
   Which others at their Barr so often wrench:
   To day deep thoughts resolve with me to drench
   In mirth, that after no repenting drawes;
   Let Euclid rest and Archimedes pause,
   And what the Swede intend, and what the French.
   To measure life, learn thou betimes, and know
   Toward solid good what leads the nearest way;                        10
   For other things mild Heav'n a time ordains,
   And disapproves that care, though wise in show,
   That with superfluous burden loads the day,
   And when God sends a cheerful hour, refrains.
 
 
   XIX
 
 
   Methought I saw my late espoused Saint
   Brought to me like Alcestis from the grave,
   Whom Joves great Son to her glad Husband gave,
   Rescu'd from death by force though pale and faint.
   Mine as whom washt from spot of child-bed taint,
   Purification in the old Law did save,
   And such, as yet once more I trust to have
   Full sight of her in Heaven without restraint,
   Came vested all in white, pure as her mind:
   Her face was vail'd, yet to my fancied sight,                        10
   Love, sweetness, goodness, in her person shin'd
   So clear, as in no face with more delight.
   But O as to embrace me she enclin'd
   I wak'd, she fled, and day brought back my night.
 
 
 
 
 ON THE NEW FORCERS OF CONSCIENCE UNDER THE LONG PARLIAMENT.
 
 
   Because you have thrown of your Prelate Lord,
   And with stiff Vowes renounc'd his Liturgie
   To seise the widdow'd whore Pluralitie
   From them whose sin ye envi'd, not abhor'd,
   Dare ye for this adjure the Civill Sword
   To force our Consciences that Christ set free,
   And ride us with a classic Hierarchy
   Taught ye by meer A. S. and Rotherford?
   Men whose Life, Learning, Faith and pure intent
   Would have been held in high esteem with Paul                        10
   Must now he nam'd and printed Hereticks
   By shallow Edwards and Scotch what d'ye call:
   But we do hope to find out all your tricks,
   Your plots and packing wors then those of Trent,
   That so the Parliament
   May with their wholsom and preventive Shears
   Clip your Phylacteries, though bauk your Ears,
   And succour our just Fears
   When they shall read this clearly in your charge
   New Presbyter is but Old Priest Writ Large.                          20
 
 
   The four following sonnets were not published until 1694, and
   then in a mangled form by Phillips, in his Life of Milton; they
   are here printed from the Cambridge MS., where that to Fairfax
   is in Milton's autograph.
 
 
 
 
 ON THE LORD GEN. FAIRFAX AT THE SEIGE OF COLCHESTER.
 
 
   Fairfax, whose name in armes through Europe rings
   Filling each mouth with envy, or with praise,
   And all her jealous monarchs with amaze,
   And rumors loud, that daunt remotest kings,
   Thy firm unshak'n vertue ever brings
   Victory home, though new rebellions raise
   Their Hydra heads, & the fals North displaies
   Her brok'n league, to impe their serpent wings,
   O yet a nobler task awaites thy hand;
   Yet what can Warr, but endless warr still breed,                     10
   Till Truth, & Right from Violence be freed,
   And Public Faith cleard from the shamefull brand
   Of Public Fraud.  In vain doth Valour bleed
   While Avarice, & Rapine share the land.
 
 
 
 
 TO THE LORD GENERALL CROMWELL MAY 1652.
 
   ON THE PROPOSALLS OF CERTAINE MINISTERS AT THE COMMITTEE FOR
   PROPAGATION OF THE GOSPELL.
 
 
   Cromwell, our cheif of men, who through a cloud
   Not of warr onely, but detractions rude,
   Guided by faith & matchless Fortitude
   To peace & truth thy glorious way hast plough'd,
   And on the neck of crowned Fortune proud
   Hast reard Gods Trophies, & his work pursu'd,
   While Darwen stream with blood of Scotts imbru'd,
   And Dunbarr field resounds thy praises loud,
   And Worsters laureat wreath; yet much remaines
   To conquer still; peace hath her victories                           10
   No less renownd then warr, new foes aries
   Threatning to bind our soules with secular chaines:
   Helpe us to save free Conscience from the paw
   Of hireling wolves whose Gospell is their maw.
 
 
 
 
 TO SR HENRY VANE THE YOUNGER.
 
 
   Vane, young in yeares, but in sage counsell old,
   Then whome a better Senatour nere held
   The helme of Rome, when gownes not armes repelld
   The feirce Epeirot & the African bold,
   Whether to settle peace, or to unfold
   The drift of hollow states, hard to be spelld,
   Then to advise how warr may best, upheld,
   Move by her two maine nerves, Iron & Gold
   In all her equipage: besides to know
   Both spirituall powre & civill, what each meanes                     10
   What severs each thou hast learnt, which few have don
   The bounds of either sword to thee wee ow.
   Therfore on thy firme hand religion leanes
   In peace, & reck'ns thee her eldest son.
 
 
 
 
 TO MR. CYRIACK SKINNER UPON HIS BLINDNESS.
 
 
   Cyriack, this three years day these eys, though clear
   To outward view, of blemish or of spot;
   Bereft of light thir seeing have forgot,
   Nor to thir idle orbs doth sight appear
   Of Sun or Moon or Starre throughout the year,
   Or man or woman.  Yet I argue not
   Against heavns hand or will, nor bate a jot
   Of heart or hope; but still bear up and steer
   Right onward.  What supports me, dost thou ask?
   The conscience, Friend, to have lost them overply'd                  10
   In libertyes defence, my noble task,
   Of which all Europe talks from side to side.
   This thought might lead me through the world's vain mask
   Content though blind, had I no better guide.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. I.  Done into Verse,  1653.
 
 
   BLESS'D is the man who hath not walk'd astray
   In counsel of the wicked, and ith'way
   Of sinners hath not stood, and in the seat
   Of scorners hath not sate.  But in the great
   Jehovahs Law is ever his delight,
   And in his law he studies day and night.
   He shall be as a tree which planted grows
   By watry streams, and in his season knows
   To yield his fruit, and his leaf shall not fall.
   And what he takes in hand shall prosper all.                         10
   Not so the wicked, but as chaff which fann'd
   The wind drives, so the wicked shall not stand
   In judgment, or abide their tryal then
   Nor sinners in th'assembly of just men.
   For the Lord knows th'upright way of the just
   And the way of bad men to ruine must.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. II   Done Aug. 8. 1653. Terzetti.
 
 
   WHY do the Gentiles tumult, and the Nations
   Muse a vain thing, the Kings of th'earth upstand
   With power, and Princes in their Congregations
   Lay deep their plots together through each Land,
   Against the Lord and his Messiah dear.
   Let us break off; say they, by strength of hand
   Their bonds, and cast from us, no more to wear,
   Their twisted cords: he who in Heaven doth dwell
   Shall laugh, the Lord shall scoff them, then severe
   Speak to them in his wrath, and in his fell                          10
   And fierce ire trouble them; but I saith hee
   Anointed have my King (though ye rebell)
   On Sion my holi' hill.  A firm decree
   I will declare; the Lord to me hath say'd
   Thou art my Son I have begotten thee
   This day, ask of me, and the grant is made;
   As thy possession I on thee bestow
   Th'Heathen, and as thy conquest to be sway'd
   Earths utmost bounds: them shalt thou bring full low
   With Iron Sceptir bruis'd, and them disperse                         20
   Like to a potters vessel shiver'd so.
   And now be wise at length ye Kings averse
   Be taught ye Judges of the earth; with fear
   Jehovah serve and let your joy converse
   With trembling;  Kiss the Son least he appear
   In anger and ye perish in the way
   If once his wrath take fire like fuel sere.
   Happy all those who have in him their stay.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. III. Aug. 9. 1653
 
   WHEN HE FLED FROM ABSALOM.
 
 
   LORD how many are my foes
   How many those
   That in arms against me rise
   Many are they
   That of my life distrustfully thus say,
   No help for him in God there lies.
   But thou Lord art my shield my glory,
   Thee through my story
   Th' exalter of my head I count
   Aloud I cry'd                                                        10
   Unto Jehovah, he full soon reply'd
   And heard me from his holy mount.
   I lay and slept, I wak'd again,
   For my sustain
   Was the Lord.  Of many millions
   The populous rout
   I fear not though incamping round about
   They pitch against me their Pavillions.
   Rise Lord, save me my God for thou
   Hast smote ere now                                                   20
   On the cheek-bone all my foes,
   Of men abhor'd
   Hast broke the teeth.  This help was from the Lord;
   Thy blessing on thy people flows.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. IV. Aug. 10.1653.
 
 
   ANSWER me when I call
   God of my righteousness;
   In straights and in distress
   Thou didst me disinthrall
   And set at large; now spare,
   Now pity me, and hear my earnest prai'r.
 
   Great ones how long will ye
   My glory have in scorn
   How long be thus forlorn
   Still to love vanity,                                                10
   To love, to seek, to prize
   Things false and vain and nothing else but lies?
 
   Yet know the Lord hath chose
   Chose to himself a part
   The good and meek of heart
   (For whom to chuse he knows)
   Jehovah from on high
   Will hear my voyce what time to him I crie.
 
   Be aw'd, and do not sin,
   Speak to your hearts alone,                                          20
   Upon your beds, each one,
   And be at peace within.
   Offer the offerings just
   Of righteousness and in Jehovah trust.
 
   Many there be that say
   Who yet will shew us good?
   Talking like this worlds brood;
   But Lord, thus let me pray,
   On us lift up the light
   Lift up the favour of thy count'nance bright.                        30
 
   Into my heart more joy
   And gladness thou hast put
   Then when a year of glut
   Their stores doth over-cloy
   And from their plenteous grounds
   With vast increase their corn and wine abounds.
 
   In peace at once will I
   Both lay me down and sleep
   For thou alone dost keep
   Me safe where ere I lie                                              40
   As in a rocky Cell
   Thou Lord alone in safety mak'st me dwell.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. V. Aug. 12.1653.
 
 
   JEHOVAH to my words give ear
   My meditation waigh
   The voyce of my complaining hear
   My King and God for unto thee I pray.
   Jehovah thou my early voyce
   Shalt in the morning hear
   Ith'morning I to thee with choyce
   Will rank my Prayers, and watch till thou appear.
   For thou art not a God that takes
   In wickedness delight                                                10
   Evil with thee no biding makes
   Fools or mad men stand not within thy sight.
   All workers of iniquity
   Thou wilt destroy that speak a ly
   The bloodi' and guileful man God doth detest.
   But I will in thy mercies dear
   Thy numerous mercies go
   Into thy house; I in thy fear
   Will towards thy holy temple worship low.                            20
   Lord lead me in thy righteousness
   Lead me because of those
   That do observe if I transgress,
   Set thy wayes right before, where my step goes.
   For in his faltring mouth unstable
   No word is firm or sooth
   Their inside, troubles miserable;
   An open grave their throat, their tongue they smooth.
   God, find them guilty, let them fall
   By their own counsels quell'd;                                       30
   Push them in their rebellions all
   Still on; for against thee they have rebell'd;
   Then all who trust in thee shall bring
   Their joy, while thou from blame
   Defend'st them, they shall ever sing
   And shall triumph in thee, who love thy name.
   For thou Jehovah wilt be found
   To bless the just man still,
   As with a shield thou wilt surround
   Him with thy lasting favour and good will.                           40
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. VI  Aug. 13. 1653.
 
 
   LORD in thine anger do not reprehend me
   Nor in thy hot displeasure me correct;
   Pity me Lord for I am much deject
   Am very weak and faint; heal and amend me,
   For all my bones, that even with anguish ake,
   Are troubled, yea my soul is troubled sore
   And thou O Lord how long? turn Lord, restore
   My soul, O save me for thy goodness sake
   For in death no remembrance is of thee;
   Who in the grave can celebrate thy praise?                           10
   Wearied I am with sighing out my dayes.
   Nightly my Couch I make a kind of Sea;
   My Bed I water with my tears; mine Eie
   Through grief consumes, is waxen old and dark
   Ith' mid'st of all mine enemies that mark.
   Depart all ye that work iniquitie.
   Depart from me, for the voice of my weeping
   The Lord hath heard, the Lord hath heard my prai'r
   My supplication with acceptance fair
   The Lord will own, and have me in his keeping.                       20
   Mine enemies shall all be blank and dash't
   With much confusion; then grow red with shame,
   They shall return in hast the way they came
   And in a moment shall be quite abash't.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. VII. Aug.  14. 1653.
 
   UPON THE WORDS OF CHUSH THE BENJAMITE AGAINST HIM.
 
 
   Lord my God to thee I flie
   Save me and secure me under
   Thy protection while I crie
   Least as a Lion (and no wonder)
   He hast to tear my Soul asunder
   Tearing and no rescue nigh.
 
   Lord my God if I have thought
   Or done this, if wickedness
   Be in my hands, if I have wrought
   Ill to him that meant me peace,                                      10
   Or to him have render'd less,
   And fre'd my foe for naught;
 
   Let th'enemy pursue my soul
   And overtake it, let him tread
   My life down to the earth and roul
   In the dust my glory dead,
   In the dust and there out spread
   Lodge it with dishonour foul.
 
   Rise Jehovah in thine ire
   Rouze thy self amidst the rage                                       20
   Of my foes that urge like fire;
   And wake for me, their furi' asswage;
   Judgment here thou didst ingage
   And command which I desire.
 
   So th' assemblies of each Nation
   Will surround thee, seeking right,
   Thence to thy glorious habitation
   Return on high and in their sight.
   Jehovah judgeth most upright
   All people from the worlds foundation.                               30
 
   Judge me Lord, be judge in this
   According to my righteousness
   And the innocence which is
   Upon me: cause at length to cease
   Of evil men the wickedness
   And their power that do amiss.
 
   But the just establish fast,
   Since thou art the just God that tries
   Hearts and reins.  On God is cast
   My defence, and in him lies                                          40
   In him who both just and wise
   Saves th' upright of Heart at last.
 
   God is a just Judge and severe,
   And God is every day offended;
   If th' unjust will not forbear,
   His Sword he whets, his Bow hath bended
   Already, and for him intended
   The tools of death, that waits him near.
 
   (His arrows purposely made he
   For them that persecute.)  Behold                                    50
   He travels big with vanitie,
   Trouble he hath conceav'd of old
   As in a womb, and from that mould
   Hath at length brought forth a Lie.
 
   He dig'd a pit, and delv'd it deep,
   And fell into the pit he made,
   His mischief that due course doth keep,
   Turns on his head, and his ill trade
   Of violence will undelay'd
   Fall on his crown with ruine steep.                                  60
 
   Then will I Jehovah's praise
   According to his justice raise
   And sing the Name and Deitie
   Of Jehovah the most high.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. VIII. Aug. 14. 1653.
 
 
   O JEHOVAH our Lord how wondrous great
   And glorious is thy name through all the earth?
   So as above the Heavens thy praise to set
   Out of the tender mouths of latest bearth,
 
   Out of the mouths of babes and sucklings thou
   Hast founded strength because of all thy foes
   To stint th'enemy, and slack th'avengers brow
   That bends his rage thy providence to oppose.
 
   When I behold thy Heavens, thy Fingers art,
   The Moon and Starrs which thou so bright hast set,                   10
   In the pure firmament, then saith my heart,
   O What is man that thou remembrest yet,
 
   And think'st upon him; or of man begot
   That him thou visit'st and of him art found;
   Scarce to be less then Gods, thou mad'st his lot,
   With honour and with state thou hast him crown'd.
 
   O're the works of thy hand thou mad'st him Lord,
   Thou hast put all under his lordly feet,
   All Flocks, and Herds, by thy commanding word,
   All beasts that in the field or forrest meet.                        20
 
   Fowl of the Heavens, and Fish that through the wet
   Sea-paths in shoals do slide. And know no dearth.
   O Jehovah our Lord how wondrous great
   And glorious is thy name through all the earth.
 
 
 
 
 APRIL, 1648.  J. M. NINE OF THE PSALMS DONE INTO METRE,
 
 Wherein all but what is in a different Character, are the very words of
 the Text, translated from the Original.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. LXXX.
 
 
   1   THOU Shepherd that dost Israel keep
       Give ear in time of need,
       Who leadest like a flock of sheep
       Thy loved Josephs seed,
       That sitt'st between the Cherubs bright
       Between their wings out-spread
       Shine forth, and from thy cloud give light,
       And on our foes thy dread.
   2   In Ephraims view and Benjamins,
       And in Manasse's sight                                           10
       Awake* thy strength, come, and be seen                    *Gnorera.
       To save us by thy might.
   3   Turn us again, thy grace divine
       To us O God vouchsafe;
       Cause thou thy face on us to shine
       And then we shall be safe.
   4   Lord God of Hosts, how long wilt thou,
       How long wilt thou declare
       Thy *smoaking wrath, and angry brow                     *Gnashanta.
       Against thy peoples praire.                                      20
   5   Thou feed'st them with the bread of tears,
       Their bread with tears they eat,
       And mak'st them* largely drink the tears                  *Shalish.
       Wherewith their cheeks are wet.
   6   A strife thou mak'st us and a prey
       To every neighbour foe,
       Among themselves they *laugh, they *play,                *Jilgnagu.
       And *flouts at us they throw.
   7   Return us, and thy grace divine,
       O God of Hosts vouchsafe                                         30
       Cause thou thy face on us to shine,
       And then we shall be safe.
   8   A Vine from Aegypt thou hast brought,
       Thy free love made it thine,
       And drov'st out Nations proud and haut
       To plant this lovely Vine.
   9   Thou did'st prepare for it a place
       And root it deep and fast
       That it began to grow apace,
       And fill'd the land at last.                                     40
   10  With her green shade that cover'd all,
       The Hills were over-spread
       Her Bows as high as Cedars tall
       Advanc'd their lofty head.
   11  Her branches on the western side
       Down to the Sea she sent,
       And upward to that river wide
       Her other branches went.
   12  Why hast thou laid her Hedges low
       And brok'n down her Fence,                                       50
       That all may pluck her, as they go,
       With rudest violence?
   13  The tusked Boar out of the wood
       Up turns it by the roots,
       Wild Beasts there brouze, and make their food
       Her Grapes and tender Shoots.
   14  Return now, God of Hosts, look down
       From Heav'n, thy Seat divine,
       Behold us, but without a frown,
       And visit this thy Vine.                                         60
   15  Visit this Vine, which thy right hand
       Hath set, and planted long,
       And the young branch, that for thy self
       Thou hast made firm and strong.
   16  But now it is consum'd with fire,
       And cut with Axes down,
       They perish at thy dreadfull ire,
       At thy rebuke and frown.
   17  Upon the man of thy right hand
       Let thy good hand be laid,                                       70
       Upon the Son of Man, whom thou
       Strong for thyself hast made.
   18  So shall we not go back from thee
       To wayes of sin and shame,
       Quick'n us thou, then gladly wee
       Shall call upon thy Name.
       Return us, and thy grace divine
       Lord God of Hosts voutsafe,
       Cause thou thy face on us to shine,
       And then we shall be safe.                                       80
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. LXXXI.
 
 
   1   To God our strength sing loud, and clear,
       Sing loud to God our King,
       To Jacobs God, that all may hear
       Loud acclamations ring.
   2   Prepare a Hymn, prepare a Song
       The Timbrel hither bring
       The cheerfull Psaltry bring along
       And Harp with pleasant string.
   3   Blow, as is wont, in the new Moon
       With Trumpets lofty sound,                                       10
       Th'appointed time, the day wheron
       Our solemn Feast comes round.
   4   This was a Statute giv'n of old
       For Israel to observe
       A Law of Jacobs God, to hold
       From whence they might not swerve.
   5   This he a Testimony ordain'd
       In Joseph, not to change,
       When as he pass'd through Aegypt land;
       The Tongue I heard, was strange.                                 20
   6   From burden, and from slavish toyle
       I set his shoulder free;
       His hands from pots, and mirie soyle
       Deliver'd were by me.
   7   When trouble did thee sore assaile,
       On me then didst thou call,
       And I to free thee did not faile,
       And led thee out of thrall.
       I answer'd thee in *thunder deep                 *Be Sether ragnam.
       With clouds encompass'd round;                                   30
       I tri'd thee at the water steep
       Of Meriba renown'd.
   8   Hear O my people, heark'n well,
       I testifie to thee
       Thou antient flock of Israel,
       If thou wilt list to mee,
   9   Through out the land of thy abode
       No alien God shall be
       Nor shalt thou to a forein God
       In honour bend thy knee.                                         40
   10  I am the Lord thy God which brought
       Thee out of Aegypt land
       Ask large enough, and I, besought,
       Will grant thy full demand.
   11  And yet my people would not hear,
       Nor hearken to my voice;
       And Israel whom I lov'd so dear
       Mislik'd me for his choice.
   12  Then did I leave them to their will
       And to their wandring mind;                                      50
       Their own conceits they follow'd still
       Their own devises blind
   13  O that my people would be wise
       To serve me all their daies,
       And O that Israel would advise
       To walk my righteous waies.
   14  Then would I soon bring down their foes
       That now so proudly rise,
       And turn my hand against all those
       That are their enemies.                                          60
   15  Who hate the Lord should then be fain
       To bow to him and bend,
       But they, His should remain,
       Their time should have no end.
   16  And he would free them from the shock
       With flower of finest wheat,
       And satisfie them from the rock
       With Honey for their Meat.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. LXXXII.
 
 
   1   GOD in the *great *assembly stands                    *Bagnadath-el
       Of Kings and lordly States,
       Among the gods* on both his hands.                        *Bekerev.
       He judges and debates.
   2   How long will ye *pervert the right                      *Tishphetu
       With *judgment false and wrong                              gnavel.
       Favouring the wicked by your might,
       Who thence grow bold and strong?
   3  *Regard the *weak and fatherless                       *Shiphtu-dal.
      *Dispatch the *poor mans cause,                                   10
       And **raise the man in deep distress
       By **just and equal Lawes.                              **Hatzdiku.
   4   Defend the poor and desolate,
       And rescue from the hands
       Of wicked men the low estate
       Of him that help demands.
   5   They know not nor will understand,
       In darkness they walk on,
       The Earths foundations all are *mov'd                     *Jimmotu.
       And *out of order gon.                                           20
   6   I said that ye were Gods, yea all
       The Sons of God most high
   7   But ye shall die like men, and fall
       As other Princes die.
   8   Rise God, *judge thou the earth in might,
       This wicked earth *redress,                               *Shiphta.
       For thou art he who shalt by right
       The Nations all possess.
 
 
 
 
   PSAL. LXXXIII.
 
   1   BE not thou silent now at length
       O God hold not thy peace,
       Sit not thou still O God of strength
       We cry and do not cease.
   2   For lo thy furious foes now *swell
       And *storm outrageously,                                *Jehemajun.
       And they that hate thee proud and fill
       Exalt their heads full hie.
   3   Against thy people they *contrive                       *Jagnarimu.
      *Their Plots and Counsels deep,                             *Sod. 10
      *Them to ensnare they chiefly strive             *Jithjagnatsu gnal.
      *Whom thou dost hide and keep.                          *Tsephuneca.
   4   Come let us cut them off say they,
       Till they no Nation be
       That Israels name for ever may
       Be lost in memory.
   5   For they consult *with all their might,               *Lev jachdau.
       And all as one in mind
       Themselves against thee they unite
       And in firm union bind.                                          20
   6   The tents of Edom, and the brood
       Of scornful Ishmael,
       Moab, with them of Hagars blood
       That in the Desart dwell,
   7   Gebal and Ammon there conspire,
       And hateful Amalec,
       The Philistims, and they of Tyre
       Whose bounds the sea doth check.
   8   With them great Asshur also bands
       And doth confirm the knot,                                       30
       All these have lent their armed hands
       To aid the Sons of Lot.
   9   Do to them as to Midian bold
       That wasted all the Coast.
       To Sisera, and as is told
       Thou didst to Jabins hoast,
       When at the brook of Kishon old
       They were repulst and slain,
   10  At Endor quite cut off, and rowl'd
       As dung upon the plain.                                          40
   11  As Zeb and Oreb evil sped
       So let their Princes speed
       As Zeba, and Zalmunna bled
       So let their Princes bleed.
   12  For they amidst their pride have said
       By right now shall we seize
       Gods houses, and will now invade
      *Their stately Palaces.                    *Neoth Elohim bears both.
   13  My God, oh make them as a wheel
       No quiet let them find,                                          50
       Giddy and restless let them reel
       Like stubble from the wind.
   14  As when an aged wood takes fire
       Which on a sudden straies,
       The greedy flame runs hier and hier
       Till all the mountains blaze,
   15  So with thy whirlwind them pursue,
       And with thy tempest chase;
   16 *And till they *yield thee honour due,                *They seek thy
       Lord fill with shame their face.                         Name. Heb.
   17  Asham'd and troubl'd let them be,                                60
       Troubl'd and sham'd for ever,
       Ever confounded, and so die
       With shame, and scape it never.
   18  Then shall they know that thou whose name
       Jehova is alone,
       Art the most high, and thou the same
       O're all the earth art one.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. LXXXIV.
 
 
   1   How lovely are thy dwellings fair!
       O Lord of Hoasts, how dear
       The pleasant Tabernacles are!
       Where thou do'st dwell so near.
   2   My Soul doth long and almost die
       Thy Courts O Lord to see,
       My heart and flesh aloud do crie,
       O living God, for thee.
   3   There ev'n the Sparrow freed from wrong
       Hath found a house of rest,                                      10
       The Swallow there, to lay her young
       Hath built her brooding nest,
       Ev'n by thy Altars Lord of Hoasts
       They find their safe abode,
       And home they fly from round the Coasts
       Toward thee, My King, my God
   4   Happy, who in thy house reside
       Where thee they ever praise,
   5   Happy, whose strength in thee doth bide,
       And in their hearts thy waies.                                   20
   6   They pass through Baca's thirstie Vale,
       That dry and barren ground
       As through a fruitfull watry Dale
       Where Springs and Showrs abound.
   7   They journey on from strength to strength
       With joy and gladsom cheer
       Till all before our God at length
       In Sion do appear.
   8   Lord God of Hoasts hear now my praier
       O Jacobs God give ear,                                           30
   9   Thou God our shield look on the face
       Of thy anointed dear.
   10  For one day in thy Courts to be
       Is better, and mere blest
       Then in the joyes of Vanity,
       A thousand daies at best.
       I in the temple of my God
       Had rather keep a dore,
       Then dwell in Tents, and rich abode
       With Sin for evermore                                            40
   11  For God the Lord both Sun and Shield
       Gives grace and glory bright,
       No good from him shall be with-held
       Whose waies are just and right.
   12  Lord God of Hoasts that raign 'st on high,
       That man is truly blest
       Who only on thee doth relie.
       And in thee only rest.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL LXXXV.
 
 
   1   THY Land to favour graciously
       Thou hast not Lord been slack,
       Thou hast from hard Captivity
       Returned Jacob back.
   2   Th' iniquity thou didst forgive
       That wrought thy people woe,
       And all their Sin, that did thee grieve
       Hast hid where none shall know.
   3   Thine anger all thou hadst remov'd,
       And calmly didst return                                          10
       From thy *fierce wrath which we had prov'd        *Heb. The burning
       Far worse then fire to burn.                            heat of thy
   4   God of our saving health and peace,                          wrath.
       Turn us, and us restore,
       Thine indignation cause to cease
       Toward us, and chide no more.
   5   Wilt thou be angry without end,
       For ever angry thus
       Wilt thou thy frowning ire extend
       From age to age on us?                                           20
   6   Wilt thou not * turn, and hear our voice             * Heb. Turn to
       And us again * revive,                                 quicken us.
       That so thy people may rejoyce
       By thee preserv'd alive.
   7   Cause us to see thy goodness Lord,
       To us thy mercy shew
       Thy saving health to us afford
       And lift in us renew.
   8   And now what God the Lord will speak
       I will go strait and hear,                                       30
       For to his people he speaks peace
       And to his Saints full dear,
       To his dear Saints he will speak peace,
       But let them never more
       Return to folly, but surcease
       To trespass as before.
   9   Surely to such as do him fear
       Salvation is at hand
       And glory shall ere long appear
       To dwell within our Land.                                        40
   10  Mercy and Truth that long were miss'd
       Now joyfully are met
       Sweet Peace and Righteousness have kiss'd
       And hand in hand are set.
   11  Truth from the earth like to a flowr
       Shall bud and blossom then,
       And Justice from her heavenly bowr
       Look down on mortal men.
   12  The Lord will also then bestow
       Whatever thing is good                                           50
       Our Land shall forth in plenty throw
       Her fruits to be our food.
   13  Before him Righteousness shall go
       His Royal Harbinger,
       Then * will he come, and not be slow          *Heb. He will set his
       His footsteps cannot err.                         steps to the way.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. LXXXVI.
 
 
   1   THY gracious ear, O Lord, encline,
       O hear me I thee pray,
       For I am poor, and almost pine
       With need, and sad decay.
   2   Preserve my soul, for *I have trod           Heb. I am good, loving,
       Thy waies, and love the just,                    a doer of good and
       Save thou thy servant O my God                          holy things
       Who still in thee doth trust.
   3   Pity me Lord for daily thee
       I call; 4 O make rejoyce                                         10
       Thy Servants Soul; for Lord to thee
       I lift my soul and voice,
   5   For thou art good, thou Lord art prone
       To pardon, thou to all
       Art full of mercy, thou alone
       To them that on thee call.
   6   Unto my supplication Lord
       Give ear, and to the crie
       Of my incessant praiers afford
       Thy hearing graciously.                                          20
   7   I in the day of my distress
       Will call on thee for aid;
       For thou wilt grant me free access
       And answer, what I pray'd.
   8   Like thee among the gods is none
       O Lord, nor any works
       Of all that other Gods have done
       Like to thy glorious works.
   9   The Nations all whom thou hast made
       Shall come, and all shall frame                                  30
       To bow them low before thee Lord,
       And glorifie thy name.
   10  For great thou art, and wonders great
       By thy strong hand are done,
       Thou in thy everlasting Seat
       Remainest God alone.
   11  Teach me O Lord thy way most right,
       I in thy truth will hide,
       To fear thy name my heart unite
       So shall it never slide.                                         40
   12  Thee will I praise O Lord my God
       Thee honour, and adore
       With my whole heart, and blaze abroad
       Thy name for ever more.
   13  For great thy mercy is toward me,
       And thou hast free'd my Soul
       Eev'n from the lowest Hell set free
       From deepest darkness foul.
   14  O God the proud against me rise
       And violent men are met                                          50
       To seek my life, and in their eyes
       No fear of thee have set.
   15  But thou Lord art the God most mild
       Readiest thy grace to shew,
       Slow to be angry, and art stil'd
       Most mercifull, most true.
   16  O turn to me thy face at length,
       And me have mercy on,
       Unto thy servant give thy strength,
       And save thy hand-maids Son.                                     60
   17  Some sign of good to me afford,
       And let my foes then see
       And be asham'd, because thou Lord
       Do'st help and comfort me.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. LXXXVII
 
 
   1   AMONG the holy Mountains high
       Is his foundation fast,
       There Seated in his Sanctuary,
       His Temple there is plac't.
   2   Sions fair Gates the Lord loves more
       Then all the dwellings faire
       Of Jacobs Land, though there be store,
       And all within his care.
   3   City of God, most glorious things
       Of thee abroad are spoke;                                        10
   4   I mention Egypt, where proud Kings
       Did our forefathers yoke,
       I mention Babel to my friends,
       Philistia full of scorn,
       And Tyre with Ethiops utmost ends,
       Lo this man there was born:
   5   But twise that praise shall in our ear
       Be said of Sion last
       This and this man was born in her,
       High God shall fix her fast.                                     20
   6   The Lord shall write it in a Scrowle
       That ne're shall be out-worn
       When he the Nations doth enrowle
       That this man there was born.
   7   Both they who sing, and they who dance
       With sacred Songs are there,
       In thee fresh brooks, and soft streams glance
       And all my fountains clear.
 
 
 
 
 PSAL. LXXXVIII
 
 
   1   LORD God that dost me save and keep,
       All day to thee I cry;
       And all night long, before thee weep
       Before thee prostrate lie.
   2   Into thy presence let my praier
       With sighs devout ascend
       And to my cries, that ceaseless are,
       Thine ear with favour bend.
   3   For cloy'd with woes and trouble store
       Surcharg'd my Soul doth lie,                                     10
       My life at death's uncherful dore
       Unto the grave draws nigh.
   4   Reck'n'd I am with them that pass
       Down to the dismal pit
       I am a *man, but weak alas               * Heb. A man without manly
       And for that name unfit.                                  strength.
   5   From life discharg'd and parted quite
       Among the dead to sleep
       And like the slain in bloody fight
       That in the grave lie deep.                                      20
       Whom thou rememberest no more,
       Dost never more regard,
       Them from thy hand deliver'd o're
       Deaths hideous house hath barr'd.
   6   Thou in the lowest pit profound'
       Hast set me all forlorn,
       Where thickest darkness hovers round,
       In horrid deeps to mourn.
   7   Thy wrath from which no shelter saves
       Full sore doth press on me;                                      30
      *Thou break'st upon me all thy waves,                      *The Heb.
      *And all thy waves break me                              bears both.
   8   Thou dost my friends from me estrange,
       And mak'st me odious,
       Me to them odious, for they change,
       And I here pent up thus.
   9   Through sorrow, and affliction great
       Mine eye grows dim and dead,
       Lord all the day I thee entreat,
       My hands to thee I spread.                                       40
   10  Wilt thou do wonders on the dead,
       Shall the deceas'd arise
       And praise thee from their loathsom bed
       With pale and hollow eyes?
   11  Shall they thy loving kindness tell
       On whom the grave hath hold,
       Or they who in perdition dwell
       Thy faithfulness unfold?
   12  In darkness can thy mighty hand
       Or wondrous acts be known,                                       50
       Thy justice in the gloomy land
       Of dark oblivion?
   13  But I to thee O Lord do cry
       E're yet my life be spent,
       And up to thee my praier doth hie
       Each morn, and thee prevent.
   14  Why wilt thou Lord my soul forsake,
       And hide thy face from me,
   15  That am already bruis'd, and *shake          *Heb. Prae Concussione.
       With terror sent from thee;                                      60
       Bruz'd, and afflicted and so low
       As ready to expire,
       While I thy terrors undergo
       Astonish'd with thine ire.
   16  Thy fierce wrath over me doth flow
       Thy threatnings cut me through.
   17  All day they round about me go,
       Like waves they me persue.
   18  Lover and friend thou hast remov'd
       And sever'd from me far.                                         70
       They fly me now whom I have lov'd,
       And as in darkness are.
 
 
   Finis.
 
 
 
 
 COLLECTION OF PASSAGES TRANSLATED IN THE PROSE WRITINGS.
 
 
 
 
 [From Of Reformation in England, 1641.]
 
 
   Ah Constantine, of how much ill was cause
   Not thy Conversion, but those rich demains
   That the first wealthy Pope receiv'd of thee.
   DANTE, Inf. xix. 115.
 
   Founded in chast and humble Poverty,
   'Gainst them that rais'd thee dost thou lift thy horn,
   Impudent whoore, where hast thou plac'd thy hope?
   In thy Adulterers, or thy ill got wealth?
   Another Constantine comes not in hast.
   PETRARCA, Son. 108.
 
   And to be short, at last his guid him brings
   Into a goodly valley, where he sees
   A mighty mass of things strangely confus'd
   Things that on earth were lost or were abus'd.
   .   .   .   .   .
   Then past he to a flowry Mountain green,
   Which once smelt sweet, now stinks as odiously;
   This was that gift (if you the truth will have)
   That Constantine to good Sylvestro gave.
   ARIOSTO, Orl. Fur. xxxiv. 80.
 
 
 
 
 [From Reason of Church Government,  1641.]
 
 
   When I die, let the Earth be roul'd in flames.
 
 
 
 
 [From Apology for Smectymnuus, 1642.]
 
 
   Laughing to teach the truth
   What hinders? as some teachers give to Boys
   Junkets and knacks, that they may learne apace.
   HORACE, Sat. 1. 24.
 
   Jesting decides great things
   Stronglier, and better oft than earnest can.
   IBID. i. 10. 14.
 
   'Tis you that say it, not I: you do the deeds
   And your ungodly deeds find me the words.
   SOPHOCLES, Elec. 624.
 
 
 
 
 [From Areopagitica, 1644.]
 
 
   This is true Liberty, when free-born Men,
   Having to advise the Public, may speak free,
   Which he who can, and will, deserv's high praise;
   Who neither can nor will, may hold his peace,
   What can be juster in a state then this?
   EURIPIDES, Supp. 438
 
 
 
 
 [From Tetrachordon, 1645.]
 
 
   Whom do we count a good man, whom but he
   Who keeps the laws and statutes of the Senate,
   Who judges in great suits and controversies,
   Whose witness and opinion wins the cause?
   But his own house, and the whole neighbourhood
   See his foul inside through his whited skin.
   HORACE, Ep. i. 16. 40.
 
 
 
 
 [From The Tenure of Kings and Magistrates, 1649.]
 
 
                          There can be slaine
   No sacrifice to God more acceptable
   Than an unjust and wicked king.
   SENECA, Herc. Fur. 922.
 
 
 
 
 [From History of Britain, 1670.]
 
 
   Brutus thus addresses Diana in the country of Leogecia.
 
   Goddess of Shades, and Huntress, who at will
   Walk'st on the rowling Sphear, and through the deep,
   On thy third Reign the Earth look now, and tell
   What Land, what Seat of rest thou bidst me seek,
   What certain Seat, where I may worship thee
   For aye, with Temples vow'd, and Virgin quires.
 
   To whom sleeping before the altar, Diana in a Vision that night
   thus answer'd.
 
   Brutus far to the West, in th' Ocean wide
   Beyond the Realm of Gaul, a Land there lies,
   Sea-girt it lies, where Giants dwelt of old,
   Now void, it fits thy People; thether bend
   Thy course, there shalt thou find a lasting seat,
   There to thy Sons another Troy shall rise,
   And Kings be born of thee, whose dredded might
   Shall aw the World, and conquer Nations bold.
 
 
 
 Transcriber's Note: Title page of first (1667) edition of
 Paradise Lost follows:
 
 
                          Paradise lost.
                                A
                               POEM
                            Written in
                            TEN BOOKS
                          By John Milton
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                  Licensed and Entred according
                            to Order
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                             LONDON.
           Printed, and are to be sold by Peter Parker
             under Creed Church neer Aldgate; And by
     Robert Boulter at the Turk's head in Bishopsgate-street
        And Matthias Walker, under St. Dunstan's Church
                     in Fleet-street, 1667.
 
 
 
 Transcriber's Note: Title page of second (1674) edition of
 Paradise Lost follows:
 
 
                          Paradise Lost.
                                A
                              POEM
                               IN
                          TWELVE BOOKS.
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                           The Author
                          JOHN MILTON.
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                        The Second Edition
                   Revised and Augmented by the
                           Same Author.
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                             LONDON.
              Printed by S. Simmons next door to the
              Golden Lion in Aldergate-street, 1674.
 
 
 
 
 PARADISE LOST.
 
 
 
 
 ON Paradise Lost.
 
 
   WHEN I beheld the Poet blind, yet bold,
   In slender Book his vast Design unfold,
   Messiah Crown'd, Gods Reconcil'd Decree,
   Rebelling Angels, the Forbidden Tree,
   Heav'n, Hell, Earth, Chaos, All; the Argument
   Held me a while misdoubting his Intent,
   That he would ruine (for I saw him strong)
   The sacred Truths to Fable and old Song
   (So Sampson groap'd the Temples Posts in spight)
   The World o'rewhelming to revenge his sight.
 
   Yet as I read soon growing less severe,
   I lik'd his Project, the success did fear;
   Through that wide Field how he his way should find
   O're which lame Faith leads Understanding blind;
   Lest he perplex'd the things he would explain,
   And what was easie he should render vain.
 
   Or if a Work so infinite he spann'd,
   Jealous I was that some less skilful hand
   (Such as disquiet always what is well,
   And by ill imitating would excell)
   Might hence presume the whole Creations day
   To change in Scenes, and show it in a Play.
 
   Pardon me, Mighty Poet, nor despise
   My causeless, yet not impious, surmise.
   But I am now convinc'd, and none will dare
   Within thy Labours to pretend a share,
   Thou hast not miss'd one thought that could be fit,
   And all that was improper dost omit:
   So that no room is here for Writers left,
   But to detect their Ignorance or Theft.
 
   That Majesty which through thy Work doth Reign
   Draws the Devout, deterring the Profane,
   And things divine thou treatst of in such state
   As them preserves, and thee, inviolate.
   At once delight and horrour on us seise,
   Thou singst with so much gravity and ease;
   And above humane flight dost soar aloft
   With Plume so strong, so equal, and so soft.
   The Bird nam'd from that Paradise you sing
   So never flaggs, but always keeps on Wing.
 
   Where couldst thou words of such a compass find?
   Whence furnish such a vast expence of mind?
   Just Heav'n thee like Tiresias to requite
   Rewards with Prophesie thy loss of sight.
 
   Well mightst thou scorn thy Readers to allure
   With tinkling Rhime, of thy own sense secure;
   While the Town-Bayes writes all the while and spells,
   And like a Pack-horse tires without his Bells:
   Their Fancies like our Bushy-points appear,
   The Poets tag them, we for fashion wear.
   I too transported by the Mode offend,
   And while I meant to Praise thee must Commend.
   Thy Verse created like thy Theme sublime,
   In Number, Weight, and Measure, needs not Rhime.
 
                                          A.M.
 
   Note: On Paradise Lost] Added in the second edition 1674.
 
 
 
 
 The Printer to the Reader.
 
 
 Courteous Reader, there was no Argument at first intended to the Book,
 but for the satisfaction of many that have desired it, I have procur'd
 it, and withall a reason of that which stumbled many others, why the
 Poem Rimes not. S. Simmons.
 
 Notes: The Printer to the Reader] Added in 1668 to the copies then
 remaining of the first edition, amended in 1669, and omitted in 1670. I
 have procur'd it, and.... not. 1669]  is procured. 1668.
 
 
 
 
 THE VERSE.
 
 
 THE measure is English Heroic Verse without Rime as that of Homer in
 Greek, and of Virgil in Latin; Rime being no necessary Adjunct or true
 Ornament of Poem or good Verse, in longer Works especially, but the
 Invention of a barbarous Age, to set off wretched matter and lame
 Meeter; grac't indeed since by the use of some famous modern Poets,
 carried away by Custom, but much to thir own vexation, hindrance, and
 constraint to express many things otherwise, and for the most part worse
 then else they would have exprest them.  Not without cause therefore
 some both Italian and Spanish Poets of prime note have rejected Rime
 both in longer and shorter Works, as have also long since our best
 English Tragedies, as a thing of it self, to all judicious eares,
 triveal and of no true musical delight: which consists only in apt
 Numbers, fit quantity of Syllables, and the sense variously drawn out
 from one Verse into another, not in the jingling sound of like endings,
 a fault avoyded by the learned Ancients both in Poetry and all good
 Oratory  This neglect then of Rime so little is to be taken for a defect
 though it may seem so perhaps to vulgar Readers, that it rather is to be
 esteem'd an example set, the first in English, of ancient liberty
 recover'd to Heroic Poem from the troublesom and modern bondage of
 Rimeing.
 
 Note: The Verse] Added in 1668 to the copies then remaining of the first
 edition; together with the Argument. In the second edition (1674) the
 Argument, with the necessary adjustment to the division made in Books
 vii and x, was distributed through the several books of the poem, as it
 is here printed.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK I.
 
 
 
 THE ARGUMENT.
 
 THIS first Book proposes first in brief the whole Subject, Mans
 disobedience, and the loss thereupon of Paradise wherein he was plac't:
 Then touches the prime cause of his fall, the Serpent, or rather Satan
 in the Serpent; who revolting from God, and drawing to his side many
 Legions of Angels, was by the command of God driven out of Heaven with
 all his Crew into the great Deep. Which action past over, the Poem hasts
 into the midst of things, presenting Satan with his Angels now fallen
 into Hell describ'd here, not in the Center (for Heaven and Earth may be
 suppos'd as yet not made, certainly not yet accurst) but in a place of
 utter darknesse, fitliest call'd Chaos: Here Satan with his Angels lying
 on the burning Lake, thunder-struck and astonisht, after a certain space
 recovers, as from confusion, calls up him who next in Order and Dignity
 lay by him; they confer of thir miserable fall.  Satan awakens all his
 Legions, who lay till then in the same manner confounded; They rise,
 thir Numbers, array of Battel, thir chief Leaders nam'd according to the
 Idols known afterwards in Canaan and the Countries adjoyning. To these
 Satan directs his Speech, comforts them with hope yet of gaining Heaven,
 but tells them lastly of a new World and new kind of Creature to be
 created, according to an ancient Prophesie or report in Heaven; for that
 Angels were long before this visible Creation, was the opinion of many
 ancient Fathers.  To find out the truth of this Prophesie, and what to
 determin thereon he refers to a full councell.  What his Associates
 thence attempt.  Pandemonium the palace of Satan rises, suddenly built
 out of the Deep: The infernal Peers there sit in Counsel.
 
   Of Mans First Disobedience, and the Fruit
   Of that Forbidden Tree, whose mortal tast
   Brought Death into the World, and all our woe,
   With loss of Eden, till one greater Man
   Restore us, and regain the blissful Seat,
   Sing Heav'nly Muse, that on the secret top
   Of Oreb, or of Sinai, didst inspire
   That Shepherd, who first taught the chosen Seed,
   In the Beginning how the Heav'ns and Earth
   Rose out of Chaos: Or if Sion Hill                                   10
   Delight thee more, and Siloa's Brook that flow'd
   Fast by the Oracle of God; I thence
   Invoke thy aid to my adventrous Song,
   That with no middle flight intends to soar
   Above th' Aonian Mount, while it pursues
   Things unattempted yet in Prose or Rhime.
   And chiefly Thou O Spirit, that dost prefer
   Before all Temples th' upright heart and pure,
   Instruct me, for Thou know'st; Thou from the first
   Wast present, and with mighty wings outspread                        20
   Dove-like satst brooding on the vast Abyss
   And mad'st it pregnant: What in me is dark
   Illumine, what is low raise and support;
   That to the highth of this great Argument
   I may assert th' Eternal Providence,
   And justifie the wayes of God to men.
   Say first, for Heav'n hides nothing from thy view
   Nor the deep Tract of Hell, say first what cause
   Mov'd our Grand Parents in that happy State,
   Favour'd of Heav'n so highly, to fall off                            30
   From their Creator, and transgress his Will
   For one restraint, Lords of the World besides?
   Who first seduc'd them to that fowl revolt?
   Th' infernal Serpent; he it was, whose guile
   Stird up with Envy and Revenge, deceiv'd
   The Mother of Mankinde, what time his Pride
   Had cast him out from Heav'n, with all his Host
   Of Rebel Angels, by whose aid aspiring
   To set himself in Glory above his Peers,
   He trusted to have equal'd the most High,                            40
   If he oppos'd; and with ambitious aim
   Against the Throne and Monarchy of God
   Rais'd impious War in Heav'n and Battel proud
   With vain attempt. Him the Almighty Power
   Hurld headlong flaming from th' Ethereal Skie
   With hideous ruine and combustion down
   To bottomless perdition, there to dwell
   In Adamantine Chains and penal Fire,
   Who durst defie th' Omnipotent to Arms.
   Nine times the Space that measures Day and Night                     50
   To mortal men, he with his horrid crew
   Lay vanquisht, rowling in the fiery Gulfe
   Confounded though immortal: But his doom
   Reserv'd him to more wrath; for now the thought
   Both of lost happiness and lasting pain
   Torments him; round he throws his baleful eyes
   That witness'd huge affliction and dismay
   Mixt with obdurate pride and stedfast hate:
   At once as far as Angels kenn he views
   The dismal Situation waste and wilde,                                60
   A Dungeon horrible, on all sides round
   As one great Furnace flam'd, yet from those flames
   No light, but rather darkness visible
   Serv'd only to discover sights of woe,
   Regions of sorrow, doleful shades, where peace
   And rest can never dwell, hope never comes
   That comes to all; but torture without end
   Still urges, and a fiery Deluge, fed
   With ever-burning Sulphur unconsum'd:
   Such place Eternal Justice had prepar'd                              70
   For those rebellious, here their Prison ordain'd
   In utter darkness, and their portion set
   As far remov'd from God and light of Heav'n
   As from the Center thrice to th' utmost Pole.
   O how unlike the place from whence they fell!
   There the companions of his fall, o'rewhelm'd
   With Floods and Whirlwinds of tempestuous fire,
   He soon discerns, and weltring by his side
   One next himself in power, and next in crime,
   Long after known in Palestine, and nam'd                             80
   Beelzebub. To whom th' Arch-Enemy,
   And thence in Heav'n call'd Satan, with bold words
   Breaking the horrid silence thus began.
   If thou beest he; But O how fall'n! how chang'd
   From him, who in the happy Realms of Light
   Cloth'd with transcendent brightnes didst outshine
   Myriads though bright: If he whom mutual league,
   United thoughts and counsels, equal hope,
   And hazard in the Glorious Enterprize,
   Joynd with me once, now misery hath joynd                            90
   In equal ruin: into what Pit thou seest
   From what highth fal'n, so much the stronger provd
   He with his Thunder: and till then who knew
   The force of those dire Arms? yet not for those
   Nor what the Potent Victor in his rage
   Can else inflict do I repent or change,
   Though chang'd in outward lustre; that fixt mind
   And high disdain, from sence of injur'd merit,
   That with the mightiest rais'd me to contend,
   And to the fierce contention brought along                          100
   Innumerable force of Spirits arm'd
   That durst dislike his reign, and me preferring,
   His utmost power with adverse power oppos'd
   In dubious Battel on the Plains of Heav'n,
   And shook his throne. What though the field be lost?
   All is not lost; the unconquerable Will,
   And study of revenge, immortal hate,
   And courage never to submit or yield:
   And what is else not to be overcome?
   That Glory never shall his wrath or might                           110
   Extort from me. To bow and sue for grace
   With suppliant knee, and deifie his power
   Who from the terrour of this Arm so late
   Doubted his Empire, that were low indeed,
   That were an ignominy and shame beneath
   This downfall; since by Fate the strength of Gods
   And this Empyreal substance cannot fail,
   Since through experience of this great event
   In Arms not worse, in foresight much advanc't,
   We may with more successful hope resolve                            120
   To wage by force or guile eternal Warr
   Irreconcileable, to our grand Foe,
   Who now triumphs, and in th' excess of joy
   Sole reigning holds the Tyranny of Heav'n.
   So spake th' Apostate Angel, though in pain,
   Vaunting aloud, but rackt with deep despare:
   And him thus answer'd soon his bold Compeer.
   O Prince, O Chief of many Throned Powers,
   That led th' imbattelld Seraphim to Warr
   Under thy conduct, and in dreadful deeds                            130
   Fearless, endanger'd Heav'ns perpetual King;
   And put to proof his high Supremacy,
   Whether upheld by strength, or Chance, or Fate,
   Too well I see and rue the dire event,
   That with sad overthrow and foul defeat
   Hath lost us Heav'n, and all this mighty Host
   In horrible destruction laid thus low,
   As far as Gods and Heav'nly Essences
   Can Perish: for the mind and spirit remains
   Invincible, and vigour soon returns,                                140
   Though all our Glory extinct, and happy state
   Here swallow'd up in endless misery.
   But what if he our Conquerour, (whom I now
   Of force believe Almighty, since no less
   Then such could hav orepow'rd such force as ours)
   Have left us this our spirit and strength intire
   Strongly to suffer and support our pains,
   That we may so suffice his vengeful ire,
   Or do him mightier service as his thralls
   By right of Warr, what e're his business be                         150
   Here in the heart of Hell to work in Fire,
   Or do his Errands in the gloomy Deep;
   What can it then avail though yet we feel
   Strength undiminisht, or eternal being
   To undergo eternal punishment?
   Whereto with speedy words th' Arch-fiend reply'd.
   Fall'n Cherube, to be weak is miserable
   Doing or Suffering: but of this be sure,
   To do ought good never will be our task,
   But ever to do ill our sole delight,                                160
   As being the contrary to his high will
   Whom we resist. If then his Providence
   Out of our evil seek to bring forth good,
   Our labour must be to pervert that end,
   And out of good still to find means of evil;
   Which oft times may succeed, so as perhaps
   Shall grieve him, if I fail not, and disturb
   His inmost counsels from their destind aim.
   But see the angry Victor hath recall'd
   His Ministers of vengeance and pursuit                              170
   Back to the Gates of Heav'n: The Sulphurous Hail
   Shot after us in storm, oreblown hath laid
   The fiery Surge, that from the Precipice
   Of Heav'n receiv'd us falling, and the Thunder,
   Wing'd with red Lightning and impetuous rage,
   Perhaps hath spent his shafts, and ceases now
   To bellow through the vast and boundless Deep.
   Let us not slip th' occasion, whether scorn,
   Or satiate fury yield it from our Foe.
   Seest thou yon dreary Plain, forlorn and wilde,                     180
   The seat of desolation, voyd of light,
   Save what the glimmering of these livid flames
   Casts pale and dreadful? Thither let us tend
   From off the tossing of these fiery waves,
   There rest, if any rest can harbour there,
   And reassembling our afflicted Powers,
   Consult how we may henceforth most offend
   Our Enemy, our own loss how repair,
   How overcome this dire Calamity,
   What reinforcement we may gain from Hope,                           190
   If not what resolution from despare.
   Thus Satan talking to his neerest Mate
   With Head up-lift above the wave, and Eyes
   That sparkling blaz'd, his other Parts besides
   Prone on the Flood, extended long and large
   Lay floating many a rood, in bulk as huge
   As whom the Fables name of monstrous size,
   Titanian, or Earth-born, that warr'd on Jove,
   Briarios or Typhon, whom the Den
   By ancient Tarsus held, or that Sea-beast                           200
   Leviathan, which God of all his works
   Created hugest that swim th' Ocean stream:
   Him haply slumbring on the Norway foam
   The Pilot of some small night-founder'd Skiff,
   Deeming some Island, oft, as Sea-men tell,
   With fixed Anchor in his skaly rind
   Moors by his side under the Lee, while Night
   Invests the Sea, and wished Morn delayes:
   So stretcht out huge in length the Arch-fiend lay
   Chain'd on the burning Lake, nor ever thence                        210
   Had ris'n or heav'd his head, but that the will
   And high permission of all-ruling Heaven
   Left him at large to his own dark designs,
   That with reiterated crimes he might
   Heap on himself damnation, while he sought
   Evil to others, and enrag'd might see
   How all his malice serv'd but to bring forth
   Infinite goodness, grace and mercy shewn
   On Man by him seduc't, but on himself
   Treble confusion, wrath and vengeance pour'd.                       220
   Forthwith upright he rears from off the Pool
   His mighty Stature; on each hand the flames
   Drivn backward slope their pointing spires, & rowld
   In billows, leave i'th' midst a horrid Vale.
   Then with expanded wings he stears his flight
   Aloft, incumbent on the dusky Air
   That felt unusual weight, till on dry Land
   He lights, if it were Land that ever burn'd
   With solid, as the Lake with liquid fire;
   And such appear'd in hue, as when the force                         230
   Of subterranean wind transports a Hill
   Torn from Pelorus, or the shatter'd side
   Of thundring Aetna, whose combustible
   And fewel'd entrals thence conceiving Fire,
   Sublim'd with Mineral fury, aid the Winds,
   And leave a singed bottom all involv'd
   With stench and smoak: Such resting found the sole
   Of unblest feet. Him followed his next Mate,
   Both glorying to have scap't the Stygian flood
   As Gods, and by their own recover'd strength,                       240
   Not by the sufferance of supernal Power.
   Is this the Region, this the Soil, the Clime,
   Said then the lost Arch Angel, this the seat
   That we must change for Heav'n, this mournful gloom
   For that celestial light? Be it so, since hee
   Who now is Sovran can dispose and bid
   What shall be right: fardest from him is best
   Whom reason hath equald, force hath made supream
   Above his equals. Farewel happy Fields
   Where Joy for ever dwells: Hail horrours, hail                      250
   Infernal world, and thou profoundest Hell
   Receive thy new Possessor: One who brings
   A mind not to be chang'd by Place or Time.
   The mind is its own place, and in it self
   Can make a Heav'n of Hell, a Hell of Heav'n.
   What matter where, if I be still the same,
   And what I should be, all but less then hee
   Whom Thunder hath made greater? Here at least
   We shall be free; th' Almighty hath not built
   Here for his envy, will not drive us hence:                         260
   Here we may reign secure, and in my choyce
   To reign is worth ambition though in Hell:
   Better to reign in Hell, then serve in Heav'n.
   But wherefore let we then our faithful friends,
   Th' associates and copartners of our loss
   Lye thus astonisht on th' oblivious Pool,
   And call them not to share with us their part
   In this unhappy Mansion, or once more
   With rallied Arms to try what may be yet
   Regaind in Heav'n, or what more lost in Hell?                       270
   So Satan spake, and him Beelzebub
   Thus answer'd. Leader of those Armies bright,
   Which but th' Omnipotent none could have foyld,
   If once they hear that voyce, their liveliest pledge
   Of hope in fears and dangers, heard so oft
   In worst extreams, and on the perilous edge
   Of battel when it rag'd, in all assaults
   Their surest signal, they will soon resume
   New courage and revive, though now they lye
   Groveling and prostrate on yon Lake of Fire,                        280
   As we erewhile, astounded and amaz'd,
   No wonder, fall'n such a pernicious highth.
   He scarce had ceas't when the superiour Fiend
   Was moving toward the shore; his ponderous shield
   Ethereal temper, massy, large and round,
   Behind him cast; the broad circumference
   Hung on his shoulders like the Moon, whose Orb
   Through Optic Glass the Tuscan Artist views
   At Ev'ning from the top of Fesole,
   Or in Valdarno, to descry new Lands,                                290
   Rivers or Mountains in her spotty Globe.
   His Spear, to equal which the tallest Pine
   Hewn on Norwegian hills, to be the Mast
   Of some great Ammiral, were but a wand,
   He walkt with to support uneasie steps
   Over the burning Marle, not like those steps
   On Heavens Azure, and the torrid Clime
   Smote on him sore besides, vaulted with Fire;
   Nathless he so endur'd, till on the Beach
   Of that inflamed Sea, he stood and call'd                           300
   His Legions, Angel Forms, who lay intrans't
   Thick as Autumnal Leaves that strow the Brooks
   In Vallombrosa, where th' Etrurian shades
   High overarch't imbowr; or scatterd sedge
   Afloat, when with fierce Winds Orion arm'd
   Hath vext the Red-Sea Coast, whose waves orethrew
   Busiris and his Memphian Chivalrie,
   While with perfidious hatred they pursu'd
   The Sojourners of Goshen, who beheld
   From the safe shore their floating Carkases                         310
   And broken Chariot Wheels, so thick bestrown
   Abject and lost lay these, covering the Flood,
   Under amazement of their hideous change.
   He call'd so loud, that all the hollow Deep
   Of Hell resounded. Princes, Potentates,
   Warriers, the Flowr of Heav'n, once yours, now lost,
   If such astonishment as this can sieze
   Eternal spirits; or have ye chos'n this place
   After the toyl of Battel to repose
   Your wearied vertue, for the ease you find                          320
   To slumber here, as in the Vales of Heav'n?
   Or in this abject posture have ye sworn
   To adore the Conquerour? who now beholds
   Cherube and Seraph rowling in the Flood
   With scatter'd Arms and Ensigns, till anon
   His swift pursuers from Heav'n Gates discern
   Th' advantage, and descending tread us down
   Thus drooping, or with linked Thunderbolts
   Transfix us to the bottom of this Gulfe.
   Awake, arise, or be for ever fall'n.                                330
   They heard, and were abasht, and up they sprung
   Upon the wing, as when men wont to watch
   On duty, sleeping found by whom they dread,
   Rouse and bestir themselves ere well awake.
   Nor did they not perceave the evil plight
   In which they were, or the fierce pains not feel;
   Yet to their Generals Voyce they soon obeyd
   Innumerable. As when the potent Rod
   Of Amrams Son in Egypts evill day
   Wav'd round the Coast, up call'd a pitchy cloud                     340
   Of Locusts, warping on the Eastern Wind,
   That ore the Realm of impious Pharoah hung
   Like Night, and darken'd all the Land of Nile:
   So numberless were those bad Angels seen
   Hovering on wing under the Cope of Hell
   'Twixt upper, nether, and surrounding Fires;
   Till, as a signal giv'n, th' uplifted Spear
   Of their great Sultan waving to direct
   Thir course, in even ballance down they light
   On the firm brimstone, and fill all the Plain;                      350
   A multitude, like which the populous North
   Pour'd never from her frozen loyns, to pass
   Rhene or the Danaw, when her barbarous Sons
   Came like a Deluge on the South, and spread
   Beneath Gibraltar to the Lybian sands.
   Forthwith from every Squadron and each Band
   The Heads and Leaders thither hast where stood
   Their great Commander; Godlike shapes and forms
   Excelling human, Princely Dignities,
   And Powers that earst in Heaven sat on Thrones;                     360
   Though of their Names in heav'nly Records now
   Be no memorial, blotted out and ras'd
   By thir Rebellion, from the Books of Life.
   Nor had they yet among the Sons of Eve
   Got them new Names, till wandring ore the Earth,
   Through Gods high sufferance for the tryal of man,
   By falsities and lyes the greatest part
   Of Mankind they corrupted to forsake
   God their Creator, and th' invisible
   Glory of him, that made them, to transform                          370
   Oft to the Image of a Brute, adorn'd
   With gay Religions full of Pomp and Gold,
   And Devils to adore for Deities:
   Then were they known to men by various Names,
   And various Idols through the Heathen World.
   Say, Muse, their Names then known, who first, who last,
   Rous'd from the slumber, on that fiery Couch,
   At thir great Emperors call, as next in worth
   Came singly where he stood on the bare strand,
   While the promiscuous croud stood yet aloof?                        380
   The chief were those who from the Pit of Hell
   Roaming to seek their prey on earth, durst fix
   Their Seats long after next the Seat of God,
   Their Altars by his Altar, Gods ador'd
   Among the Nations round, and durst abide
   Jehovah thundring out of Sion, thron'd
   Between the Cherubim; yea, often plac'd
   Within his Sanctuary it self their Shrines,
   Abominations; and with cursed things
   His holy Rites, and solemn Feasts profan'd,                         390
   And with their darkness durst affront his light.
   First Moloch, horrid King besmear'd with blood
   Of human sacrifice, and parents tears,
   Though for the noyse of Drums and Timbrels loud
   Their childrens cries unheard, that past through fire
   To his grim Idol. Him the Ammonite
   Worshipt in Rabba and her watry Plain,
   In Argob and in Basan, to the stream
   Of utmost Arnon. Nor content with such
   Audacious neighbourhood, the wisest heart                           400
   Of Solomon he led by fraud to build
   His Temple right against the Temple of God
   On that opprobrious Hill, and made his Grove
   The pleasant Vally of Hinnom, Tophet thence
   And black Gehenna call'd, the Type of Hell.
   Next Chemos, th' obscene dread of Moabs Sons,
   From Aroer to Nebo, and the wild
   Of Southmost Abarim; in Hesebon
   And Heronaim, Seons Realm, beyond
   The flowry Dale of Sibma clad with Vines,                           410
   And Eleale to th' Asphaltick Pool.
   Peor his other Name, when he entic'd
   Israel in Sittim on their march from Nile
   To do him wanton rites, which cost them woe.
   Yet thence his lustful Orgies he enlarg'd
   Even to that Hill of scandal, by the Grove
   Of Moloch homicide, lust hard by hate;
   Till good Josiah drove them thence to Hell.
   With these came they, who from the bordring flood
   Of old Euphrates to the Brook that parts                            420
   Egypt from Syrian ground, had general Names
   Of Baalim and Ashtaroth, those male,
   These Feminine. For Spirits when they please
   Can either Sex assume, or both; so soft
   And uncompounded is their Essence pure,
   Not ti'd or manacl'd with joynt or limb,
   Nor founded on the brittle strength of bones,
   Like cumbrous flesh; but in what shape they choose
   Dilated or condens't, bright or obscure,
   Can execute their aerie purposes,                                   430
   And works of love or enmity fulfill.
   For those the Race of Israel oft forsook
   Their living strength, and unfrequented left
   His righteous Altar, bowing lowly down
   To bestial Gods; for which their heads as low
   Bow'd down in Battel, sunk before the Spear
   Of despicable foes. With these in troop
   Came Astoreth, whom the Phoenicians call'd
   Astarte, Queen of Heav'n, with crescent Horns;
   To whose bright Image nightly by the Moon                           440
   Sidonian Virgins paid their Vows and Songs,
   In Sion also not unsung, where stood
   Her Temple on th' offensive Mountain, built
   By that uxorious King, whose heart though large,
   Beguil'd by fair Idolatresses, fell
   To Idols foul. Thammuz came next behind,
   Whose annual wound in Lebanon allur'd
   The Syrian Damsels to lament his fate
   In amorous dittyes all a Summers day,
   While smooth Adonis from his native Rock                            450
   Ran purple to the Sea, suppos'd with blood
   Of Thammuz yearly wounded: the Love-tale
   Infected Sions daughters with like heat,
   Whose wanton passions in the sacred Porch
   Ezekiel saw, when by the Vision led
   His eye survay'd the dark Idolatries
   Of alienated Judah. Next came one
   Who mourn'd in earnest, when the Captive Ark
   Maim'd his brute Image, head and hands lopt off
   In his own Temple, on the grunsel edge,                             460
   Where he fell flat, and sham'd his Worshipers:
   Dagon his Name, Sea Monster, upward Man
   And downward Fish: yet had his Temple high
   Rear'd in Azotus, dreaded through the Coast
   Of Palestine, in Gath and Ascalon,
   And Accaron and Gaza's frontier bounds.
   Him follow'd Rimmon, whose delightful Seat
   Was fair Damascus, on the fertil Banks
   Of Abbana and Pharphar, lucid streams.
   He also against the house of God was bold:                          470
   A Leper once he lost and gain'd a King,
   Ahaz his sottish Conquerour, whom he drew
   Gods Altar to disparage and displace
   For one of Syrian mode, whereon to burn
   His odious offrings, and adore the Gods
   Whom he had vanquisht. After these appear'd
   A crew who under Names of old Renown,
   Osiris, Isis, Orus and their Train
   With monstrous shapes and sorceries abus'd
   Fanatic Egypt and her Priests, to seek                              480
   Thir wandring Gods disguis'd in brutish forms
   Rather then human. Nor did Israel scape
   Th' infection when their borrow'd Gold compos'd
   The Calf in Oreb: and the Rebel King
   Doubl'd that sin in Bethel and in Dan,
   Lik'ning his Maker to the Grazed Ox,
   Jehovah, who in one Night when he pass'd
   From Egypt marching, equal'd with one stroke
   Both her first born and all her bleating Gods.
   Belial came last, then whom a Spirit more lewd                      490
   Fell not from Heaven, or more gross to love
   Vice for it self: To him no Temple stood
   Or Altar smoak'd; yet who more oft then hee
   In Temples and at Altars, when the Priest
   Turns Atheist, as did Ely's Sons, who fill'd
   With lust and violence the house of God.
   In Courts and Palaces he also Reigns
   And in luxurious Cities, where the noyse
   Of riot ascends above thir loftiest Towrs,
   And injury and outrage: And when Night                              500
   Darkens the Streets, then wander forth the Sons
   Of Belial, flown with insolence and wine.
   Witness the Streets of Sodom, and that night
   In Gibeah, when hospitable Dores
   Yielded thir Matrons to prevent worse rape.
   These were the prime in order and in might;
   The rest were long to tell, though far renown'd,
   Th' Ionian Gods, of Javans Issue held
   Gods, yet confest later then Heav'n and Earth
   Thir boasted Parents; Titan Heav'ns first born                      510
   With his enormous brood, and birthright seis'd
   By younger Saturn, he from mightier Jove
   His own and Rhea's Son like measure found;
   So Jove usurping reign'd: these first in Creet
   And Ida known, thence on the Snowy top
   Of cold Olympus rul'd the middle Air
   Thir highest Heav'n; or on the Delphian Cliff,
   Or in Dodona, and through all the bounds
   Of Doric Land; or who with Saturn old
   Fled over Adria to th' Hesperian Fields,                            520
   And ore the Celtic roam'd the utmost Isles.
   All these and more came flocking; but with looks
   Down cast and damp, yet such wherein appear'd
   Obscure som glimps of joy, to have found thir chief
   Not in despair, to have found themselves not lost
   In loss it self; which on his count'nance cast
   Like doubtful hue: but he his wonted pride
   Soon recollecting, with high words, that bore
   Semblance of worth not substance, gently rais'd
   Their fainted courage, and dispel'd their fears.                    530
   Then strait commands that at the warlike sound
   Of Trumpets loud and Clarions be upreard
   His mighty Standard; that proud honour claim'd
   Azazel as his right, a Cherube tall:
   Who forthwith from the glittering Staff unfurld
   Th' Imperial Ensign, which full high advanc't
   Shon like a Meteor streaming to the Wind
   With Gemms and Golden lustre rich imblaz'd,
   Seraphic arms and Trophies: all the while
   Sonorous mettal blowing Martial sounds:                             540
   At which the universal Host upsent
   A shout that tore Hells Concave, and beyond
   Frighted the Reign of Chaos and old Night.
   All in a moment through the gloom were seen
   Ten thousand Banners rise into the Air
   With Orient Colours waving: with them rose
   A Forrest huge of Spears: and thronging Helms
   Appear'd, and serried Shields in thick array
   Of depth immeasurable: Anon they move
   In perfect Phalanx to the Dorian mood                               550
   Of Flutes and soft Recorders; such as rais'd
   To highth of noblest temper Hero's old
   Arming to Battel, and in stead of rage
   Deliberate valour breath'd, firm and unmov'd
   With dread of death to flight or foul retreat,
   Nor wanting power to mitigate and swage
   With solemn touches, troubl'd thoughts, and chase
   Anguish and doubt and fear and sorrow and pain
   From mortal or immortal minds. Thus they
   Breathing united force with fixed thought                           560
   Mov'd on in silence to soft Pipes that charm'd
   Thir painful steps o're the burnt soyle; and now
   Advanc't in view they stand, a horrid Front
   Of dreadful length and dazling Arms, in guise
   Of Warriers old with order'd Spear and Shield,
   Awaiting what command thir mighty Chief
   Had to impose: He through the armed Files
   Darts his experienc't eye, and soon traverse
   The whole Battalion views, thir order due,
   Thir visages and stature as of Gods,                                570
   Thir number last he summs. And now his heart
   Distends with pride, and hardning in his strength
   Glories: For never since created man,
   Met such imbodied force, as nam'd with these
   Could merit more then that small infantry
   Warr'd on by Cranes: though all the Giant brood
   Of Phlegra with th' Heroic Race were joyn'd
   That fought at Theb's and Ilium, on each side
   Mixt with auxiliar Gods; and what resounds
   In Fable or Romance of Uthers Son                                   580
   Begirt with British and Armoric Knights;
   And all who since, Baptiz'd or Infidel
   Jousted in Aspramont or Montalban,
   Damasco, or Marocco, or Trebisond,
   Or whom Biserta sent from Afric shore
   When Charlemain with all his Peerage fell
   By Fontarabbia. Thus far these beyond
   Compare of mortal prowess, yet observ'd
   Thir dread Commander: he above the rest
   In shape and gesture proudly eminent                                590
   Stood like a Towr; his form had yet not lost
   All her Original brightness, nor appear'd
   Less then Arch Angel ruind, and th' excess
   Of Glory obscur'd: As when the Sun new ris'n
   Looks through the Horizontal misty Air
   Shorn of his Beams, or from behind the Moon
   In dim Eclips disastrous twilight sheds
   On half the Nations, and with fear of change
   Perplexes Monarchs. Dark'n'd so, yet shon
   Above them all th' Arch Angel: but his face                         600
   Deep scars of Thunder had intrencht, and care
   Sat on his faded cheek, but under Browes
   Of dauntless courage, and considerate Pride
   Waiting revenge: cruel his eye, but cast
   Signs of remorse and passion to behold
   The fellows of his crime, the followers rather
   (Far other once beheld in bliss) condemn'd
   For ever now to have their lot in pain,
   Millions of Spirits for his fault amerc't
   Of Heav'n, and from Eternal Splendors flung                         610
   For his revolt, yet faithfull how they stood,
   Thir Glory witherd. As when Heavens Fire
   Hath scath'd the Forrest Oaks, or Mountain Pines,
   With singed top their stately growth though bare
   Stands on the blasted Heath. He now prepar'd
   To speak; whereat their doubl'd Ranks they bend
   From Wing to Wing, and half enclose him round
   With all his Peers: attention held them mute.
   Thrice he assayd, and thrice in spite of scorn,
   Tears such as Angels weep, burst forth: at last                     620
   Words interwove with sighs found out their way.
   O Myriads of immortal Spirits, O Powers
   Matchless, but with th' Almighty, and that strife
   Was not inglorious, though th' event was dire,
   As this place testifies, and this dire change
   Hateful to utter: but what power of mind
   Foreseeing or presaging, from the Depth
   Of knowledge past or present, could have fear'd,
   How such united force of Gods, how such
   As stood like these, could ever know repulse?                       630
   For who can yet beleeve, though after loss,
   That all these puissant Legions, whose exile
   Hath emptied Heav'n, shall faile to re-ascend
   Self-rais'd, and repossess their native seat.
   For me, be witness all the Host of Heav'n,
   If counsels different, or danger shun'd
   By me, have lost our hopes. But he who reigns
   Monarch in Heav'n, till then as one secure
   Sat on his Throne, upheld by old repute,
   Consent or custome, and his Regal State                             640
   Put forth at full, but still his strength conceal'd,
   Which tempted our attempt, and wrought our fall.
   Henceforth his might we know, and know our own
   So as not either to provoke, or dread
   New warr, provok't; our better part remains
   To work in close design, by fraud or guile
   What force effected not: that he no less
   At length from us may find, who overcomes
   By force, hath overcome but half his foe.
   Space may produce new Worlds; whereof so rife                       650
   There went a fame in Heav'n that he ere long
   Intended to create, and therein plant
   A generation, whom his choice regard
   Should favour equal to the Sons of Heaven:
   Thither, if but to prie, shall be perhaps
   Our first eruption, thither or elsewhere:
   For this Infernal Pit shall never hold
   Caelestial Spirits in Bondage, nor th' Abysse
   Long under darkness cover. But these thoughts
   Full Counsel must mature: Peace is despaird,                        660
   For who can think Submission? Warr then, Warr
   Open or understood must be resolv'd.
   He spake: and to confirm his words, out-flew
   Millions of flaming swords, drawn from the thighs
   Of mighty Cherubim; the sudden blaze
   Far round illumin'd hell: highly they rag'd
   Against the Highest, and fierce with grasped arm's
   Clash'd on their sounding shields the din of war,
   Hurling defiance toward the vault of Heav'n.
   There stood a Hill not far whose griesly top                        670
   Belch'd fire and rowling smoak; the rest entire
   Shon with a glossie scurff, undoubted sign
   That in his womb was hid metallic Ore,
   The work of Sulphur. Thither wing'd with speed
   A numerous Brigad hasten'd. As when bands
   Of Pioners with Spade and Pickaxe arm'd
   Forerun the Royal Camp, to trench a Field,
   Or cast a Rampart. Mammon led them on,
   Mammon, the least erected Spirit that fell
   From heav'n, for ev'n in heav'n his looks and thoughts              680
   Were always downward bent, admiring more
   The riches of Heav'ns pavement, trod'n Gold,
   Then aught divine or holy else enjoy'd
   In vision beatific: by him first
   Men also, and by his suggestion taught,
   Ransack'd the Center, and with impious hands
   Rifl'd the bowels of thir mother Earth
   For Treasures better hid. Soon had his crew
   Op'nd into the Hill a spacious wound
   And dig'd out ribs of Gold. Let none admire                         690
   That riches grow in Hell; that soyle may best
   Deserve the pretious bane. And here let those
   Who boast in mortal things, and wondring tell
   Of Babel, and the works of Memphian Kings,
   Learn how thir greatest Monuments of Fame,
   And Strength and Art are easily outdone
   By Spirits reprobate, and in an hour
   What in an age they with incessant toyle
   And hands innumerable scarce perform.
   Nigh on the Plain in many cells prepar'd,                           700
   That underneath had veins of liquid fire
   Sluc'd from the Lake, a second multitude
   With wondrous Art founded the massie Ore,
   Severing each kinde, and scum'd the Bullion dross:
   A third as soon had form'd within the ground
   A various mould, and from the boyling cells
   By strange conveyance fill'd each hollow nook,
   As in an Organ from one blast of wind
   To many a row of Pipes the sound-board breaths.
   Anon out of the earth a Fabrick huge                                710
   Rose like an Exhalation, with the sound
   Of Dulcet Symphonies and voices sweet,
   Built like a Temple, where Pilasters round
   Were set, and Doric pillars overlaid
   With Golden Architrave; nor did there want
   Cornice or Freeze, with bossy Sculptures grav'n,
   The Roof was fretted Gold. Not Babilon,
   Nor great Alcairo such magnificence
   Equal'd in all thir glories, to inshrine
   Belus or Serapis thir Gods, or seat                                 720
   Thir Kings, when Aegypt with Assyria strove
   In wealth and luxurie. Th' ascending pile
   Stood fixt her stately highth, and strait the dores
   Op'ning thir brazen foulds discover wide
   Within, her ample spaces, o're the smooth
   And level pavement: from the arched roof
   Pendant by suttle Magic many a row
   Of Starry Lamps and blazing Cressets fed
   With Naphtha and Asphaltus yeilded light
   As from a sky. The hasty multitude                                  730
   Admiring enter'd, and the work some praise
   And some the Architect: his hand was known
   In Heav'n by many a Towred structure high,
   Where Scepter'd Angels held thir residence,
   And sat as Princes, whom the supreme King
   Exalted to such power, and gave to rule,
   Each in his Herarchie, the Orders bright.
   Nor was his name unheard or unador'd
   In ancient Greece; and in Ausonian land
   Men call'd him Mulciber; and how he fell                            740
   From Heav'n, they fabl'd, thrown by angry Jove
   Sheer o're the Chrystal Battlements: from Morn
   To Noon he fell, from Noon to dewy Eve,
   A Summers day; and with the setting Sun
   Dropt from the Zenith like a falling Star,
   On Lemnos th' Aegaean Ile: thus they relate,
   Erring; for he with this rebellious rout
   Fell long before; nor aught avail'd him now
   To have built in Heav'n high Towrs; nor did he scape
   By all his Engins, but was headlong sent                            750
   With his industrious crew to build in hell.
   Mean while the winged Haralds by command
   Of Sovran power, with awful Ceremony
   And Trumpets sound throughout the Host proclaim
   A solemn Councel forthwith to be held
   At Pandaemonium, the high Capital
   Of Satan and his Peers: thir summons call'd
   From Band and squared Regiment
   By place or choice the worthiest; they anon
   With hundreds and with thousands trooping came                      760
   Attended: all access was throng'd, the Gates
   And Porches wide, but chief the spacious Hall
   (Though like a cover'd field, where Champions bold
   Wont ride in arm'd, and at the Soldans chair
   Defi'd the best of Panim chivalry
   To mortal combat or carreer with Lance)
   Thick swarm'd, both on the ground and in the air,
   Brusht with the hiss of russling wings. As Bees
   In spring time, when the Sun with Taurus rides,
   Poure forth thir populous youth about the Hive                      770
   In clusters; they among fresh dews and flowers
   Flie to and fro, or on the smoothed Plank,
   The suburb of thir Straw-built Cittadel,
   New rub'd with Baume, expatiate and confer
   Thir State affairs. So thick the aerie crowd
   Swarm'd and were straitn'd; till the Signal giv'n,
   Behold a wonder! they but now who seemd
   In bigness to surpass Earths Giant Sons
   Now less then smallest Dwarfs, in narrow room
   Throng numberless, like that Pigmean Race                           780
   Beyond the Indian Mount, or Faerie Elves,
   Whose midnight Revels, by a Forrest side
   Or Fountain some belated Peasant sees,
   Or dreams he sees, while over head the Moon
   Sits Arbitress, and neerer to the Earth
   Wheels her pale course, they on thir mirth & dance
   Intent, with jocond Music charm his ear;
   At once with joy and fear his heart rebounds.
   Thus incorporeal Spirits to smallest forms
   Reduc'd thir shapes immense, and were at large,                     790
   Though without number still amidst the Hall
   Of that infernal Court. But far within
   And in thir own dimensions like themselves
   The great Seraphic Lords and Cherubim
   In close recess and secret conclave sat
   A thousand Demy-Gods on golden seat's,
   Frequent and full. After short silence then
   And summons read, the great consult began.
 
   Notes:
   504, 505 hospitable Dores Yielded thir Matrons] the hospitable
   door Expos'd a Matron 1674.
   530 fainted] fa(i)nting 1674.
   703 founded] found out 1674.
   737 Herarchie] Hierarchie 1674.
 
   The End Of The First Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK II.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 The Consultation begun, Satan debates whether another Battel be to be
 hazarded for the recovery of Heaven: some advise it, others dissuade: A
 third proposal is prefer'd, mention'd before by Satan, to search the
 truth of that Prophesie or Tradition in Heaven concerning another world,
 and another kind of creature equal or much inferiour to themselves,
 about this time to be created:  Thir doubt who shall be sent on this
 difficult search: Satan thir cheif undertakes alone the voyage, is
 honourd and applauded.   The Councel thus ended, the rest betake them
 several wayes and to several imployments, as thir inclinations lead
 them, to entertain the time till Satan return. He passes on his Journey
 to Hell Gates, finds them shut, and who sat there to guard them, by whom
 at length they are op'nd, and discover to him the great Gulf between
 Hell and Heaven; with what difficulty he passes through, directed by
 Chaos the Power of that place, to the sight of this new World which he
 sought.
 
 Note: who shall be sent] who should be sent 1669.
 
 
   High on a Throne of Royal State, which far
   Outshon the wealth of Ormus and of Ind,
   Or where the gorgeous East with richest hand
   Showrs on her Kings Barbaric Pearl & Gold,
   Satan exalted sat, by merit rais'd
   To that bad eminence; and from despair
   Thus high uplifted beyond hope, aspires
   Beyond thus high, insatiate to pursue
   Vain Warr with Heav'n, and by success untaught
   His proud imaginations thus displaid.                                10
   Powers and Dominions, Deities of Heav'n,
   For since no deep within her gulf can hold
   Immortal vigor, though opprest and fall'n,
   I give not Heav'n for lost. From this descent
   Celestial vertues rising, will appear
   More glorious and more dread then from no fall,
   And trust themselves to fear no second fate:
   Mee though just right, and the fixt Laws of Heav'n
   Did first create your Leader, next, free choice,
   With what besides, in Counsel or in Fight,                           20
   Hath bin achievd of merit, yet this loss
   Thus farr at least recover'd, hath much more
   Establisht in a safe unenvied Throne
   Yielded with full consent. The happier state
   In Heav'n, which follows dignity, might draw
   Envy from each inferior; but who here
   Will envy whom the highest place exposes
   Formost to stand against the Thunderers aime
   Your bulwark, and condemns to greatest share
   Of endless pain? where there is then no good                         30
   For which to strive, no strife can grow up there
   From Faction; for none sure will claim in hell
   Precedence, none, whose portion is so small
   Of present pain, that with ambitious mind
   Will covet more. With this advantage then
   To union, and firm Faith, and firm accord,
   More then can be in Heav'n, we now return
   To claim our just inheritance of old,
   Surer to prosper then prosperity
   Could have assur'd us; and by what best way,                         40
   Whether of open Warr or covert guile,
   We now debate; who can advise, may speak.
   He ceas'd, and next him Moloc, Scepter'd King
   Stood up, the strongest and the fiercest Spirit
   That fought in Heav'n; now fiercer by despair:
   His trust was with th' Eternal to be deem'd
   Equal in strength, and rather then be less
   Car'd not to be at all; with that care lost
   Went all his fear: of God, or Hell, or worse
   He reckd not, and these words thereafter spake.                      50
   My sentence is for open Warr: Of Wiles,
   More unexpert, I boast not: them let those
   Contrive who need, or when they need, not now.
   For while they sit contriving, shall the rest,
   Millions that stand in Arms, and longing wait
   The Signal to ascend, sit lingring here
   Heav'ns fugitives, and for thir dwelling place
   Accept this dark opprobrious Den of shame,
   The Prison of his Tyranny who Reigns
   By our delay? no, let us rather choose                               60
   Arm'd with Hell flames and fury all at once
   O're Heav'ns high Towrs to force resistless way,
   Turning our Tortures into horrid Arms
   Against the Torturer; when to meet the noise
   Of his Almighty Engin he shall hear
   Infernal Thunder, and for Lightning see
   Black fire and horror shot with equal rage
   Among his Angels; and his Throne it self
   Mixt with Tartarean Sulphur, and strange fire,
   His own invented Torments. But perhaps                               70
   The way seems difficult and steep to scale
   With upright wing against a higher foe.
   Let such bethink them, if the sleepy drench
   Of that forgetful Lake benumme not still,
   That in our proper motion we ascend
   Up to our native seat: descent and fall
   To us is adverse. Who but felt of late
   When the fierce Foe hung on our brok'n Rear
   Insulting, and pursu'd us through the Deep,
   With what compulsion and laborious flight                            80
   We sunk thus low? Th' ascent is easie then;
   Th' event is fear'd; should we again provoke
   Our stronger, some worse way his wrath may find
   To our destruction: if there be in Hell
   Fear to be worse destroy'd: what can be worse
   Then to dwell here, driv'n out from bliss, condemn'd
   In this abhorred deep to utter woe;
   Where pain of unextinguishable fire
   Must exercise us without hope of end
   The Vassals of his anger, when the Scourge                           90
   Inexorably, and the torturing houre
   Calls us to Penance? More destroy'd then thus
   We should be quite abolisht and expire.
   What fear we then? what doubt we to incense
   His utmost ire? which to the highth enrag'd,
   Will either quite consume us, and reduce
   To nothing this essential, happier farr
   Then miserable to have eternal being:
   Or if our substance be indeed Divine,
   And cannot cease to be, we are at worst                             100
   On this side nothing; and by proof we feel
   Our power sufficient to disturb his Heav'n,
   And with perpetual inrodes to Allarme,
   Though inaccessible, his fatal Throne:
   Which if not Victory is yet Revenge.
   He ended frowning, and his look denounc'd
   Desperate revenge, and Battel dangerous
   To less then Gods. On th' other side up rose
   Belial, in act more graceful and humane;
   A fairer person lost not Heav'n; he seemd                           110
   For dignity compos'd and high exploit:
   But all was false and hollow; though his Tongue
   Dropt Manna, and could make the worse appear
   The better reason, to perplex and dash
   Maturest Counsels: for his thoughts were low;
   To vice industrious, but to Nobler deeds
   Timorous and slothful: yet he pleas'd the eare,
   And with perswasive accent thus began.
   I should be much for open Warr, O Peers,
   As not behind in hate; if what was urg'd                            120
   Main reason to perswade immediate Warr,
   Did not disswade me most, and seem to cast
   Ominous conjecture on the whole success:
   When he who most excels in fact of Arms,
   In what he counsels and in what excels
   Mistrustful, grounds his courage on despair
   And utter dissolution, as the scope
   Of all his aim, after some dire revenge.
   First, what Revenge? the Towrs of Heav'n are fill'd
   With Armed watch, that render all access                            130
   Impregnable; oft on the bordering Deep
   Encamp thir Legions, or with obscure wing
   Scout farr and wide into the Realm of night,
   Scorning surprize. Or could we break our way
   By force, and at our heels all Hell should rise
   With blackest Insurrection, to confound
   Heav'ns purest Light, yet our great Enemie
   All incorruptible would on his Throne
   Sit unpolluted, and th' Ethereal mould
   Incapable of stain would soon expel                                 140
   Her mischief, and purge off the baser fire
   Victorious. Thus repuls'd, our final hope
   Is flat despair: we must exasperate
   Th' Almighty Victor to spend all his rage,
   And that must end us, that must be our cure,
   To be no more; sad cure; for who would loose,
   Though full of pain, this intellectual being,
   Those thoughts that wander through Eternity,
   To perish rather, swallowd up and lost
   In the wide womb of uncreated night,                                150
   Devoid of sense and motion? and who knows,
   Let this be good, whether our angry Foe
   Can give it, or will ever? how he can
   Is doubtful; that he never will is sure.
   Will he, so wise, let loose at once his ire,
   Belike through impotence, or unaware,
   To give his Enemies thir wish, and end
   Them in his anger, whom his anger saves
   To punish endless? wherefore cease we then?
   Say they who counsel Warr, we are decreed,                          160
   Reserv'd and destin'd to Eternal woe;
   Whatever doing, what can we suffer more,
   What can we suffer worse? is this then worst,
   Thus sitting, thus consulting, thus in Arms?
   What when we fled amain, pursu'd and strook
   With Heav'ns afflicting Thunder, and besought
   The Deep to shelter us? this Hell then seem'd
   A refuge from those wounds: or when we lay
   Chain'd on the burning Lake? that sure was worse.
   What if the breath that kindl'd those grim fires                    170
   Awak'd should blow them into sevenfold rage
   And plunge us in the Flames? or from above
   Should intermitted vengeance Arme again
   His red right hand to plague us? what if all
   Her stores were op'n'd, and this Firmament
   Of Hell should spout her Cataracts of Fire,
   Impendent horrors, threatning hideous fall
   One day upon our heads; while we perhaps
   Designing or exhorting glorious Warr,
   Caught in a fierie Tempest shall be hurl'd                          180
   Each on his rock transfixt, the sport and prey
   Of racking whirlwinds, or for ever sunk
   Under yon boyling Ocean, wrapt in Chains;
   There to converse with everlasting groans,
   Unrespited, unpitied, unrepreevd,
   Ages of hopeless end; this would be worse.
   Warr therefore, open or conceal'd, alike
   My voice disswades; for what can force or guile
   With him, or who deceive his mind, whose eye
   Views all things at one view? he from heav'ns highth                190
   All these our motions vain, sees and derides;
   Not more Almighty to resist our might
   Then wise to frustrate all our plots and wiles.
   Shall we then live thus vile, the race of Heav'n
   Thus trampl'd, thus expell'd to suffer here
   Chains and these Torments? better these then worse
   By my advice; since fate inevitable
   Subdues us, and Omnipotent Decree,
   The Victors will. To suffer, as to doe,
   Our strength is equal, nor the Law unjust                           200
   That so ordains: this was at first resolv'd,
   If we were wise, against so great a foe
   Contending, and so doubtful what might fall.
   I laugh, when those who at the Spear are bold
   And vent'rous, if that fail them, shrink and fear
   What yet they know must follow, to endure
   Exile, or ignominy, or bonds, or pain,
   The sentence of thir Conquerour: This is now
   Our doom; which if we can sustain and bear,
   Our Supream Foe in time may much remit                              210
   His anger, and perhaps thus farr remov'd
   Not mind us not offending, satisfi'd
   With what is punish't; whence these raging fires
   Will slack'n, if his breath stir not thir flames.
   Our purer essence then will overcome
   Thir noxious vapour, or enur'd not feel,
   Or chang'd at length, and to the place conformd
   In temper and in nature, will receive
   Familiar the fierce heat, and void of pain;
   This horror will grow milde, this darkness light,                   220
   Besides what hope the never-ending flight
   Of future days may bring, what chance, what change
   Worth waiting, since our present lot appeers
   For happy though but ill, for ill not worst,
   If we procure not to our selves more woe.
   Thus Belial with words cloath'd in reasons garb
   Counsel'd ignoble ease, and peaceful sloath,
   Not peace: and after him thus Mammon spake.
   Either to disinthrone the King of Heav'n
   We warr, if warr be best, or to regain                              230
   Our own right lost: him to unthrone we then
   May hope, when everlasting Fate shall yeild
   To fickle Chance, and Chaos judge the strife:
   The former vain to hope argues as vain
   The latter: for what place can be for us
   Within Heav'ns bound, unless Heav'ns Lord supream
   We overpower? Suppose he should relent
   And publish Grace to all, on promise made
   Of new Subjection; with what eyes could we
   Stand in his presence humble, and receive                           240
   Strict Laws impos'd, to celebrate his Throne
   With warbl'd Hymns, and to his Godhead sing
   Forc't Halleluiah's; while he Lordly sits
   Our envied Sovran, and his Altar breathes
   Ambrosial Odours and Ambrosial Flowers,
   Our servile offerings. This must be our task
   In Heav'n, this our delight; how wearisom
   Eternity so spent in worship paid
   To whom we hate. Let us not then pursue
   By force impossible, by leave obtain'd                              250
   Unacceptable, though in Heav'n, our state
   Of splendid vassalage, but rather seek
   Our own good from our selves, and from our own
   Live to our selves, though in this vast recess,
   Free, and to none accountable, preferring
   Hard liberty before the easie yoke
   Of servile Pomp. Our greatness will appear
   Then most conspicuous, when great things of small,
   Useful of hurtful, prosperous of adverse
   We can create, and in what place so e're                            260
   Thrive under evil, and work ease out of pain
   Through labour and endurance. This deep world
   Of darkness do we dread? How oft amidst
   Thick clouds and dark doth Heav'ns all-ruling Sire
   Choose to reside, his Glory unobscur'd,
   And with the Majesty of darkness round
   Covers his Throne; from whence deep thunders roar
   Must'ring thir rage, and Heav'n resembles Hell?
   As he our Darkness, cannot we his Light
   Imitate when we please? This Desart soile                           270
   Wants not her hidden lustre, Gemms and Gold;
   Nor want we skill or art, from whence to raise
   Magnificence; and what can Heav'n shew more?
   Our torments also may in length of time
   Become our Elements, these piercing Fires
   As soft as now severe, our temper chang'd
   Into their temper; which must needs remove
   The sensible of pain. All things invite
   To peaceful Counsels, and the settl'd State
   Of order, how in safety best we may                                 280
   Compose our present evils, with regard
   Of what we are and where, dismissing quite
   All thoughts of Warr: ye have what I advise.
   He scarce had finisht, when such murmur filld
   Th' Assembly, as when hollow Rocks retain
   The sound of blustring winds, which all night long
   Had rous'd the Sea, now with hoarse cadence lull
   Sea-faring men orewatcht, whose Bark by chance
   Or Pinnace anchors in a craggy Bay
   After the Tempest: Such applause was heard                          290
   As Mammon ended, and his Sentence pleas'd,
   Advising peace: for such another Field
   They dreaded worse then Hell: so much the fear
   Of Thunder and the Sword of Michael
   Wrought still within them; and no less desire
   To found this nether Empire, which might rise
   By pollicy, and long process of time,
   In emulation opposite to Heav'n.
   Which when Beelzebub perceiv'd, then whom,
   Satan except, none higher sat, with grave                           300
   Aspect he rose, and in his rising seem'd
   A Pillar of State; deep on his Front engraven
   Deliberation sat and publick care;
   And Princely counsel in his face yet shon,
   Majestick though in ruin: sage he stood
   With Atlantean shoulders fit to bear
   The weight of mightiest Monarchies; his look
   Drew audience and attention still as Night
   Or Summers Noon-tide air, while thus he spake.
   Thrones and imperial Powers, off-spring of heav'n,                  310
   Ethereal Vertues; or these Titles now
   Must we renounce, and changing stile be call'd
   Princes of Hell? for so the popular vote
   Inclines, here to continue, and build up here
   A growing Empire; doubtless; while we dream,
   And know not that the King of Heav'n hath doom'd
   This place our dungeon, not our safe retreat
   Beyond his Potent arm, to live exempt
   From Heav'ns high jurisdiction, in new League
   Banded against his Throne, but to remaine                           320
   In strictest bondage, though thus far remov'd,
   Under th' inevitable curb, reserv'd
   His captive multitude: For he, be sure,
   In highth or depth, still first and last will Reign
   Sole King, and of his Kingdom loose no part
   By our revolt, but over Hell extend
   His Empire, and with Iron Scepter rule
   Us here, as with his Golden those in Heav'n.
   What sit we then projecting Peace and Warr?
   Warr hath determin'd us, and foild with loss                        330
   Irreparable; tearms of peace yet none
   Voutsaf't or sought; for what peace will be giv'n
   To us enslav'd, but custody severe,
   And stripes, and arbitrary punishment
   Inflicted? and what peace can we return,
   But to our power hostility and hate,
   Untam'd reluctance, and revenge though slow,
   Yet ever plotting how the Conquerour least
   May reap his conquest, and may least rejoyce
   In doing what we most in suffering feel?                            340
   Nor will occasion want, nor shall we need
   With dangerous expedition to invade
   Heav'n, whose high walls fear no assault or Siege,
   Or ambush from the Deep. What if we find
   Some easier enterprize? There is a place
   (If ancient and prophetic fame in Heav'n
   Err not) another World, the happy seat
   Of som new Race call'd Man, about this time
   To be created like to us, though less
   In power and excellence, but favour'd more                          350
   Of him who rules above; so was his will
   Pronounc'd among the Gods, and by an Oath,
   That shook Heav'ns whol circumference, confirm'd.
   Thither let us bend all our thoughts, to learn
   What creatures there inhabit, of what mould,
   Or substance, how endu'd, and what thir Power,
   And where thir weakness, how attempted best,
   By force or suttlety: Though Heav'n be shut,
   And Heav'ns high Arbitrator sit secure
   In his own strength, this place may lye expos'd                     360
   The utmost border of his Kingdom, left
   To their defence who hold it: here perhaps
   Som advantagious act may be achiev'd
   By sudden onset, either with Hell fire
   To waste his whole Creation, or possess
   All as our own, and drive as we were driven,
   The punie habitants, or if not drive,
   Seduce them to our Party, that thir God
   May prove thir foe, and with repenting hand
   Abolish his own works. This would surpass                           370
   Common revenge, and interrupt his joy
   In our Confusion, and our Joy upraise
   In his disturbance; when his darling Sons
   Hurl'd headlong to partake with us, shall curse
   Thir frail Originals, and faded bliss,
   Faded so soon. Advise if this be worth
   Attempting, or to sit in darkness here
   Hatching vain Empires. Thus Beelzebub
   Pleaded his devilish Counsel, first devis'd
   By Satan, and in part propos'd: for whence,                         380
   But from the Author of all ill could Spring
   So deep a malice, to confound the race
   Of mankind in one root, and Earth with Hell
   To mingle and involve, done all to spite
   The great Creatour? But thir spite still serves
   His glory to augment. The bold design
   Pleas'd highly those infernal States, and joy
   Sparkl'd in all thir eyes; with full assent
   They vote: whereat his speech he thus renews.
   Well have ye judg'd, well ended long debate,                        390
   Synod of Gods, and like to what ye are,
   Great things resolv'd; which from the lowest deep
   Will once more lift us up, in spight of Fate,
   Neerer our ancient Seat; perhaps in view
   Of those bright confines, whence with neighbouring Arms
   And opportune excursion we may chance
   Re-enter Heav'n; or else in some milde Zone
   Dwell not unvisited of Heav'ns fair Light
   Secure, and at the brightning Orient beam
   Purge off this gloom; the soft delicious Air,                       400
   To heal the scarr of these corrosive Fires
   Shall breath her balme. But first whom shall we send
   In search of this new world, whom shall we find
   Sufficient? who shall tempt with wandring feet
   The dark unbottom'd infinite Abyss
   And through the palpable obscure find out
   His uncouth way, or spread his aerie flight
   Upborn with indefatigable wings
   Over the vast abrupt, ere he arrive
   The happy Ile; what strength, what art can then                     410
   Suffice, or what evasion bear him safe
   Through the strict Senteries and Stations thick
   Of Angels watching round? Here he had need
   All circumspection, and we now no less
   Choice in our suffrage; for on whom we send,
   The weight of all and our last hope relies.
   This said, he sat; and expectation held
   His look suspence, awaiting who appeer'd
   To second, or oppose, or undertake
   The perilous attempt: but all sat mute,                             420
   Pondering the danger with deep thoughts; and each
   In others count'nance red his own dismay
   Astonisht: none among the choice and prime
   Of those Heav'n-warring Champions could be found
   So hardie as to proffer or accept
   Alone the dreadful voyage; till at last
   Satan, whom now transcendent glory rais'd
   Above his fellows, with Monarchal pride
   Conscious of highest worth, unmov'd thus spake.
   O Progeny of Heav'n, Empyreal Thrones,                              430
   With reason hath deep silence and demurr
   Seis'd us, though undismaid: long is the way
   And hard, that out of Hell leads up to Light;
   Our prison strong, this huge convex of Fire,
   Outrageous to devour, immures us round
   Ninefold, and gates of burning Adamant
   Barr'd over us prohibit all egress.
   These past, if any pass, the void profound
   Of unessential Night receives him next
   Wide gaping, and with utter loss of being                           440
   Threatens him, plung'd in that abortive gulf.
   If thence he scape into what ever world,
   Or unknown Region, what remains him less
   Then unknown dangers and as hard escape.
   But I should ill become this Throne, O Peers,
   And this Imperial Sov'ranty, adorn'd
   With splendor, arm'd with power, if aught propos'd
   And judg'd of public moment, in the shape
   Of difficulty or danger could deterre
   Me from attempting. Wherefore do I assume                           450
   These Royalties, and not refuse to Reign,
   Refusing to accept as great a share
   Of hazard as of honour, due alike
   To him who Reigns, and so much to him due
   Of hazard more, as he above the rest
   High honourd sits? Go therfore mighty powers,
   Terror of Heav'n, though fall'n; intend at home,
   While here shall be our home, what best may ease
   The present misery, and render Hell
   More tollerable; if there be cure or charm                          460
   To respite or deceive, or slack the pain
   Of this ill Mansion: intermit no watch
   Against a wakeful Foe, while I abroad
   Through all the coasts of dark destruction seek
   Deliverance for us all: this enterprize
   None shall partake with me. Thus saying rose
   The Monarch, and prevented all reply,
   Prudent, least from his resolution rais'd
   Others among the chief might offer now
   (Certain to be refus'd) what erst they feard;                       470
   And so refus'd might in opinion stand
   His rivals, winning cheap the high repute
   Which he through hazard huge must earn. But they
   Dreaded not more th' adventure then his voice
   Forbidding; and at once with him they rose;
   Thir rising all at once was as the sound
   Of Thunder heard remote. Towards him they bend
   With awful reverence prone; and as a God
   Extoll him equal to the highest in Heav'n:
   Nor fail'd they to express how much they prais'd,                   480
   That for the general safety he despis'd
   His own: for neither do the Spirits damn'd
   Loose all thir vertue; least bad men should boast
   Thir specious deeds on earth, which glory excites,
   Or close ambition varnisht o're with zeal.
   Thus they thir doubtful consultations dark
   Ended rejoycing in thir matchless Chief:
   As when from mountain tops the dusky clouds
   Ascending, while the North wind sleeps, o'respread
   Heav'ns chearful face, the lowring Element                          490
   Scowls ore the dark'nd lantskip Snow, or showre;
   If chance the radiant Sun with farewell sweet
   Extend his ev'ning beam, the fields revive,
   The birds thir notes renew, and bleating herds
   Attest thir joy, that hill and valley rings.
   O shame to men! Devil with Devil damn'd
   Firm concord holds, men onely disagree
   Of Creatures rational, though under hope
   Of heavenly Grace: and God proclaiming peace,
   Yet live in hatred, enmitie, and strife                             500
   Among themselves, and levie cruel warres,
   Wasting the Earth, each other to destroy:
   As if (which might induce us to accord)
   Man had not hellish foes anow besides,
   That day and night for his destruction waite.
   The Stygian Councel thus dissolv'd; and forth
   In order came the grand infernal Peers,
   Midst came thir mighty Paramount, and seemd
   Alone th' Antagonist of Heav'n, nor less
   Then Hells dread Emperour with pomp Supream,                        510
   And God-like imitated State; him round
   A Globe of fierie Seraphim inclos'd
   With bright imblazonrie, and horrent Arms.
   Then of thir Session ended they bid cry
   With Trumpets regal sound the great result:
   Toward the four winds four speedy Cherubim
   Put to thir mouths the sounding Alchymie
   By Haralds voice explain'd: the hollow Abyss
   Heard farr and wide, and all the host of Hell
   With deafning shout, return'd them loud acclaim.                    520
   Thence more at ease thir minds and somwhat rais'd
   By false presumptuous hope, the ranged powers
   Disband, and wandring, each his several way
   Pursues, as inclination or sad choice
   Leads him perplext, where he may likeliest find
   Truce to his restless thoughts, and entertain
   The irksome hours, till his great Chief return.
   Part on the Plain, or in the Air sublime
   Upon the wing, or in swift race contend,
   As at th' Olympian Games or Pythian fields;                         530
   Part curb thir fierie Steeds, or shun the Goal
   With rapid wheels, or fronted Brigads form.
   As when to warn proud Cities warr appears
   Wag'd in the troubl'd Skie, and Armies rush
   To Battel in the Clouds, before each Van
   Pric forth the Aerie Knights, and couch thir spears
   Till thickest Legions close; with feats of Arms
   From either end of Heav'n the welkin burns.
   Others with vast Typhoean rage more fell
   Rend up both Rocks and Hills, and ride the Air                      540
   In whirlwind; Hell scarce holds the wilde uproar.
   As when Alcides from Oealia Crown'd
   With conquest, felt th' envenom'd robe, and tore
   Through pain up by the roots Thessalian Pines,
   And Lichas from the top of Oeta threw
   Into th' Euboic Sea. Others more milde,
   Retreated in a silent valley, sing
   With notes Angelical to many a Harp
   Thir own Heroic deeds and hapless fall
   By doom of Battel; and complain that Fate                           550
   Free Vertue should enthrall to Force or Chance.
   Thir song was partial, but the harmony
   (What could it less when Spirits immortal sing?)
   Suspended Hell, and took with ravishment
   The thronging audience. In discourse more sweet
   (For Eloquence the Soul, Song charms the Sense,)
   Others apart sat on a Hill retir'd,
   In thoughts more elevate, and reason'd high
   Of Providence, Foreknowledge, Will, and Fate,
   Fixt Fate, free will, foreknowledge absolute,                       560
   And found no end, in wandring mazes lost.
   Of good and evil much they argu'd then,
   Of happiness and final misery,
   Passion and Apathie, and glory and shame,
   Vain wisdom all, and false Philosophie:
   Yet with a pleasing sorcerie could charm
   Pain for a while or anguish, and excite
   Fallacious hope, or arm th' obdured brest
   With stubborn patience as with triple steel.
   Another part in Squadrons and gross Bands,                          570
   On bold adventure to discover wide
   That dismal world, if any Clime perhaps
   Might yeild them easier habitation, bend
   Four ways thir flying March, along the Banks
   Of four infernal Rivers that disgorge
   Into the burning Lake thir baleful streams;
   Abhorred Styx the flood of deadly hate,
   Sad Acheron of sorrow, black and deep;
   Cocytus, nam'd of lamentation loud
   Heard on the ruful stream; fierce Phlegeton                         580
   Whose waves of torrent fire inflame with rage.
   Farr off from these a slow and silent stream,
   Lethe the River of Oblivion roules
   Her watrie Labyrinth, whereof who drinks,
   Forthwith his former state and being forgets,
   Forgets both joy and grief, pleasure and pain.
   Beyond this flood a frozen Continent
   Lies dark and wilde, beat with perpetual storms
   Of Whirlwind and dire Hail, which on firm land
   Thaws not, but gathers heap, and ruin seems                         590
   Of ancient pile; all else deep snow and ice,
   A gulf profound as that Serbonian Bog
   Betwixt Damiata and mount Casius old,
   Where Armies whole have sunk: the parching Air
   Burns frore, and cold performs th' effect of Fire.
   Thither by harpy-footed Furies hail'd,
   At certain revolutions all the damn'd
   Are brought: and feel by turns the bitter change
   Of fierce extreams, extreams by change more fierce,
   From Beds of raging Fire to starve in Ice                           600
   Thir soft Ethereal warmth, and there to pine
   Immovable, infixt, and frozen round,
   Periods of time, thence hurried back to fire.
   They ferry over this Lethean Sound
   Both to and fro, thir sorrow to augment,
   And wish and struggle, as they pass, to reach
   The tempting stream, with one small drop to loose
   In sweet forgetfulness all pain and woe,
   All in one moment, and so neer the brink;
   But fate withstands, and to oppose th' attempt                      610
   Medusa with Gorgonian terror guards
   The Ford, and of it self the water flies
   All taste of living wight, as once it fled
   The lip of Tantalus. Thus roving on
   In confus'd march forlorn, th' adventrous Bands
   With shuddring horror pale, and eyes agast
   View'd first thir lamentable lot, and found
   No rest: through many a dark and drearie Vaile
   They pass'd, and many a Region dolorous,
   O're many a Frozen, many a Fierie Alpe,                             620
   Rocks, Caves, Lakes, Fens, Bogs, Dens, and shades of death,
   A Universe of death, which God by curse
   Created evil, for evil only good,
   Where all life dies, death lives, and nature breeds,
   Perverse, all monstrous, all prodigious things,
   Abominable, inutterable, and worse
   Then Fables yet have feign'd, or fear conceiv'd,
   Gorgons and Hydra's, and Chimera's dire.
   Mean while the Adversary of God and Man,
   Satan with thoughts inflam'd of highest design,                     630
   Puts on swift wings, and toward the Gates of Hell
   Explores his solitary flight; som times
   He scours the right hand coast, som times the left,
   Now shaves with level wing the Deep, then soares
   Up to the fiery concave touring high.
   As when farr off at Sea a Fleet descri'd
   Hangs in the Clouds, by Aequinoctial Winds
   Close sailing from Bengala, or the Iles
   Of Ternate and Tidore, whence Merchants bring
   Thir spicie Drugs: they on the trading Flood                        640
   Through the wide Ethiopian to the Cape
   Ply stemming nightly toward the Pole. So seem'd
   Farr off the flying Fiend: at last appeer
   Hell bounds high reaching to the horrid Roof,
   And thrice threefold the Gates; three folds were Brass
   Three Iron, three of Adamantine Rock,
   Impenitrable, impal'd with circling fire,
   Yet unconsum'd. Before the Gates there sat
   On either side a formidable shape;
   The one seem'd Woman to the waste, and fair,                        650
   But ended foul in many a scaly fould
   Voluminous and vast, a Serpent arm'd
   With mortal sting: about her middle round
   A cry of Hell Hounds never ceasing bark'd
   With wide Cerberean mouths full loud, and rung
   A hideous Peal: yet, when they list, would creep,
   If aught disturb'd thir noyse, into her woomb,
   And kennel there, yet there still bark'd and howl'd
   Within unseen. Farr less abhorrd then these
   Vex'd Scylla bathing in the Sea that parts                          660
   Calabria from the hoarce Trinacrian shore:
   Nor uglier follow the Night-Hag, when call'd
   In secret, riding through the Air she comes
   Lur'd with the smell of infant blood, to dance
   With Lapland Witches, while the labouring Moon
   Eclipses at thir charms. The other shape,
   If shape it might be call'd that shape had none
   Distinguishable in member, joynt, or limb,
   Or substance might be call'd that shadow seem'd,
   For each seem'd either; black it stood as Night,                    670
   Fierce as ten Furies, terrible as Hell,
   And shook a dreadful Dart; what seem'd his head
   The likeness of a Kingly Crown had on.
   Satan was now at hand, and from his seat
   The Monster moving onward came as fast,
   With horrid strides, Hell trembled as he strode.
   Th' undaunted Fiend what this might be admir'd,
   Admir'd, not fear'd; God and his Son except,
   Created thing naught vallu'd he nor shun'd;
   And with disdainful look thus first began.                          680
   Whence and what art thou, execrable shape,
   That dar'st, though grim and terrible, advance
   Thy miscreated Front athwart my way
   To yonder Gates? through them I mean to pass,
   That be assur'd, without leave askt of thee:
   Retire, or taste thy folly, and learn by proof,
   Hell-born, not to contend with Spirits of Heav'n.
   To whom the Goblin full of wrauth reply'd,
   Art thou that Traitor Angel, art thou hee,
   Who first broke peace in Heav'n and Faith, till then                690
   Unbrok'n, and in proud rebellious Arms
   Drew after him the third part of Heav'ns Sons
   Conjur'd against the highest, for which both Thou
   And they outcast from God, are here condemn'd
   To waste Eternal daies in woe and pain?
   And reck'n'st thou thy self with Spirits of Heav'n,
   Hell-doomd, and breath'st defiance here and scorn,
   Where I reign King, and to enrage thee more,
   Thy King and Lord? Back to thy punishment,
   False fugitive, and to thy speed add wings,                         700
   Least with a whip of Scorpions I pursue
   Thy lingring, or with one stroke of this Dart
   Strange horror seise thee, and pangs unfelt before.
   So spake the grieslie terrour, and in shape,
   So speaking and so threatning, grew ten fold
   More dreadful and deform: on th' other side
   Incenc't with indignation Satan stood
   Unterrifi'd, and like a Comet burn'd,
   That fires the length of Ophiucus huge
   In th' Artick Sky, and from his horrid hair                         710
   Shakes Pestilence and Warr. Each at the Head
   Level'd his deadly aime; thir fatall hands
   No second stroke intend, and such a frown
   Each cast at th' other, as when two black Clouds
   With Heav'ns Artillery fraught, come rattling on
   Over the Caspian, then stand front to front
   Hov'ring a space, till Winds the signal blow
   To joyn thir dark Encounter in mid air:
   So frownd the mighty Combatants, that Hell
   Grew darker at thir frown, so matcht they stood;                    720
   For never but once more was either like
   To meet so great a foe: and now great deeds
   Had been achiev'd, whereof all Hell had rung,
   Had not the Snakie Sorceress that sat
   Fast by Hell Gate, and kept the fatal Key,
   Ris'n, and with hideous outcry rush'd between.
   O Father, what intends thy hand, she cry'd,
   Against thy only Son? What fury O Son,
   Possesses thee to bend that mortal Dart
   Against thy Fathers head? and know'st for whom;                     730
   For him who sits above and laughs the while
   At thee ordain'd his drudge, to execute
   What e're his wrath, which he calls Justice, bids,
   His wrath which one day will destroy ye both.
   She spake, and at her words the hellish Pest
   Forbore, then these to her Satan return'd:
   So strange thy outcry, and thy words so strange
   Thou interposest, that my sudden hand
   Prevented spares to tell thee yet by deeds
   What it intends; till first I know of thee,                         740
   What thing thou art, thus double-form'd, and why
   In this infernal Vaile first met thou call'st
   Me Father, and that Fantasm call'st my Son?
   I know thee not, nor ever saw till now
   Sight more detestable then him and thee.
   T' whom thus the Portress of Hell Gate reply'd;
   Hast thou forgot me then, and do I seem
   Now in thine eye so foul, once deemd so fair
   In Heav'n, when at th' Assembly, and in sight
   Of all the Seraphim with thee combin'd                              750
   In bold conspiracy against Heav'ns King,
   All on a sudden miserable pain
   Surpris'd thee, dim thine eyes, and dizzie swumm
   In darkness, while thy head flames thick and fast
   Threw forth, till on the left side op'ning wide,
   Likest to thee in shape and count'nance bright,
   Then shining heav'nly fair, a Goddess arm'd
   Out of thy head I sprung: amazement seis'd
   All th' Host of Heav'n; back they recoild affraid
   At first, and call'd me Sin, and for a Sign                         760
   Portentous held me; but familiar grown,
   I pleas'd, and with attractive graces won
   The most averse, thee chiefly, who full oft
   Thy self in me thy perfect image viewing
   Becam'st enamour'd, and such joy thou took'st
   With me in secret, that my womb conceiv'd
   A growing burden. Mean while Warr arose,
   And fields were fought in Heav'n; wherein remaind
   (For what could else) to our Almighty Foe
   Cleer Victory, to our part loss and rout                            770
   Through all the Empyrean: down they fell
   Driv'n headlong from the Pitch of Heaven, down
   Into this Deep, and in the general fall
   I also; at which time this powerful Key
   Into my hand was giv'n, with charge to keep
   These Gates for ever shut, which none can pass
   Without my op'ning. Pensive here I sat
   Alone, but long I sat not, till my womb
   Pregnant by thee, and now excessive grown
   Prodigious motion felt and rueful throes.                           780
   At last this odious offspring whom thou seest
   Thine own begotten, breaking violent way
   Tore through my entrails, that with fear and pain
   Distorted, all my nether shape thus grew
   Transform'd: but he my inbred enemie
   Forth issu'd, brandishing his fatal Dart
   Made to destroy: I fled, and cry'd out Death;
   Hell trembl'd at the hideous Name, and sigh'd
   From all her Caves, and back resounded Death.
   I fled, but he pursu'd (though more, it seems,                      790
   Inflam'd with lust then rage) and swifter far,
   Me overtook his mother all dismaid,
   And in embraces forcible and foule
   Ingendring with me, of that rape begot
   These yelling Monsters that with ceasless cry
   Surround me, as thou sawst, hourly conceiv'd
   And hourly born, with sorrow infinite
   To me, for when they list into the womb
   That bred them they return, and howle and gnaw
   My Bowels, their repast; then bursting forth                        800
   Afresh with conscious terrours vex me round,
   That rest or intermission none I find.
   Before mine eyes in opposition sits
   Grim Death my Son and foe, who sets them on,
   And me his Parent would full soon devour
   For want of other prey, but that he knows
   His end with mine involvd; and knows that I
   Should prove a bitter Morsel, and his bane,
   When ever that shall be; so Fate pronounc'd.
   But thou O Father, I forewarn thee, shun                            810
   His deadly arrow; neither vainly hope
   To be invulnerable in those bright Arms,
   Though temper'd heav'nly, for that mortal dint,
   Save he who reigns above, none can resist.
   She finish'd, and the suttle Fiend his lore
   Soon learnd, now milder, and thus answerd smooth.
   Dear Daughter, since thou claim'st me for thy Sire,
   And my fair Son here showst me, the dear pledge
   Of dalliance had with thee in Heav'n, and joys
   Then sweet, now sad to mention, through dire change                 820
   Befalln us unforeseen, unthought of, know
   I come no enemie, but to set free
   From out this dark and dismal house of pain,
   Both him and thee, and all the heav'nly Host
   Of Spirits that in our just pretenses arm'd
   Fell with us from on high: from them I go
   This uncouth errand sole, and one for all
   My self expose, with lonely steps to tread
   Th' unfounded deep, & through the void immense
   To search with wandring quest a place foretold                      830
   Should be, and, by concurring signs, ere now
   Created vast and round, a place of bliss
   In the Pourlieues of Heav'n, and therein plac't
   A race of upstart Creatures, to supply
   Perhaps our vacant room, though more remov'd,
   Least Heav'n surcharg'd with potent multitude
   Might hap to move new broiles: Be this or aught
   Then this more secret now design'd, I haste
   To know, and this once known, shall soon return,
   And bring ye to the place where Thou and Death                      840
   Shall dwell at ease, and up and down unseen
   Wing silently the buxom Air, imbalm'd
   With odours; there ye shall be fed and fill'd
   Immeasurably, all things shall be your prey.
   He ceas'd, for both seemd highly pleasd, and Death
   Grinnd horrible a gastly smile, to hear
   His famine should be fill'd, and blest his mawe
   Destin'd to that good hour: no less rejoyc'd
   His mother bad, and thus bespake her Sire.
   The key of this infernal Pit by due,                                850
   And by command of Heav'ns all-powerful King
   I keep, by him forbidden to unlock
   These Adamantine Gates; against all force
   Death ready stands to interpose his dart,
   Fearless to be o'rematcht by living might.
   But what ow I to his commands above
   Who hates me, and hath hither thrust me down
   Into this gloom of Tartarus profound,
   To sit in hateful Office here confin'd,
   Inhabitant of Heav'n, and heav'nlie-born,                           860
   Here in perpetual agonie and pain,
   With terrors and with clamors compasst round
   Of mine own brood, that on my bowels feed:
   Thou art my Father, thou my Author, thou
   My being gav'st me; whom should I obey
   But thee, whom follow? thou wilt bring me soon
   To that new world of light and bliss, among
   The Gods who live at ease, where I shall Reign
   At thy right hand voluptuous, as beseems
   Thy daughter and thy darling, without end.                          870
   Thus saying, from her side the fatal Key,
   Sad instrument of all our woe, she took;
   And towards the Gate rouling her bestial train,
   Forthwith the huge Portcullis high up drew,
   Which but her self not all the Stygian powers
   Could once have mov'd; then in the key-hole turns
   Th' intricate wards, and every Bolt and Bar
   Of massie Iron or sollid Rock with ease
   Unfast'ns: on a sudden op'n flie
   With impetuous recoile and jarring sound                            880
   Th' infernal dores, and on thir hinges great
   Harsh Thunder, that the lowest bottom shook
   Of Erebus. She op'nd, but to shut
   Excel'd her power; the Gates wide op'n stood,
   That with extended wings a Bannerd Host
   Under spread Ensigns marching might pass through
   With Horse and Chariots rankt in loose array;
   So wide they stood, and like a Furnace mouth
   Cast forth redounding smoak and ruddy flame.
   Before thir eyes in sudden view appear                              890
   The secrets of the hoarie deep, a dark
   Illimitable Ocean without bound,
   Without dimension, where length, breadth, and highth,
   And time and place are lost; where eldest Night
   And Chaos, Ancestors of Nature, hold
   Eternal Anarchie, amidst the noise
   Of endless warrs and by confusion stand.
   For hot, cold, moist, and dry, four Champions fierce
   Strive here for Maistrie, and to Battel bring
   Thir embryon Atoms; they around the flag                            900
   Of each his faction, in thir several Clanns,
   Light-arm'd or heavy, sharp, smooth, swift or slow,
   Swarm populous, unnumber'd as the Sands
   Of Barca or Cyrene's torrid soil,
   Levied to side with warring Winds, and poise
   Thir lighter wings. To whom these most adhere,
   Hee rules a moment; Chaos Umpire sits,
   And by decision more imbroiles the fray
   By which he Reigns: next him high Arbiter
   Chance governs all. Into this wilde Abyss,                          910
   The Womb of nature and perhaps her Grave,
   Of neither Sea, nor Shore, nor Air, nor Fire,
   But all these in thir pregnant causes mixt
   Confus'dly, and which thus must ever fight,
   Unless th' Almighty Maker them ordain
   His dark materials to create more Worlds,
   Into this wilde Abyss the warie fiend
   Stood on the brink of Hell and look'd a while,
   Pondering his Voyage; for no narrow frith
   He had to cross. Nor was his eare less peal'd                       920
   With noises loud and ruinous (to compare
   Great things with small) then when Bellona storms,
   With all her battering Engines bent to rase
   Som Capital City, or less then if this frame
   Of Heav'n were falling, and these Elements
   In mutinie had from her Axle torn
   The stedfast Earth. At last his Sail-broad Vannes
   He spreads for flight, and in the surging smoak
   Uplifted spurns the ground, thence many a League
   As in a cloudy Chair ascending rides                                930
   Audacious, but that seat soon failing, meets
   A vast vacuitie: all unawares
   Fluttring his pennons vain plumb down he drops
   Ten thousand fadom deep, and to this hour
   Down had been falling, had not by ill chance
   The strong rebuff of som tumultuous cloud
   Instinct with Fire and Nitre hurried him
   As many miles aloft: that furie stay'd,
   Quencht in a Boggie Syrtis, neither Sea,
   Nor good dry Land: nigh founderd on he fares,                       940
   Treading the crude consistence, half on foot,
   Half flying; behoves him now both Oare and Saile.
   As when a Gryfon through the Wilderness
   With winged course ore Hill or moarie Dale,
   Pursues the Arimaspian, who by stelth
   Had from his wakeful custody purloind
   The guarded Gold: So eagerly the fiend
   Ore bog or steep, through strait, rough, dense, or rare,
   With head, hands, wings, or feet pursues his way,
   And swims or sinks, or wades, or creeps, or flyes:                  950
   At length a universal hubbub wilde
   Of stunning sounds and voices all confus'd
   Born through the hollow dark assaults his eare
   With loudest vehemence: thither he plyes,
   Undaunted to meet there what ever power
   Or Spirit of the nethermost Abyss
   Might in that noise reside, of whom to ask
   Which way the neerest coast of darkness lyes
   Bordering on light; when strait behold the Throne
   Of Chaos, and his dark Pavilion spread                              960
   Wide on the wasteful Deep; with him Enthron'd
   Sat Sable-vested Night, eldest of things,
   The consort of his Reign; and by them stood
   Orcus and Ades, and the dreaded name
   Of Demogorgon; Rumor next and Chance,
   And Tumult and Confusion all imbroild,
   And Discord with a thousand various mouths.
   T' whom Satan turning boldly, thus. Ye Powers
   And Spirits of this nethermost Abyss,
   Chaos and Ancient Night, I come no Spie,                            970
   With purpose to explore or to disturb
   The secrets of your Realm, but by constraint
   Wandring this darksome desart, as my way
   Lies through your spacious Empire up to light,
   Alone, and without guide, half lost, I seek
   What readiest path leads where your gloomie bounds
   Confine with Heav'n; or if som other place
   From your Dominion won, th' Ethereal King
   Possesses lately, thither to arrive
   I travel this profound, direct my course;                           980
   Directed, no mean recompence it brings
   To your behoof, if I that Region lost,
   All usurpation thence expell'd, reduce
   To her original darkness and your sway
   (Which is my present journey) and once more
   Erect the Standerd there of Ancient Night;
   Yours be th' advantage all, mine the revenge.
   Thus Satan; and him thus the Anarch old
   With faultring speech and visage incompos'd
   Answer'd. I know thee, stranger, who thou art,                      990
   That mighty leading Angel, who of late
   Made head against Heav'ns King, though overthrown.
   I saw and heard, for such a numerous host
   Fled not in silence through the frighted deep
   With ruin upon ruin, rout on rout,
   Confusion worse confounded; and Heav'n Gates
   Pourd out by millions her victorious Bands
   Pursuing. I upon my Frontieres here
   Keep residence; if all I can will serve,
   That little which is left so to defend                             1000
   Encroacht on still through our intestine broiles
   Weakning the Scepter of old Night: first Hell
   Your dungeon stretching far and wide beneath;
   Now lately Heaven and Earth, another World
   Hung ore my Realm, link'd in a golden Chain
   To that side Heav'n from whence your Legions fell:
   If that way be your walk, you have not farr;
   So much the neerer danger; goe and speed;
   Havock and spoil and ruin are my gain.
   He ceas'd; and Satan staid not to reply,                           1010
   But glad that now his Sea should find a shore,
   With fresh alacritie and force renew'd
   Springs upward like a Pyramid of fire
   Into the wilde expanse, and through the shock
   Of fighting Elements, on all sides round
   Environ'd wins his way; harder beset
   And more endanger'd, then when Argo pass'd
   Through Bosporus betwixt the justling Rocks:
   Or when Ulysses on the Larbord shunnd
   Charybdis, and by th' other whirlpool steard.                      1020
   So he with difficulty and labour hard
   Mov'd on, with difficulty and labour hee;
   But hee once past, soon after when man fell,
   Strange alteration! Sin and Death amain
   Following his track, such was the will of Heav'n,
   Pav'd after him a broad and beat'n way
   Over the dark Abyss, whose boiling Gulf
   Tamely endur'd a Bridge of wondrous length
   From Hell continu'd reaching th' utmost Orbe
   Of this frail World; by which the Spirits perverse                 1030
   With easie intercourse pass to and fro
   To tempt or punish mortals, except whom
   God and good Angels guard by special grace.
   But now at last the sacred influence
   Of light appears, and from the walls of Heav'n
   Shoots farr into the bosom of dim Night
   A glimmering dawn; here Nature first begins
   Her fardest verge, and Chaos to retire
   As from her outmost works a brok'n foe
   With tumult less and with less hostile din,                        1040
   That Satan with less toil, and now with ease
   Wafts on the calmer wave by dubious light
   And like a weather-beaten Vessel holds
   Gladly the Port, though Shrouds and Tackle torn;
   Or in the emptier waste, resembling Air,
   Weighs his spread wings, at leasure to behold
   Farr off th' Empyreal Heav'n, extended wide
   In circuit, undetermind square or round,
   With Opal Towrs and Battlements adorn'd
   Of living Saphire, once his native Seat;                           1050
   And fast by hanging in a golden Chain
   This pendant world, in bigness as a Starr
   Of smallest Magnitude close by the Moon.
   Thither full fraught with mischievous revenge,
   Accurst, and in a cursed hour he hies.
 
   Notes:
   282 where] were 1674.
   402 breath] misprint for breathe.
   483 thir] her 1674.
   527 his] this 1674.
   542 Oealia] Oechalia 1674.
   631 toward] towards 1674.
 
   The End Of The Second Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK III.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 God sitting on his Throne sees Satan flying towards this world, then
 newly created; shews him to the Son who sat at his right hand;
 foretells the success of Satan in perverting mankind; clears his own
 Justice and Wisdom from all imputation, having created Man free and able
 enough to have withstood his Tempter; yet declares his purpose of grace
 towards him, in regard he fell not of his own malice, as did Satan, but
 by him seduc't.  The Son of God renders praises to his father for the
 manifestation of his gracious purpose towards Man; God again declares,
 that Grace cannot be extended towards Man without the satisfaction of
 divine Justice; Man hath offended the majesty of God by aspiring to
 Godhead, and therefore with all his progeny devoted to death must dye,
 unless some one can be found sufficient to answer for his offence, and
 undergoe his Punishment. The Son of God freely offers himself a Ransome
 for Man: the Father accepts him, ordains his incarnation, pronounces his
 exaltation above all in Heaven and Earth, commands all the Angels to
 adore him; they obey, amid hymning to their Harps in full Quire,
 celebrate the Father and the Son.. Mean while Satan alights upon the
 bare convex of this Worlds outermost Orb; where wandring he first finds
 a place since call'd The Lymbo of Vanity, what persons and things fly up
 thither; thence comes to the Gate of Heaven, describ'd ascending by
 stairs and the waters above the Firmament that flow about it: His
 passage thence to the Orb of the Sun; he finds there Uriel the Regent of
 that Orb, but first changes himself into the shape of a meaner Angel;
 and pretending a zealous desire to behold the new Creation and Man whom
 God had plac't here, inquires of him the place of his habitation, and is
 directed; alights first on Mount Niphates.
 
   Hail holy light, ofspring of Heav'n first-born,
   Or of th' Eternal Coeternal beam
   May I express thee unblam'd? since God is light,
   And never but in unapproached light
   Dwelt from Eternitie, dwelt then in thee,
   Bright effluence of bright essence increate.
   Or hear'st thou rather pure Ethereal stream,
   Whose Fountain who shall tell? before the Sun,
   Before the Heavens thou wert, and at the voice
   Of God, as with a Mantle didst invest                                10
   The rising world of waters dark and deep,
   Won from the void and formless infinite.
   Thee I re-visit now with bolder wing,
   Escap't the Stygian Pool, though long detain'd
   In that obscure sojourn, while in my flight
   Through utter and through middle darkness borne
   With other notes then to th' Orphean Lyre
   I sung of Chaos and Eternal Night,
   Taught by the heav'nly Muse to venture down
   The dark descent, and up to reascend,                                20
   Though hard and rare: thee I revisit safe,
   And feel thy sovran vital Lamp; but thou
   Revisit'st not these eyes, that rowle in vain
   To find thy piercing ray, and find no dawn;
   So thick a drop serene hath quencht thir Orbs,
   Or dim suffusion veild. Yet not the more
   Cease I to wander where the Muses haunt
   Cleer Spring, or shadie Grove, or Sunnie Hill,
   Smit with the love of sacred song; but chief
   Thee Sion and the flowrie Brooks beneath                             30
   That wash thy hallowd feet, and warbling flow,
   Nightly I visit: nor somtimes forget
   Those other two equal'd with me in Fate,
   So were I equal'd with them in renown,
   Blind Thamyris and blind Maeonides,
   And Tiresias and Phineus Prophets old.
   Then feed on thoughts, that voluntarie move
   Harmonious numbers; as the wakeful Bird
   Sings darkling, and in shadiest Covert hid
   Tunes her nocturnal Note. Thus with the Year                         40
   Seasons return, but not to me returns
   Day, or the sweet approach of Ev'n or Morn,
   Or sight of vernal bloom, or Summers Rose,
   Or flocks, or herds, or human face divine;
   But cloud in stead, and ever-during dark
   Surrounds me, from the chearful waies of men
   Cut off, and for the book of knowledg fair
   Presented with a Universal blanc
   Of Natures works to mee expung'd and ras'd,
   And wisdome at one entrance quite shut out.                          50
   So much the rather thou Celestial light
   Shine inward, and the mind through all her powers
   Irradiate, there plant eyes, all mist from thence
   Purge and disperse, that I may see and tell
   Of things invisible to mortal sight.
   Now had the Almighty Father from above,
   From the pure Empyrean where he sits
   High Thron'd above all highth, bent down his eye,
   His own works and their works at once to view:
   About him all the Sanctities of Heaven                               60
   Stood thick as Starrs, and from his sight receiv'd
   Beatitude past utterance; on his right
   The radiant image of his Glory sat,
   His onely Son; On Earth he first beheld
   Our two first Parents, yet the onely two
   Of mankind, in the happie Garden plac't,
   Reaping immortal fruits of joy and love,
   Uninterrupted joy, unrivald love
   In blissful solitude; he then survey'd
   Hell and the Gulf between, and Satan there                           70
   Coasting the wall of Heav'n on this side Night
   In the dun Air sublime, and ready now
   To stoop with wearied wings, and willing feet
   On the bare outside of this World, that seem'd
   Firm land imbosom'd without Firmament,
   Uncertain which, in Ocean or in Air.
   Him God beholding from his prospect high,
   Wherein past, present, future he beholds,
   Thus to his onely Son foreseeing spake.
   Onely begotten Son, seest thou what rage                             80
   Transports our adversarie, whom no bounds
   Prescrib'd, no barrs of Hell, nor all the chains
   Heapt on him there, nor yet the main Abyss
   Wide interrupt can hold; so bent he seems
   On desperat revenge, that shall redound
   Upon his own rebellious head. And now
   Through all restraint broke loose he wings his way
   Not farr off Heav'n, in the Precincts of light,
   Directly towards the new created World,
   And Man there plac't, with purpose to assay                          90
   If him by force he can destroy, or worse,
   By som false guile pervert; and shall pervert;
   For man will heark'n to his glozing lyes,
   And easily transgress the sole Command,
   Sole pledge of his obedience: So will fall
   Hee and his faithless Progenie: whose fault?
   Whose but his own? ingrate, he had of mee
   All he could have; I made him just and right,
   Sufficient to have stood, though free to fall.
   Such I created all th' Ethereal Powers                              100
   And Spirits, both them who stood & them who faild;
   Freely they stood who stood, and fell who fell.
   Not free, what proof could they have givn sincere
   Of true allegiance, constant Faith or Love,
   Where onely what they needs must do, appeard,
   Not what they would? what praise could they receive?
   What pleasure I from such obedience paid,
   When Will and Reason (Reason also is choice)
   Useless and vain, of freedom both despoild,
   Made passive both, had servd necessitie,                            110
   Not mee. They therefore as to right belongd,
   So were created, nor can justly accuse
   Thir maker, or thir making, or thir Fate;
   As if Predestination over-rul'd
   Thir will, dispos'd by absolute Decree
   Or high foreknowledge; they themselves decreed
   Thir own revolt, not I: if I foreknew,
   Foreknowledge had no influence on their fault,
   Which had no less prov'd certain unforeknown.
   So without least impulse or shadow of Fate,                         120
   Or aught by me immutablie foreseen,
   They trespass, Authors to themselves in all
   Both what they judge and what they choose; for so
   I formd them free, and free they must remain,
   Till they enthrall themselves: I else must change
   Thir nature, and revoke the high Decree
   Unchangeable, Eternal, which ordain'd
   Thir freedom, they themselves ordain'd thir fall.
   The first sort by thir own suggestion fell,
   Self-tempted, self-deprav'd: Man falls deceiv'd                     130
   By the other first: Man therefore shall find grace,
   The other none: in Mercy and Justice both,
   Through Heav'n and Earth, so shall my glorie excel,
   But Mercy first and last shall brightest shine.
   Thus while God spake, ambrosial fragrance fill'd
   All Heav'n, and in the blessed Spirits elect
   Sense of new joy ineffable diffus'd:
   Beyond compare the Son of God was seen
   Most glorious, in him all his Father shon
   Substantially express'd, and in his face                            140
   Divine compassion visibly appeerd,
   Love without end, and without measure Grace,
   Which uttering thus he to his Father spake.
   O Father, gracious was that word which clos'd
   Thy sovran sentence, that Man should find grace;
   For which both Heav'n and Earth shall high extoll
   Thy praises, with th' innumerable sound
   Of Hymns and sacred Songs, wherewith thy Throne
   Encompass'd shall resound thee ever blest.
   For should Man finally be lost, should Man                          150
   Thy creature late so lov'd, thy youngest Son
   Fall circumvented thus by fraud, though joynd
   With his own folly? that be from thee farr,
   That farr be from thee, Father, who art Judge
   Of all things made, and judgest onely right.
   Or shall the Adversarie thus obtain
   His end, and frustrate thine, shall he fulfill
   His malice, and thy goodness bring to naught,
   Or proud return though to his heavier doom,
   Yet with revenge accomplish't and to Hell                           160
   Draw after him the whole Race of mankind,
   By him corrupted? or wilt thou thy self
   Abolish thy Creation, and unmake,
   For him, what for thy glorie thou hast made?
   So should thy goodness and thy greatness both
   Be questiond and blaspheam'd without defence.
   To whom the great Creatour thus reply'd.
   O Son, in whom my Soul hath chief delight,
   Son of my bosom, Son who art alone
   My word, my wisdom, and effectual might,                            170
   All hast thou spok'n as my thoughts are, all
   As my Eternal purpose hath decreed:
   Man shall not quite be lost, but sav'd who will,
   Yet not of will in him, but grace in me
   Freely voutsaft; once more I will renew
   His lapsed powers, though forfeit and enthrall'd
   By sin to foul exorbitant desires;
   Upheld by me, yet once more he shall stand
   On even ground against his mortal foe,
   By me upheld, that he may know how frail                            180
   His fall'n condition is, and to me ow
   All his deliv'rance, and to none but me.
   Some I have chosen of peculiar grace
   Elect above the rest; so is my will:
   The rest shall hear me call, and oft be warnd
   Thir sinful state, and to appease betimes
   Th' incensed Deitie, while offerd grace
   Invites; for I will cleer thir senses dark,
   What may suffice, and soft'n stonie hearts
   To pray, repent, and bring obedience due.                           190
   To prayer, repentance, and obedience due,
   Though but endevord with sincere intent,
   Mine eare shall not be slow, mine eye not shut.
   And I will place within them as a guide
   My Umpire Conscience, whom if they will hear,
   Light after light well us'd they shall attain,
   And to the end persisting, safe arrive.
   This my long sufferance and my day of grace
   They who neglect and scorn, shall never taste;
   But hard be hard'nd, blind be blinded more,                         200
   That they may stumble on, and deeper fall;
   And none but such from mercy I exclude.
   But yet all is not don; Man disobeying,
   Disloyal breaks his fealtie, and sinns
   Against the high Supremacie of Heav'n,
   Affecting God-head, and so loosing all,
   To expiate his Treason hath naught left,
   But to destruction sacred and devote,
   He with his whole posteritie must die,
   Die hee or Justice must; unless for him                             210
   Som other able, and as willing, pay
   The rigid satisfaction, death for death.
   Say Heav'nly Powers, where shall we find such love,
   Which of ye will be mortal to redeem
   Mans mortal crime, and just th' unjust to save,
   Dwels in all Heaven charitie so deare?
   He ask'd, but all the Heav'nly Quire stood mute,
   And silence was in Heav'n: on mans behalf
   Patron or Intercessor none appeerd,
   Much less that durst upon his own head draw                         220
   The deadly forfeiture, and ransom set.
   And now without redemption all mankind
   Must have bin lost, adjudg'd to Death and Hell
   By doom severe, had not the Son of God,
   In whom the fulness dwels of love divine,
   His dearest mediation thus renewd.
   Father, thy word is past, man shall find grace;
   And shall grace not find means, that finds her way,
   The speediest of thy winged messengers,
   To visit all thy creatures, and to all                              230
   Comes unprevented, unimplor'd, unsought,
   Happie for man, so coming; be her aide
   Can never seek, once dead in sins and lost;
   Attonement for himself or offering meet,
   Indebted and undon, hath none to bring:
   Behold mee then, mee for him, life for life
   I offer, on mee let thine anger fall;
   Account mee man; I for his sake will leave
   Thy bosom, and this glorie next to thee
   Freely put off, and for him lastly die                              240
   Well pleas'd, on me let Death wreck all his rage;
   Under his gloomie power I shall not long
   Lie vanquisht; thou hast givn me to possess
   Life in my self for ever, by thee I live,
   Though now to Death I yeild, and am his due
   All that of me can die, yet that debt paid,
   Thou wilt not leave me in the loathsom grave
   His prey, nor suffer my unspotted Soule
   For ever with corruption there to dwell;
   But I shall rise Victorious, and subdue                             250
   My Vanquisher, spoild of his vanted spoile;
   Death his deaths wound shall then receive, & stoop
   Inglorious, of his mortall sting disarm'd.
   I through the ample Air in Triumph high
   Shall lead Hell Captive maugre Hell, and show
   The powers of darkness bound. Thou at the sight
   Pleas'd, out of Heaven shalt look down and smile,
   While by thee rais'd I ruin all my Foes,
   Death last, and with his Carcass glut the Grave:
   Then with the multitude of my redeemd                               260
   Shall enter Heaven long absent, and returne,
   Father, to see thy face, wherein no cloud
   Of anger shall remain, but peace assur'd,
   And reconcilement; wrauth shall be no more
   Thenceforth, but in thy presence Joy entire.
   His words here ended, but his meek aspect
   Silent yet spake, and breath'd immortal love
   To mortal men, above which only shon
   Filial obedience: as a sacrifice
   Glad to be offer'd, he attends the will                             270
   Of his great Father. Admiration seis'd
   All Heav'n, what this might mean, & whither tend
   Wondring; but soon th' Almighty thus reply'd:
   O thou in Heav'n and Earth the only peace
   Found out for mankind under wrauth, O thou
   My sole complacence! well thou know'st how dear,
   To me are all my works, nor Man the least
   Though last created, that for him I spare
   Thee from my bosom and right hand, to save,
   By loosing thee a while, the whole Race lost.                       280
   Thou therefore whom thou only canst redeeme,
   Thir Nature also to thy Nature joyne;
   And be thy self Man among men on Earth,
   Made flesh, when time shall be, of Virgin seed,
   By wondrous birth: Be thou in Adams room
   The Head of all mankind, though Adams Son.
   As in him perish all men, so in thee
   As from a second root shall be restor'd,
   As many as are restor'd, without thee none.
   His crime makes guiltie all his Sons, thy merit                     290
   Imputed shall absolve them who renounce
   Thir own both righteous and unrighteous deeds,
   And live in thee transplanted, and from thee
   Receive new life. So Man, as is most just,
   Shall satisfie for Man, be judg'd and die,
   And dying rise, and rising with him raise
   His Brethren, ransomd with his own dear life.
   So Heav'nly love shal outdoo Hellish hate,
   Giving to death, and dying to redeeme,
   So dearly to redeem what Hellish hate                               300
   So easily destroy'd, and still destroyes
   In those who, when they may, accept not grace.
   Nor shalt thou by descending to assume
   Mans Nature, less'n or degrade thine owne.
   Because thou hast, though Thron'd in highest bliss
   Equal to God, and equally enjoying
   God-like fruition, quitted all to save
   A World from utter loss, and hast been found
   By Merit more then Birthright Son of God,
   Found worthiest to be so by being Good,                             310
   Farr more then Great or High; because in thee
   Love hath abounded more then Glory abounds,
   Therefore thy Humiliation shall exalt
   With thee thy Manhood also to this Throne;
   Here shalt thou sit incarnate, here shalt Reigne
   Both God and Man, Son both of God and Man,
   Anointed universal King; all Power
   I give thee, reign for ever, and assume
   Thy Merits; under thee as Head Supream
   Thrones, Princedoms, Powers, Dominions I reduce:                    320
   All knees to thee shall bow, of them that bide
   In Heaven, or Earth, or under Earth in Hell;
   When thou attended gloriously from Heav'n
   Shalt in the Skie appeer, and from thee send
   The summoning Arch-Angels to proclaime
   Thy dread Tribunal: forthwith from all Windes
   The living, and forthwith the cited dead
   Of all past Ages to the general Doom
   Shall hast'n, such a peal shall rouse thir sleep.
   Then all thy Saints assembl'd, thou shalt judge                     330
   Bad men and Angels, they arraignd shall sink
   Beneath thy Sentence; Hell, her numbers full,
   Thenceforth shall be for ever shut. Mean while
   The World shall burn, and from her ashes spring
   New Heav'n and Earth, wherein the just shall dwell
   And after all thir tribulations long
   See golden days, fruitful of golden deeds,
   With Joy and Love triumphing, and fair Truth.
   Then thou thy regal Scepter shalt lay by,
   For regal Scepter then no more shall need,                          340
   God shall be All in All. But all ye Gods,
   Adore him, who to compass all this dies,
   Adore the Son, and honour him as mee.
   No sooner had th' Almighty ceas't, but all
   The multitude of Angels with a shout
   Loud as from numbers without number, sweet
   As from blest voices, uttering joy, Heav'n rung
   With Jubilee, and loud Hosanna's fill'd
   Th' eternal Regions: lowly reverent
   Towards either Throne they bow, & to the ground                     350
   With solemn adoration down they cast
   Thir Crowns inwove with Amarant and Gold,
   Immortal Amarant, a Flour which once
   In Paradise, fast by the Tree of Life
   Began to bloom, but soon for mans offence
   To Heav'n remov'd where first it grew, there grows,
   And flours aloft shading the Fount of Life,
   And where the river of Bliss through midst of Heavn
   Rowls o're Elisian Flours her Amber stream;
   With these that never fade the Spirits Elect                        360
   Bind thir resplendent locks inwreath'd with beams,
   Now in loose Garlands thick thrown off, the bright
   Pavement that like a Sea of Jasper shon
   Impurpl'd with Celestial Roses smil'd.
   Then Crown'd again thir gold'n Harps they took,
   Harps ever tun'd, that glittering by their side
   Like Quivers hung, and with Praeamble sweet
   Of charming symphonie they introduce
   Thir sacred Song, and waken raptures high;
   No voice exempt, no voice but well could joine                      370
   Melodious part, such concord is in Heav'n.
   Thee Father first they sung Omnipotent,
   Immutable, Immortal, Infinite,
   Eternal King; thee Author of all being,
   Fountain of Light, thy self invisible
   Amidst the glorious brightness where thou sit'st
   Thron'd inaccessible, but when thou shad'st
   The full blaze of thy beams, and through a cloud
   Drawn round about thee like a radiant Shrine,
   Dark with excessive bright thy skirts appeer,                       380
   Yet dazle Heav'n, that brightest Seraphim
   Approach not, but with both wings veil thir eyes.
   Thee next they sang of all Creation first,
   Begotten Son, Divine Similitude,
   In whose conspicuous count'nance, without cloud
   Made visible, th' Almighty Father shines,
   Whom else no Creature can behold; on thee
   Impresst the effulgence of his Glorie abides,
   Transfus'd on thee his ample Spirit rests.
   Hee Heav'n of Heavens and all the Powers therein                    390
   By thee created, and by thee threw down
   Th' aspiring Dominations: thou that day
   Thy Fathers dreadful Thunder didst not spare,
   Nor stop thy flaming Chariot wheels, that shook
   Heav'ns everlasting Frame, while o're the necks
   Thou drov'st of warring Angels disarraid.
   Back from pursuit thy Powers with loud acclaime
   Thee only extold, Son of thy Fathers might,
   To execute fierce vengeance on his foes,
   Not so on Man; him through their malice fall'n,                     400
   Father of Mercie and Grace, thou didst not doome
   So strictly, but much more to pitie encline:
   No sooner did thy dear and onely Son
   Perceive thee purpos'd not to doom frail Man
   So strictly, but much more to pitie enclin'd,
   He to appease thy wrauth, and end the strife
   Of Mercy and Justice in thy face discern'd,
   Regardless of the Bliss wherein hee sat
   Second to thee, offerd himself to die
   For mans offence. O unexampl'd love,                                410
   Love no where to be found less then Divine!
   Hail Son of God, Saviour of Men, thy Name
   Shall be the copious matter of my Song
   Henceforth, and never shall my Harp thy praise
   Forget, nor from thy Fathers praise disjoine.
   Thus they in Heav'n, above the starry Sphear,
   Thir happie hours in joy and hymning spent.
   Mean while upon the firm opacous Globe
   Of this round World, whose first convex divides
   The luminous inferior Orbs, enclos'd                                420
   From Chaos and th' inroad of Darkness old,
   Satan alighted walks: a Globe farr off
   It seem'd, now seems a boundless Continent
   Dark, waste, and wild, under the frown of Night
   Starless expos'd, and ever-threatning storms
   Of Chaos blustring round, inclement skie;
   Save on that side which from the wall of Heav'n
   Though distant farr som small reflection gaines
   Of glimmering air less vext with tempest loud:
   Here walk'd the Fiend at large in spacious field.                   430
   As when a Vultur on Imaus bred,
   Whose snowie ridge the roving Tartar bounds,
   Dislodging from a Region scarce of prey
   To gorge the flesh of Lambs or yeanling Kids
   On Hills where Flocks are fed, flies toward the Springs
   Of Ganges or Hydaspes, Indian streams;
   But in his way lights on the barren plaines
   Of Sericana, where Chineses drive
   With Sails and Wind thir canie Waggons light:
   So on this windie Sea of Land, the Fiend                            440
   Walk'd up and down alone bent on his prey,
   Alone, for other Creature in this place
   Living or liveless to be found was none,
   None yet, but store hereafter from the earth
   Up hither like Aereal vapours flew
   Of all things transitorie and vain, when Sin
   With vanity had filld the works of men:
   Both all things vain, and all who in vain things
   Built thir fond hopes of Glorie or lasting fame,
   Or happiness in this or th' other life;                             450
   All who have thir reward on Earth, the fruits
   Of painful Superstition and blind Zeal,
   Naught seeking but the praise of men, here find
   Fit retribution, emptie as thir deeds;
   All th' unaccomplisht works of Natures hand,
   Abortive, monstrous, or unkindly mixt,
   Dissolvd on earth, fleet hither, and in vain,
   Till final dissolution, wander here,
   Not in the neighbouring Moon, as some have dreamd;
   Those argent Fields more likely habitants,                          460
   Translated Saints, or middle Spirits hold
   Betwixt th' Angelical and Human kinde:
   Hither of ill-joynd Sons and Daughters born
   First from the ancient World those Giants came
   With many a vain exploit, though then renownd:
   The builders next of Babel on the Plain
   Of Sennaar, and still with vain designe
   New Babels, had they wherewithall, would build:
   Others came single; hee who to be deemd
   A God, leap'd fondly into Aetna flames,                             470
   Empedocles, and hee who to enjoy
   Plato's Elysium, leap'd into the Sea,
   Cleombrotus, and many more too long,
   Embryo's and Idiots, Eremits and Friers
   White, Black and Grey, with all thir trumperie.
   Here Pilgrims roam, that stray'd so farr to seek
   In Golgotha him dead, who lives in Heav'n;
   And they who to be sure of Paradise
   Dying put on the weeds of Dominic,
   Or in Franciscan think to pass disguis'd;                           480
   They pass the Planets seven, and pass the fixt,
   And that Crystalline Sphear whose ballance weighs
   The Trepidation talkt, and that first mov'd;
   And now Saint Peter at Heav'ns Wicket seems
   To wait them with his Keys, and now at foot
   Of Heav'ns ascent they lift thir Feet, when loe
   A violent cross wind from either Coast
   Blows them transverse ten thousand Leagues awry
   Into the devious Air; then might ye see
   Cowles, Hoods and Habits with thir wearers tost                     490
   And flutterd into Raggs, then Reliques, Beads,
   Indulgences, Dispenses, Pardons, Bulls,
   The sport of Winds: all these upwhirld aloft
   Fly o're the backside of the World farr off
   Into a Limbo large and broad, since calld
   The Paradise of Fools, to few unknown
   Long after, now unpeopl'd, and untrod;
   All this dark Globe the Fiend found as he pass'd,
   And long he wanderd, till at last a gleame
   Of dawning light turnd thither-ward in haste                        500
   His travell'd steps; farr distant hee descries
   Ascending by degrees magnificent
   Up to the wall of Heaven a Structure high,
   At top whereof, but farr more rich appeerd
   The work as of a Kingly Palace Gate
   With Frontispice of Diamond and Gold
   Imbellisht, thick with sparkling orient Gemmes
   The Portal shon, inimitable on Earth
   By Model, or by shading Pencil drawn.
   The Stairs were such as whereon Jacob saw                           510
   Angels ascending and descending, bands
   Of Guardians bright, when he from Esau fled
   To Padan-aram in the field of Luz,
   Dreaming by night under the open Skie,
   And waking cri'd, This is the Gate of Heav'n.
   Each Stair mysteriously was meant, nor stood
   There alwaies, but drawn up to Heav'n somtimes
   Viewless, and underneath a bright Sea flow'd
   Of Jasper, or of liquid Pearle, whereon
   Who after came from Earth, sayling arriv'd,                         520
   Wafted by Angels, or flew o're the Lake
   Rapt in a Chariot drawn by fiery Steeds.
   The Stairs were then let down, whether to dare
   The Fiend by easie ascent, or aggravate
   His sad exclusion from the dores of Bliss.
   Direct against which op'nd from beneath,
   Just o're the blissful seat of Paradise,
   A passage down to th' Earth, a passage wide,
   Wider by farr then that of after-times
   Over Mount Sion, and, though that were large,                       530
   Over the Promis'd Land to God so dear,
   By which, to visit oft those happy Tribes,
   On high behests his Angels to and fro
   Pass'd frequent, and his eye with choice regard
   From Paneas the fount of Jordans flood
   To Beersaba, where the Holy Land
   Borders on Aegypt and the Arabian shoare;
   So wide the op'ning seemd, where bounds were set
   To darkness, such as bound the Ocean wave.
   Satan from hence now on the lower stair                             540
   That scal'd by steps of Gold to Heav'n Gate
   Looks down with wonder at the sudden view
   Of all this World at once. As when a Scout
   Through dark and desart wayes with peril gone
   All night; at last by break of chearful dawne
   Obtains the brow of some high-climbing Hill,
   Which to his eye discovers unaware
   The goodly prospect of some forein land
   First-seen, or some renownd Metropolis
   With glistering Spires and Pinnacles adornd,                        550
   Which now the Rising Sun guilds with his beams.
   Such wonder seis'd, though after Heaven seen,
   The Spirit maligne, but much more envy seis'd
   At sight of all this World beheld so faire.
   Round he surveys, and well might, where he stood
   So high above the circling Canopie
   Of Nights extended shade; from Eastern Point
   Of Libra to the fleecie Starr that bears
   Andromeda farr off Atlantick Seas
   Beyond th' Horizon; then from Pole to Pole                          560
   He views in bredth, and without longer pause
   Down right into the Worlds first Region throws
   His flight precipitant, and windes with ease
   Through the pure marble Air his oblique way
   Amongst innumerable Starrs, that shon
   Stars distant, but nigh hand seemd other Worlds,
   Or other Worlds they seemd, or happy Iles,
   Like those Hesperian Gardens fam'd of old,
   Fortunate Fields, and Groves and flourie Vales,
   Thrice happy Iles, but who dwelt happy there                        570
   He stayd not to enquire: above them all
   The golden Sun in splendor likest Heaven
   Allur'd his eye: Thither his course he bends
   Through the calm Firmament; but up or downe
   By center, or eccentric, hard to tell,
   Or Longitude, where the great Luminarie
   Alooff the vulgar Constellations thick,
   That from his Lordly eye keep distance due,
   Dispenses Light from farr; they as they move
   Thir Starry dance in numbers that compute                           580
   Days, months, and years, towards his all-chearing Lamp
   Turn swift their various motions, or are turnd
   By his Magnetic beam, that gently warms
   The Univers, and to each inward part
   With gentle penetration, though unseen,
   Shoots invisible vertue even to the deep:
   So wondrously was set his Station bright.
   There lands the Fiend, a spot like which perhaps
   Astronomer in the Sun's lucent Orbe
   Through his glaz'd Optic Tube yet never saw.                        590
   The place he found beyond expression bright,
   Compar'd with aught on Earth, Medal or Stone;
   Not all parts like, but all alike informd
   With radiant light, as glowing Iron with fire;
   If mettal, part seemd Gold, part Silver cleer;
   If stone, Carbuncle most or Chrysolite,
   Rubie or Topaz, to the Twelve that shon
   In Aarons Brest-plate, and a stone besides
   Imagind rather oft then elsewhere seen,
   That stone, or like to that which here below                        600
   Philosophers in vain so long have sought,
   In vain, though by thir powerful Art they binde
   Volatil Hermes, and call up unbound
   In various shapes old Proteus from the Sea,
   Draind through a Limbec to his Native forme.
   What wonder then if fields and regions here
   Breathe forth Elixir pure, and Rivers run
   Potable Gold, when with one vertuous touch
   Th' Arch-chimic Sun so farr from us remote
   Produces with Terrestrial Humor mixt                                610
   Here in the dark so many precious things
   Of colour glorious and effect so rare?
   Here matter new to gaze the Devil met
   Undazl'd, farr and wide his eye commands,
   For sight no obstacle found here, nor shade,
   But all Sun-shine, as when his Beams at Noon
   Culminate from th' Aequator, as they now
   Shot upward still direct, whence no way round
   Shadow from body opaque can fall, and the Aire,
   No where so cleer, sharp'nd his visual ray                          620
   To objects distant farr, whereby he soon
   Saw within kenn a glorious Angel stand,
   The same whom John saw also in the Sun:
   His back was turnd, but not his brightness hid;
   Of beaming sunnie Raies, a golden tiar
   Circl'd his Head, nor less his Locks behind
   Illustrious on his Shoulders fledge with wings
   Lay waving round; on som great charge imploy'd
   Hee seemd, or fixt in cogitation deep.
   Glad was the Spirit impure as now in hope                           630
   To find who might direct his wandring flight
   To Paradise the happie seat of Man,
   His journies end and our beginning woe.
   But first he casts to change his proper shape,
   Which else might work him danger or delay:
   And now a stripling Cherube he appeers,
   Not of the prime, yet such as in his face
   Youth smil'd Celestial, and to every Limb
   Sutable grace diffus'd, so well he feignd;
   Under a Coronet his flowing haire                                   640
   In curles on either cheek plaid, wings he wore
   Of many a colourd plume sprinkl'd with Gold,
   His habit fit for speed succinct, and held
   Before his decent steps a Silver wand.
   He drew not nigh unheard, the Angel bright,
   Ere he drew nigh, his radiant visage turnd,
   Admonisht by his eare, and strait was known
   Th' Arch-Angel Uriel, one of the seav'n
   Who in Gods presence, neerest to his Throne
   Stand ready at command, and are his Eyes                            650
   That run through all the Heav'ns, or down to th' Earth
   Bear his swift errands over moist and dry,
   O're Sea and Land: him Satan thus accostes;
   Uriel, for thou of those seav'n Spirits that stand
   In sight of God's high Throne, gloriously bright,
   The first art wont his great authentic will
   Interpreter through highest Heav'n to bring,
   Where all his Sons thy Embassie attend;
   And here art likeliest by supream decree
   Like honour to obtain, and as his Eye                               660
   To visit oft this new Creation round;
   Unspeakable desire to see, and know
   All these his wondrous works, but chiefly Man,
   His chief delight and favour, him for whom
   All these his works so wondrous he ordaind,
   Hath brought me from the Quires of Cherubim
   Alone thus wandring. Brightest Seraph tell
   In which of all these shining Orbes hath Man
   His fixed seat, or fixed seat hath none,
   But all these shining Orbes his choice to dwell;                    670
   That I may find him, and with secret gaze,
   Or open admiration him behold
   On whom the great Creator hath bestowd
   Worlds, and on whom hath all these graces powrd;
   That both in him and all things, as is meet,
   The Universal Maker we may praise;
   Who justly hath drivn out his Rebell Foes
   To deepest Hell, and to repair that loss
   Created this new happie Race of Men
   To serve him better: wise are all his wayes.                        680
   So spake the false dissembler unperceivd;
   For neither Man nor Angel can discern
   Hypocrisie, the only evil that walks
   Invisible, except to God alone,
   By his permissive will, through Heav'n and Earth:
   And oft though wisdom wake, suspicion sleeps
   At wisdoms Gate, and to simplicitie
   Resigns her charge, while goodness thinks no ill
   Where no ill seems: Which now for once beguil'd
   Uriel, though Regent of the Sun, and held                           690
   The sharpest sighted Spirit of all in Heav'n;
   Who to the fraudulent Impostor foule
   In his uprightness answer thus returnd.
   Faire Angel, thy desire which tends to know
   The works of God, thereby to glorifie
   The great Work-Maister, leads to no excess
   That reaches blame, but rather merits praise
   The more it seems excess, that led thee hither
   From thy Empyreal Mansion thus alone,
   To witness with thine eyes what some perhaps                        700
   Contented with report heare onely in heav'n:
   For wonderful indeed are all his works,
   Pleasant to know, and worthiest to be all
   Had in remembrance alwayes with delight;
   But what created mind can comprehend
   Thir number, or the wisdom infinite
   That brought them forth, but hid thir causes deep.
   I saw when at his Word the formless Mass,
   This worlds material mould, came to a heap:
   Confusion heard his voice, and wilde uproar                         710
   Stood rul'd, stood vast infinitude confin'd;
   Till at his second bidding darkness fled,
   Light shon, and order from disorder sprung:
   Swift to thir several Quarters hasted then
   The cumbrous Elements, Earth, Flood, Aire, Fire,
   And this Ethereal quintessence of Heav'n
   Flew upward, spirited with various forms,
   That rowld orbicular, and turnd to Starrs
   Numberless, as thou seest, and how they move;
   Each had his place appointed, each his course,                      720
   The rest in circuit walles this Universe.
   Look downward on that Globe whose hither side
   With light from hence, though but reflected, shines;
   That place is Earth the seat of Man, that light
   His day, which else as th' other Hemisphere
   Night would invade, but there the neighbouring Moon
   (So call that opposite fair Starr) her aide
   Timely interposes, and her monthly round
   Still ending, still renewing, through mid Heav'n;
   With borrowd light her countenance triform                          730
   Hence fills and empties to enlighten th' Earth,
   And in her pale dominion checks the night.
   That spot to which I point is Paradise,
   Adams abode, those loftie shades his Bowre.
   Thy way thou canst not miss, me mine requires.
   Thus said, he turnd, and Satan bowing low,
   As to superior Spirits is wont in Heaven,
   Where honour due and reverence none neglects,
   Took leave, and toward the coast of Earth beneath,
   Down from th' Ecliptic, sped with hop'd success,                    740
   Throws his steep flight with many an Aerie wheele,
   Nor staid, till on Niphates top he lights.
 
   The End Of The Third Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK IV.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 Satan now in prospect of Eden, and nigh the place where he must now
 attempt the bold enterprize which he undertook alone against God and
 Man, falls into many doubts with himself, and many passions, fear, envy,
 and despare; but at length confirms himself in evil,  journeys on to
 Paradise, whose outward prospect and scituation is described, overleaps
 the bounds, sits in the shape of a Cormorant on the tree of life, as
 highest in the Garden to look about him.  The Garden describ'd; Satans
 first sight of Adam and Eve; his wonder at thir excellent form and happy
 state but with resolution to work thir fall; overhears thir discourse,
 thence gathers that the Tree of knowledge was forbidden them to eat of,
 under penalty of death; and thereon intends to found his temptation, by
 seducing them to transgress: then leaves them a while to know further
 of thir state by some other means. Mean while Uriel descending on a
 Sunbeam warns Gabriel, who had in charge the Gate of Paradise, that some
 evil spirit had escap'd the Deep, and past at Noon by his Sphere in the
 shape of a good Angel down to Paradise, discovered after by his furious
 gestures in the Mount. Gabriel promises to find him out ere morning.
 Night coming on, Adam and Eve discourse of going to thir rest: thir
 Bower describ'd; thir Evening worship. Gabriel drawing forth his Bands
 of Night-watch to walk the round of Paradise, appoints two strong Angels
 to Adams Bower, least the evill spirit should be there doing some harm
 to Adam or Eve sleeping; there they find him at the ear of Eve, tempting
 her in a dream, and bring him, though unwilling, to Gabriel; by whom
 question'd he scornfully answers, prepares resistance, but hinder'd by
 a Sign from Heaven, flies out of Paradise.
 
   O For that warning voice, which he who saw
   Th' Apocalyps, heard cry in Heaven aloud,
   Then when the Dragon, put to second rout,
   Came furious down to be reveng'd on men,
   Wo To The Inhabitants On Earth! that now,
   While time was, our first Parents had bin warnd
   The coming of thir secret foe, and scap'd
   Haply so scap'd his mortal snare; for now
   Satan, now first inflam'd with rage, came down,
   The Tempter ere th' Accuser of man-kind,                             10
   To wreck on innocent frail man his loss
   Of that first Battel, and his flight to Hell:
   Yet not rejoycing in his speed, though bold,
   Far off and fearless, nor with cause to boast,
   Begins his dire attempt, which nigh the birth
   Now rowling, boiles in his tumultuous brest,
   And like a devillish Engine back recoiles
   Upon himself; horror and doubt distract
   His troubl'd thoughts, and from the bottom stirr
   The Hell within him, for within him Hell                             20
   He brings, and round about him, nor from Hell
   One step no more then from himself can fly
   By change of place: Now conscience wakes despair
   That slumberd, wakes the bitter memorie
   Of what he was, what is, and what must be
   Worse; of worse deeds worse sufferings must ensue.
   Sometimes towards Eden which now in his view
   Lay pleasant, his grievd look he fixes sad,
   Sometimes towards Heav'n and the full-blazing Sun,
   Which now sat high in his Meridian Towre:                            30
   Then much revolving, thus in sighs began.
   O thou that with surpassing Glory crownd,
   Look'st from thy sole Dominion like the God
   Of this new World; at whose sight all the Starrs
   Hide thir diminisht heads; to thee I call,
   But with no friendly voice, and add thy name
   O Sun, to tell thee how I hate thy beams
   That bring to my remembrance from what state
   I fell, how glorious once above thy Spheare;
   Till Pride and worse Ambition threw me down                          40
   Warring in Heav'n against Heav'ns matchless King:
   Ah wherefore! he deservd no such return
   From me, whom he created what I was
   In that bright eminence, and with his good
   Upbraided none; nor was his service hard.
   What could be less then to afford him praise,
   The easiest recompence, and pay him thanks,
   How due! yet all his good prov'd ill in me,
   And wrought but malice; lifted up so high
   I sdeind subjection, and thought one step higher                     50
   Would set me highest, and in a moment quit
   The debt immense of endless gratitude,
   So burthensome, still paying, still to ow;
   Forgetful what from him I still receivd,
   And understood not that a grateful mind
   By owing owes not, but still pays, at once
   Indebted and dischargd; what burden then?
   O had his powerful Destiny ordaind
   Me some inferiour Angel, I had stood
   Then happie; no unbounded hope had rais'd                            60
   Ambition. Yet why not? som other Power
   As great might have aspir'd, and me though mean
   Drawn to his part; but other Powers as great
   Fell not, but stand unshak'n, from within
   Or from without, to all temptations arm'd.
   Hadst thou the same free Will and Power to stand?
   Thou hadst: whom hast thou then or what to accuse,
   But Heav'ns free Love dealt equally to all?
   Be then his Love accurst, since love or hate,
   To me alike, it deals eternal woe.                                   70
   Nay curs'd be thou; since against his thy will
   Chose freely what it now so justly rues.
   Me miserable! which way shall I flie
   Infinite wrauth, and infinite despaire?
   Which way I flie is Hell; my self am Hell;
   And in the lowest deep a lower deep
   Still threatning to devour me opens wide,
   To which the Hell I suffer seems a Heav'n.
   O then at last relent: is there no place
   Left for Repentance, none for Pardon left?                           80
   None left but by submission; and that word
   Disdain forbids me, and my dread of shame
   Among the spirits beneath, whom I seduc'd
   With other promises and other vaunts
   Then to submit, boasting I could subdue
   Th' Omnipotent. Ay me, they little know
   How dearly I abide that boast so vaine,
   Under what torments inwardly I groane;
   While they adore me on the Throne of Hell,
   With Diadem and Scepter high advanc'd                                90
   The lower still I fall, onely Supream
   In miserie; such joy Ambition findes.
   But say I could repent and could obtaine
   By Act of Grace my former state; how soon
   Would highth recal high thoughts, how soon unsay
   What feign'd submission swore: ease would recant
   Vows made in pain, as violent and void.
   For never can true reconcilement grow
   Where wounds of deadly hate have peirc'd so deep:
   Which would but lead me to a worse relapse                          100
   And heavier fall: so should I purchase deare
   Short intermission bought with double smart.
   This knows my punisher; therefore as farr
   From granting hee, as I from begging peace:
   All hope excluded thus, behold in stead
   Of us out-cast, exil'd, his new delight,
   Mankind created, and for him this World.
   So farwel Hope, and with Hope farwel Fear,
   Farwel Remorse: all Good to me is lost;
   Evil be thou my Good; by thee at least                              110
   Divided Empire with Heav'ns King I hold
   By thee, and more then half perhaps will reigne;
   As Man ere long, and this new World shall know.
   Thus while he spake, each passion dimm'd his face
   Thrice chang'd with pale, ire, envie and despair,
   Which marrd his borrow'd visage, and betraid
   Him counterfet, if any eye beheld.
   For heav'nly mindes from such distempers foule
   Are ever cleer. Whereof hee soon aware,
   Each perturbation smooth'd with outward calme,                      120
   Artificer of fraud; and was the first
   That practisd falshood under saintly shew,
   Deep malice to conceale, couch't with revenge:
   Yet not anough had practisd to deceive
   Uriel once warnd; whose eye pursu'd him down
   The way he went, and on th' Assyrian mount
   Saw him disfigur'd, more then could befall
   Spirit of happie sort: his gestures fierce
   He markd and mad demeanour, then alone,
   As he suppos'd, all unobserv'd, unseen.                             130
   So on he fares, and to the border comes
   Of Eden, where delicious Paradise,
   Now nearer, Crowns with her enclosure green,
   As with a rural mound the champain head
   Of a steep wilderness, whose hairie sides
   With thicket overgrown, grottesque and wilde,
   Access deni'd; and over head up grew
   Insuperable highth of loftiest shade,
   Cedar, and Pine, and Firr, and branching Palm,
   A Silvan Scene, and as the ranks ascend                             140
   Shade above shade, a woodie Theatre
   Of stateliest view. Yet higher then thir tops
   The verdurous wall of Paradise up sprung:
   Which to our general Sire gave prospect large
   Into his neather Empire neighbouring round.
   And higher then that Wall a circling row
   Of goodliest Trees loaden with fairest Fruit,
   Blossoms and Fruits at once of golden hue
   Appeerd, with gay enameld colours mixt:
   On which the Sun more glad impress'd his beams                      150
   Then in fair Evening Cloud, or humid Bow,
   When God hath showrd the earth; so lovely seemd
   That Lantskip: And of pure now purer aire
   Meets his approach, and to the heart inspires
   Vernal delight and joy, able to drive
   All sadness but despair: now gentle gales
   Fanning thir odoriferous wings dispense
   Native perfumes, and whisper whence they stole
   Those balmie spoiles. As when to them who saile
   Beyond the Cape Of Hope, and now are past                           160
   Mozambic, off at Sea North-East windes blow
   Sabean Odours from the spicie shoare
   Of Arabie the blest, with such delay
   Well pleas'd they slack thir course, and many a League
   Cheard with the grateful smell old Ocean smiles.
   So entertaind those odorous sweets the Fiend
   Who came thir bane, though with them better pleas'd
   Then Asmodeus with the fishie fume,
   That drove him, though enamourd, from the Spouse
   Of Tobits Son, and with a vengeance sent                            170
   From Media post to Aegypt, there fast bound.
   Now to th' ascent of that steep savage Hill
   Satan had journied on, pensive and slow;
   But further way found none, so thick entwin'd,
   As one continu'd brake, the undergrowth
   Of shrubs and tangling bushes had perplext
   All path of Man or Beast that past that way:
   One Gate there onely was, and that look'd East
   On th' other side: which when th' arch-fellon saw
   Due entrance he disdaind, and in contempt,                          180
   At one slight bound high overleap'd all bound
   Of Hill or highest Wall, and sheer within
   Lights on his feet. As when a prowling Wolfe,
   Whom hunger drives to seek new haunt for prey,
   Watching where Shepherds pen thir Flocks at eeve
   In hurdl'd Cotes amid the field secure,
   Leaps o're the fence with ease into the Fould:
   Or as a Thief bent to unhoord the cash
   Of some rich Burgher, whose substantial dores,
   Cross-barrd and bolted fast, fear no assault,                       190
   In at the window climbes, or o're the tiles;
   So clomb this first grand Thief into Gods Fould:
   So since into his Church lewd Hirelings climbe.
   Thence up he flew, and on the Tree of Life,
   The middle Tree and highest there that grew,
   Sat like a Cormorant; yet not true Life
   Thereby regaind, but sat devising Death
   To them who liv'd; nor on the vertue thought
   Of that life-giving Plant, but only us'd
   For prospect, what well us'd had bin the pledge                     200
   Of immortalitie. So little knows
   Any, but God alone, to value right
   The good before him, but perverts best things
   To worst abuse, or to thir meanest use.
   Beneath him with new wonder now he views
   To all delight of human sense expos'd
   In narrow room Natures whole wealth, yea more,
   A Heaven on Earth, for blissful Paradise
   Of God the Garden was, by him in the East
   Of Eden planted; Eden stretchd her Line                             210
   From Auran Eastward to the Royal Towrs
   Of great Seleucia, built by Grecian Kings,
   Or where the Sons of Eden long before
   Dwelt in Telassar: in this pleasant soile
   His farr more pleasant Garden God ordaind;
   Out of the fertil ground he caus'd to grow
   All Trees of noblest kind for sight, smell, taste;
   And all amid them stood the Tree of Life,
   High eminent, blooming Ambrosial Fruit
   Of vegetable Gold; and next to Life                                 220
   Our Death the Tree of Knowledge grew fast by,
   Knowledge of Good bought dear by knowing ill.
   Southward through Eden went a River large,
   Nor chang'd his course, but through the shaggie hill
   Pass'd underneath ingulft, for God had thrown
   That Mountain as his Garden mould high rais'd
   Upon the rapid current, which through veins
   Of porous Earth with kindly thirst up drawn,
   Rose a fresh Fountain, and with many a rill
   Waterd the Garden; thence united fell                               230
   Down the steep glade, and met the neather Flood,
   Which from his darksom passage now appeers,
   And now divided into four main Streams,
   Runs divers, wandring many a famous Realme
   And Country whereof here needs no account,
   But rather to tell how, if Art could tell,
   How from that Saphire Fount the crisped Brooks,
   Rowling on Orient Pearl and sands of Gold,
   With mazie error under pendant shades
   Ran Nectar, visiting each plant, and fed                            240
   Flours worthy of Paradise which not nice Art
   In Beds and curious Knots, but Nature boon
   Powrd forth profuse on Hill and Dale and Plaine,
   Both where the morning Sun first warmly smote
   The open field, and where the unpierc't shade
   Imbround the noontide Bowrs: Thus was this place,
   A happy rural seat of various view;
   Groves whose rich Trees wept odorous Gumms and Balme,
   Others whose fruit burnisht with Golden Rinde
   Hung amiable, Hesperian Fables true,                                250
   If true, here onely, and of delicious taste:
   Betwixt them Lawns, or level Downs, and Flocks
   Grasing the tender herb, were interpos'd,
   Or palmie hilloc, or the flourie lap
   Of som irriguous Valley spread her store,
   Flours of all hue, and without Thorn the Rose:
   Another side, umbrageous Grots and Caves
   Of coole recess, o're which the mantling Vine
   Layes forth her purple Grape, and gently creeps
   Luxuriant; mean while murmuring waters fall                         260
   Down the slope hills, disperst, or in a Lake,
   That to the fringed Bank with Myrtle crownd,
   Her chrystall mirror holds, unite thir streams.
   The Birds thir quire apply; aires, vernal aires,
   Breathing the smell of field and grove, attune
   The trembling leaves, while Universal Pan
   Knit with the Graces and the Hours in dance
   Led on th' Eternal Spring. Not that faire field
   Of Enna, where Proserpin gathring flours
   Her self a fairer Floure by gloomie Dis                             270
   Was gatherd, which cost Ceres all that pain
   To seek her through the world; nor that sweet Grove
   Of Daphne by Orontes, and th' inspir'd
   Castalian Spring might with this Paradise
   Of Eden strive; nor that Nyseian Ile
   Girt with the River Triton, where old Cham,
   Whom Gentiles Ammon call and Libyan Jove,
   Hid Amalthea and her Florid Son
   Young Bacchus from his Stepdame Rhea's eye;
   Nor where Abassin Kings thir issue Guard,                           280
   Mount Amara, though this by som suppos'd
   True Paradise under the Ethiop Line
   By Nilus head, enclos'd with shining Rock,
   A whole dayes journey high, but wide remote
   From this Assyrian Garden, where the Fiend
   Saw undelighted all delight, all kind
   Of living Creatures new to sight and strange:
   Two of far nobler shape erect and tall,
   Godlike erect, with native Honour clad
   In naked Majestie seemd Lords of all,                               290
   And worthie seemd, for in thir looks Divine
   The image of thir glorious Maker shon,
   Truth, Wisdome, Sanctitude severe and pure,
   Severe, but in true filial freedom plac't;
   Whence true autoritie in men; though both
   Not equal, as thir sex not equal seemd;
   For contemplation hee and valour formd,
   For softness shee and sweet attractive Grace,
   Hee for God only, shee for God in him:
   His fair large Front and Eye sublime declar'd                       300
   Absolute rule; and Hyacinthin Locks
   Round from his parted forelock manly hung
   Clustring, but not beneath his shoulders broad:
   Shee as a vail down to the slender waste
   Her unadorned golden tresses wore
   Dissheveld, but in wanton ringlets wav'd
   As the Vine curles her tendrils, which impli'd
   Subjection, but requir'd with gentle sway,
   And by her yeilded, by him best receivd,
   Yeilded with coy submission, modest pride,                          310
   And sweet reluctant amorous delay.
   Nor those mysterious parts were then conceald,
   Then was not guiltie shame, dishonest shame
   Of natures works, honor dishonorable,
   Sin-bred, how have ye troubl'd all mankind
   With shews instead, meer shews of seeming pure,
   And banisht from mans life his happiest life,
   Simplicitie and spotless innocence.
   So passd they naked on, nor shund the sight
   Of God or Angel, for they thought no ill:                           320
   So hand in hand they passd, the lovliest pair
   That ever since in loves imbraces met,
   Adam the goodliest man of men since borne
   His Sons, the fairest of her Daughters Eve.
   Under a tuft of shade that on a green
   Stood whispering soft, by a fresh Fountain side
   They sat them down, and after no more toil
   Of thir sweet Gardning labour then suffic'd
   To recommend coole Zephyr, and made ease
   More easie, wholsom thirst and appetite                             330
   More grateful, to thir Supper Fruits they fell,
   Nectarine Fruits which the compliant boughes
   Yeilded them, side-long as they sat recline
   On the soft downie Bank damaskt with flours:
   The savourie pulp they chew, and in the rinde
   Still as they thirsted scoop the brimming stream;
   Nor gentle purpose, nor endearing smiles
   Wanted, nor youthful dalliance as beseems
   Fair couple, linkt in happie nuptial League,
   Alone as they. About them frisking playd                            340
   All Beasts of th' Earth, since wilde, and of all chase
   In Wood or Wilderness, Forrest or Den;
   Sporting the Lion rampd, and in his paw
   Dandl'd the Kid; Bears, Tygers, Ounces, Pards
   Gambold before them, th' unwieldy Elephant
   To make them mirth us'd all his might, and wreathd
   His Lithe Proboscis; close the Serpent sly
   Insinuating, wove with Gordian twine
   His breaded train, and of his fatal guile
   Gave proof unheeded; others on the grass                            350
   Coucht, and now fild with pasture gazing sat,
   Or Bedward ruminating: for the Sun
   Declin'd was hasting now with prone carreer
   To th' Ocean Iles, and in th' ascending Scale
   Of Heav'n the Starrs that usher Evening rose:
   When Satan still in gaze, as first he stood,
   Scarce thus at length faild speech recoverd sad.
   O Hell! what doe mine eyes with grief behold,
   Into our room of bliss thus high advanc't
   Creatures of other mould, earth-born perhaps,                       360
   Not Spirits, yet to heav'nly Spirits bright
   Little inferior; whom my thoughts pursue
   With wonder, and could love, so lively shines
   In them Divine resemblance, and such grace
   The hand that formd them on thir shape hath pourd.
   Ah gentle pair, yee little think how nigh
   Your change approaches, when all these delights
   Will vanish and deliver ye to woe,
   More woe, the more your taste is now of joy;
   Happie, but for so happie ill secur'd                               370
   Long to continue, and this high seat your Heav'n
   Ill fenc't for Heav'n to keep out such a foe
   As now is enterd; yet no purpos'd foe
   To you whom I could pittie thus forlorne
   Though I unpittied: League with you I seek,
   And mutual amitie so streight, so close,
   That I with you must dwell, or you with me
   Henceforth; my dwelling haply may not please
   Like this fair Paradise, your sense, yet such
   Accept your Makers work; he gave it me,                             380
   Which I as freely give; Hell shall unfould,
   To entertain you two, her widest Gates,
   And send forth all her Kings; there will be room,
   Not like these narrow limits, to receive
   Your numerous ofspring; if no better place,
   Thank him who puts me loath to this revenge
   On you who wrong me not for him who wrongd.
   And should I at your harmless innocence
   Melt, as I doe, yet public reason just,
   Honour and Empire with revenge enlarg'd,                            390
   By conquering this new World, compels me now
   To do what else though damnd I should abhorre.
   So spake the Fiend, and with necessitie,
   The Tyrants plea, excus'd his devilish deeds.
   Then from his loftie stand on that high Tree
   Down he alights among the sportful Herd
   Of those fourfooted kindes, himself now one,
   Now other, as thir shape servd best his end
   Neerer to view his prey, and unespi'd
   To mark what of thir state he more might learn                      400
   By word or action markt: about them round
   A Lion now he stalkes with fierie glare,
   Then as a Tiger, who by chance hath spi'd
   In some Purlieu two gentle Fawnes at play,
   Strait couches close, then rising changes oft
   His couchant watch, as one who chose his ground
   Whence rushing he might surest seise them both
   Grip't in each paw: when Adam first of men
   To first of women Eve thus moving speech,
   Turnd him all eare to heare new utterance flow.                     410
   Sole partner and sole part of all these joyes,
   Dearer thy self then all; needs must the Power
   That made us, and for us this ample World
   Be infinitly good, and of his good
   As liberal and free as infinite,
   That rais'd us from the dust and plac't us here
   In all this happiness, who at his hand
   Have nothing merited, nor can performe
   Aught whereof hee hath need, hee who requires
   From us no other service then to keep                               420
   This one, this easie charge, of all the Trees
   In Paradise that beare delicious fruit
   So various, not to taste that onely Tree
   Of knowledge, planted by the Tree of Life,
   So neer grows Death to Life, what ere Death is,
   Som dreadful thing no doubt; for well thou knowst
   God hath pronounc't it death to taste that Tree,
   The only sign of our obedience left
   Among so many signes of power and rule
   Conferrd upon us, and Dominion giv'n                                430
   Over all other Creatures that possesse
   Earth, Aire, and Sea. Then let us not think hard
   One easie prohibition, who enjoy
   Free leave so large to all things else, and choice
   Unlimited of manifold delights:
   But let us ever praise him, and extoll
   His bountie, following our delightful task
   To prune these growing Plants, & tend these Flours,
   Which were it toilsom, yet with thee were sweet.
   To whom thus Eve repli'd. O thou for whom                           440
   And from whom I was formd flesh of thy flesh,
   And without whom am to no end, my Guide
   And Head, what thou hast said is just and right.
   For wee to him indeed all praises owe,
   And daily thanks, I chiefly who enjoy
   So farr the happier Lot, enjoying thee
   Preeminent by so much odds, while thou
   Like consort to thy self canst no where find.
   That day I oft remember, when from sleep
   I first awak't, and found my self repos'd                           450
   Under a shade on flours, much wondring where
   And what I was, whence thither brought, and how.
   Not distant far from thence a murmuring sound
   Of waters issu'd from a Cave and spread
   Into a liquid Plain, then stood unmov'd
   Pure as th' expanse of Heav'n; I thither went
   With unexperienc't thought, and laid me downe
   On the green bank, to look into the cleer
   Smooth Lake, that to me seemd another Skie.
   As I bent down to look, just opposite,                              460
   A Shape within the watry gleam appeerd
   Bending to look on me, I started back,
   It started back, but pleasd I soon returnd,
   Pleas'd it returnd as soon with answering looks
   Of sympathie and love, there I had fixt
   Mine eyes till now, and pin'd with vain desire,
   Had not a voice thus warnd me, What thou seest,
   What there thou seest fair Creature is thy self,
   With thee it came and goes: but follow me,
   And I will bring thee where no shadow staies                        470
   Thy coming, and thy soft imbraces, hee
   Whose image thou art, him thou shall enjoy
   Inseparablie thine, to him shalt beare
   Multitudes like thy self, and thence be call'd
   Mother of human Race: what could I doe,
   But follow strait, invisibly thus led?
   Till I espi'd thee, fair indeed and tall,
   Under a Platan, yet methought less faire,
   Less winning soft, less amiablie milde,
   Then that smooth watry image; back I turnd,                         480
   Thou following cryd'st aloud, Return fair Eve,
   Whom fli'st thou? whom thou fli'st, of him thou art,
   His flesh, his bone; to give thee being I lent
   Out of my side to thee, neerest my heart
   Substantial Life, to have thee by my side
   Henceforth an individual solace dear;
   Part of my Soul I seek thee, and thee claim
   My other half: with that thy gentle hand
   Seisd mine, I yeilded, and from that time see
   How beauty is excelld by manly grace                                490
   And wisdom, which alone is truly fair.
   So spake our general Mother, and with eyes
   Of conjugal attraction unreprov'd,
   And meek surrender, half imbracing leand
   On our first Father, half her swelling Breast
   Naked met his under the flowing Gold
   Of her loose tresses hid: he in delight
   Both of her Beauty and submissive Charms
   Smil'd with superior Love, as Jupiter
   On Juno smiles, when he impregns the Clouds                         500
   That shed May Flowers; and press'd her Matron lip
   With kisses pure: aside the Devil turnd
   For envie, yet with jealous leer maligne
   Ey'd them askance, and to himself thus plaind.
   Sight hateful, sight tormenting! thus these two
   Imparadis't in one anothers arms
   The happier Eden, shall enjoy thir fill
   Of bliss on bliss, while I to Hell am thrust,
   Where neither joy nor love, but fierce desire,
   Among our other torments not the least,                             510
   Still unfulfill'd with pain of longing pines;
   Yet let me not forget what I have gain'd
   From thir own mouths; all is not theirs it seems:
   One fatal Tree there stands of Knowledge call'd,
   Forbidden them to taste: Knowledge forbidd'n?
   Suspicious, reasonless. Why should thir Lord
   Envie them that? can it be sin to know,
   Can it be death? and do they onely stand
   By Ignorance, is that thir happie state,
   The proof of thir obedience and thir faith?                         520
   O fair foundation laid whereon to build
   Thir ruine! Hence I will excite thir minds
   With more desire to know, and to reject
   Envious commands, invented with designe
   To keep them low whom knowledge might exalt
   Equal with Gods; aspiring to be such,
   They taste and die: what likelier can ensue?
   But first with narrow search I must walk round
   This Garden, and no corner leave unspi'd;
   A chance but chance may lead where I may meet                       530
   Some wandring Spirit of Heav'n, by Fountain side,
   Or in thick shade retir'd, from him to draw
   What further would be learnt. Live while ye may,
   Yet happie pair; enjoy, till I return,
   Short pleasures, for long woes are to succeed.
   So saying, his proud step he scornful turn'd,
   But with sly circumspection, and began
   Through wood, through waste, o're hil, o're dale his roam.
   Mean while in utmost Longitude, where Heav'n
   With Earth and Ocean meets, the setting Sun                         540
   Slowly descended, and with right aspect
   Against the eastern Gate of Paradise
   Leveld his eevning Rayes: it was a Rock
   Of Alablaster, pil'd up to the Clouds,
   Conspicuous farr, winding with one ascent
   Accessible from Earth, one entrance high;
   The rest was craggie cliff, that overhung
   Still as it rose, impossible to climbe.
   Betwixt these rockie Pillars Gabriel sat
   Chief of th' Angelic Guards, awaiting night;                        550
   About him exercis'd Heroic Games
   Th' unarmed Youth of Heav'n, but nigh at hand
   Celestial Armourie, Shields, Helmes, and Speares
   Hung high with Diamond flaming, and with Gold.
   Thither came Uriel, gliding through the Eeven
   On a Sun beam, swift as a shooting Starr
   In Autumn thwarts the night, when vapors fir'd
   Impress the Air, and shews the Mariner
   From what point of his Compass to beware
   Impetuous winds: he thus began in haste.                            560
   Gabriel, to thee thy cours by Lot hath giv'n
   Charge and strict watch that to this happie place
   No evil thing approach or enter in;
   This day at highth of Noon came to my Spheare
   A Spirit, zealous, as he seem'd, to know
   More of th' Almighties works, and chiefly Man
   Gods latest Image: I describ'd his way
   Bent all on speed, and markt his Aerie Gate;
   But in the Mount that lies from Eden North,
   Where he first lighted, soon discernd his looks                     570
   Alien from Heav'n, with passions foul obscur'd:
   Mine eye pursu'd him still, but under shade
   Lost sight of him; one of the banisht crew
   I fear, hath ventur'd from the deep, to raise
   New troubles; him thy care must be to find.
   To whom the winged Warriour thus returnd:
   Uriel, no wonder if thy perfet sight,
   Amid the Suns bright circle where thou sitst,
   See farr and wide: in at this Gate none pass
   The vigilance here plac't, but such as come                         580
   Well known from Heav'n; and since Meridian hour
   No Creature thence: if Spirit of other sort,
   So minded, have oreleapt these earthie bounds
   On purpose, hard thou knowst it to exclude
   Spiritual substance with corporeal barr.
   But if within the circuit of these walks
   In whatsoever shape he lurk, of whom
   Thou telst, by morrow dawning I shall know.
   So promis'd hee, and Uriel to his charge
   Returnd on that bright beam, whose point now raisd                  590
   Bore him slope downward to the Sun now fall'n
   Beneath th' Azores; whither the prime Orb,
   Incredible how swift, had thither rowl'd
   Diurnal, or this less volubil Earth
   By shorter flight to th' East, had left him there
   Arraying with reflected Purple and Gold
   The Clouds that on his Western Throne attend:
   Now came still Eevning on, and Twilight gray
   Had in her sober Liverie all things clad;
   Silence accompanied, for Beast and Bird,                            600
   They to thir grassie Couch, these to thir Nests
   Were slunk, all but the wakeful Nightingale;
   She all night long her amorous descant sung;
   Silence was pleas'd: now glow'd the Firmament
   With living Saphirs: Hesperus that led
   The starrie Host, rode brightest, till the Moon
   Rising in clouded Majestie, at length
   Apparent Queen unvaild her peerless light,
   And o're the dark her Silver Mantle threw.
   When Adam thus to Eve: Fair Consort, th' hour                       610
   Of night, and all things now retir'd to rest
   Mind us of like repose, since God hath set
   Labour and rest, as day and night to men
   Successive, and the timely dew of sleep
   Now falling with soft slumbrous weight inclines
   Our eye-lids; other Creatures all day long
   Rove idle unimploid, and less need rest;
   Man hath his daily work of body or mind
   Appointed, which declares his Dignitie,
   And the regard of Heav'n on all his waies;                          620
   While other Animals unactive range,
   And of thir doings God takes no account.
   Tomorrow ere fresh Morning streak the East
   With first approach of light, we must be ris'n,
   And at our pleasant labour, to reform
   Yon flourie Arbors, yonder Allies green,
   Our walks at noon, with branches overgrown,
   That mock our scant manuring, and require
   More hands then ours to lop thir wanton growth:
   Those Blossoms also, and those dropping Gumms,                      630
   That lie bestrowne unsightly and unsmooth,
   Ask riddance, if we mean to tread with ease;
   Mean while, as Nature wills, Night bids us rest.
   To whom thus Eve with perfet beauty adornd.
   My Author and Disposer, what thou bidst
   Unargu'd I obey; so God ordains,
   God is thy Law, thou mine: to know no more
   Is womans happiest knowledge and her praise.
   With thee conversing I forget all time,
   All seasons and thir change, all please alike.                      640
   Sweet is the breath of morn, her rising sweet,
   With charm of earliest Birds; pleasant the Sun
   When first on this delightful Land he spreads
   His orient Beams, on herb, tree, fruit, and flour,
   Glistring with dew; fragrant the fertil earth
   After soft showers; and sweet the coming on
   Of grateful Eevning milde, then silent Night
   With this her solemn Bird and this fair Moon,
   And these the Gemms of Heav'n, her starrie train:
   But neither breath of Morn when she ascends                         650
   With charm of earliest Birds, nor rising Sun
   On this delightful land, nor herb, fruit, floure,
   Glistring with dew, nor fragrance after showers,
   Nor grateful Evening mild, nor silent Night
   With this her solemn Bird, nor walk by Moon,
   Or glittering Starr-light without thee is sweet.
   But wherfore all night long shine these, for whom
   This glorious sight, when sleep hath shut all eyes?
   To whom our general Ancestor repli'd.
   Daughter of God and Man, accomplisht Eve,                           660
   Those have thir course to finish, round the Earth,
   By morrow Eevning, and from Land to Land
   In order, though to Nations yet unborn,
   Ministring light prepar'd, they set and rise;
   Least total darkness should by Night regaine
   Her old possession, and extinguish life
   In Nature and all things, which these soft fires
   Not only enlighten, but with kindly heate
   Of various influence foment and warme,
   Temper or nourish, or in part shed down                             670
   Thir stellar vertue on all kinds that grow
   On Earth, made hereby apter to receive
   Perfection from the Suns more potent Ray.
   These then, though unbeheld in deep of night,
   Shine not in vain, nor think, though men were none,
   That heav'n would want spectators, God want praise;
   Millions of spiritual Creatures walk the Earth
   Unseen, both when we wake, and when we sleep:
   All these with ceasless praise his works behold
   Both day and night: how often from the steep                        680
   Of echoing Hill or Thicket have we heard
   Celestial voices to the midnight air,
   Sole, or responsive each to others note
   Singing thir great Creator: oft in bands
   While they keep watch, or nightly rounding walk
   With Heav'nly touch of instrumental sounds
   In full harmonic number joind, thir songs
   Divide the night, and lift our thoughts to Heaven.
   Thus talking hand in hand alone they pass'd
   On to thir blissful Bower; it was a place                           690
   Chos'n by the sovran Planter, when he fram'd
   All things to mans delightful use; the roofe
   Of thickest covert was inwoven shade
   Laurel and Mirtle, and what higher grew
   Of firm and fragrant leaf; on either side
   Acanthus, and each odorous bushie shrub
   Fenc'd up the verdant wall; each beauteous flour,
   Iris all hues, Roses, and Gessamin
   Rear'd high thir flourisht heads between, and wrought
   Mosaic; underfoot the Violet,                                       700
   Crocus, and Hyacinth with rich inlay
   Broiderd the ground, more colour'd then with stone
   Of costliest Emblem: other Creature here
   Beast, Bird, Insect, or Worm durst enter none;
   Such was thir awe of man. In shadier Bower
   More sacred and sequesterd, though but feignd,
   Pan or Silvanus never slept, nor Nymph,
   Nor Faunus haunted. Here in close recess
   With Flowers, Garlands, and sweet-smelling Herbs
   Espoused Eve deckt first her Nuptial Bed,                           710
   And heav'nly Quires the Hymenaean sung,
   What day the genial Angel to our Sire
   Brought her in naked beauty more adorn'd,
   More lovely then Pandora, whom the Gods
   Endowd with all thir gifts, and O too like
   In sad event, when to the unwiser Son
   Of Japhet brought by Hermes, she ensnar'd
   Mankind with her faire looks, to be aveng'd
   On him who had stole Joves authentic fire.
   Thus at thir shadie Lodge arriv'd, both stood,                      720
   Both turnd, and under op'n Skie ador'd
   The God that made both Skie, Air, Earth & Heav'n
   Which they beheld, the Moons resplendent Globe
   And starrie Pole: Thou also mad'st the Night,
   Maker Omnipotent, and thou the Day,
   Which we in our appointed work imployd
   Have finisht happie in our mutual help
   And mutual love, the Crown of all our bliss
   Ordain'd by thee, and this delicious place
   For us too large, where thy abundance wants                         730
   Partakers, and uncropt falls to the ground.
   But thou hast promis'd from us two a Race
   To fill the Earth, who shall with us extoll
   Thy goodness infinite, both when we wake,
   And when we seek, as now, thy gift of sleep.
   This said unanimous, and other Rites
   Observing none, but adoration pure
   Which God likes best, into thir inmost bower
   Handed they went; and eas'd the putting off
   These troublesom disguises which wee wear,                          740
   Strait side by side were laid, nor turnd I weene
   Adam from his fair Spouse, nor Eve the Rites
   Mysterious of connubial Love refus'd:
   Whatever Hypocrites austerely talk
   Of puritie and place and innocence,
   Defaming as impure what God declares
   Pure, and commands to som, leaves free to all.
   Our Maker bids increase, who bids abstain
   But our Destroyer, foe to God and Man?
   Haile wedded Love, mysterious Law, true source                      750
   Of human ofspring, sole proprietie,
   In Paradise of all things common else.
   By thee adulterous lust was driv'n from men
   Among the bestial herds to raunge, by thee
   Founded in Reason, Loyal, Just, and Pure,
   Relations dear, and all the Charities
   Of Father, Son, and Brother first were known.
   Farr be it, that I should write thee sin or blame,
   Or think thee unbefitting holiest place,
   Perpetual Fountain of Domestic sweets,                              760
   Whose Bed is undefil'd and chast pronounc't,
   Present, or past, as Saints and Patriarchs us'd.
   Here Love his golden shafts imploies, here lights
   His constant Lamp, and waves his purple wings,
   Reigns here and revels; not in the bought smile
   Of Harlots, loveless, joyless, unindeard,
   Casual fruition, nor in Court Amours
   Mixt Dance, or wanton Mask, or Midnight Bal,
   Or Serenate, which the starv'd Lover sings
   To his proud fair, best quitted with disdain.                       770
   These lulld by Nightingales imbraceing slept,
   And on thir naked limbs the flourie roof
   Showrd Roses, which the Morn repair'd. Sleep on,
   Blest pair; and O yet happiest if ye seek
   No happier state, and know to know no more.
   Now had night measur'd with her shaddowie Cone
   Half way up Hill this vast Sublunar Vault,
   And from thir Ivorie Port the Cherubim
   Forth issuing at th' accustomd hour stood armd
   To thir night watches in warlike Parade,                            780
   When Gabriel to his next in power thus spake.
   Uzziel, half these draw off, and coast the South
   With strictest watch; these other wheel the North,
   Our circuit meets full West. As flame they part
   Half wheeling to the Shield, half to the Spear.
   From these, two strong and suttle Spirits he calld
   That neer him stood, and gave them thus in charge.
   Ithuriel and Zephon, with wingd speed
   Search through this Garden, leav unsearcht no nook,
   But chiefly where those two fair Creatures Lodge,                   790
   Now laid perhaps asleep secure of harme.
   This Eevning from the Sun's decline arriv'd
   Who tells of som infernal Spirit seen
   Hitherward bent (who could have thought?) escap'd
   The barrs of Hell, on errand bad no doubt:
   Such where ye find, seise fast, and hither bring.
   So saying, on he led his radiant Files,
   Daz'ling the Moon; these to the Bower direct
   In search of whom they sought: him there they found
   Squat like a Toad, close at the eare of Eve;                        800
   Assaying by his Devilish art to reach
   The Organs of her Fancie, and with them forge
   Illusions as he list, Phantasms and Dreams,
   Or if, inspiring venom, he might taint
   Th' animal Spirits that from pure blood arise
   Like gentle breaths from Rivers pure, thence raise
   At least distemperd, discontented thoughts,
   Vain hopes, vain aimes, inordinate desires
   Blown up with high conceits ingendring pride.
   Him thus intent Ithuriel with his Spear                             810
   Touch'd lightly; for no falshood can endure
   Touch of Celestial temper, but returns
   Of force to its own likeness: up he starts
   Discoverd and surpriz'd. As when a spark
   Lights on a heap of nitrous Powder, laid
   Fit for the Tun som Magazin to store
   Against a rumord Warr, the Smuttie graine
   With sudden blaze diffus'd, inflames the Aire:
   So started up in his own shape the Fiend.
   Back stept those two fair Angels half amaz'd                        820
   So sudden to behold the grieslie King;
   Yet thus, unmovd with fear, accost him soon.
   Which of those rebell Spirits adjudg'd to Hell
   Com'st thou, escap'd thy prison, and transform'd,
   Why satst thou like an enemie in waite
   Here watching at the head of these that sleep?
   Know ye not then said Satan, filld with scorn,
   Know ye not me? ye knew me once no mate
   For you, there sitting where ye durst not soare;
   Not to know mee argues your selves unknown,                         830
   The lowest of your throng; or if ye know,
   Why ask ye, and superfluous begin
   Your message, like to end as much in vain?
   To whom thus Zephon, answering scorn with scorn.
   Think not, revolted Spirit, thy shape the same,
   Or undiminisht brightness, to be known
   As when thou stoodst in Heav'n upright and pure;
   That Glorie then, when thou no more wast good,
   Departed from thee, and thou resembl'st now
   Thy sin and place of doom obscure and foule.                        840
   But come, for thou, be sure, shalt give account
   To him who sent us, whose charge is to keep
   This place inviolable, and these from harm.
   So spake the Cherube, and his grave rebuke
   Severe in youthful beautie, added grace
   Invincible: abasht the Devil stood,
   And felt how awful goodness is, and saw
   Vertue in her shape how lovly, saw, and pin'd
   His loss; but chiefly to find here observd
   His lustre visibly impar'd; yet seemd                               850
   Undaunted. If I must contend, said he,
   Best with the best, the Sender not the sent,
   Or all at once; more glorie will be wonn,
   Or less be lost. Thy fear, said Zephon bold,
   Will save us trial what the least can doe
   Single against thee wicked, and thence weak.
   The Fiend repli'd not, overcome with rage;
   But like a proud Steed reind, went hautie on,
   Chaumping his iron curb: to strive or flie
   He held it vain; awe from above had quelld                          860
   His heart, not else dismai'd. Now drew they nigh
   The western point, where those half-rounding guards
   Just met, & closing stood in squadron joind
   Awaiting next command. To whom thir Chief
   Gabriel from the Front thus calld aloud.
   O friends, I hear the tread of nimble feet
   Hasting this way, and now by glimps discerne
   Ithuriel and Zephon through the shade,
   And with them comes a third of Regal port,
   But faded splendor wan; who by his gate                             870
   And fierce demeanour seems the Prince of Hell,
   Not likely to part hence without contest;
   Stand firm, for in his look defiance lours.
   He scarce had ended, when those two approachd
   And brief related whom they brought, wher found,
   How busied, in what form and posture coucht.
   To whom with stern regard thus Gabriel spake.
   Why hast thou, Satan, broke the bounds prescrib'd
   To thy transgressions, and disturbd the charge
   Of others, who approve not to transgress                            880
   By thy example, but have power and right
   To question thy bold entrance on this place;
   Imploi'd it seems to violate sleep, and those
   Whose dwelling God hath planted here in bliss?
   To whom thus Satan with contemptuous brow.
   Gabriel, thou hadst in Heav'n th' esteem of wise,
   And such I held thee; but this question askt
   Puts me in doubt. Lives ther who loves his pain?
   Who would not, finding way, break loose from Hell,
   Though thither doomd? Thou wouldst thy self, no doubt,              890
   And boldly venture to whatever place
   Farthest from pain, where thou mightst hope to change
   Torment with ease, & soonest recompence
   Dole with delight, which in this place I sought;
   To thee no reason; who knowst only good,
   But evil hast not tri'd: and wilt object
   His will who bound us? let him surer barr
   His Iron Gates, if he intends our stay
   In that dark durance: thus much what was askt.
   The rest is true, they found me where they say;                     900
   But that implies not violence or harme.
   Thus hee in scorn. The warlike Angel mov'd,
   Disdainfully half smiling thus repli'd.
   O loss of one in Heav'n to judge of wise,
   Since Satan fell, whom follie overthrew,
   And now returns him from his prison scap't,
   Gravely in doubt whether to hold them wise
   Or not, who ask what boldness brought him hither
   Unlicenc't from his bounds in Hell prescrib'd;
   So wise he judges it to fly from pain                               910
   However, and to scape his punishment.
   So judge thou still, presumptuous, till the wrauth,
   Which thou incurr'st by flying, meet thy flight
   Seavenfold, and scourge that wisdom back to Hell,
   Which taught thee yet no better, that no pain
   Can equal anger infinite provok't.
   But wherefore thou alone? wherefore with thee
   Came not all Hell broke loose? is pain to them
   Less pain, less to be fled, or thou then they
   Less hardie to endure? courageous Chief,                            920
   The first in flight from pain, had'st thou alleg'd
   To thy deserted host this cause of flight,
   Thou surely hadst not come sole fugitive.
   To which the Fiend thus answerd frowning stern.
   Not that I less endure, or shrink from pain,
   Insulting Angel, well thou knowst I stood
   Thy fiercest, when in Battel to thy aide
   The blasting volied Thunder made all speed
   And seconded thy else not dreaded Spear.
   But still thy words at random, as before,                           930
   Argue thy inexperience what behooves
   From hard assaies and ill successes past
   A faithful Leader, not to hazard all
   Through wayes of danger by himself untri'd.
   I therefore, I alone first undertook
   To wing the desolate Abyss, and spie
   This new created World, whereof in Hell
   Fame is not silent, here in hope to find
   Better abode, and my afflicted Powers
   To settle here on Earth, or in mid Aire;                            940
   Though for possession put to try once more
   What thou and thy gay Legions dare against;
   Whose easier business were to serve thir Lord
   High up in Heav'n, with songs to hymne his Throne,
   And practis'd distances to cringe, not fight.
   To whom the warriour Angel soon repli'd.
   To say and strait unsay, pretending first
   Wise to flie pain, professing next the Spie,
   Argues no Leader, but a lyar trac't,
   Satan, and couldst thou faithful add? O name,                       950
   O sacred name of faithfulness profan'd!
   Faithful to whom? to thy rebellious crew?
   Armie of Fiends, fit body to fit head;
   Was this your discipline and faith ingag'd,
   Your military obedience, to dissolve
   Allegeance to th' acknowledg'd Power supream?
   And thou sly hypocrite, who now wouldst seem
   Patron of liberty, who more then thou
   Once fawn'd, and cring'd, and servilly ador'd
   Heav'ns awful Monarch? wherefore but in hope                        960
   To dispossess him, and thy self to reigne?
   But mark what I arreede thee now, avant;
   Flie thither whence thou fledst: if from this houre
   Within these hallowd limits thou appeer,
   Back to th' infernal pit I drag thee chaind,
   And Seale thee so, as henceforth not to scorne
   The facil gates of hell too slightly barrd.
   So threatn'd hee, but Satan to no threats
   Gave heed, but waxing more in rage repli'd.
   Then when I am thy captive talk of chaines,                         970
   Proud limitarie Cherube, but ere then
   Farr heavier load thy self expect to feel
   From my prevailing arme, though Heavens King
   Ride on thy wings, and thou with thy Compeers,
   Us'd to the yoak, draw'st his triumphant wheels
   In progress through the rode of Heav'n Star-pav'd.
   While thus he spake, th' Angelic Squadron bright
   Turnd fierie red, sharpning in mooned hornes
   Thir Phalanx, and began to hemm him round
   With ported Spears, as thick as when a field                        980
   Of Ceres ripe for harvest waving bends
   Her bearded Grove of ears, which way the wind
   Swayes them; the careful Plowman doubting stands
   Least on the threshing floore his hopeful sheaves
   Prove chaff. On th' other side Satan allarm'd
   Collecting all his might dilated stood,
   Like Teneriff or Atlas unremov'd:
   His stature reacht the Skie, and on his Crest
   Sat horror Plum'd; nor wanted in his graspe
   What seemd both Spear and Shield: now dreadful deeds                990
   Might have ensu'd, nor onely Paradise
   In this commotion, but the Starrie Cope
   Of Heav'n perhaps, or all the Elements
   At least had gon to rack, disturbd and torne
   With violence of this conflict, had not soon
   Th' Eternal to prevent such horrid fray
   Hung forth in Heav'n his golden Scales, yet seen
   Betwixt Astrea and the Scorpion signe,
   Wherein all things created first he weighd,
   The pendulous round Earth with ballanc't Aire                      1000
   In counterpoise, now ponders all events,
   Battels and Realms: in these he put two weights
   The sequel each of parting and of fight;
   The latter quick up flew, and kickt the beam;
   Which Gabriel spying, thus bespake the Fiend.
   Satan, I know thy strength, and thou knowst mine,
   Neither our own but giv'n; what follie then
   To boast what Arms can doe, since thine no more
   Then Heav'n permits, nor mine, though doubld now
   To trample thee as mire: for proof look up,                        1010
   And read thy Lot in yon celestial Sign
   Where thou art weigh'd, & shown how light, how weak,
   If thou resist. The Fiend lookt up and knew
   His mounted scale aloft: nor more; but fled
   Murmuring, and with him fled the shades of night.
 
   Notes:
   Argument: promises to find him out]  promises to find him 1674
   627 walks] walk 1674.
   928 The] Thy 1674.
 
   The End Of The Fourth Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK V.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 Morning approach't, Eve relates to Adam her troublesome dream: he likes
 it not, yet comforts her: They come forth to thir day labours: Their
 Morning Hymn  at the Door of their Bower. God to render Man inexcusable
 sends Raphael to admonish him of his obedience, of his free estate, of
 his enemy near at hand; who he is, and why his enemy, and whatever else
 may avail Adam to know. Raphael comes down to Paradise; his appearance
 describ'd, his coming discern'd by Adam afar off sitting at the door of
 his Bower; he goes out to meet him, brings him to his lodge, entertains
 him with the choycest fruits of Paradise got together by Eve;  their
 discourse at Table: Raphael performs his message, minds Adam of his
 state and of his enemy; relates at Adams request who that enemy is, and
 how he came to be so, beginning with his first revolt in Heaven and the
 occasion thereof; how he drew his Legions after him to the parts of the
 North, and there incited them to rebel with him, perswading all but only
 Abdiel a Seraph, who in Argument diswades and opposes him, then forsakes
 him.
 
   Now Morn her rosie steps in th' Eastern Clime
   Advancing, sow'd the Earth with Orient Pearle,
   When Adam wak't, so customd, for his sleep
   Was Aerie light, from pure digestion bred,
   And temperat vapors bland, which th' only sound
   Of leaves and fuming rills, Aurora's fan,
   Lightly dispers'd, and the shrill Matin Song
   Of Birds on every bough; so much the more
   His wonder was to find unwak'nd Eve
   With Tresses discompos'd, and glowing Cheek,                         10
   As through unquiet rest: he on his side
   Leaning half-rais'd, with looks of cordial Love
   Hung over her enamour'd, and beheld
   Beautie, which whether waking or asleep,
   Shot forth peculiar Graces; then with voice
   Milde, as when Zephyrus on Flora breathes,
   Her hand soft touching, whisperd thus. Awake
   My fairest, my espous'd, my latest found,
   Heav'ns last best gift, my ever new delight,
   Awake, the morning shines, and the fresh field                       20
   Calls us, we lose the prime, to mark how spring
   Our tended Plants, how blows the Citron Grove,
   What drops the Myrrhe, & what the balmie Reed,
   How Nature paints her colours, how the Bee
   Sits on the Bloom extracting liquid sweet.
   Such whispering wak'd her, but with startl'd eye
   On Adam, whom imbracing, thus she spake.
   O Sole in whom my thoughts find all repose,
   My Glorie, my Perfection, glad I see
   Thy face, and Morn return'd, for I this Night,                       30
   Such night till this I never pass'd, have dream'd,
   If dream'd, not as I oft am wont, of thee,
   Works of day pass't, or morrows next designe,
   But of offence and trouble, which my mind
   Knew never till this irksom night; methought
   Close at mine ear one call'd me forth to walk
   With gentle voice, I thought it thine; it said,
   Why sleepst thou Eve? now is the pleasant time,
   The cool, the silent, save where silence yields
   To the night-warbling Bird, that now awake                           40
   Tunes sweetest his love-labor'd song; now reignes
   Full Orb'd the Moon, and with more pleasing light
   Shadowie sets off the face of things; in vain,
   If none regard; Heav'n wakes with all his eyes,
   Whom to behold but thee, Natures desire,
   In whose sight all things joy, with ravishment
   Attracted by thy beauty still to gaze.
   I rose as at thy call, but found thee not;
   To find thee I directed then my walk;
   And on, methought, alone I pass'd through ways                       50
   That brought me on a sudden to the Tree
   Of interdicted Knowledge: fair it seem'd,
   Much fairer to my Fancie then by day:
   And as I wondring lookt, beside it stood
   One shap'd and wing'd like one of those from Heav'n
   By us oft seen; his dewie locks distill'd
   Ambrosia; on that Tree he also gaz'd;
   And O fair Plant, said he, with fruit surcharg'd,
   Deigns none to ease thy load and taste thy sweet,
   Nor God, nor Man; is Knowledge so despis'd?                          60
   Or envie, or what reserve forbids to taste?
   Forbid who will, none shall from me withhold
   Longer thy offerd good, why else set here?
   This said he paus'd not, but with ventrous Arme
   He pluckt, he tasted; mee damp horror chil'd
   At such bold words voucht with a deed so bold:
   But he thus overjoy'd, O Fruit Divine,
   Sweet of thy self, but much more sweet thus cropt,
   Forbidd'n here, it seems, as onely fit
   For Gods, yet able to make Gods of Men:                              70
   And why not Gods of Men, since good, the more
   Communicated, more abundant growes,
   The Author not impair'd, but honourd more?
   Here, happie Creature, fair Angelic Eve,
   Partake thou also; happie though thou art,
   Happier thou mayst be, worthier canst not be:
   Taste this, and be henceforth among the Gods
   Thy self a Goddess, not to Earth confind,
   But somtimes in the Air, as wee, somtimes
   Ascend to Heav'n, by merit thine, and see                            80
   What life the Gods live there, and such live thou.
   So saying, he drew nigh, and to me held,
   Even to my mouth of that same fruit held part
   Which he had pluckt; the pleasant savourie smell
   So quick'nd appetite, that I, methought,
   Could not but taste. Forthwith up to the Clouds
   With him I flew, and underneath beheld
   The Earth outstretcht immense, a prospect wide
   And various: wondring at my flight and change
   To this high exaltation; suddenly                                    90
   My Guide was gon, and I, me thought, sunk down,
   And fell asleep; but O how glad I wak'd
   To find this but a dream! Thus Eve her Night
   Related, and thus Adam answerd sad.
   Best Image of my self and dearer half,
   The trouble of thy thoughts this night in sleep
   Affects me equally; nor can I like
   This uncouth dream, of evil sprung I fear;
   Yet evil whence? in thee can harbour none,
   Created pure. But know that in the Soule                            100
   Are many lesser Faculties that serve
   Reason as chief; among these Fansie next
   Her office holds; of all external things,
   Which the five watchful Senses represent,
   She forms Imaginations, Aerie shapes,
   Which Reason joyning or disjoyning, frames
   All what we affirm or what deny, and call
   Our knowledge or opinion; then retires
   Into her private Cell when Nature rests.
   Oft in her absence mimic Fansie wakes                               110
   To imitate her; but misjoyning shapes,
   Wilde work produces oft, and most in dreams,
   Ill matching words and deeds long past or late.
   Som such resemblances methinks I find
   Of our last Eevnings talk, in this thy dream,
   But with addition strange; yet be not sad.
   Evil into the mind of God or Man
   May come and go, so unapprov'd, and leave
   No spot or blame behind: Which gives me hope
   That what in sleep thou didst abhorr to dream,                      120
   Waking thou never wilt consent to do.
   Be not disheart'nd then, nor cloud those looks
   That wont to be more chearful and serene
   Then when fair Morning first smiles on the World,
   And let us to our fresh imployments rise
   Among the Groves, the Fountains, and the Flours
   That open now thir choicest bosom'd smells
   Reservd from night, and kept for thee in store.
   So cheard he his fair Spouse, and she was cheard,
   But silently a gentle tear let fall                                 130
   From either eye, and wip'd them with her haire;
   Two other precious drops that ready stood,
   Each in thir chrystal sluce, hee ere they fell
   Kiss'd as the gracious signs of sweet remorse
   And pious awe, that feard to have offended.
   So all was cleard, and to the Field they haste.
   But first from under shadie arborous roof,
   Soon as they forth were come to open sight
   Of day-spring, and the Sun, who scarce up risen
   With wheels yet hov'ring o're the Ocean brim,                       140
   Shot paralel to the earth his dewie ray,
   Discovering in wide Lantskip all the East
   Of Paradise and Edens happie Plains,
   Lowly they bow'd adoring, and began
   Thir Orisons, each Morning duly paid
   In various style, for neither various style
   Nor holy rapture wanted they to praise
   Thir Maker, in fit strains pronounc't or sung
   Unmeditated, such prompt eloquence
   Flowd from thir lips, in Prose or numerous Verse,                   150
   More tuneable then needed Lute or Harp
   To add more sweetness, and they thus began.
   These are thy glorious works, Parent of good,
   Almightie, thine this universal Frame,
   Thus wondrous fair; thy self how wondrous then!
   Unspeakable, who sitst above these Heavens
   To us invisible or dimly seen
   In these thy lowest works, yet these declare
   Thy goodness beyond thought, and Power Divine:
   Speak yee who best can tell, ye Sons of light,                      160
   Angels, for yee behold him, and with songs
   And choral symphonies, Day without Night,
   Circle his Throne rejoycing, yee in Heav'n,
   On Earth joyn all yee Creatures to extoll
   Him first, him last, him midst, and without end.
   Fairest of Starrs, last in the train of Night,
   If better thou belong not to the dawn,
   Sure pledge of day, that crownst the smiling Morn
   With thy bright Circlet, praise him in thy Spheare
   While day arises, that sweet hour of Prime.                         170
   Thou Sun, of this great World both Eye and Soule,
   Acknowledge him thy Greater, sound his praise
   In thy eternal course, both when thou climb'st,
   And when high Noon hast gaind, & when thou fallst.
   Moon, that now meetst the orient Sun, now fli'st
   With the fixt Starrs, fixt in thir Orb that flies,
   And yee five other wandring Fires that move
   In mystic Dance not without Song, resound
   His praise, who out of Darkness call'd up Light.
   Aire, and ye Elements the eldest birth                              180
   Of Natures Womb, that in quaternion run
   Perpetual Circle, multiform; and mix
   And nourish all things, let your ceasless change
   Varie to our great Maker still new praise.
   Ye Mists and Exhalations that now rise
   From Hill or steaming Lake, duskie or grey,
   Till the Sun paint your fleecie skirts with Gold,
   In honour to the Worlds great Author rise,
   Whether to deck with Clouds the uncolourd skie,
   Or wet the thirstie Earth with falling showers,                     190
   Rising or falling still advance his praise.
   His praise ye Winds, that from four Quarters blow,
   Breath soft or loud; and wave your tops, ye Pines,
   With every Plant, in sign of Worship wave.
   Fountains and yee, that warble, as ye flow,
   Melodious murmurs, warbling tune his praise.
   Joyn voices all ye living Souls, ye Birds,
   That singing up to Heaven Gate ascend,
   Bear on your wings and in your notes his praise;
   Yee that in Waters glide, and yee that walk                         200
   The Earth, and stately tread, or lowly creep;
   Witness if I be silent, Morn or Eeven,
   To Hill, or Valley, Fountain, or fresh shade
   Made vocal by my Song, and taught his praise.
   Hail universal Lord, be bounteous still
   To give us onely good; and if the night
   Have gathered aught of evil or conceald,
   Disperse it, as now light dispels the dark.
   So pray'd they innocent, and to thir thoughts
   Firm peace recoverd soon and wonted calm.                           210
   On to thir mornings rural work they haste
   Among sweet dewes and flours; where any row
   Of Fruit-trees overwoodie reachd too farr
   Thir pamperd boughes, and needed hands to check
   Fruitless imbraces: or they led the Vine
   To wed her Elm; she spous'd about him twines
   Her mariageable arms, and with her brings
   Her dowr th' adopted Clusters, to adorn
   His barren leaves. Them thus imploid beheld
   With pittie Heav'ns high King, and to him call'd                    220
   Raphael, the sociable Spirit, that deign'd
   To travel with Tobias, and secur'd
   His marriage with the seaventimes-wedded Maid.
   Raphael, said hee, thou hear'st what stir on Earth
   Satan from Hell scap't through the darksom Gulf
   Hath raisd in Paradise, and how disturbd
   This night the human pair, how he designes
   In them at once to ruin all mankind.
   Go therefore, half this day as friend with friend
   Converse with Adam, in what Bowre or shade                          230
   Thou find'st him from the heat of Noon retir'd,
   To respit his day-labour with repast,
   Or with repose; and such discourse bring on,
   As may advise him of his happie state,
   Happiness in his power left free to will,
   Left to his own free Will, his Will though free,
   Yet mutable; whence warne him to beware
   He swerve not too secure: tell him withall
   His danger, and from whom, what enemie
   Late falln himself from Heav'n, is plotting now                     240
   The fall of others from like state of bliss;
   By violence, no, for that shall be withstood,
   But by deceit and lies; this let him know,
   Least wilfully transgressing he pretend
   Surprisal, unadmonisht, unforewarnd.
   So spake th' Eternal Father, and fulfilld
   All Justice: nor delaid the winged Saint
   After his charge receivd, but from among
   Thousand Celestial Ardors, where he stood
   Vaild with his gorgeous wings, up springing light                   250
   Flew through the midst of Heav'n; th' angelic Quires
   On each hand parting, to his speed gave way
   Through all th' Empyreal road; till at the Gate
   Of Heav'n arriv'd, the gate self-opend wide
   On golden Hinges turning, as by work
   Divine the sov'ran Architect had fram'd.
   From hence, no cloud, or, to obstruct his sight,
   Starr interpos'd, however small he sees,
   Not unconform to other shining Globes,
   Earth and the Gard'n of God, with Cedars crownd                     260
   Above all Hills. As when by night the Glass
   Of Galileo, less assur'd, observes
   Imagind Lands and Regions in the Moon:
   Or Pilot from amidst the Cyclades
   Delos or Samos first appeering kenns
   A cloudy spot. Down thither prone in flight
   He speeds, and through the vast Ethereal Skie
   Sailes between worlds & worlds, with steddie wing
   Now on the polar windes, then with quick Fann
   Winnows the buxom Air; till within soare                            270
   Of Towring Eagles, to all the Fowles he seems
   A Phoenix, gaz'd by all, as that sole Bird
   When to enshrine his reliques in the Sun's
   Bright Temple, to Aegyptian Theb's he flies.
   At once on th' Eastern cliff of Paradise
   He lights, and to his proper shape returns
   A Seraph wingd; six wings he wore, to shade
   His lineaments Divine; the pair that clad
   Each shoulder broad, came mantling o're his brest
   With regal Ornament; the middle pair                                280
   Girt like a Starrie Zone his waste, and round
   Skirted his loines and thighes with downie Gold
   And colours dipt in Heav'n; the third his feet
   Shaddowd from either heele with featherd maile
   Skie-tinctur'd grain. Like Maia's son he stood,
   And shook his Plumes, that Heav'nly fragrance filld
   The circuit wide. Strait knew him all the bands
   Of Angels under watch; and to his state,
   And to his message high in honour rise;
   For on som message high they guessd him bound.                      290
   Thir glittering Tents he passd, and now is come
   Into the blissful field, through Groves of Myrrhe,
   And flouring Odours, Cassia, Nard, and Balme;
   A Wilderness of sweets; for Nature here
   Wantond as in her prime, and plaid at will
   Her Virgin Fancies, pouring forth more sweet,
   Wilde above rule or art; enormous bliss.
   Him through the spicie Forrest onward com
   Adam discernd, as in the dore he sat
   Of his coole Bowre, while now the mounted Sun                       300
   Shot down direct his fervid Raies, to warme
   Earths inmost womb, more warmth then Adam needs;
   And Eve within, due at her hour prepar'd
   For dinner savourie fruits, of taste to please
   True appetite, and not disrelish thirst
   Of nectarous draughts between, from milkie stream,
   Berrie or Grape: to whom thus Adam call'd.
   Haste hither Eve, and worth thy sight behold
   Eastward among those Trees, what glorious shape
   Comes this way moving; seems another Morn                           310
   Ris'n on mid-noon; som great behest from Heav'n
   To us perhaps he brings, and will voutsafe
   This day to be our Guest. But goe with speed,
   And what thy stores contain, bring forth and poure
   Abundance, fit to honour and receive
   Our Heav'nly stranger; well we may afford
   Our givers thir own gifts, and large bestow
   From large bestowd, where Nature multiplies
   Her fertil growth, and by disburd'ning grows
   More fruitful, which instructs us not to spare.                     320
   To whom thus Eve. Adam, earths hallowd mould,
   Of God inspir'd, small store will serve, where store,
   All seasons, ripe for use hangs on the stalk;
   Save what by frugal storing firmness gains
   To nourish, and superfluous moist consumes:
   But I will haste and from each bough and break,
   Each Plant & juciest Gourd will pluck such choice
   To entertain our Angel guest, as hee
   Beholding shall confess that here on Earth
   God hath dispenst his bounties as in Heav'n.                        330
   So saying, with dispatchful looks in haste
   She turns, on hospitable thoughts intent
   What choice to chuse for delicacie best,
   What order, so contriv'd as not to mix
   Tastes, not well joynd, inelegant, but bring
   Taste after taste upheld with kindliest change,
   Bestirs her then, and from each tender stalk
   Whatever Earth all-bearing Mother yeilds
   In India East or West, or middle shoare
   In Pontus or the Punic Coast, or where                              340
   Alcinous reign'd, fruit of all kindes, in coate,
   Rough, or smooth rin'd, or bearded husk, or shell
   She gathers, Tribute large, and on the board
   Heaps with unsparing hand; for drink the Grape
   She crushes, inoffensive moust, and meathes
   From many a berrie, and from sweet kernels prest
   She tempers dulcet creams, nor these to hold
   Wants her fit vessels pure, then strews the ground
   With Rose and Odours from the shrub unfum'd.
   Mean while our Primitive great Sire, to meet                        350
   His god-like Guest, walks forth, without more train
   Accompani'd then with his own compleat
   Perfections, in himself was all his state,
   More solemn then the tedious pomp that waits
   On Princes, when thir rich Retinue long
   Of Horses led, and Grooms besmeard with Gold
   Dazles the croud, and sets them all agape.
   Neerer his presence Adam though not awd,
   Yet with submiss approach and reverence meek,
   As to a superior Nature, bowing low,                                360
   Thus said. Native of Heav'n, for other place
   None can then Heav'n such glorious shape contain;
   Since by descending from the Thrones above,
   Those happie places thou hast deignd a while
   To want, and honour these, voutsafe with us
   Two onely, who yet by sov'ran gift possess
   This spacious ground, in yonder shadie Bowre
   To rest, and what the Garden choicest bears
   To sit and taste, till this meridian heat
   Be over, and the Sun more coole decline.                            370
   Whom thus the Angelic Vertue answerd milde.
   Adam, I therefore came, nor art thou such
   Created, or such place hast here to dwell,
   As may not oft invite, though Spirits of Heav'n
   To visit thee; lead on then where thy Bowre
   Oreshades; for these mid-hours, till Eevning rise
   I have at will. So to the Silvan Lodge
   They came, that like Pomona's Arbour smil'd
   With flourets deck't and fragrant smells; but Eve
   Undeckt, save with her self more lovely fair                        380
   Then Wood-Nymph, or the fairest Goddess feign'd
   Of three that in Mount Ida naked strove,
   Stood to entertain her guest from Heav'n; no vaile
   Shee needed, Vertue-proof, no thought infirme
   Alterd her cheek. On whom the Angel Haile
   Bestowd, the holy salutation us'd
   Long after to blest Marie, second Eve.
   Haile Mother of Mankind, whose fruitful Womb
   Shall fill the World more numerous with thy Sons
   Then with these various fruits the Trees of God                     390
   Have heap'd this Table. Rais'd of grassie terf
   Thir Table was, and mossie seats had round,
   And on her ample Square from side to side
   All Autumn pil'd, though Spring and Autumn here
   Danc'd hand in hand. A while discourse they hold;
   No fear lest Dinner coole; when thus began
   Our Authour. Heav'nly stranger, please to taste
   These bounties which our Nourisher, from whom
   All perfet good unmeasur'd out, descends,
   To us for food and for delight hath caus'd                          400
   The Earth to yeild; unsavourie food perhaps
   To spiritual Natures; only this I know,
   That one Celestial Father gives to all.
   To whom the Angel. Therefore what he gives
   (Whose praise be ever sung) to man in part
   Spiritual, may of purest Spirits be found
   No ingrateful food: and food alike those pure
   Intelligential substances require
   As doth your Rational; and both contain
   Within them every lower facultie                                    410
   Of sense, whereby they hear, see, smell, touch, taste,
   Tasting concoct, digest, assimilate,
   And corporeal to incorporeal turn.
   For know, whatever was created, needs
   To be sustaind and fed; of Elements
   The grosser feeds the purer, earth the sea,
   Earth and the Sea feed Air, the Air those Fires
   Ethereal, and as lowest first the Moon;
   Whence in her visage round those spots, unpurg'd
   Vapours not yet into her substance turnd.                           420
   Nor doth the Moon no nourishment exhale
   From her moist Continent to higher Orbes.
   The Sun that light imparts to all, receives
   From all his alimental recompence
   In humid exhalations, and at Even
   Sups with the Ocean: though in Heav'n the Trees
   Of life ambrosial frutage bear, and vines
   Yeild Nectar, though from off the boughs each Morn
   We brush mellifluous Dewes, and find the ground
   Cover'd with pearly grain: yet God hath here                        430
   Varied his bounty so with new delights,
   As may compare with Heaven; and to taste
   Think not I shall be nice. So down they sat,
   And to thir viands fell, nor seemingly
   The Angel, nor in mist, the common gloss
   Of Theologians, but with keen dispatch
   Of real hunger, and concoctive heate
   To transubstantiate; what redounds, transpires
   Through Spirits with ease; nor wonder; if by fire
   Of sooty coal the Empiric Alchimist                                 440
   Can turn, or holds it possible to turn
   Metals of drossiest Ore to perfet Gold
   As from the Mine. Mean while at Table Eve
   Ministerd naked, and thir flowing cups
   With pleasant liquors crown'd: O innocence
   Deserving Paradise! if ever, then,
   Then had the Sons of God excuse to have bin
   Enamour'd at that sight; but in those hearts
   Love unlibidinous reign'd, nor jealousie
   Was understood, the injur'd Lovers Hell.                            450
   Thus when with meats & drinks they had suffic'd,
   Not burd'nd Nature, sudden mind arose
   In Adam, not to let th' occasion pass
   Given him by this great Conference to know
   Of things above his World, and of thir being
   Who dwell in Heav'n, whose excellence he saw
   Transcend his own so farr, whose radiant forms
   Divine effulgence, whose high Power so far
   Exceeded human, and his wary speech
   Thus to th' Empyreal Minister he fram'd.                            460
   Inhabitant with God, now know I well
   Thy favour, in this honour done to man,
   Under whose lowly roof thou hast voutsaf't
   To enter, and these earthly fruits to taste,
   Food not of Angels, yet accepted so,
   As that more willingly thou couldst not seem
   At Heav'ns high feasts to have fed: yet what compare?
   To whom the winged Hierarch repli'd.
   O Adam, one Almightie is, from whom
   All things proceed, and up to him return,                           470
   If not deprav'd from good, created all
   Such to perfection, one first matter all,
   Indu'd with various forms, various degrees
   Of substance, and in things that live, of life;
   But more refin'd, more spiritous, and pure,
   As neerer to him plac't or neerer tending
   Each in thir several active Sphears assignd,
   Till body up to spirit work, in bounds
   Proportiond to each kind. So from the root
   Springs lighter the green stalk, from thence the leaves             480
   More aerie, last the bright consummate floure
   Spirits odorous breathes: flours and thir fruit
   Mans nourishment, by gradual scale sublim'd
   To vital Spirits aspire, to animal,
   To intellectual, give both life and sense,
   Fansie and understanding, whence the soule
   Reason receives, and reason is her being,
   Discursive, or Intuitive; discourse
   Is oftest yours, the latter most is ours,
   Differing but in degree, of kind the same.                          490
   Wonder not then, what God for you saw good
   If I refuse not, but convert, as you,
   To proper substance; time may come when men
   With Angels may participate, and find
   No inconvenient Diet, nor too light Fare:
   And from these corporal nutriments perhaps
   Your bodies may at last turn all to Spirit
   Improv'd by tract of time, and wingd ascend
   Ethereal, as wee, or may at choice
   Here or in Heav'nly Paradises dwell;                                500
   If ye be found obedient, and retain
   Unalterably firm his love entire
   Whose progenie you are. Mean while enjoy
   Your fill what happiness this happie state
   Can comprehend, incapable of more.
   To whom the Patriarch of mankind repli'd.
   O favourable spirit, propitious guest,
   Well hast thou taught the way that might direct
   Our knowledge, and the scale of Nature set
   From center to circumference, whereon                               510
   In contemplation of created things
   By steps we may ascend to God. But say,
   What meant that caution joind, If Ye Be Found
   Obedient? can wee want obedience then
   To him, or possibly his love desert
   Who formd us from the dust, and plac'd us here
   Full to the utmost measure of what bliss
   Human desires can seek or apprehend?
   To whom the Angel. Son of Heav'n and Earth,
   Attend: That thou art happie, owe to God;                           520
   That thou continu'st such, owe to thy self,
   That is, to thy obedience; therein stand.
   This was that caution giv'n thee; be advis'd.
   God made thee perfet, not immutable;
   And good he made thee, but to persevere
   He left it in thy power, ordaind thy will
   By nature free, not over-rul'd by Fate
   Inextricable, or strict necessity;
   Our voluntarie service he requires,
   Not our necessitated, such with him                                 530
   Findes no acceptance, nor can find, for how
   Can hearts, not free, be tri'd whether they serve
   Willing or no, who will but what they must
   By Destinie, and can no other choose?
   My self and all th' Angelic Host that stand
   In sight of God enthron'd, our happie state
   Hold, as you yours, while our obedience holds;
   On other surety none; freely we serve.
   Because wee freely love, as in our will
   To love or not; in this we stand or fall:                           540
   And som are fall'n, to disobedience fall'n,
   And so from Heav'n to deepest Hell; O fall
   From what high state of bliss into what woe!
   To whom our great Progenitor. Thy words
   Attentive, and with more delighted eare
   Divine instructer, I have heard, then when
   Cherubic Songs by night from neighbouring Hills
   Aereal Music send: nor knew I not
   To be both will and deed created free;
   Yet that we never shall forget to love                              550
   Our maker, and obey him whose command
   Single, is yet so just, my constant thoughts
   Assur'd me and still assure: though what thou tellst
   Hath past in Heav'n, som doubt within me move,
   But more desire to hear, if thou consent,
   The full relation, which must needs be strange,
   Worthy of Sacred silence to be heard;
   And we have yet large day, for scarce the Sun
   Hath finisht half his journey, and scarce begins
   His other half in the great Zone of Heav'n.                         560
   Thus Adam made request, and Raphael
   After short pause assenting, thus began.
   High matter thou injoinst me, O prime of men,
   Sad task and hard, for how shall I relate
   To human sense th' invisible exploits
   Of warring Spirits; how without remorse
   The ruin of so many glorious once
   And perfet while they stood; how last unfould
   The secrets of another world, perhaps
   Not lawful to reveal? yet for thy good                              570
   This is dispenc't, and what surmounts the reach
   Of human sense, I shall delineate so,
   By lik'ning spiritual to corporal forms,
   As may express them best, though what if Earth
   Be but the shaddow of Heav'n, and things therein
   Each to other like, more then on earth is thought?
   As yet this world was not, and Chaos wilde
   Reignd where these Heav'ns now rowl, where Earth now rests
   Upon her Center pois'd, when on a day
   (For Time, though in Eternitie, appli'd                             580
   To motion, measures all things durable
   By present, past, and future) on such day
   As Heav'ns great Year brings forth, th' Empyreal Host
   Of Angels by Imperial summons call'd,
   Innumerable before th' Almighties Throne
   Forthwith from all the ends of Heav'n appeerd
   Under thir Hierarchs in orders bright
   Ten thousand thousand Ensignes high advanc'd,
   Standards, and Gonfalons twixt Van and Reare
   Streame in the Aire, and for distinction serve                      590
   Of Hierarchies, of Orders, and Degrees;
   Or in thir glittering Tissues bear imblaz'd
   Holy Memorials, acts of Zeale and Love
   Recorded eminent. Thus when in Orbes
   Of circuit inexpressible they stood,
   Orb within Orb, the Father infinite,
   By whom in bliss imbosom'd sat the Son,
   Amidst as from a flaming Mount, whose top
   Brightness had made invisible, thus spake.
   Hear all ye Angels, Progenie of Light,                              600
   Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Vertues, Powers,
   Hear my Decree, which unrevok't shall stand.
   This day I have begot whom I declare
   My onely Son, and on this holy Hill
   Him have anointed, whom ye now behold
   At my right hand; your Head I him appoint;
   And by my Self have sworn to him shall bow
   All knees in Heav'n, and shall confess him Lord:
   Under his great Vice-gerent Reign abide
   United as one individual Soule                                      610
   For ever happie: him who disobeyes
   Mee disobeyes, breaks union, and that day
   Cast out from God and blessed vision, falls
   Into utter darkness, deep ingulft, his place
   Ordaind without redemption, without end.
   So spake th' Omnipotent, and with his words
   All seemd well pleas'd, all seem'd, but were not all.
   That day, as other solem dayes, they spent
   In song and dance about the sacred Hill,
   Mystical dance, which yonder starrie Spheare                        620
   Of Planets and of fixt in all her Wheeles
   Resembles nearest, mazes intricate,
   Eccentric, intervolv'd, yet regular
   Then most, when most irregular they seem:
   And in thir motions harmonie Divine
   So smooths her charming tones, that Gods own ear
   Listens delighted. Eevning approachd
   (For we have also our Eevning and our Morn,
   We ours for change delectable, not need)
   Forthwith from dance to sweet repast they turn                      630
   Desirous, all in Circles as they stood,
   Tables are set, and on a sudden pil'd
   With Angels Food, and rubied Nectar flows:
   In Pearl, in Diamond, and massie Gold,
   Fruit of delicious Vines, the growth of Heav'n.
   They eat, they drink, and with refection sweet
   Are fill'd, before th' all bounteous King, who showrd
   With copious hand, rejoycing in thir joy.
   Now when ambrosial Night with Clouds exhal'd
   From that high mount of God, whence light & shade                   640
   Spring both, the face of brightest Heav'n had changd
   To grateful Twilight (for Night comes not there
   In darker veile) and roseat Dews dispos'd
   All but the unsleeping eyes of God to rest,
   Wide over all the Plain, and wider farr
   Then all this globous Earth in Plain outspred,
   (Such are the Courts of God) Th' Angelic throng
   Disperst in Bands and Files thir Camp extend
   By living Streams among the Trees of Life,
   Pavilions numberless, and sudden reard,                             650
   Celestial Tabernacles, where they slept
   Fannd with coole Winds, save those who in thir course
   Melodious Hymns about the sovran Throne
   Alternate all night long: but not so wak'd
   Satan, so call him now, his former name
   Is heard no more in Heav'n; he of the first,
   If not the first Arch-Angel, great in Power,
   In favour and praeeminence, yet fraught
   With envie against the Son of God, that day
   Honourd by his great Father, and proclaimd                          660
   Messiah King anointed, could not beare
   Through pride that sight, and thought himself impaird.
   Deep malice thence conceiving & disdain,
   Soon as midnight brought on the duskie houre
   Friendliest to sleep and silence, he resolv'd
   With all his Legions to dislodge, and leave
   Unworshipt, unobey'd the Throne supream
   Contemptuous, and his next subordinate
   Awak'ning, thus to him in secret spake.
   Sleepst thou Companion dear, what sleep can close                   670
   Thy eye-lids? and remembrest what Decree
   Of yesterday, so late hath past the lips
   Of Heav'ns Almightie. Thou to me thy thoughts
   Wast wont, I mine to thee was wont to impart;
   Both waking we were one; how then can now
   Thy sleep dissent? new Laws thou seest impos'd;
   New Laws from him who reigns, new minds may raise
   In us who serve, new Counsels, to debate
   What doubtful may ensue, more in this place
   To utter is not safe. Assemble thou                                 680
   Of all those Myriads which we lead the chief;
   Tell them that by command, ere yet dim Night
   Her shadowie Cloud withdraws, I am to haste,
   And all who under me thir Banners wave,
   Homeward with flying march where we possess
   The Quarters of the North, there to prepare
   Fit entertainment to receive our King
   The great Messiah, and his new commands,
   Who speedily through all the Hierarchies
   Intends to pass triumphant, and give Laws.                          690
   So spake the false Arch-Angel, and infus'd
   Bad influence into th' unwarie brest
   Of his Associate; hee together calls,
   Or several one by one, the Regent Powers,
   Under him Regent, tells, as he was taught,
   That the most High commanding, now ere Night,
   Now ere dim Night had disincumberd Heav'n,
   The great Hierarchal Standard was to move;
   Tells the suggested cause, and casts between
   Ambiguous words and jealousies, to sound                            700
   Or taint integritie; but all obey'd
   The wonted signal, and superior voice
   Of thir great Potentate; for great indeed
   His name, and high was his degree in Heav'n;
   His count'nance, as the Morning Starr that guides
   The starrie flock, allur'd them, and with lyes
   Drew after him the third part of Heav'ns Host:
   Mean while th' Eternal eye, whose sight discernes
   Abstrusest thoughts, from forth his holy Mount
   And from within the golden Lamps that burne                         710
   Nightly before him, saw without thir light
   Rebellion rising, saw in whom, how spred
   Among the sons of Morn, what multitudes
   Were banded to oppose his high Decree;
   And smiling to his onely Son thus said.
   Son, thou in whom my glory I behold
   In full resplendence, Heir of all my might,
   Neerly it now concernes us to be sure
   Of our Omnipotence, and with what Arms
   We mean to hold what anciently we claim                             720
   Of Deitie or Empire, such a foe
   Is rising, who intends to erect his Throne
   Equal to ours, throughout the spacious North;
   Nor so content, hath in his thought to trie
   In battel, what our Power is, or our right.
   Let us advise, and to this hazard draw
   With speed what force is left, and all imploy
   In our defence, lest unawares we lose
   This our high place, our Sanctuarie, our Hill.
   To whom the Son with calm aspect and cleer                          730
   Light'ning Divine, ineffable, serene,
   Made answer. Mightie Father, thou thy foes
   Justly hast in derision, and secure
   Laugh'st at thir vain designes and tumults vain,
   Matter to mee of Glory, whom thir hate
   Illustrates, when they see all Regal Power
   Giv'n me to quell thir pride, and in event
   Know whether I be dextrous to subdue
   Thy Rebels, or be found the worst in Heav'n.
   So spake the Son, but Satan with his Powers                         740
   Farr was advanc't on winged speed, an Host
   Innumerable as the Starrs of Night,
   Or Starrs of Morning, Dew-drops, which the Sun
   Impearls on every leaf and every flouer.
   Regions they pass'd, the mightie Regencies
   Of Seraphim and Potentates and Thrones
   In thir triple Degrees, Regions to which
   All thy Dominion, Adam, is no more
   Then what this Garden is to all the Earth,
   And all the Sea, from one entire globose                            750
   Stretcht into Longitude; which having pass'd
   At length into the limits of the North
   They came, and Satan to his Royal seat
   High on a Hill, far blazing, as a Mount
   Rais'd on a Mount, with Pyramids and Towrs
   From Diamond Quarries hew'n, & Rocks of Gold,
   The Palace of great Lucifer, (so call
   That Structure in the Dialect of men
   Interpreted) which not long after, hee
   Affecting all equality with God,                                    760
   In imitation of that Mount whereon
   Messiah was declar'd in sight of Heav'n,
   The Mountain of the Congregation call'd;
   For thither he assembl'd all his Train,
   Pretending so commanded to consult
   About the great reception of thir King,
   Thither to come, and with calumnious Art
   Of counterfeted truth thus held thir ears.
   Thrones, Dominations, Princedomes, Vertues, Powers,
   If these magnific Titles yet remain                                 770
   Not meerly titular, since by Decree
   Another now hath to himself ingross't
   All Power, and us eclipst under the name
   Of King anointed, for whom all this haste
   Of midnight march, and hurried meeting here,
   This onely to consult how we may best
   With what may be devis'd of honours new
   Receive him coming to receive from us
   Knee-tribute yet unpaid, prostration vile,
   Too much to one, but double how endur'd,                            780
   To one and to his image now proclaim'd?
   But what if better counsels might erect
   Our minds and teach us to cast off this Yoke?
   Will ye submit your necks, and chuse to bend
   The supple knee? ye will not, if I trust
   To know ye right, or if ye know your selves
   Natives and Sons of Heav'n possest before
   By none, and if not equal all, yet free,
   Equally free; for Orders and Degrees
   Jarr not with liberty, but well consist.                            790
   Who can in reason then or right assume
   Monarchie over such as live by right
   His equals, if in power and splendor less,
   In freedome equal? or can introduce
   Law and Edict on us, who without law
   Erre not, much less for this to be our Lord,
   And look for adoration to th' abuse
   Of those Imperial Titles which assert
   Our being ordain'd to govern, not to serve?
   Thus farr his bold discourse without controule                      800
   Had audience, when among the Seraphim
   Abdiel, then whom none with more zeale ador'd
   The Deitie, and divine commands obei'd,
   Stood up, and in a flame of zeale severe
   The current of his fury thus oppos'd.
   O argument blasphemous, false and proud!
   Words which no eare ever to hear in Heav'n
   Expected, least of all from thee, ingrate
   In place thy self so high above thy Peeres.
   Canst thou with impious obloquie condemne                           810
   The just Decree of God, pronounc't and sworn,
   That to his only Son by right endu'd
   With Regal Scepter, every Soule in Heav'n
   Shall bend the knee, and in that honour due
   Confess him rightful King? unjust thou saist
   Flatly unjust, to binde with Laws the free,
   And equal over equals to let Reigne,
   One over all with unsucceeded power.
   Shalt thou give Law to God, shalt thou dispute
   With him the points of libertie, who made                           820
   Thee what thou art, & formd the Pow'rs of Heav'n
   Such as he pleasd, and circumscrib'd thir being?
   Yet by experience taught we know how good,
   And of our good, and of our dignitie
   How provident he is, how farr from thought
   To make us less, bent rather to exalt
   Our happie state under one Head more neer
   United. But to grant it thee unjust,
   That equal over equals Monarch Reigne:
   Thy self though great & glorious dost thou count,                   830
   Or all Angelic Nature joind in one,
   Equal to him begotten Son, by whom
   As by his Word the mighty Father made
   All things, ev'n thee, and all the Spirits of Heav'n
   By him created in thir bright degrees,
   Crownd them with Glory, & to thir Glory nam'd
   Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Vertues, Powers
   Essential Powers, nor by his Reign obscur'd,
   But more illustrious made, since he the Head
   One of our number thus reduc't becomes,                             840
   His Laws our Laws, all honour to him done
   Returns our own. Cease then this impious rage,
   And tempt not these; but hast'n to appease
   Th' incensed Father, and th' incensed Son,
   While Pardon may be found in time besought.
   So spake the fervent Angel, but his zeale
   None seconded, as out of season judg'd,
   Or singular and rash, whereat rejoic'd
   Th' Apostat, and more haughty thus repli'd.
   That we were formd then saist thou? & the work                      850
   Of secondarie hands, by task transferd
   From Father to his Son? strange point and new!
   Doctrin which we would know whence learnt: who saw
   When this creation was? rememberst thou
   Thy making, while the Maker gave thee being?
   We know no time when we were not as now;
   Know none before us, self-begot, self-rais'd
   By our own quick'ning power, when fatal course
   Had circl'd his full Orbe, the birth mature
   Of this our native Heav'n, Ethereal Sons.                           860
   Our puissance is our own, our own right hand
   Shall teach us highest deeds, by proof to try
   Who is our equal: then thou shalt behold
   Whether by supplication we intend
   Address, and to begirt th' Almighty Throne
   Beseeching or besieging. This report,
   These tidings carrie to th' anointed King;
   And fly, ere evil intercept thy flight.
   He said, and as the sound of waters deep
   Hoarce murmur echo'd to his words applause                          870
   Through the infinite Host, nor less for that
   The flaming Seraph fearless, though alone
   Encompass'd round with foes, thus answerd bold.
   O alienate from God, O spirit accurst,
   Forsak'n of all good; I see thy fall
   Determind, and thy hapless crew involv'd
   In this perfidious fraud, contagion spred
   Both of thy crime and punishment: henceforth
   No more be troubl'd how to quit the yoke
   Of Gods Messiah; those indulgent Laws                               880
   Will not be now voutsaf't, other Decrees
   Against thee are gon forth without recall;
   That Golden Scepter which thou didst reject
   Is now an Iron Rod to bruise and breake
   Thy disobedience. Well thou didst advise,
   Yet not for thy advise or threats I fly
   These wicked Tents devoted, least the wrauth
   Impendent, raging into sudden flame
   Distinguish not: for soon expect to feel
   His Thunder on thy head, devouring fire.                            890
   Then who created thee lamenting learne,
   When who can uncreate thee thou shalt know.
   So spake the Seraph Abdiel faithful found,
   Among the faithless, faithful only hee;
   Among innumerable false, unmov'd,
   Unshak'n, unseduc'd, unterrifi'd
   His Loyaltie he kept, his Love, his Zeale;
   Nor number, nor example with him wrought
   To swerve from truth, or change his constant mind
   Though single. From amidst them forth he passd,                     900
   Long way through hostile scorn, which he susteind
   Superior, nor of violence fear'd aught;
   And with retorted scorn his back he turn'd
   On those proud Towrs to swift destruction doom'd.
 
   Notes:
   627: Eevning approachd] Eevning now approachd 1674
   636-639: On flours repos'd, and with fresh flourets crown'd
            They eate, they drink, and in communion sweet
            Quaff immortalitie and joy, secure
            Of surfet where full measure onely bounds
            Excess, before th'all bounteous King, who showrd 1674.
 
   The End Of The Fifth Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK VI.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 Raphael continues to relate how Michael and Gabriel were sent forth to
 Battel against Satan and his Angels. The first Fight describ'd: Satan
 and his Powers retire under Night: he calls a Councel, invents devilish
 Engines, which in the second dayes Fight put Michael and his Angels to
 some disorder; But they at length pulling up Mountains overwhelm'd both
 the force and Machins of Satan: Yet the Tumult not so ending, God on the
 third day sends Messiah his Son, for whom he had reserv'd the glory of
 that Victory.  Hee in the Power of his Father coming to the place, and
 causing all his Legions to stand still on either side, with his Chariot
 and Thunder driving into the midst of his Enemies, pursues them unable
 to resist towards the wall of Heaven; which opening, they leap down with
 horror and confusion into the place of punishment prepar'd for them in
 the Deep: Messiah returns with triumph to his Father.
 
   All night the dreadless Angel unpursu'd
   Through Heav'ns wide Champain held his way, till Morn,
   Wak't by the circling Hours, with rosie hand
   Unbarr'd the gates of Light. There is a Cave
   Within the Mount of God, fast by his Throne,
   Where light and darkness in perpetual round
   Lodge and dislodge by turns, which makes through Heav'n
   Grateful vicissitude, like Day and Night;
   Light issues forth, and at the other dore
   Obsequious darkness enters, till her houre                           10
   To veile the Heav'n, though darkness there might well
   Seem twilight here; and now went forth the Morn
   Such as in highest Heav'n, arrayd in Gold
   Empyreal, from before her vanisht Night,
   Shot through with orient Beams: when all the Plain
   Coverd with thick embatteld Squadrons bright,
   Chariots and flaming Armes, and fierie Steeds
   Reflecting blaze on blaze, first met his view:
   Warr he perceav'd, warr in procinct, and found
   Already known what he for news had thought                           20
   To have reported: gladly then he mixt
   Among those friendly Powers who him receav'd
   With joy and acclamations loud, that one
   That of so many Myriads fall'n, yet one
   Returnd not lost: On to the sacred hill
   They led him high applauded, and present
   Before the seat supream; from whence a voice
   From midst a Golden Cloud thus milde was heard.
   Servant of God, well done, well hast thou fought
   The better fight, who single hast maintaind                          30
   Against revolted multitudes the Cause
   Of Truth, in word mightier then they in Armes;
   And for the testimonie of Truth hast born
   Universal reproach, far worse to beare
   Then violence: for this was all thy care
   To stand approv'd in sight of God, though Worlds
   Judg'd thee perverse: the easier conquest now
   Remains thee, aided by this host of friends,
   Back on thy foes more glorious to return
   Then scornd thou didst depart, and to subdue                         40
   By force, who reason for thir Law refuse,
   Right reason for thir Law, and for thir King
   Messiah, who by right of merit Reigns.
   Goe Michael of Celestial Armies Prince,
   And thou in Military prowess next
   Gabriel, lead forth to Battel these my Sons
   Invincible, lead forth my armed Saints
   By Thousands and by Millions rang'd for fight;
   Equal in number to that Godless crew
   Rebellious, them with Fire and hostile Arms                          50
   Fearless assault, and to the brow of Heav'n
   Pursuing drive them out from God and bliss,
   Into thir place of punishment, the Gulf
   Of Tartarus, which ready opens wide
   His fiery Chaos to receave thir fall.
   So spake the Sovran voice, and Clouds began
   To darken all the Hill, and smoak to rowl
   In duskie wreathes, reluctant flames, the signe
   Of wrauth awak't: nor with less dread the loud
   Ethereal Trumpet from on high gan blow:                              60
   At which command the Powers Militant,
   That stood for Heav'n, in mighty Quadrate joyn'd
   Of Union irresistible, mov'd on
   In silence thir bright Legions, to the sound
   Of instrumental Harmonie that breath'd
   Heroic Ardor to advent'rous deeds
   Under thir God-like Leaders, in the Cause
   Of God and his Messiah. On they move
   Indissolubly firm; nor obvious Hill,
   Nor streit'ning Vale, nor Wood, nor Stream divides                   70
   Thir perfet ranks; for high above the ground
   Thir march was, and the passive Air upbore
   Thir nimble tread; as when the total kind
   Of Birds in orderly array on wing
   Came summond over Eden to receive
   Thir names of thee; so over many a tract
   Of Heav'n they march'd, and many a Province wide
   Tenfold the length of this terrene: at last
   Farr in th' Horizon to the North appeer'd
   From skirt to skirt a fierie Region, stretcht                        80
   In battailous aspect, and neerer view
   Bristl'd with upright beams innumerable
   Of rigid Spears, and Helmets throng'd, and Shields
   Various, with boastful Argument portraid,
   The banded Powers of Satan hasting on
   With furious expedition; for they weend
   That self same day by fight, or by surprize
   To win the Mount of God, and on his Throne
   To set the envier of his State, the proud
   Aspirer, but thir thoughts prov'd fond and vain                      90
   In the mid way: though strange to us it seemd
   At first, that Angel should with Angel warr,
   And in fierce hosting meet, who wont to meet
   So oft in Festivals of joy and love
   Unanimous, as sons of one great Sire
   Hymning th' Eternal Father: but the shout
   Of Battel now began, and rushing sound
   Of onset ended soon each milder thought.
   High in the midst exalted as a God
   Th' Apostat in his Sun-bright Chariot sate                          100
   Idol of Majestie Divine, enclos'd
   With Flaming Cherubim, and golden Shields;
   Then lighted from his gorgeous Throne, for now
   'Twixt Host and Host but narrow space was left,
   A dreadful interval, and Front to Front
   Presented stood in terrible array
   Of hideous length: before the cloudie Van,
   On the rough edge of battel ere it joyn'd,
   Satan with vast and haughtie strides advanc't,
   Came towring, armd in Adamant and Gold;                             110
   Abdiel that sight endur'd not, where he stood
   Among the mightiest, bent on highest deeds,
   And thus his own undaunted heart explores.
   O Heav'n! that such resemblance of the Highest
   Should yet remain, where faith and realtie
   Remain not; wherfore should not strength & might
   There fail where Vertue fails, or weakest prove
   Where boldest; though to sight unconquerable?
   His puissance, trusting in th' Almightie's aide,
   I mean to try, whose Reason I have tri'd                            120
   Unsound and false; nor is it aught but just,
   That he who in debate of Truth hath won,
   Should win in Arms, in both disputes alike
   Victor; though brutish that contest and foule,
   When Reason hath to deal with force, yet so
   Most reason is that Reason overcome.
   So pondering, and from his armed Peers
   Forth stepping opposite, half way he met
   His daring foe, at this prevention more
   Incens't, and thus securely him defi'd.                             130
   Proud, art thou met? thy hope was to have reacht
   The highth of thy aspiring unoppos'd,
   The Throne of God unguarded, and his side
   Abandond at the terror of thy Power
   Or potent tongue; fool, not to think how vain
   Against th' Omnipotent to rise in Arms;
   Who out of smallest things could without end
   Have rais'd incessant Armies to defeat
   Thy folly; or with solitarie hand
   Reaching beyond all limit, at one blow                              140
   Unaided could have finisht thee, and whelmd
   Thy Legions under darkness; but thou seest
   All are not of thy Train; there be who Faith
   Prefer, and Pietie to God, though then
   To thee not visible, when I alone
   Seemd in thy World erroneous to dissent
   From all: my Sect thou seest, now learn too late
   How few somtimes may know, when thousands err.
   Whom the grand foe with scornful eye askance
   Thus answerd. Ill for thee, but in wisht houre                      150
   Of my revenge, first sought for thou returnst
   From flight, seditious Angel, to receave
   Thy merited reward, the first assay
   Of this right hand provok't, since first that tongue
   Inspir'd with contradiction durst oppose
   A third part of the Gods, in Synod met
   Thir Deities to assert, who while they feel
   Vigour Divine within them, can allow
   Omnipotence to none. But well thou comst
   Before thy fellows, ambitious to win                                160
   From me som Plume, that thy success may show
   Destruction to the rest: this pause between
   (Unanswerd least thou boast) to let thee know;
   At first I thought that Libertie and Heav'n
   To heav'nly Soules had bin all one; but now
   I see that most through sloth had rather serve,
   Ministring Spirits, traind up in Feast and Song;
   Such hast thou arm'd, the Minstrelsie of Heav'n,
   Servilitie with freedom to contend,
   As both thir deeds compar'd this day shall prove.                   170
   To whom in brief thus Abdiel stern repli'd.
   Apostat, still thou errst, nor end wilt find
   Of erring, from the path of truth remote:
   Unjustly thou deprav'st it with the name
   Of Servitude to serve whom God ordains,
   Or Nature; God and Nature bid the same,
   When he who rules is worthiest, and excells
   Them whom he governs. This is servitude,
   To serve th' unwise, or him who hath rebelld
   Against his worthier, as thine now serve thee,                      180
   Thy self not free, but to thy self enthrall'd;
   Yet leudly dar'st our ministring upbraid.
   Reign thou in Hell thy Kingdom, let mee serve
   In Heav'n God ever blessed, and his Divine
   Behests obey, worthiest to be obey'd,
   Yet Chains in Hell, not Realms expect: mean while
   From mee returnd, as erst thou saidst, from flight,
   This greeting on thy impious Crest receive.
   So saying, a noble stroke he lifted high,
   Which hung not, but so swift with tempest fell                      190
   On the proud Crest of Satan, that no sight,
   Nor motion of swift thought, less could his Shield
   Such ruin intercept: ten paces huge
   He back recoild; the tenth on bended knee
   His massie Spear upstaid; as if on Earth
   Winds under ground or waters forcing way
   Sidelong, had push't a Mountain from his seat
   Half sunk with all his Pines. Amazement seis'd
   The Rebel Thrones, but greater rage to see
   Thus foil'd thir mightiest, ours joy filld, and shout,              200
   Presage of Victorie and fierce desire
   Of Battel: whereat Michael bid sound
   Th' Arch-Angel trumpet; through the vast of Heav'n
   It sounded, and the faithful Armies rung
   Hosanna to the Highest: nor stood at gaze
   The adverse Legions, nor less hideous joyn'd
   The horrid shock: now storming furie rose,
   And clamour such as heard in Heav'n till now
   Was never, Arms on Armour clashing bray'd
   Horrible discord, and the madding Wheeles                           210
   Of brazen Chariots rag'd; dire was the noise
   Of conflict; over head the dismal hiss
   Of fiery Darts in flaming volies flew,
   And flying vaulted either Host with fire.
   So under fierie Cope together rush'd
   Both Battels maine, with ruinous assault
   And inextinguishable rage; all Heav'n
   Resounded, and had Earth bin then, all Earth
   Had to her Center shook. What wonder? when
   Millions of fierce encountring Angels fought                        220
   On either side, the least of whom could weild
   These Elements, and arm him with the force
   Of all thir Regions: how much more of Power
   Armie against Armie numberless to raise
   Dreadful combustion warring, and disturb,
   Though not destroy, thir happie Native seat;
   Had not th' Eternal King Omnipotent
   From his strong hold of Heav'n high over-rul'd
   And limited thir might; though numberd such
   As each divided Legion might have seemd                             230
   A numerous Host, in strength each armed hand
   A Legion; led in fight, yet Leader seemd
   Each Warriour single as in Chief, expert
   When to advance, or stand, or turn the sway
   Of Battel, open when, and when to close
   The ridges of grim Warr; no thought of flight,
   None of retreat, no unbecoming deed
   That argu'd fear; each on himself reli'd,
   As onely in his arm the moment lay
   Of victorie; deeds of eternal fame                                  240
   Were don, but infinite: for wide was spred
   That Warr and various; somtimes on firm ground
   A standing fight, then soaring on main wing
   Tormented all the Air; all Air seemd then
   Conflicting Fire: long time in eeven scale
   The Battel hung; till Satan, who that day
   Prodigious power had shewn, and met in Armes
   No equal, raunging through the dire attack
   Of fighting Seraphim confus'd, at length
   Saw where the Sword of Michael smote, and fell'd                    250
   Squadrons at once, with huge two-handed sway
   Brandisht aloft the horrid edge came down
   Wide wasting; such destruction to withstand
   He hasted, and oppos'd the rockie Orb
   Of tenfold Adamant, his ample Shield
   A vast circumference: At his approach
   The great Arch-Angel from his warlike toile
   Surceas'd, and glad as hoping here to end
   Intestine War in Heav'n, the arch foe subdu'd
   Or Captive drag'd in Chains, with hostile frown                     260
   And visage all enflam'd first thus began.
   Author of evil, unknown till thy revolt,
   Unnam'd in Heav'n, now plenteous, as thou seest
   These Acts of hateful strife, hateful to all,
   Though heaviest by just measure on thy self
   And thy adherents: how hast thou disturb'd
   Heav'ns blessed peace, and into Nature brought
   Miserie, uncreated till the crime
   Of thy Rebellion? how hast thou instill'd
   Thy malice into thousands, once upright                             270
   And faithful, now prov'd false. But think not here
   To trouble Holy Rest; Heav'n casts thee out
   From all her Confines. Heav'n the seat of bliss
   Brooks not the works of violence and Warr.
   Hence then, and evil go with thee along
   Thy ofspring, to the place of evil, Hell,
   Thou and thy wicked crew; there mingle broiles,
   Ere this avenging Sword begin thy doome,
   Or som more sudden vengeance wing'd from God
   Precipitate thee with augmented paine.                              280
   So spake the Prince of Angels; to whom thus
   The Adversarie. Nor think thou with wind
   Of airie threats to aw whom yet with deeds
   Thou canst not. Hast thou turnd the least of these
   To flight, or if to fall, but that they rise
   Unvanquisht, easier to transact with mee
   That thou shouldst hope, imperious, & with threats
   To chase me hence? erre not that so shall end
   The strife which thou call'st evil, but wee style
   The strife of Glorie: which we mean to win,                         290
   Or turn this Heav'n it self into the Hell
   Thou fablest, here however to dwell free,
   If not to reign: mean while thy utmost force,
   And join him nam'd Almightie to thy aid,
   I flie not, but have sought thee farr and nigh.
   They ended parle, and both addrest for fight
   Unspeakable; for who, though with the tongue
   Of Angels, can relate, or to what things
   Liken on Earth conspicuous, that may lift
   Human imagination to such highth                                    300
   Of Godlike Power: for likest Gods they seemd,
   Stood they or mov'd, in stature, motion, arms
   Fit to decide the Empire of great Heav'n.
   Now wav'd thir fierie Swords, and in the Aire
   Made horrid Circles; two broad Suns thir Shields
   Blaz'd opposite, while expectation stood
   In horror; from each hand with speed retir'd
   Where erst was thickest fight, th' Angelic throng,
   And left large field, unsafe within the wind
   Of such commotion, such as to set forth                             310
   Great things by small, If Natures concord broke,
   Among the Constellations warr were sprung,
   Two Planets rushing from aspect maligne
   Of fiercest opposition in mid Skie,
   Should combat, and thir jarring Sphears confound.
   Together both with next to Almightie Arme,
   Uplifted imminent one stroke they aim'd
   That might determine, and not need repeate,
   As not of power, at once; nor odds appeerd
   In might or swift prevention; but the sword                         320
   Of Michael from the Armorie of God
   Was giv'n him temperd so, that neither keen
   Nor solid might resist that edge: it met
   The sword of Satan with steep force to smite
   Descending, and in half cut sheere, nor staid,
   But with swift wheele reverse, deep entring shar'd
   All his right side; then Satan first knew pain,
   And writh'd him to and fro convolv'd; so sore
   The griding sword with discontinuous wound
   Pass'd through him, but th' Ethereal substance clos'd               330
   Not long divisible, and from the gash
   A stream of Nectarous humor issuing flow'd
   Sanguin, such as Celestial Spirits may bleed,
   And all his Armour staind ere while so bright.
   Forthwith on all sides to his aide was run
   By Angels many and strong, who interpos'd
   Defence, while others bore him on thir Shields
   Back to his Chariot; where it stood retir'd
   From off the files of warr; there they him laid
   Gnashing for anguish and despite and shame                          340
   To find himself not matchless, and his pride
   Humbl'd by such rebuke, so farr beneath
   His confidence to equal God in power.
   Yet soon he heal'd; for Spirits that live throughout
   Vital in every part, not as frail man
   In Entrailes, Heart or Head, Liver or Reines,
   Cannot but by annihilating die;
   Nor in thir liquid texture mortal wound
   Receive, no more then can the fluid Aire:
   All Heart they live, all Head, all Eye, all Eare,                   350
   All Intellect, all Sense, and as they please,
   They Limb themselves, and colour, shape or size
   Assume, as likes them best, condense or rare.
   Mean while in other parts like deeds deservd
   Memorial, where the might of Gabriel fought,
   And with fierce Ensignes pierc'd the deep array
   Of Moloc furious King, who him defi'd,
   And at his Chariot wheeles to drag him bound
   Threatn'd, nor from the Holie One of Heav'n
   Refrein'd his tongue blasphemous; but anon                          360
   Down clov'n to the waste, with shatterd Armes
   And uncouth paine fled bellowing. On each wing
   Uriel and Raphael his vaunting foe,
   Though huge, and in a Rock of Diamond Armd,
   Vanquish'd Adramelec, and Asmadai,
   Two potent Thrones, that to be less then Gods
   Disdain'd, but meaner thoughts learnd in thir flight,
   Mangl'd with gastly wounds through Plate and Maile.
   Nor stood unmindful Abdiel to annoy
   The Atheist crew, but with redoubl'd blow                           370
   Ariel and Arioc, and the violence
   Of Ramiel scorcht and blasted overthrew.
   I might relate of thousands, and thir names
   Eternize here on Earth; but those elect
   Angels contented with thir fame in Heav'n
   Seek not the praise of men: the other sort
   In might though wondrous and in Acts of Warr,
   Nor of Renown less eager, yet by doome
   Canceld from Heav'n and sacred memorie,
   Nameless in dark oblivion let them dwell.                           380
   For strength from Truth divided and from Just,
   Illaudable, naught merits but dispraise
   And ignominie, yet to glorie aspires
   Vain glorious, and through infamie seeks fame:
   Therfore Eternal silence be thir doome.
   And now thir mightiest quelld, the battel swerv'd,
   With many an inrode gor'd; deformed rout
   Enter'd, and foul disorder; all the ground
   With shiverd armour strow'n, and on a heap
   Chariot and Charioter lay overturnd                                 390
   And fierie foaming Steeds; what stood, recoyld
   Orewearied, through the faint Satanic Host
   Defensive scarse, or with pale fear surpris'd,
   Then first with fear surpris'd and sense of paine
   Fled ignominious, to such evil brought
   By sinne of disobedience, till that hour
   Not liable to fear or flight or paine.
   Far otherwise th' inviolable Saints
   In Cubic Phalanx firm advanc't entire,
   Invulnerable, impenitrably arm'd:                                   400
   Such high advantages thir innocence
   Gave them above thir foes, not to have sinnd,
   Not to have disobei'd; in fight they stood
   Unwearied, unobnoxious to be pain'd
   By wound, though from thir place by violence mov'd.
   Now Night her course began, and over Heav'n
   Inducing darkness, grateful truce impos'd,
   And silence on the odious dinn of Warr:
   Under her Cloudie covert both retir'd,
   Victor and Vanquisht: on the foughten field                         410
   Michael and his Angels prevalent
   Encamping, plac'd in Guard thir Watches round,
   Cherubic waving fires: on th' other part
   Satan with his rebellious disappeerd,
   Far in the dark dislodg'd, and void of rest,
   His Potentates to Councel call'd by night;
   And in the midst thus undismai'd began.
   O now in danger tri'd, now known in Armes
   Not to be overpowerd, Companions deare,
   Found worthy not of Libertie alone,                                 420
   Too mean pretense, but what we more affect,
   Honour, Dominion, Glorie, and renowne,
   Who have sustaind one day in doubtful fight,
   (And if one day, why not Eternal dayes?)
   What Heavens Lord had powerfullest to send
   Against us from about his Throne, and judg'd
   Sufficient to subdue us to his will,
   But proves not so: then fallible, it seems,
   Of future we may deem him, though till now
   Omniscient thought. True is, less firmly arm'd,                     430
   Some disadvantage we endur'd and paine,
   Till now not known, but known as soon contemnd,
   Since now we find this our Empyreal forme
   Incapable of mortal injurie
   Imperishable, and though peirc'd with wound,
   Soon closing, and by native vigour heal'd.
   Of evil then so small as easie think
   The remedie; perhaps more valid Armes,
   Weapons more violent, when next we meet,
   May serve to better us, and worse our foes,                         440
   Or equal what between us made the odds,
   In Nature none: if other hidden cause
   Left them Superiour, while we can preserve
   Unhurt our mindes, and understanding sound,
   Due search and consultation will disclose.
   He sat; and in th' assembly next upstood
   Nisroc, of Principalities the prime;
   As one he stood escap't from cruel fight,
   Sore toild, his riv'n Armes to havoc hewn,
   And cloudie in aspect thus answering spake.                         450
   Deliverer from new Lords, leader to free
   Enjoyment of our right as Gods; yet hard
   For Gods, and too unequal work we find
   Against unequal armes to fight in paine,
   Against unpaind, impassive; from which evil
   Ruin must needs ensue; for what availes
   Valour or strength, though matchless, quelld with pain
   Which all subdues, and makes remiss the hands
   Of Mightiest. Sense of pleasure we may well
   Spare out of life perhaps, and not repine,                          460
   But live content, which is the calmest life:
   But pain is perfet miserie, the worst
   Of evils, and excessive, overturnes
   All patience. He who therefore can invent
   With what more forcible we may offend
   Our yet unwounded Enemies, or arme
   Our selves with like defence, to mee deserves
   No less then for deliverance what we owe.
   Whereto with look compos'd Satan repli'd.
   Not uninvented that, which thou aright                              470
   Beleivst so main to our success, I bring;
   Which of us who beholds the bright surface
   Of this Ethereous mould whereon we stand,
   This continent of spacious Heav'n, adornd
   With Plant, Fruit, Flour Ambrosial, Gemms & Gold,
   Whose Eye so superficially surveyes
   These things, as not to mind from whence they grow
   Deep under ground, materials dark and crude,
   Of spiritous and fierie spume, till toucht
   With Heav'ns ray, and temperd they shoot forth                      480
   So beauteous, op'ning to the ambient light.
   These in thir dark Nativitie the Deep
   Shall yeild us, pregnant with infernal flame,
   Which into hallow Engins long and round
   Thick-rammd, at th' other bore with touch of fire
   Dilated and infuriate shall send forth
   From far with thundring noise among our foes
   Such implements of mischief as shall dash
   To pieces, and orewhelm whatever stands
   Adverse, that they shall fear we have disarmd                       490
   The Thunderer of his only dreaded bolt.
   Nor long shall be our labour, yet ere dawne,
   Effect shall end our wish. Mean while revive;
   Abandon fear; to strength and counsel joind
   Think nothing hard, much less to be despaird.
   He ended, and his words thir drooping chere
   Enlightn'd, and thir languisht hope reviv'd.
   Th' invention all admir'd, and each, how hee
   To be th' inventer miss'd, so easie it seemd
   Once found, which yet unfound most would have thought               500
   Impossible: yet haply of thy Race
   In future dayes, if Malice should abound,
   Some one intent on mischief, or inspir'd
   With dev'lish machination might devise
   Like instrument to plague the Sons of men
   For sin, on warr and mutual slaughter bent.
   Forthwith from Councel to the work they flew,
   None arguing stood, innumerable hands
   Were ready, in a moment up they turnd
   Wide the Celestial soile, and saw beneath                           510
   Th' originals of Nature in thir crude
   Conception; Sulphurous and Nitrous Foame
   They found, they mingl'd, and with suttle Art,
   Concocted and adusted they reduc'd
   To blackest grain, and into store conveyd:
   Part hidd'n veins diggd up (nor hath this Earth
   Entrails unlike) of Mineral and Stone,
   Whereof to found thir Engins and thir Balls
   Of missive ruin; part incentive reed
   Provide, pernicious with one touch to fire.                         520
   So all ere day spring, under conscious Night
   Secret they finish'd, and in order set,
   With silent circumspection unespi'd.
   Now when fair Morn Orient in Heav'n appeerd
   Up rose the Victor Angels, and to Arms
   The matin Trumpet Sung: in Arms they stood
   Of Golden Panoplie, refulgent Host,
   Soon banded; others from the dawning Hills
   Lookd round, and Scouts each Coast light-armed scoure,
   Each quarter, to descrie the distant foe,                           530
   Where lodg'd, or whither fled, or if for fight,
   In motion or in alt: him soon they met
   Under spred Ensignes moving nigh, in slow
   But firm Battalion; back with speediest Sail
   Zephiel, of Cherubim the swiftest wing,
   Came flying, and in mid Aire aloud thus cri'd.
   Arme, Warriours, Arme for fight, the foe at hand,
   Whom fled we thought, will save us long pursuit
   This day, fear not his flight; so thick a Cloud
   He comes, and settl'd in his face I see                             540
   Sad resolution and secure: let each
   His Adamantine coat gird well, and each
   Fit well his Helme, gripe fast his orbed Shield,
   Born eevn or high, for this day will pour down,
   If I conjecture aught, no drizling showr,
   But ratling storm of Arrows barbd with fire.
   So warnd he them aware themselves, and soon
   In order, quit of all impediment;
   Instant without disturb they took Allarm,
   And onward move Embattelld; when behold                             550
   Not distant far with heavie pace the Foe
   Approaching gross and huge; in hollow Cube
   Training his devilish Enginrie, impal'd
   On every side with shaddowing Squadrons Deep,
   To hide the fraud. At interview both stood
   A while, but suddenly at head appeerd
   Satan: And thus was heard Commanding loud.
   Vangard, to Right and Left the Front unfould;
   That all may see who hate us, how we seek
   Peace and composure, and with open brest                            560
   Stand readie to receive them, if they like
   Our overture, and turn not back perverse;
   But that I doubt, however witness Heaven,
   Heav'n witness thou anon, while we discharge
   Freely our part: yee who appointed stand
   Do as you have in charge, and briefly touch
   What we propound, and loud that all may hear.
   So scoffing in ambiguous words, he scarce
   Had ended; when to Right and Left the Front
   Divided, and to either Flank retir'd.                               570
   Which to our eyes discoverd new and strange,
   A triple-mounted row of Pillars laid
   On Wheels (for like to Pillars most they seem'd
   Or hollow'd bodies made of Oak or Firr
   With branches lopt, in Wood or Mountain fell'd)
   Brass, Iron, Stonie mould, had not thir mouthes
   With hideous orifice gap't on us wide,
   Portending hollow truce; at each behind
   A Seraph stood, and in his hand a Reed
   Stood waving tipt with fire; while we suspense,                     580
   Collected stood within our thoughts amus'd,
   Not long, for sudden all at once thir Reeds
   Put forth, and to a narrow vent appli'd
   With nicest touch. Immediate in a flame,
   But soon obscur'd with smoak, all Heav'n appeerd,
   From those deep-throated Engins belcht, whose roar
   Emboweld with outragious noise the Air,
   And all her entrails tore, disgorging foule
   Thir devillish glut, chaind Thunderbolts and Hail
   Of Iron Globes, which on the Victor Host                            590
   Level'd, with such impetuous furie smote,
   That whom they hit, none on thir feet might stand,
   Though standing else as Rocks, but down they fell
   By thousands, Angel on Arch-Angel rowl'd;
   The sooner for thir Arms, unarm'd they might
   Have easily as Spirits evaded swift
   By quick contraction or remove; but now
   Foule dissipation follow'd and forc't rout;
   Nor serv'd it to relax thir serried files.
   What should they do? if on they rusht, repulse                      600
   Repeated, and indecent overthrow
   Doubl'd, would render them yet more despis'd,
   And to thir foes a laughter; for in view
   Stood rankt of Seraphim another row
   In posture to displode thir second tire
   Of Thunder: back defeated to return
   They worse abhorr'd. Satan beheld thir plight,
   And to his Mates thus in derision call'd.
   O Friends, why come not on these Victors proud?
   Ere while they fierce were coming, and when wee,                    610
   To entertain them fair with open Front
   And Brest, (what could we more?) propounded terms
   Of composition, strait they chang'd thir minds,
   Flew off, and into strange vagaries fell,
   As they would dance, yet for a dance they seemd
   Somwhat extravagant and wilde, perhaps
   For joy of offerd peace: but I suppose
   If our proposals once again were heard
   We should compel them to a quick result.
   To whom thus Belial in like gamesom mood.                           620
   Leader, the terms we sent were terms of weight,
   Of hard contents, and full of force urg'd home,
   Such as we might perceive amus'd them all,
   And stumbl'd many, who receives them right,
   Had need from head to foot well understand;
   Not understood, this gift they have besides,
   They shew us when our foes walk not upright.
   So they among themselves in pleasant veine
   Stood scoffing, highthn'd in thir thoughts beyond
   All doubt of Victorie, eternal might                                630
   To match with thir inventions they presum'd
   So easie, and of his Thunder made a scorn,
   And all his Host derided, while they stood
   A while in trouble; but they stood not long,
   Rage prompted them at length, & found them arms
   Against such hellish mischief fit to oppose.
   Forthwith (behold the excellence, the power
   Which God hath in his mighty Angels plac'd)
   Thir Arms away they threw, and to the Hills
   (For Earth hath this variety from Heav'n                            640
   Of pleasure situate in Hill and Dale)
   Light as the Lightning glimps they ran, they flew,
   From thir foundations loosning to and fro
   They pluckt the seated Hills with all thir load,
   Rocks, Waters, Woods, and by the shaggie tops
   Up lifting bore them in thir hands: Amaze,
   Be sure, and terrour seis'd the rebel Host,
   When coming towards them so dread they saw
   The bottom of the Mountains upward turn'd,
   Till on those cursed Engins triple-row                              650
   They saw them whelmd, and all thir confidence
   Under the weight of Mountains buried deep,
   Themselves invaded next, and on thir heads
   Main Promontories flung, which in the Air
   Came shadowing, and opprest whole Legions arm'd,
   Thir armor help'd thir harm, crush't in and brus'd
   Into thir substance pent, which wrought them pain
   Implacable, and many a dolorous groan,
   Long strugling underneath, ere they could wind
   Out of such prison, though Spirits of purest light,                 660
   Purest at first, now gross by sinning grown.
   The rest in imitation to like Armes
   Betook them, and the neighbouring Hills uptore;
   So Hills amid the Air encounterd Hills
   Hurl'd to and fro with jaculation dire,
   That under ground they fought in dismal shade;
   Infernal noise; Warr seem'd a civil Game
   To this uproar; horrid confusion heapt
   Upon confusion rose: and now all Heav'n
   Had gone to wrack, with ruin overspred,                             670
   Had not th' Almightie Father where he sits
   Shrin'd in his Sanctuarie of Heav'n secure,
   Consulting on the sum of things, foreseen
   This tumult, and permitted all, advis'd:
   That his great purpose he might so fulfill,
   To honour his Anointed Son aveng'd
   Upon his enemies, and to declare
   All power on him transferr'd: whence to his Son
   Th' Assessor of his Throne he thus began.
   Effulgence of my Glorie, Son belov'd,                               680
   Son in whose face invisible is beheld
   Visibly, what by Deitie I am,
   And in whose hand what by Decree I doe,
   Second Omnipotence, two dayes are past,
   Two dayes, as we compute the dayes of Heav'n,
   Since Michael and his Powers went forth to tame
   These disobedient; sore hath been thir fight,
   As likeliest was, when two such Foes met arm'd;
   For to themselves I left them, and thou knowst,
   Equal in their Creation they were form'd,                           690
   Save what sin hath impaird, which yet hath wrought
   Insensibly, for I suspend thir doom;
   Whence in perpetual fight they needs must last
   Endless, and no solution will be found:
   Warr wearied hath perform'd what Warr can do,
   And to disorder'd rage let loose the reines,
   With Mountains as with Weapons arm'd, which makes
   Wild work in Heav'n, and dangerous to the maine.
   Two dayes are therefore past, the third is thine;
   For thee I have ordain'd it, and thus farr                          700
   Have sufferd, that the Glorie may be thine
   Of ending this great Warr, since none but Thou
   Can end it. Into thee such Vertue and Grace
   Immense I have transfus'd, that all may know
   In Heav'n and Hell thy Power above compare,
   And this perverse Commotion governd thus,
   To manifest thee worthiest to be Heir
   Of all things, to be Heir and to be King
   By Sacred Unction, thy deserved right.
   Go then thou Mightiest in thy Fathers might,                        710
   Ascend my Chariot, guide the rapid Wheeles
   That shake Heav'ns basis, bring forth all my Warr,
   My Bow and Thunder, my Almightie Arms
   Gird on, and Sword upon thy puissant Thigh;
   Pursue these sons of Darkness, drive them out
   From all Heav'ns bounds into the utter Deep:
   There let them learn, as likes them, to despise
   God and Messiah his anointed King.
   He said, and on his Son with Rayes direct
   Shon full, he all his Father full exprest                           720
   Ineffably into his face receiv'd,
   And thus the filial Godhead answering spake.
   O Father, O Supream of heav'nly Thrones,
   First, Highest, Holiest, Best, thou alwayes seekst
   To glorifie thy Son, I alwayes thee,
   As is most just; this I my Glorie account,
   My exaltation, and my whole delight,
   That thou in me well pleas'd, declarst thy will
   Fulfill'd, which to fulfil is all my bliss.
   Scepter and Power, thy giving, I assume,                            730
   And gladlier shall resign, when in the end
   Thou shalt be All in All, and I in thee
   For ever, and in mee all whom thou lov'st:
   But whom thou hat'st, I hate, and can put on
   Thy terrors, as I put thy mildness on,
   Image of thee in all things; and shall soon,
   Armd with thy might, rid heav'n of these rebell'd,
   To thir prepar'd ill Mansion driven down
   To chains of Darkness, and th' undying Worm,
   That from thy just obedience could revolt,                          740
   Whom to obey is happiness entire.
   Then shall thy Saints unmixt, and from th' impure
   Farr separate, circling thy holy Mount
   Unfained Halleluiahs to thee sing,
   Hymns of high praise, and I among them chief.
   So said, he o're his Scepter bowing, rose
   From the right hand of Glorie where he sate,
   And the third sacred Morn began to shine
   Dawning through Heav'n: forth rush'd with whirlwind sound
   The Chariot of Paternal Deitie,                                     750
   Flashing thick flames, Wheele within Wheele undrawn,
   It self instinct with Spirit, but convoyd
   By four Cherubic shapes, four Faces each
   Had wondrous, as with Starrs thir bodies all
   And Wings were set with Eyes, with Eyes the Wheels
   Of Beril, and careering Fires between;
   Over thir heads a chrystal Firmament,
   Whereon a Saphir Throne, inlaid with pure
   Amber, and colours of the showrie Arch.
   Hee in Celestial Panoplie all armd                                  760
   Of radiant Urim, work divinely wrought,
   Ascended, at his right hand Victorie
   Sate Eagle-wing'd, beside him hung his Bow
   And Quiver with three-bolted Thunder stor'd,
   And from about him fierce Effusion rowld
   Of smoak and bickering flame, and sparkles dire;
   Attended with ten thousand thousand Saints,
   He onward came, farr off his coming shon,
   And twentie thousand (I thir number heard)
   Chariots of God, half on each hand were seen:                       770
   Hee on the wings of Cherub rode sublime
   On the Crystallin Skie, in Saphir Thron'd.
   Illustrious farr and wide, but by his own
   First seen, them unexpected joy surpriz'd,
   When the great Ensign of Messiah blaz'd
   Aloft by Angels born, his Sign in Heav'n:
   Under whose Conduct Michael soon reduc'd
   His Armie, circumfus'd on either Wing,
   Under thir Head imbodied all in one.
   Before him Power Divine his way prepar'd;                           780
   At his command the uprooted Hills retir'd
   Each to his place, they heard his voice and went
   Obsequious, Heav'n his wonted face renewd,
   And with fresh Flourets Hill and Valley smil'd.
   This saw his hapless Foes, but stood obdur'd,
   And to rebellious fight rallied thir Powers
   Insensate, hope conceiving from despair.
   In heav'nly Spirits could such perverseness dwell?
   But to convince the proud what Signs availe,
   Or Wonders move th' obdurate to relent?                             790
   They hard'nd more by what might most reclame,
   Grieving to see his Glorie, at the sight
   Took envie, and aspiring to his highth,
   Stood reimbattell'd fierce, by force or fraud
   Weening to prosper, and at length prevaile
   Against God and Messiah, or to fall
   In universal ruin last, and now
   To final Battel drew, disdaining flight,
   Or faint retreat; when the great Son of God
   To all his Host on either hand thus spake.                          800
   Stand still in bright array ye Saints, here stand
   Ye Angels arm'd, this day from Battel rest;
   Faithful hath been your Warfare, and of God
   Accepted, fearless in his righteous Cause,
   And as ye have receivd, so have ye don
   Invincibly; but of this cursed crew
   The punishment to other hand belongs,
   Vengeance is his, or whose he sole appoints;
   Number to this dayes work is not ordain'd
   Nor multitude, stand onely and behold                               810
   Gods indignation on these Godless pourd
   By mee; not you but mee they have despis'd,
   Yet envied; against mee is all thir rage,
   Because the Father, t' whom in Heav'n supream
   Kingdom and Power and Glorie appertains,
   Hath honourd me according to his will.
   Therefore to mee thir doom he hath assig'n'd;
   That they may have thir wish, to trie with mee
   In Battel which the stronger proves, they all,
   Or I alone against them, since by strength                          820
   They measure all, of other excellence
   Not emulous, nor care who them excells;
   Nor other strife with them do I voutsafe.
   So spake the Son, and into terrour chang'd
   His count'nance too severe to be beheld
   And full of wrauth bent on his Enemies.
   At once the Four spred out thir Starrie wings
   With dreadful shade contiguous, and the Orbes
   Of his fierce Chariot rowld, as with the sound
   Of torrent Floods, or of a numerous Host.                           830
   Hee on his impious Foes right onward drove,
   Gloomie as Night; under his burning Wheeles
   The stedfast Empyrean shook throughout,
   All but the Throne it self of God. Full soon
   Among them he arriv'd; in his right hand
   Grasping ten thousand Thunders, which he sent
   Before him, such as in thir Soules infix'd
   Plagues; they astonisht all resistance lost,
   All courage; down thir idle weapons drop'd;
   O're Shields and Helmes, and helmed heads he rode                   840
   Of Thrones and mighty Seraphim prostrate,
   That wish'd the Mountains now might be again
   Thrown on them as a shelter from his ire.
   Nor less on either side tempestuous fell
   His arrows, from the fourfold-visag'd Foure,
   Distinct with eyes, and from the living Wheels,
   Distinct alike with multitude of eyes,
   One Spirit in them rul'd, and every eye
   Glar'd lightning, and shot forth pernicious fire
   Among th' accurst, that witherd all thir strength,                  850
   And of thir wonted vigour left them draind,
   Exhausted, spiritless, afflicted, fall'n.
   Yet half his strength he put not forth, but check'd
   His Thunder in mid Volie, for he meant
   Not to destroy, but root them out of Heav'n:
   The overthrown he rais'd, and as a Heard
   Of Goats or timerous flock together throngd
   Drove them before him Thunder-struck, pursu'd
   With terrors and with furies to the bounds
   And Chrystall wall of Heav'n, which op'ning wide,                   860
   Rowld inward, and a spacious Gap disclos'd
   Into the wastful Deep; the monstrous sight
   Strook them with horror backward, but far worse
   Urg'd them behind; headlong themselvs they threw
   Down from the verge of Heav'n, Eternal wrauth
   Burnt after them to the bottomless pit.
   Hell heard th' unsufferable noise, Hell saw
   Heav'n ruining from Heav'n and would have fled
   Affrighted; but strict Fate had cast too deep
   Her dark foundations, and too fast had bound.                       870
   Nine dayes they fell; confounded Chaos roard,
   And felt tenfold confusion in thir fall
   Through his wilde Anarchie, so huge a rout
   Incumberd him with ruin: Hell at last
   Yawning receavd them whole, and on them clos'd,
   Hell thir fit habitation fraught with fire
   Unquenchable, the house of woe and paine.
   Disburd'nd Heav'n rejoic'd, and soon repaird
   Her mural breach, returning whence it rowld.
   Sole Victor from th' expulsion of his Foes                          880
   Messiah his triumphal Chariot turnd:
   To meet him all his Saints, who silent stood
   Eye witnesses of his Almightie Acts,
   With Jubilie advanc'd; and as they went,
   Shaded with branching Palme, each order bright,
   Sung Triumph, and him sung Victorious King,
   Son, Heire, and Lord, to him Dominion giv'n,
   Worthiest to Reign: he celebrated rode
   Triumphant through mid Heav'n, into the Courts
   And Temple of his mightie Father Thron'd                            890
   On high; who into Glorie him receav'd,
   Where now he sits at the right hand of bliss.
   Thus measuring things in Heav'n by things on Earth
   At thy request, and that thou maist beware
   By what is past, to thee I have reveal'd
   What might have else to human Race bin hid;
   The discord which befel, and Warr in Heav'n
   Among th' Angelic Powers, and the deep fall
   Of those too high aspiring, who rebelld
   With Satan, hee who envies now thy state,                           900
   Who now is plotting how he may seduce
   Thee also from obedience, that with him
   Bereavd of happiness thou maist partake
   His punishment, Eternal miserie;
   Which would be all his solace and revenge,
   As a despite don against the most High,
   Thee once to gaine Companion of his woe.
   But list'n not to his Temptations, warne
   Thy weaker; let it profit thee to have heard
   By terrible Example the reward                                      910
   Of disobedience; firm they might have stood,
   Yet fell; remember, and fear to transgress.
 
   The End Of The Sixth Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK VII.
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 Raphael at the request of Adam relates how and wherefore this world was
 first created; that God, after the expelling of Satan and his Angels out
 of Heaven, declar'd his pleasure to create another World and other
 Creatures to dwell therein; sends his Son with Glory and attendance of
 Angels to perform the work of Creation in six dayes: the Angels
 celebrate with Hymns the performance thereof, and his reascention into
 Heaven.
 
   Descend from Heav'n Urania, by that name
   If rightly thou art call'd, whose Voice divine
   Following, above th' Olympian Hill I soare,
   Above the flight of Pegasean wing.
   The meaning, not the Name I call: for thou
   Nor of the Muses nine, nor on the top
   Of old Olympus dwell'st, but Heav'nlie borne,
   Before the Hills appeerd, or Fountain flow'd,
   Thou with Eternal wisdom didst converse,
   Wisdom thy Sister, and with her didst play                           10
   In presence of th' Almightie Father, pleas'd
   With thy Celestial Song. Up led by thee
   Into the Heav'n of Heav'ns I have presum'd,
   An Earthlie Guest, and drawn Empyreal Aire,
   Thy tempring; with like safetie guided down
   Return me to my Native Element:
   Least from this flying Steed unrein'd, (as once
   Bellerophon, though from a lower Clime)
   Dismounted, on th' Aleian Field I fall
   Erroneous, there to wander and forlorne.                             20
   Half yet remaines unsung, but narrower bound
   Within the visible Diurnal Spheare;
   Standing on Earth, not rapt above the Pole,
   More safe I Sing with mortal voice, unchang'd
   To hoarce or mute, though fall'n on evil dayes,
   On evil dayes though fall'n, and evil tongues;
   In darkness, and with dangers compast round,
   And solitude; yet not alone, while thou
   Visit'st my slumbers Nightly, or when Morn
   Purples the East: still govern thou my Song,                         30
   Urania, and fit audience find, though few.
   But drive farr off the barbarous dissonance
   Of Bacchus and his Revellers, the Race
   Of that wilde Rout that tore the Thracian Bard
   In Rhodope, where Woods and Rocks had Eares
   To rapture, till the savage clamor dround
   Both Harp and Voice; nor could the Muse defend
   Her Son. So fail not thou, who thee implores:
   For thou art Heav'nlie, shee an empty dreame.
   Say Goddess, what ensu'd when Raphael,                               40
   The affable Arch-angel, had forewarn'd
   Adam by dire example to beware
   Apostasie, by what befell in Heaven
   To those Apostates, least the like befall
   In Paradise to Adam or his Race,
   Charg'd not to touch the interdicted Tree,
   If they transgress, and slight that sole command,
   So easily obeyd amid the choice
   Of all tasts else to please thir appetite,
   Though wandring. He with his consorted Eve                           50
   The storie heard attentive, and was fill'd
   With admiration, and deep Muse to heare
   Of things so high and strange, things to thir thought
   So unimaginable as hate in Heav'n,
   And Warr so neer the Peace of God in bliss
   With such confusion: but the evil soon
   Driv'n back redounded as a flood on those
   From whom it sprung, impossible to mix
   With Blessedness. Whence Adam soon repeal'd
   The doubts that in his heart arose: and now                          60
   Led on, yet sinless, with desire to know
   What neerer might concern him, how this World
   Of Heav'n and Earth conspicuous first began,
   When, and whereof created, for what cause,
   What within Eden or without was done
   Before his memorie, as one whose drouth
   Yet scarce allay'd still eyes the current streame,
   Whose liquid murmur heard new thirst excites,
   Proceeded thus to ask his Heav'nly Guest.
   Great things, and full of wonder in our eares,                       70
   Farr differing from this World, thou hast reveal'd
   Divine Interpreter, by favour sent
   Down from the Empyrean to forewarne
   Us timely of what might else have bin our loss,
   Unknown, which human knowledg could not reach:
   For which to the infinitly Good we owe
   Immortal thanks, and his admonishment
   Receave with solemne purpose to observe
   Immutably his sovran will, the end
   Of what we are. But since thou hast voutsaf't                        80
   Gently for our instruction to impart
   Things above Earthly thought, which yet concernd
   Our knowing, as to highest wisdom seemd,
   Deign to descend now lower, and relate
   What may no less perhaps availe us known,
   How first began this Heav'n which we behold
   Distant so high, with moving Fires adornd
   Innumerable, and this which yeelds or fills
   All space, the ambient Aire wide interfus'd
   Imbracing round this florid Earth, what cause                        90
   Mov'd the Creator in his holy Rest
   Through all Eternitie so late to build
   In Chaos, and the work begun, how soon
   Absolv'd, if unforbid thou maist unfould
   What wee, not to explore the secrets aske
   Of his Eternal Empire, but the more
   To magnifie his works, the more we know.
   And the great Light of Day yet wants to run
   Much of his Race though steep, suspens in Heav'n
   Held by thy voice, thy potent voice he heares,                      100
   And longer will delay to heare thee tell
   His Generation, and the rising Birth
   Of Nature from the unapparent Deep:
   Or if the Starr of Eevning and the Moon
   Haste to thy audience, Night with her will bring
   Silence, and Sleep listning to thee will watch,
   Or we can bid his absence, till thy Song
   End, and dismiss thee ere the Morning shine.
   Thus Adam his illustrous Guest besought:
   And thus the Godlike Angel answerd milde.                           110
   This also thy request with caution askt
   Obtaine: though to recount Almightie works
   What words or tongue of Seraph can suffice,
   Or heart of man suffice to comprehend?
   Yet what thou canst attain, which best may serve
   To glorifie the Maker, and inferr
   Thee also happier, shall not be withheld
   Thy hearing, such Commission from above
   I have receav'd, to answer thy desire
   Of knowledge within bounds; beyond abstain                          120
   To ask, nor let thine own inventions hope
   Things not reveal'd, which th' invisible King,
   Onely Omniscient, hath supprest in Night,
   To none communicable in Earth or Heaven:
   Anough is left besides to search and know.
   But Knowledge is as food, and needs no less
   Her Temperance over Appetite, to know
   In measure what the mind may well contain,
   Oppresses else with Surfet, and soon turns
   Wisdom to Folly, as Nourishment to Winde.                           130
   Know then, that after Lucifer from Heav'n
   (So call him, brighter once amidst the Host
   Of Angels, then that Starr the Starrs among)
   Fell with his flaming Legions through the Deep
   Into his place, and the great Son returnd
   Victorious with his Saints, th' Omnipotent
   Eternal Father from his Throne beheld
   Thir multitude, and to his Son thus spake.
   At least our envious Foe hath fail'd, who thought
   All like himself rebellious, by whose aid                           140
   This inaccessible high strength, the seat
   Of Deitie supream, us dispossest,
   He trusted to have seis'd, and into fraud
   Drew many, whom thir place knows here no more;
   Yet farr the greater part have kept, I see,
   Thir station, Heav'n yet populous retaines
   Number sufficient to possess her Realmes
   Though wide, and this high Temple to frequent
   With Ministeries due and solemn Rites:
   But least his heart exalt him in the harme                          150
   Already done, to have dispeopl'd Heav'n,
   My damage fondly deem'd, I can repaire
   That detriment, if such it be to lose
   Self-lost, and in a moment will create
   Another World, out of one man a Race
   Of men innumerable, there to dwell,
   Not here, till by degrees of merit rais'd
   They open to themselves at length the way
   Up hither, under long obedience tri'd,
   And Earth be chang'd to Heavn, & Heav'n to Earth,                   160
   One Kingdom, Joy and Union without end.
   Mean while inhabit laxe, ye Powers of Heav'n,
   And thou my Word, begotten Son, by thee
   This I perform, speak thou, and be it don:
   My overshadowing Spirit and might with thee
   I send along, ride forth, and bid the Deep
   Within appointed bounds be Heav'n and Earth,
   Boundless the Deep, because I am who fill
   Infinitude, nor vacuous the space.
   Though I uncircumscrib'd my self retire,                            170
   And put not forth my goodness, which is free
   To act or not, Necessitie and Chance
   Approach not mee, and what I will is Fate.
   So spake th' Almightie, and to what he spake
   His Word, the Filial Godhead, gave effect.
   Immediate are the Acts of God, more swift
   Then time or motion, but to human ears
   Cannot without process of speech be told,
   So told as earthly notion can receave.
   Great triumph and rejoycing was in Heav'n                           180
   When such was heard declar'd the Almightie's will;
   Glorie they sung to the most High, good will
   To future men, and in thir dwellings peace:
   Glorie to him whose just avenging ire
   Had driven out th' ungodly from his sight
   And th' habitations of the just; to him
   Glorie and praise, whose wisdom had ordain'd
   Good out of evil to create, in stead
   Of Spirits maligne a better Race to bring
   Into thir vacant room, and thence diffuse                           190
   His good to Worlds and Ages infinite.
   So sang the Hierarchies: Mean while the Son
   On his great Expedition now appeer'd,
   Girt with Omnipotence, with Radiance crown'd
   Of Majestie Divine, Sapience and Love
   Immense, and all his Father in him shon.
   About his Chariot numberless were pour'd
   Cherub and Seraph, Potentates and Thrones,
   And Vertues, winged Spirits, and Chariots wing'd,
   From the Armoury of God, where stand of old                         200
   Myriads between two brazen Mountains lodg'd
   Against a solemn day, harnest at hand,
   Celestial Equipage; and now came forth
   Spontaneous, for within them Spirit livd,
   Attendant on thir Lord: Heav'n op'nd wide
   Her ever during Gates, Harmonious sound
   On golden Hinges moving, to let forth
   The King of Glorie in his powerful Word
   And Spirit coming to create new Worlds.
   On heav'nly ground they stood, and from the shore                   210
   They view'd the vast immeasurable Abyss
   Outrageous as a Sea, dark, wasteful, wilde,
   Up from the bottom turn'd by furious windes
   And surging waves, as Mountains to assault
   Heav'ns highth, and with the Center mix the Pole.
   Silence, ye troubl'd waves, and thou Deep, peace,
   Said then th' Omnific Word, your discord end:
   Nor staid, but on the Wings of Cherubim
   Uplifted, in Paternal Glorie rode
   Farr into Chaos, and the World unborn;                              220
   For Chaos heard his voice: him all his Traine
   Follow'd in bright procession to behold
   Creation, and the wonders of his might.
   Then staid the fervid Wheeles, and in his hand
   He took the golden Compasses, prepar'd
   In Gods Eternal store, to circumscribe
   This Universe, and all created things:
   One foot he center'd, and the other turn'd
   Round through the vast profunditie obscure,
   And said, thus farr extend, thus farr thy bounds,                   230
   This be thy just Circumference, O World.
   Thus God the Heav'n created, thus the Earth,
   Matter unform'd and void: Darkness profound
   Cover'd th' Abyss: but on the watrie calme
   His brooding wings the Spirit of God outspred,
   And vital vertue infus'd, and vital warmth
   Throughout the fluid Mass, but downward purg'd
   The black tartareous cold infernal dregs
   Adverse to life: then founded, then conglob'd
   Like things to like, the rest to several place                      240
   Disparted, and between spun out the Air,
   And Earth self-ballanc't on her Center hung.
   Let ther be Light, said God, and forthwith Light
   Ethereal, first of things, quintessence pure
   Sprung from the Deep, and from her Native East
   To journie through the airie gloom began,
   Sphear'd in a radiant Cloud, for yet the Sun
   Was not; shee in a cloudie Tabernacle
   Sojourn'd the while. God saw the Light was good;
   And light from darkness by the Hemisphere                           250
   Divided: Light the Day, and Darkness Night
   He nam'd. Thus was the first Day Eev'n and Morn:
   Nor past uncelebrated, nor unsung
   By the Celestial Quires, when Orient Light
   Exhaling first from Darkness they beheld;
   Birth-day of Heav'n and Earth; with joy and shout
   The hollow Universal Orb they fill'd,
   And touch't thir Golden Harps, & hymning prais'd
   God and his works, Creatour him they sung,
   Both when first Eevning was, and when first Morn.                   260
   Again, God said, let ther be Firmament
   Amid the Waters, and let it divide
   The Waters from the Waters: and God made
   The Firmament, expanse of liquid, pure,
   Transparent, Elemental Air, diffus'd
   In circuit to the uttermost convex
   Of this great Round: partition firm and sure,
   The Waters underneath from those above
   Dividing: for as Earth, so hee the World
   Built on circumfluous Waters calme, in wide                         270
   Crystallin Ocean, and the loud misrule
   Of Chaos farr remov'd, least fierce extreames
   Contiguous might distemper the whole frame:
   And Heav'n he nam'd the Firmament: So Eev'n
   And Morning Chorus sung the second Day.
   The Earth was form'd, but in the Womb as yet
   Of Waters, Embryon immature involv'd,
   Appeer'd not: over all the face of Earth
   Main Ocean flow'd, not idle, but with warme
   Prolific humour soft'ning all her Globe,                            280
   Fermented the great Mother to conceave,
   Satiate with genial moisture, when God said
   Be gather'd now ye Waters under Heav'n
   Into one place, and let dry Land appeer.
   Immediately the Mountains huge appeer
   Emergent, and thir broad bare backs upheave
   Into the Clouds, thir tops ascend the Skie:
   So high as heav'd the tumid Hills, so low
   Down sunk a hollow bottom broad and deep,
   Capacious bed of Waters: thither they                               290
   Hasted with glad precipitance, uprowld
   As drops on dust conglobing from the drie;
   Part rise in crystal Wall, or ridge direct,
   For haste; such flight the great command impress'd
   On the swift flouds: as Armies at the call
   Of Trumpet (for of Armies thou hast heard)
   Troop to thir Standard, so the watrie throng,
   Wave rowling after Wave, where way they found,
   If steep, with torrent rapture, if through Plaine,
   Soft-ebbing; nor withstood them Rock or Hill,                       300
   But they, or under ground, or circuit wide
   With Serpent errour wandring, found thir way,
   And on the washie Oose deep Channels wore;
   Easie, e're God had bid the ground be drie,
   All but within those banks, where Rivers now
   Stream, and perpetual draw thir humid traine.
   The dry Land, Earth, and the great receptacle
   Of congregated Waters he call'd Seas:
   And saw that it was good, and said, Let th' Earth
   Put forth the verdant Grass, Herb yeilding Seed,                    310
   And Fruit Tree yeilding Fruit after her kind;
   Whose Seed is in her self upon the Earth.
   He scarce had said, when the bare Earth, till then
   Desert and bare, unsightly, unadorn'd,
   Brought forth the tender Grass, whose verdure clad
   Her Universal Face with pleasant green,
   Then Herbs of every leaf, that sudden flour'd
   Op'ning thir various colours, and made gay
   Her bosom smelling sweet: and these scarce blown,
   Forth flourish't thick the clustring Vine, forth crept              320
   The smelling Gourd, up stood the cornie Reed
   Embattell'd in her field: add the humble Shrub,
   And Bush with frizl'd hair implicit: last
   Rose as in Dance the stately Trees, and spred
   Thir branches hung with copious Fruit; or gemm'd
   Thir Blossoms: with high Woods the Hills were crownd,
   With tufts the vallies & each fountain side,
   With borders long the Rivers. That Earth now
   Seemd like to Heav'n, a seat where Gods might dwell,
   Or wander with delight, and love to haunt                           330
   Her sacred shades: though God had yet not rain'd
   Upon the Earth, and man to till the ground
   None was, but from the Earth a dewie Mist
   Went up and waterd all the ground, and each
   Plant of the field, which e're it was in the Earth
   God made, and every Herb, before it grew
   On the green stemm; God saw that it was good:
   So Eev'n and Morn recorded the Third Day.
   Again th' Almightie spake: Let there be Lights
   High in th' expanse of Heaven to divide                             340
   The Day from Night; and let them be for Signes,
   For Seasons, and for Dayes, and circling Years,
   And let them be for Lights as I ordaine
   Thir Office in the Firmament of Heav'n
   To give Light on the Earth; and it was so.
   And God made two great Lights, great for thir use
   To Man, the greater to have rule by Day,
   The less by Night alterne: and made the Starrs,
   And set them in the Firmament of Heav'n
   To illuminate the Earth, and rule the Day                           350
   In thir vicissitude, and rule the Night,
   And Light from Darkness to divide. God saw,
   Surveying his great Work, that it was good:
   For of Celestial Bodies first the Sun
   A mightie Spheare he fram'd, unlightsom first,
   Though of Ethereal Mould: then form'd the Moon
   Globose, and everie magnitude of Starrs,
   And sowd with Starrs the Heav'n thick as a field:
   Of Light by farr the greater part he took,
   Transplanted from her cloudie Shrine, and plac'd                    360
   In the Suns Orb, made porous to receive
   And drink the liquid Light, firm to retaine
   Her gather'd beams, great Palace now of Light.
   Hither as to thir Fountain other Starrs
   Repairing, in thir gold'n Urns draw Light,
   And hence the Morning Planet guilds his horns;
   By tincture or reflection they augment
   Thir small peculiar, though from human sight
   So farr remote, with diminution seen.
   First in his East the glorious Lamp was seen,                       370
   Regent of Day, and all th' Horizon round
   Invested with bright Rayes, jocond to run
   His Longitude through Heav'ns high rode: the gray
   Dawn, and the Pleiades before him danc'd
   Shedding sweet influence: less bright the Moon,
   But opposite in leveld West was set
   His mirror, with full face borrowing her Light
   From him, for other light she needed none
   In that aspect, and still that distance keepes
   Till night, then in the East her turn she shines,                   380
   Revolvd on Heav'ns great Axle, and her Reign
   With thousand lesser Lights dividual holds,
   With thousand thousand Starres, that then appeer'd
   Spangling the Hemisphere: then first adornd
   With thir bright Luminaries that Set and Rose,
   Glad Eevning & glad Morn crownd the fourth day.
   And God said, let the Waters generate
   Reptil with Spawn abundant, living Soule:
   And let Fowle flie above the Earth, with wings
   Displayd on the op'n Firmament of Heav'n.                           390
   And God created the great Whales, and each
   Soul living, each that crept, which plenteously
   The waters generated by thir kindes,
   And every Bird of wing after his kinde;
   And saw that it was good, and bless'd them, saying,
   Be fruitful, multiply, and in the Seas
   And Lakes and running Streams the waters fill;
   And let the Fowle be multiply'd on the Earth.
   Forthwith the Sounds and Seas, each Creek & Bay
   With Frie innumerable swarme, and Shoales                           400
   Of Fish that with thir Finns & shining Scales
   Glide under the green Wave, in Sculles that oft
   Bank the mid Sea: part single or with mate
   Graze the Sea weed thir pasture, & through Groves
   Of Coral stray, or sporting with quick glance
   Show to the Sun thir wav'd coats dropt with Gold,
   Or in thir Pearlie shells at ease, attend
   Moist nutriment, or under Rocks thir food
   In jointed Armour watch: on smooth the Seale,
   And bended Dolphins play: part huge of bulk                         410
   Wallowing unweildie, enormous in thir Gate
   Tempest the Ocean: there Leviathan
   Hugest of living Creatures, on the Deep
   Stretcht like a Promontorie sleeps or swimmes,
   And seems a moving Land, and at his Gilles
   Draws in, and at his Trunck spouts out a Sea.
   Mean while the tepid Caves, and Fens and shoares
   Thir Brood as numerous hatch, from the Egg that soon
   Bursting with kindly rupture forth disclos'd
   Thir callow young, but featherd soon and fledge                     420
   They summ'd thir Penns, and soaring th' air sublime
   With clang despis'd the ground, under a cloud
   In prospect; there the Eagle and the Stork
   On Cliffs and Cedar tops thir Eyries build:
   Part loosly wing the Region, part more wise
   In common, rang'd in figure wedge thir way,
   Intelligent of seasons, and set forth
   Thir Aierie Caravan high over Sea's
   Flying, and over Lands with mutual wing
   Easing thir flight; so stears the prudent Crane                     430
   Her annual Voiage, born on Windes; the Aire
   Floats, as they pass, fann'd with unnumber'd plumes:
   From Branch to Branch the smaller Birds with song
   Solac'd the Woods, and spred thir painted wings
   Till Ev'n, nor then the solemn Nightingal
   Ceas'd warbling, but all night tun'd her soft layes:
   Others on Silver Lakes and Rivers Bath'd
   Thir downie Brest; the Swan with Arched neck
   Between her white wings mantling proudly, Rowes
   Her state with Oarie feet: yet oft they quit                        440
   The Dank, and rising on stiff Pennons, towre
   The mid Aereal Skie: Others on ground
   Walk'd firm; the crested Cock whose clarion sounds
   The silent hours, and th' other whose gay Traine
   Adorns him, colour'd with the Florid hue
   Of Rainbows and Starrie Eyes. The Waters thus
   With Fish replenisht, and the Aire with Fowle,
   Ev'ning and Morn solemniz'd the Fift day.
   The Sixt, and of Creation last arose
   With Eevning Harps and Mattin, when God said,                       450
   Let th' Earth bring forth Fowle living in her kinde,
   Cattel and Creeping things, and Beast of the Earth,
   Each in their kinde. The Earth obey'd, and strait
   Op'ning her fertil Woomb teem'd at a Birth
   Innumerous living Creatures, perfet formes,
   Limb'd and full grown: out of the ground up-rose
   As from his Laire the wilde Beast where he wonns
   In Forrest wilde, in Thicket, Brake, or Den;
   Among the Trees in Pairs they rose, they walk'd:
   The Cattel in the Fields and Meddowes green:                        460
   Those rare and solitarie, these in flocks
   Pasturing at once, and in broad Herds upsprung:
   The grassie Clods now Calv'd, now half appeer'd
   The Tawnie Lion, pawing to get free
   His hinder parts, then springs as broke from Bonds,
   And Rampant shakes his Brinded main; the Ounce,
   The Libbard, and the Tyger, as the Moale
   Rising, the crumbl'd Earth above them threw
   In Hillocks; the swift Stag from under ground
   Bore up his branching head: scarse from his mould                   470
   Behemoth biggest born of Earth upheav'd
   His vastness: Fleec't the Flocks and bleating rose,
   As Plants: ambiguous between Sea and Land
   The River Horse and scalie Crocodile.
   At once came forth whatever creeps the ground,
   Insect or Worme; those wav'd thir limber fans
   For wings, and smallest Lineaments exact
   In all the Liveries dect of Summers pride
   With spots of Gold and Purple, azure and green:
   These as a line thir long dimension drew,                           480
   Streaking the ground with sinuous trace; not all
   Minims of Nature; some of Serpent kinde
   Wondrous in length and corpulence involv'd
   Thir Snakie foulds, and added wings. First crept
   The Parsimonious Emmet, provident
   Of future, in small room large heart enclos'd,
   Pattern of just equalitie perhaps
   Hereafter, join'd in her popular Tribes
   Of Commonaltie: swarming next appeer'd
   The Femal Bee that feeds her Husband Drone                          490
   Deliciously, and builds her waxen Cells
   With Honey stor'd: the rest are numberless,
   And thou thir Natures know'st, and gav'st them Names,
   Needlest to thee repeated; nor unknown
   The Serpent suttl'st Beast of all the field,
   Of huge extent somtimes, with brazen Eyes
   And hairie Main terrific, though to thee
   Not noxious, but obedient at thy call.
   Now Heav'n in all her Glorie shon, and rowld
   Her motions, as the great first-Movers hand                         500
   First wheeld thir course; Earth in her rich attire
   Consummate lovly smil'd; Aire, Water, Earth,
   By Fowl, Fish, Beast, was flown, was swum, was walkt
   Frequent; and of the Sixt day yet remain'd;
   There wanted yet the Master work, the end
   Of all yet don; a Creature who not prone
   And Brute as other Creatures, but endu'd
   With Sanctitie of Reason, might erect
   His Stature, and upright with Front serene
   Govern the rest, self-knowing, and from thence                      510
   Magnanimous to correspond with Heav'n,
   But grateful to acknowledge whence his good
   Descends, thither with heart and voice and eyes
   Directed in Devotion, to adore
   And worship God Supream, who made him chief
   Of all his works: therefore the Omnipotent
   Eternal Father (For where is not hee
   Present) thus to his Son audibly spake.
   Let us make now Man in our image, Man
   In our similitude, and let them rule                                520
   Over the Fish and Fowle of Sea and Aire,
   Beast of the Field, and over all the Earth,
   And every creeping thing that creeps the ground.
   This said, he formd thee, Adam, thee O Man
   Dust of the ground, and in thy nostrils breath'd
   The breath of Life; in his own Image hee
   Created thee, in the Image of God
   Express, and thou becam'st a living Soul.
   Male he created thee, but thy consort
   Femal for Race; then bless'd Mankinde, and said,                    530
   Be fruitful, multiplie, and fill the Earth,
   Subdue it, and throughout Dominion hold
   Over Fish of the Sea, and Fowle of the Aire,
   And every living thing that moves on the Earth.
   Wherever thus created, for no place
   Is yet distinct by name, thence, as thou know'st
   He brought thee into this delicious Grove,
   This Garden, planted with the Trees of God,
   Delectable both to behold and taste;
   And freely all thir pleasant fruit for food                         540
   Gave thee, all sorts are here that all th' Earth yeelds,
   Varietie without end; but of the Tree
   Which tasted works knowledge of Good and Evil,
   Thou mai'st not; in the day thou eat'st, thou di'st;
   Death is the penaltie impos'd, beware,
   And govern well thy appetite, least sin
   Surprise thee, and her black attendant Death.
   Here finish'd hee, and all that he had made
   View'd, and behold all was entirely good;
   So Ev'n and Morn accomplish'd the Sixt day:                         550
   Yet not till the Creator from his work
   Desisting, though unwearied, up returnd
   Up to the Heav'n of Heav'ns his high abode,
   Thence to behold this new created World
   Th' addition of his Empire, how it shew'd
   In prospect from his Throne, how good, how faire,
   Answering his great Idea. Up he rode
   Followd with acclamation and the sound
   Symphonious of ten thousand Harpes that tun'd
   Angelic harmonies: the Earth, the Aire                              560
   Resounded, (thou remember'st, for thou heardst)
   The Heav'ns and all the Constellations rung,
   The Planets in thir stations list'ning stood,
   While the bright Pomp ascended jubilant.
   Open, ye everlasting Gates, they sung,
   Open, ye Heav'ns, your living dores; let in
   The great Creator from his work returnd
   Magnificent, his Six days work, a World;
   Open, and henceforth oft; for God will deigne
   To visit oft the dwellings of just Men                              570
   Delighted, and with frequent intercourse
   Thither will send his winged Messengers
   On errands of supernal Grace. So sung
   The glorious Train ascending: He through Heav'n,
   That open'd wide her blazing Portals, led
   To Gods Eternal house direct the way,
   A broad and ample rode, whose dust is Gold
   And pavement Starrs, as Starrs to thee appeer,
   Seen in the Galaxie, that Milkie way
   Which nightly as a circling Zone thou seest                         580
   Pouderd with Starrs. And now on Earth the Seaventh
   Eev'ning arose in Eden, for the Sun
   Was set, and twilight from the East came on,
   Forerunning Night; when at the holy mount
   Of Heav'ns high-seated top, th' Impereal Throne
   Of Godhead, fixt for ever firm and sure,
   The Filial Power arriv'd, and sate him down
   With his great Father (for he also went
   Invisible, yet staid (such priviledge
   Hath Omnipresence) and the work ordain'd,                           590
   Author and end of all things, and from work
   Now resting, bless'd and hallowd the Seav'nth day,
   As resting on that day from all his work,
   But not in silence holy kept; the Harp
   Had work and rested not, the solemn Pipe,
   And Dulcimer, all Organs of sweet stop,
   All sounds on Fret by String or Golden Wire
   Temper'd soft Tunings, intermixt with Voice
   Choral or Unison: of incense Clouds
   Fuming from Golden Censers hid the Mount.                           600
   Creation and the Six dayes acts they sung,
   Great are thy works, Jehovah, infinite
   Thy power; what thought can measure thee or tongue
   Relate thee; greater now in thy return
   Then from the Giant Angels; thee that day
   Thy Thunders magnifi'd; but to create
   Is greater then created to destroy.
   Who can impair thee, mighty King, or bound
   Thy Empire? easily the proud attempt
   Of Spirits apostat and thir Counsels vaine                          610
   Thou hast repeld, while impiously they thought
   Thee to diminish, and from thee withdraw
   The number of thy worshippers. Who seekes
   To lessen thee, against his purpose serves
   To manifest the more thy might: his evil
   Thou usest, and from thence creat'st more good.
   Witness this new-made World, another Heav'n
   From Heaven Gate not farr, founded in view
   On the cleer Hyaline, the Glassie Sea;
   Of amplitude almost immense, with Starr's                           620
   Numerous, and every Starr perhaps a World
   Of destind habitation; but thou know'st
   Thir seasons: among these the seat of men,
   Earth with her nether Ocean circumfus'd,
   Thir pleasant dwelling place. Thrice happie men,
   And sons of men, whom God hath thus advanc't,
   Created in his Image, there to dwell
   And worship him, and in reward to rule
   Over his Works, on Earth, in Sea, or Air,
   And multiply a Race of Worshippers                                  630
   Holy and just: thrice happie if they know
   Thir happiness, and persevere upright.
   So sung they, and the Empyrean rung,
   With Halleluiahs: Thus was Sabbath kept.
   And thy request think now fulfill'd, that ask'd
   How first this World and face of things began,
   And what before thy memorie was don
   From the beginning, that posteritie
   Informd by thee might know; if else thou seekst
   Aught, not surpassing human measure, say.                           640
 
   Notes:
   451. Bentley's emendation of soul for fowl should be noted.
   See Genesis i. 30 A. V. margin.
   563 stations] station 1674
 
   The End of the Seventh Book
 
 
 
 
 BOOK VIII.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 Adam inquires concerning celestial Motions, is doubtfully answer'd and
 exhorted to search rather things more worthy of knowledg: Adam assents,
 and still desirous to detain Raphael, relates to him what he remember'd
 since his own Creation, his placing in Paradise, his talk with God
 concerning solitude and fit society, his first meeting and Nuptials with
 Eve, his discourse with the Angel thereupon; who after admonitions
 repeated departs.
 
   [THE Angel ended, and in Adams Eare
   So Charming left his voice, that he a while
   Thought him still speaking, still stood fixt to hear;
   Then as new wak't thus gratefully repli'd.]
   What thanks sufficient, or what recompence
   Equal have I to render thee, Divine
   Hystorian, who thus largely hast allayd
   The thirst I had of knowledge, and voutsaf't
   This friendly condescention to relate
   Things else by me unsearchable, now heard                            10
   With wonder, but delight, and, as is due,
   With glorie attributed to the high
   Creator; some thing yet of doubt remaines,
   Which onely thy solution can resolve.
   When I behold this goodly Frame, this World
   Of Heav'n and Earth consisting, and compute,
   Thir magnitudes, this Earth a spot, a graine,
   An Atom, with the Firmament compar'd
   And all her numberd Starrs, that seem to rowle
   Spaces incomprehensible (for such                                    20
   Thir distance argues and thir swift return
   Diurnal) meerly to officiate light
   Round this opacous Earth, this punctual spot,
   One day and night; in all thir vast survey
   Useless besides, reasoning I oft admire,
   How Nature wise and frugal could commit
   Such disproportions, with superfluous hand
   So many nobler Bodies to create,
   Greater so manifold to this one use,
   For aught appeers, and on thir Orbs impose                           30
   Such restless revolution day by day
   Repeated, while the sedentarie Earth,
   That better might with farr less compass move,
   Serv'd by more noble then her self, attaines
   Her end without least motion, and receaves,
   As Tribute such a sumless journey brought
   Of incorporeal speed, her warmth and light;
   Speed, to describe whose swiftness Number failes.
   So spake our Sire, and by his count'nance seemd
   Entring on studious thoughts abstruse, which Eve                     40
   Perceaving where she sat retir'd in sight,
   With lowliness Majestic from her seat,
   And Grace that won who saw to wish her stay,
   Rose, and went forth among her Fruits and Flours,
   To visit how they prosper'd, bud and bloom,
   Her Nurserie; they at her coming sprung
   And toucht by her fair tendance gladlier grew.
   Yet went she not, as not with such discourse
   Delighted, or not capable her eare
   Of what was high: such pleasure she reserv'd,                        50
   Adam relating, she sole Auditress;
   Her Husband the Relater she preferr'd
   Before the Angel, and of him to ask
   Chose rather; hee, she knew would intermix
   Grateful digressions, and solve high dispute
   With conjugal Caresses, from his Lip
   Not Words alone pleas'd her. O when meet now
   Such pairs, in Love and mutual Honour joyn'd?
   With Goddess-like demeanour forth she went;
   Not unattended, for on her as Queen                                  60
   A pomp of winning Graces waited still,
   And from about her shot Darts of desire
   Into all Eyes to wish her still in sight.
   And Raphael now to Adam's doubt propos'd
   Benevolent and facil thus repli'd.
   To ask or search I blame thee not, for Heav'n
   Is as the Book of God before thee set,
   Wherein to read his wondrous Works, and learne
   His Seasons, Hours, or Days, or Months, or Yeares:
   This to attain, whether Heav'n move or Earth,                        70
   Imports not, if thou reck'n right, the rest
   From Man or Angel the great Architect
   Did wisely to conceal, and not divulge
   His secrets to be scann'd by them who ought
   Rather admire; or if they list to try
   Conjecture, he his Fabric of the Heav'ns
   Hath left to thir disputes, perhaps to move
   His laughter at thir quaint Opinions wide
   Hereafter, when they come to model Heav'n
   And calculate the Starrs, how they will weild                        80
   The mightie frame, how build, unbuild, contrive
   To save appeerances, how gird the Sphear
   With Centric and Eccentric scribl'd o're,
   Cycle and Epicycle, Orb in Orb:
   Alreadie by thy reasoning this I guess,
   Who art to lead thy ofspring, and supposest
   That Bodies bright and greater should not serve
   The less not bright, nor Heav'n such journies run,
   Earth sitting still, when she alone receaves
   The benefit: consider first, that Great                              90
   Or Bright inferrs not Excellence: the Earth
   Though, in comparison of Heav'n, so small,
   Nor glistering, may of solid good containe
   More plenty then the Sun that barren shines,
   Whose vertue on it self workes no effect,
   But in the fruitful Earth; there first receavd
   His beams, unactive else, thir vigor find.
   Yet not to Earth are those bright Luminaries
   Officious, but to thee Earths habitant.
   And for the Heav'ns wide Circuit, let it speak                      100
   The Makers high magnificence, who built
   So spacious, and his Line stretcht out so farr;
   That Man may know he dwells not in his own;
   An Edifice too large for him to fill,
   Lodg'd in a small partition, and the rest
   Ordain'd for uses to his Lord best known.
   The swiftness of those Circles attribute,
   Though numberless, to his Omnipotence,
   That to corporeal substances could adde
   Speed almost Spiritual; mee thou thinkst not slow,                  110
   Who since the Morning hour set out from Heav'n
   Where God resides, and ere mid-day arriv'd
   In Eden, distance inexpressible
   By Numbers that have name. But this I urge,
   Admitting Motion in the Heav'ns, to shew
   Invalid that which thee to doubt it mov'd;
   Not that I so affirm, though so it seem
   To thee who hast thy dwelling here on Earth.
   God to remove his wayes from human sense,
   Plac'd Heav'n from Earth so farr, that earthly sight,               120
   If it presume, might erre in things too high,
   And no advantage gaine. What if the Sun
   Be Center to the World, and other Starrs
   By his attractive vertue and thir own
   Incited, dance about him various rounds?
   Thir wandring course now high, now low, then hid,
   Progressive, retrograde, or standing still,
   In six thou seest, and what if sev'nth to these
   The Planet Earth, so stedfast though she seem,
   Insensibly three different Motions move?                            130
   Which else to several Sphears thou must ascribe,
   Mov'd contrarie with thwart obliquities,
   Or save the Sun his labour, and that swift
   Nocturnal and Diurnal rhomb suppos'd,
   Invisible else above all Starrs, the Wheele
   Of Day and Night; which needs not thy beleefe,
   If Earth industrious of her self fetch Day
   Travelling East, and with her part averse
   From the Suns beam meet Night, her other part
   Still luminous by his ray. What if that light                       140
   Sent from her through the wide transpicuous aire,
   To the terrestrial Moon be as a Starr
   Enlightning her by Day, as she by Night
   This Earth? reciprocal, if Land be there,
   Feilds and Inhabitants: Her spots thou seest
   As Clouds, and Clouds may rain, and Rain produce
   Fruits in her soft'nd Soile, for some to eate
   Allotted there; and other Suns perhaps
   With thir attendant Moons thou wilt descrie
   Communicating Male and Femal Light,                                 150
   Which two great Sexes animate the World,
   Stor'd in each Orb perhaps with some that live.
   For such vast room in Nature unpossest
   By living Soule, desert and desolate,
   Onely to shine, yet scarce to contribute
   Each Orb a glimps of Light, conveyd so farr
   Down to this habitable, which returnes
   Light back to them, is obvious to dispute.
   But whether thus these things, or whether not,
   Whether the Sun predominant in Heav'n                               160
   Rise on the Earth, or Earth rise on the Sun,
   Hee from the East his flaming rode begin,
   Or Shee from West her silent course advance
   With inoffensive pace that spinning sleeps
   On her soft Axle, while she paces Eev'n,
   And bears thee soft with the smooth Air along,
   Sollicit not thy thoughts with matters hid,
   Leave them to God above, him serve and feare;
   Of other Creatures, as him pleases best,
   Wherever plac't, let him dispose: joy thou                          170
   In what he gives to thee, this Paradise
   And thy faire Eve; Heav'n is for thee too high
   To know what passes there; be lowlie wise:
   Think onely what concernes thee and thy being;
   Dream not of other Worlds, what Creatures there
   Live, in what state, condition or degree,
   Contented that thus farr hath been reveal'd
   Not of Earth onely but of highest Heav'n.
   To whom thus Adam cleerd of doubt, repli'd.
   How fully hast thou satisfi'd mee, pure                             180
   Intelligence of Heav'n, Angel serene,
   And freed from intricacies, taught to live,
   The easiest way, nor with perplexing thoughts
   To interrupt the sweet of Life, from which
   God hath bid dwell farr off all anxious cares,
   And not molest us, unless we our selves
   Seek them with wandring thoughts, and notions vaine.
   But apt the Mind or Fancie is to roave
   Uncheckt, and of her roaving is no end;
   Till warn'd, or by experience taught, she learne,                   190
   That not to know at large of things remote
   From use, obscure and suttle, but to know
   That which before us lies in daily life,
   Is the prime Wisdom, what is more, is fume,
   Or emptiness, or fond impertinence,
   And renders us in things that most concerne
   Unpractis'd, unprepar'd, and still to seek.
   Therefore from this high pitch let us descend
   A lower flight, and speak of things at hand
   Useful, whence haply mention may arise                              200
   Of somthing not unseasonable to ask
   By sufferance, and thy wonted favour deign'd.
   Thee I have heard relating what was don
   Ere my remembrance: now hear mee relate
   My Storie, which perhaps thou hast not heard;
   And Day is yet not spent; till then thou seest
   How suttly to detaine thee I devise,
   Inviting thee to hear while I relate,
   Fond, were it not in hope of thy reply:
   For while I sit with thee, I seem in Heav'n,                        210
   And sweeter thy discourse is to my eare
   Then Fruits of Palm-tree pleasantest to thirst
   And hunger both, from labour, at the houre
   Of sweet repast; they satiate, and soon fill,
   Though pleasant, but thy words with Grace Divine
   Imbu'd, bring to thir sweetness no satietie.
   To whom thus Raphael answer'd heav'nly meek.
   Nor are thy lips ungraceful, Sire of men,
   Nor tongue ineloquent; for God on thee
   Abundantly his gifts hath also pour'd,                              220
   Inward and outward both, his image faire:
   Speaking or mute all comliness and grace
   Attends thee, and each word, each motion formes.
   Nor less think wee in Heav'n of thee on Earth
   Then of our fellow servant, and inquire
   Gladly into the wayes of God with Man:
   For God we see hath honour'd thee, and set
   On Man his equal Love: say therefore on;
   For I that Day was absent, as befell,
   Bound on a voyage uncouth and obscure,                              230
   Farr on excursion toward the Gates of Hell;
   Squar'd in full Legion (such command we had)
   To see that none thence issu'd forth a spie,
   Or enemie, while God was in his work,
   Least hee incenst at such eruption bold,
   Destruction with Creation might have mixt.
   Not that they durst without his leave attempt,
   But us he sends upon his high behests
   For state, as Sovran King, and to enure
   Our prompt obedience. Fast we found, fast shut                      240
   The dismal Gates, and barricado'd strong;
   But long ere our approaching heard within
   Noise, other then the sound of Dance or Song,
   Torment, and lowd lament, and furious rage.
   Glad we return'd up to the coasts of Light
   Ere Sabbath Eev'ning: so we had in charge.
   But thy relation now; for I attend,
   Pleas'd with thy words no less then thou with mine.
   So spake the Godlike Power, and thus our Sire.
   For Man to tell how human Life began                                250
   Is hard; for who himself beginning knew?
   Desire with thee still longer to converse
   Induc'd me. As new wak't from soundest sleep
   Soft on the flourie herb I found me laid
   In Balmie Sweat, which with his Beames the Sun
   Soon dri'd, and on the reaking moisture fed.
   Strait toward Heav'n my wondring Eyes I turnd,
   And gaz'd a while the ample Skie, till rais'd
   By quick instinctive motion up I sprung,
   As thitherward endevoring, and upright                              260
   Stood on my feet; about me round I saw
   Hill, Dale, and shadie Woods, and sunnie Plaines,
   And liquid Lapse of murmuring Streams; by these,
   Creatures that livd, and movd, and walk'd, or flew,
   Birds on the branches warbling; all things smil'd,
   With fragrance and with joy my heart oreflow'd.
   My self I then perus'd, and Limb by Limb
   Survey'd, and sometimes went, and sometimes ran
   With supple joints, as lively vigour led:
   But who I was, or where, or from what cause,                        270
   Knew not; to speak I tri'd, and forthwith spake,
   My Tongue obey'd and readily could name
   What e're I saw. Thou Sun, said I, faire Light,
   And thou enlight'nd Earth, so fresh and gay,
   Ye Hills and Dales, ye Rivers, Woods, and Plaines,
   And ye that live and move, fair Creatures, tell,
   Tell, if ye saw, how came I thus, how here?
   Not of my self; by some great Maker then,
   In goodness and in power praeeminent;
   Tell me, how may I know him, how adore,                             280
   From whom I have that thus I move and live,
   And feel that I am happier then I know.
   While thus I call'd, and stray'd I knew not whither,
   From where I first drew Aire, and first beheld
   This happie Light, when answer none return'd,
   On a green shadie Bank profuse of Flours
   Pensive I sate me down; there gentle sleep
   First found me, and with soft oppression seis'd
   My droused sense, untroubl'd, though I thought
   I then was passing to my former state                               290
   Insensible, and forthwith to dissolve:
   When suddenly stood at my Head a dream,
   Whose inward apparition gently mov'd
   My Fancy to believe I yet had being,
   And livd: One came, methought, of shape Divine,
   And said, thy Mansion wants thee, Adam, rise,
   First Man, of Men innumerable ordain'd
   First Father, call'd by thee I come thy Guide
   To the Garden of bliss, thy seat prepar'd.
   So saying, by the hand he took me rais'd,                           300
   And over Fields and Waters, as in Aire
   Smooth sliding without step, last led me up
   A woodie Mountain; whose high top was plaine,
   A Circuit wide, enclos'd, with goodliest Trees
   Planted, with Walks, and Bowers, that what I saw
   Of Earth before scarse pleasant seemd. Each Tree
   Load'n with fairest Fruit, that hung to the Eye
   Tempting, stirr'd in me sudden appetite
   To pluck and eate; whereat I wak'd, and found
   Before mine Eyes all real, as the dream                             310
   Had lively shadowd: Here had new begun
   My wandring, had not hee who was my Guide
   Up hither, from among the Trees appeer'd,
   Presence Divine. Rejoycing, but with aw
   In adoration at his feet I fell
   Submiss: he rear'd me, & Whom thou soughtst I am,
   Said mildely, Author of all this thou seest
   Above, or round about thee or beneath.
   This Paradise I give thee, count it thine
   To Till and keep, and of the Fruit to eate:                         320
   Of every Tree that in the Garden growes
   Eate freely with glad heart; fear here no dearth:
   But of the Tree whose operation brings
   Knowledg of good and ill, which I have set
   The Pledge of thy Obedience and thy Faith,
   Amid the Garden by the Tree of Life,
   Remember what I warne thee, shun to taste,
   And shun the bitter consequence: for know,
   The day thou eat'st thereof, my sole command
   Transgrest, inevitably thou shalt dye;                              330
   From that day mortal, and this happie State
   Shalt loose, expell'd from hence into a World
   Of woe and sorrow. Sternly he pronounc'd
   The rigid interdiction, which resounds
   Yet dreadful in mine eare, though in my choice
   Not to incur; but soon his cleer aspect
   Return'd and gratious purpose thus renew'd.
   Not onely these fair bounds, but all the Earth
   To thee and to thy Race I give; as Lords
   Possess it, and all things that therein live,                       340
   Or live in Sea, or Aire, Beast, Fish, and Fowle.
   In signe whereof each Bird and Beast behold
   After thir kindes; I bring them to receave
   From thee thir Names, and pay thee fealtie
   With low subjection; understand the same
   Of Fish within thir watry residence,
   Not hither summond, since they cannot change
   Thir Element to draw the thinner Aire.
   As thus he spake, each Bird and Beast behold
   Approaching two and two, These cowring low                          350
   With blandishment, each Bird stoop'd on his wing.
   I nam'd them, as they pass'd, and understood
   Thir Nature, with such knowledg God endu'd
   My sudden apprehension: but in these
   I found not what me thought I wanted still;
   And to the Heav'nly vision thus presum'd.
   O by what Name, for thou above all these,
   Above mankinde, or aught then mankinde higher,
   Surpassest farr my naming, how may I
   Adore thee, Author of this Universe,                                360
   And all this good to man, for whose well being
   So amply, and with hands so liberal
   Thou hast provided all things: but with mee
   I see not who partakes. In solitude
   What happiness, who can enjoy alone,
   Or all enjoying, what contentment find?
   Thus I presumptuous; and the vision bright,
   As with a smile more bright'nd, thus repli'd.
   What call'st thou solitude, is not the Earth
   With various living creatures, and the Aire                         370
   Replenisht, and all these at thy command
   To come and play before thee, know'st thou not
   Thir language and thir wayes, they also know,
   And reason not contemptibly; with these
   Find pastime, and beare rule; thy Realm is large.
   So spake the Universal Lord, and seem'd
   So ordering. I with leave of speech implor'd,
   And humble deprecation thus repli'd.
   Let not my words offend thee, Heav'nly Power,
   My Maker, be propitious while I speak.                              380
   Hast thou not made me here thy substitute,
   And these inferiour farr beneath me set?
   Among unequals what societie
   Can sort, what harmonie or true delight?
   Which must be mutual, in proportion due
   Giv'n and receiv'd; but in disparitie
   The one intense, the other still remiss
   Cannot well suite with either, but soon prove
   Tedious alike: Of fellowship I speak
   Such as I seek, fit to participate                                  390
   All rational delight, wherein the brute
   Cannot be human consort; they rejoyce
   Each with thir kinde, Lion with Lioness;
   So fitly them in pairs thou hast combin'd;
   Much less can Bird with Beast, or Fish with Fowle
   So well converse, nor with the Ox the Ape;
   Wors then can Man with Beast, and least of all.
   Whereto th' Almighty answer'd, not displeas'd.
   A nice and suttle happiness I see
   Thou to thy self proposest, in the choice                           400
   Of thy Associates, Adam, and wilt taste
   No pleasure, though in pleasure, solitarie.
   What thinkst thou then of mee, and this my State,
   Seem I to thee sufficiently possest
   Of happiness, or not? who am alone
   From all Eternitie, for none I know
   Second to mee or like, equal much less.
   How have I then with whom to hold converse
   Save with the Creatures which I made, and those
   To me inferiour, infinite descents                                  410
   Beneath what other Creatures are to thee?
   He ceas'd, I lowly answer'd. To attaine
   The highth and depth of thy Eternal wayes
   All human thoughts come short, Supream of things;
   Thou in thy self art perfet, and in thee
   Is no deficience found; not so is Man,
   But in degree, the cause of his desire
   By conversation with his like to help,
   Or solace his defects. No need that thou
   Shouldst propagat, already infinite;                                420
   And through all numbers absolute, though One;
   But Man by number is to manifest
   His single imperfection, and beget
   Like of his like, his Image multipli'd,
   In unitie defective, which requires
   Collateral love, and deerest amitie.
   Thou in thy secresie although alone,
   Best with thy self accompanied, seek'st not
   Social communication, yet so pleas'd,
   Canst raise thy Creature to what highth thou wilt                   430
   Of Union or Communion, deifi'd;
   I by conversing cannot these erect
   From prone, nor in thir wayes complacence find.
   Thus I embold'nd spake, and freedom us'd
   Permissive, and acceptance found, which gain'd
   This answer from the gratious voice Divine.
   Thus farr to try thee, Adam, I was pleas'd,
   And finde thee knowing not of Beasts alone,
   Which thou hast rightly nam'd, but of thy self,
   Expressing well the spirit within thee free,                        440
   My Image, not imparted to the Brute,
   Whose fellowship therefore unmeet for thee
   Good reason was thou freely shouldst dislike,
   And be so minded still; I, ere thou spak'st,
   Knew it not good for Man to be alone,
   And no such companie as then thou saw'st
   Intended thee, for trial onely brought,
   To see how thou could'st judge of fit and meet:
   What next I bring shall please thee, be assur'd,
   Thy likeness, thy fit help, thy other self,                         450
   Thy wish, exactly to thy hearts desire.
   Hee ended, or I heard no more, for now
   My earthly by his Heav'nly overpowerd,
   Which it had long stood under, streind to the highth
   In that celestial Colloquie sublime,
   As with an object that excels the sense,
   Dazl'd and spent, sunk down, and sought repair
   Of sleep, which instantly fell on me, call'd
   By Nature as in aide, and clos'd mine eyes.
   Mine eyes he clos'd, but op'n left the Cell                         460
   Of Fancie my internal sight, by which
   Abstract as in a transe methought I saw,
   Though sleeping, where I lay, and saw the shape
   Still glorious before whom awake I stood;
   Who stooping op'nd my left side, and took
   From thence a Rib, with cordial spirits warme,
   And Life-blood streaming fresh; wide was the wound,
   But suddenly with flesh fill'd up & heal'd:
   The Rib he formd and fashond with his hands;
   Under his forming hands a Creature grew,                            470
   Manlike, but different sex, so lovly faire,
   That what seemd fair in all the World, seemd now
   Mean, or in her summd up, in her containd
   And in her looks, which from that time infus'd
   Sweetness into my heart, unfelt before,
   And into all things from her Aire inspir'd
   The spirit of love and amorous delight.
   She disappeerd, and left me dark, I wak'd
   To find her, or for ever to deplore
   Her loss, and other pleasures all abjure:                           480
   When out of hope, behold her, not farr off,
   Such as I saw her in my dream, adornd
   With what all Earth or Heaven could bestow
   To make her amiable: On she came,
   Led by her Heav'nly Maker, though unseen,
   And guided by his voice, nor uninformd
   Of nuptial Sanctitie and marriage Rites:
   Grace was in all her steps, Heav'n in her Eye,
   In every gesture dignitie and love.
   I overjoyd could not forbear aloud.                                 490
   This turn hath made amends; thou hast fulfill'd
   Thy words, Creator bounteous and benigne,
   Giver of all things faire, but fairest this
   Of all thy gifts, nor enviest. I now see
   Bone of my Bone, Flesh of my Flesh, my Self
   Before me; Woman is her Name, of Man
   Extracted; for this cause he shall forgoe
   Father and Mother, and to his Wife adhere;
   And they shall be one Flesh, one Heart, one Soule.
   She heard me thus, and though divinely brought,                     500
   Yet Innocence and Virgin Modestie,
   Her vertue and the conscience of her worth,
   That would be woo'd, and not unsought be won,
   Not obvious, not obtrusive, but retir'd,
   The more desirable, or to say all,
   Nature her self, though pure of sinful thought,
   Wrought in her so, that seeing me, she turn'd;
   I follow'd her, she what was Honour knew,
   And with obsequious Majestie approv'd
   My pleaded reason. To the Nuptial Bowre                             510
   I led her blushing like the Morn: all Heav'n,
   And happie Constellations on that houre
   Shed thir selectest influence; the Earth
   Gave sign of gratulation, and each Hill;
   Joyous the Birds; fresh Gales and gentle Aires
   Whisper'd it to the Woods, and from thir wings
   Flung Rose, flung Odours from the spicie Shrub,
   Disporting, till the amorous Bird of Night
   Sung Spousal, and bid haste the Eevning Starr
   On his Hill top, to light the bridal Lamp.                          520
   Thus I have told thee all my State, and brought
   My Storie to the sum of earthly bliss
   Which I enjoy, and must confess to find
   In all things else delight indeed, but such
   As us'd or not, works in the mind no change,
   Nor vehement desire, these delicacies
   I mean of Taste, Sight, Smell, Herbs, Fruits, & Flours,
   Walks, and the melodie of Birds; but here
   Farr otherwise, transported I behold,
   Transported touch; here passion first I felt,                       530
   Commotion strange, in all enjoyments else
   Superiour and unmov'd, here onely weake
   Against the charm of Beauties powerful glance.
   Or Nature faild in mee, and left some part
   Not proof enough such Object to sustain,
   Or from my side subducting, took perhaps
   More then enough; at least on her bestow'd
   Too much of Ornament, in outward shew
   Elaborate, of inward less exact.
   For well I understand in the prime end                              540
   Of Nature her th' inferiour, in the mind
   And inward Faculties, which most excell,
   In outward also her resembling less
   His Image who made both, and less expressing
   The character of that Dominion giv'n
   O're other Creatures; yet when I approach
   Her loveliness, so absolute she seems
   And in her self compleat, so well to know
   Her own, that what she wills to do or say,
   Seems wisest, vertuousest, discreetest, best;                       550
   All higher knowledge in her presence falls
   Degraded, Wisdom in discourse with her
   Looses discount'nanc't, and like folly shewes;
   Authoritie and Reason on her waite,
   As one intended first, not after made
   Occasionally; and to consummate all,
   Greatness of mind and nobleness thir seat
   Build in her loveliest, and create an awe
   About her, as a guard Angelic plac't.
   To whom the Angel with contracted brow.                             560
   Accuse not Nature, she hath don her part;
   Do thou but thine, and be not diffident
   Of Wisdom, she deserts thee not, if thou
   Dismiss not her, when most thou needst her nigh,
   By attributing overmuch to things
   Less excellent, as thou thy self perceav'st.
   For what admir'st thou, what transports thee so,
   An outside? fair no doubt, and worthy well
   Thy cherishing, thy honouring, and thy love,
   Not thy subjection: weigh with her thy self;                        570
   Then value: Oft times nothing profits more
   Then self-esteem, grounded on just and right
   Well manag'd; of that skill the more thou know'st,
   The more she will acknowledge thee her Head,
   And to realities yeild all her shows;
   Made so adorn for thy delight the more,
   So awful, that with honour thou maist love
   Thy mate, who sees when thou art seen least wise.
   But if the sense of touch whereby mankind
   Is propagated seem such dear delight                                580
   Beyond all other, think the same voutsaf't
   To Cattel and each Beast; which would not be
   To them made common & divulg'd, if aught
   Therein enjoy'd were worthy to subdue
   The Soule of Man, or passion in him move.
   What higher in her societie thou findst
   Attractive, human, rational, love still;
   In loving thou dost well, in passion not,
   Wherein true Love consists not; love refines
   The thoughts, and heart enlarges, hath his seat                     590
   In Reason, and is judicious, is the scale
   By which to heav'nly Love thou maist ascend,
   Not sunk in carnal pleasure, for which cause
   Among the Beasts no Mate for thee was found.
   To whom thus half abash't Adam repli'd.
   Neither her out-side formd so fair, nor aught
   In procreation common to all kindes
   (Though higher of the genial Bed by far,
   And with mysterious reverence I deem)
   So much delights me, as those graceful acts,                        600
   Those thousand decencies that daily flow
   From all her words and actions, mixt with Love
   And sweet compliance, which declare unfeign'd
   Union of Mind, or in us both one Soule;
   Harmonie to behold in wedded pair
   More grateful then harmonious sound to the eare.
   Yet these subject not; I to thee disclose
   What inward thence I feel, not therefore foild,
   Who meet with various objects, from the sense
   Variously representing; yet still free                              610
   Approve the best, and follow what I approve.
   To love thou blam'st me not, for love thou saist
   Leads up to Heav'n, is both the way and guide;
   Bear with me then, if lawful what I ask;
   Love not the heav'nly Spirits, and how thir Love
   Express they, by looks onely, or do they mix
   Irradiance, virtual or immediate touch?
   To whom the Angel with a smile that glow'd
   Celestial rosie red, Loves proper hue,
   Answer'd. Let it suffice thee that thou know'st                     620
   Us happie, and without Love no happiness.
   Whatever pure thou in the body enjoy'st
   (And pure thou wert created) we enjoy
   In eminence, and obstacle find none
   Of membrane, joynt, or limb, exclusive barrs:
   Easier then Air with Air, if Spirits embrace,
   Total they mix, Union of Pure with Pure
   Desiring; nor restrain'd conveyance need
   As Flesh to mix with Flesh, or Soul with Soul.
   But I can now no more; the parting Sun                              630
   Beyond the Earths green Cape and verdant Isles
   Hesperean sets, my Signal to depart.
   Be strong, live happie, and love, but first of all
   Him whom to love is to obey, and keep
   His great command; take heed least Passion sway
   Thy Judgement to do aught, which else free Will
   Would not admit; thine and of all thy Sons
   The weal or woe in thee is plac't; beware.
   I in thy persevering shall rejoyce,
   And all the Blest: stand fast; to stand or fall                     640
   Free in thine own Arbitrement it lies.
   Perfet within, no outward aid require;
   And all temptation to transgress repel.
   So saying, he arose; whom Adam thus
   Follow'd with benediction. Since to part,
   Go heavenly Guest, Ethereal Messenger,
   Sent from whose sovran goodness I adore.
   Gentle to me and affable hath been
   Thy condescension, and shall be honour'd ever
   With grateful Memorie: thou to mankind                              650
   Be good and friendly still, and oft return.
   So parted they, the Angel up to Heav'n
   From the thick shade, and Adam to his Bowre.
 
   Notes:
   1-4  These lines were added in the second edition (1674) when
   Book VII was divided into two at line 640.  Line 641 had read
   'To whom thus Adam gratefully repli'd'.
   269 as] and 1674.
 
   The End Of The Eighth Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK IX.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 Satan having compast the Earth, with meditated guile returns as a mist
 by Night into Paradise, enters into the Serpent sleeping. Adam and Eve
 in the Morning go forth to thir labours, which Eve proposes to divide in
 several places, each labouring apart: Adam consents not, alledging the
 danger, lest that Enemy, of whom they were forewarn'd, should attempt
 her found alone: Eve loath to be thought not circumspect or firm enough,
 urges her going apart, the rather desirous to make tryal of her
 strength; Adam at last yields: The Serpent finds her alone; his subtle
 approach, first gazing, then speaking with much flattery extolling Eve
 above all other Creatures. Eve wondring to hear the Serpent speak, asks
 how he attain'd to human speech and such understanding not till now; the
 Serpent answers, that by tasting of a certain Tree in the Garden he
 attain'd both to Speech and Reason, till then void of both: Eve requires
 him to bring her to that Tree, and finds it to be the Tree of Knowledge
 forbidden: The Serpent now grown bolder, with many wiles and arguments
 induces her at length to eat; she pleas'd with the taste deliberates
 awhile whether to impart thereof to Adam or not, at last brings him of
 the Fruit, relates what persuaded her to eat thereof: Adam at first
 amaz'd, but perceiving her lost, resolves through vehemence of love to
 perish with her; and extenuating the trespass, eats also of the Fruit:
 The effects thereof in them both; they seek to cover thir nakedness;
 then fall to variance and accusation of one another.
 
   No more of talk where God or Angel Guest
   With Man, as with his Friend, familiar us'd
   To sit indulgent, and with him partake
   Rural repast, permitting him the while
   Venial discourse unblam'd: I now must change
   Those Notes to Tragic; foul distrust, and breach
   Disloyal on the part of Man, revolt
   And disobedience: On the part of Heav'n
   Now alienated, distance and distaste,
   Anger and just rebuke, and judgement giv'n,                          10
   That brought into this World a world of woe,
   Sinne and her shadow Death, and Miserie
   Deaths Harbinger: Sad task, yet argument
   Not less but more Heroic then the wrauth
   Of stern Achilles on his Foe pursu'd
   Thrice Fugitive about Troy Wall; or rage
   Of Turnus for Lavinia disespous'd,
   Or Neptun's ire or Juno's, that so long
   Perplex'd the Greek and Cytherea's Son;
   If answerable style I can obtaine                                    20
   Of my Celestial Patroness, who deignes
   Her nightly visitation unimplor'd,
   And dictates to me slumbring, or inspires
   Easie my unpremeditated Verse:
   Since first this subject for Heroic Song
   Pleas'd me long choosing, and beginning late;
   Not sedulous by Nature to indite
   Warrs, hitherto the onely Argument
   Heroic deem'd, chief maistrie to dissect
   With long and tedious havoc fabl'd Knights                           30
   In Battels feign'd; the better fortitude
   Of Patience and Heroic Martyrdom
   Unsung; or to describe Races and Games,
   Or tilting Furniture, emblazon'd Shields,
   Impreses quaint, Caparisons and Steeds;
   Bases and tinsel Trappings, gorgious Knights
   At Joust and Torneament; then marshal'd Feast
   Serv'd up in Hall with Sewers, and Seneshals;
   The skill of Artifice or Office mean,
   Not that which justly gives Heroic name                              40
   To Person or to Poem. Mee of these
   Nor skilld nor studious, higher Argument
   Remaines, sufficient of it self to raise
   That name, unless an age too late, or cold
   Climat, or Years damp my intended wing
   Deprest, and much they may, if all be mine,
   Not Hers who brings it nightly to my Ear.
   The Sun was sunk, and after him the Starr
   Of Hesperus, whose Office is to bring
   Twilight upon the Earth, short Arbiter                               50
   Twixt Day and Night, and now from end to end
   Nights Hemisphere had veild the Horizon round:
   When Satan who late fled before the threats
   Of Gabriel out of Eden, now improv'd
   In meditated fraud and malice, bent
   On mans destruction, maugre what might hap
   Of heavier on himself, fearless return'd.
   By Night he fled, and at Midnight return'd
   From compassing the Earth, cautious of day,
   Since Uriel Regent of the Sun descri'd                               60
   His entrance, and forewarnd the Cherubim
   That kept thir watch; thence full of anguish driv'n,
   The space of seven continu'd Nights he rode
   With darkness, thrice the Equinoctial Line
   He circl'd, four times cross'd the Carr of Night
   From Pole to Pole, traversing each Colure;
   On the eighth return'd, and on the Coast averse
   From entrance or Cherubic Watch, by stealth
   Found unsuspected way. There was a place,
   Now not, though Sin, not Time, first wraught the change,             70
   Where Tigris at the foot of Paradise
   Into a Gulf shot under ground, till part
   Rose up a Fountain by the Tree of Life;
   In with the River sunk, and with it rose
   Satan involv'd in rising Mist, then sought
   Where to lie hid; Sea he had searcht and Land
   From Eden over Pontus, and the Poole
   Maeotis, up beyond the River Ob;
   Downward as farr Antartic; and in length
   West from Orantes to the Ocean barr'd                                80
   At Darien, thence to the Land where flowes
   Ganges and Indus: thus the Orb he roam'd
   With narrow search; and with inspection deep
   Consider'd every Creature, which of all
   Most opportune might serve his Wiles, and found
   The Serpent suttlest Beast of all the Field.
   Him after long debate, irresolute
   Of thoughts revolv'd, his final sentence chose
   Fit Vessel, fittest Imp of fraud, in whom
   To enter, and his dark suggestions hide                              90
   From sharpest sight: for in the wilie Snake,
   Whatever sleights none would suspicious mark,
   As from his wit and native suttletie
   Proceeding, which in other Beasts observ'd
   Doubt might beget of Diabolic pow'r
   Active within beyond the sense of brute.
   Thus he resolv'd, but first from inward griefe
   His bursting passion into plaints thus pour'd:
   O Earth, how like to Heav'n, if not preferrd
   More justly, Seat worthier of Gods, as built                        100
   With second thoughts, reforming what was old!
   For what God after better worse would build?
   Terrestrial Heav'n, danc't round by other Heav'ns
   That shine, yet bear thir bright officious Lamps,
   Light above Light, for thee alone, as seems,
   In thee concentring all thir precious beams
   Of sacred influence: As God in Heav'n
   Is Center, yet extends to all, so thou
   Centring receav'st from all those Orbs; in thee,
   Not in themselves, all thir known vertue appeers                    110
   Productive in Herb, Plant, and nobler birth
   Of Creatures animate with gradual life
   Of Growth, Sense, Reason, all summ'd up in Man.
   With what delight could I have walkt thee round
   If I could joy in aught, sweet interchange
   Of Hill and Vallie, Rivers, Woods and Plaines,
   Now Land, now Sea, & Shores with Forrest crownd,
   Rocks, Dens, and Caves; but I in none of these
   Find place or refuge; and the more I see
   Pleasures about me, so much more I feel                             120
   Torment within me, as from the hateful siege
   Of contraries; all good to me becomes
   Bane, and in Heav'n much worse would be my state.
   But neither here seek I, no nor in Heav'n
   To dwell, unless by maistring Heav'ns Supreame;
   Nor hope to be my self less miserable
   By what I seek, but others to make such
   As I though thereby worse to me redound:
   For onely in destroying I finde ease
   To my relentless thoughts; and him destroyd,                        130
   Or won to what may work his utter loss,
   For whom all this was made, all this will soon
   Follow, as to him linkt in weal or woe,
   In wo then; that destruction wide may range:
   To mee shall be the glorie sole among
   The infernal Powers, in one day to have marr'd
   What he Almightie styl'd, six Nights and Days
   Continu'd making, and who knows how long
   Before had bin contriving, though perhaps
   Not longer then since I in one Night freed                          140
   From servitude inglorious welnigh half
   Th' Angelic Name, and thinner left the throng
   Of his adorers: hee to be aveng'd,
   And to repaire his numbers thus impair'd,
   Whether such vertue spent of old now faild
   More Angels to Create, if they at least
   Are his Created or to spite us more,
   Determin'd to advance into our room
   A Creature form'd of Earth, and him endow,
   Exalted from so base original,                                      150
   With Heav'nly spoils, our spoils: What he decreed
   He effected; Man he made, and for him built
   Magnificent this World, and Earth his seat,
   Him Lord pronounc'd, and, O indignitie!
   Subjected to his service Angel wings,
   And flaming Ministers to watch and tend
   Thir earthlie Charge: Of these the vigilance
   I dread, and to elude, thus wrapt in mist
   Of midnight vapor glide obscure, and prie
   In every Bush and Brake, where hap may finde                        160
   The Serpent sleeping, in whose mazie foulds
   To hide me, and the dark intent I bring.
   O foul descent! that I who erst contended
   With Gods to sit the highest, am now constraind
   Into a Beast, and mixt with bestial slime,
   This essence to incarnate and imbrute,
   That to the hight of Deitie aspir'd;
   But what will not Ambition and Revenge
   Descend to? who aspires must down as low
   As high he soard, obnoxious first or last                           170
   To basest things. Revenge, at first though sweet,
   Bitter ere long back on it self recoiles;
   Let it; I reck not, so it light well aim'd,
   Since higher I fall short, on him who next
   Provokes my envie, this new Favorite
   Of Heav'n, this Man of Clay, Son of despite,
   Whom us the more to spite his Maker rais'd
   From dust: spite then with spite is best repaid.
   So saying, through each Thicket Danck or Drie,
   Like a black mist low creeping, he held on                          180
   His midnight search, where soonest he might finde
   The Serpent: him fast sleeping soon he found
   In Labyrinth of many a round self-rowl'd,
   His head the midst, well stor'd with suttle wiles:
   Not yet in horrid Shade or dismal Den,
   Nor nocent yet, but on the grassie Herbe
   Fearless unfeard he slept: in at his Mouth
   The Devil enterd, and his brutal sense,
   In heart or head, possessing soon inspir'd
   With act intelligential; but his sleep                              190
   Disturbd not, waiting close th' approach of Morn.
   Now whenas sacred Light began to dawne
   In Eden on the humid Flours, that breathd
   Thir morning Incense, when all things that breath,
   From th' Earths great Altar send up silent praise
   To the Creator, and his Nostrils fill
   With gratefull Smell, forth came the human pair
   And joynd thir vocal Worship to the Quire
   Of Creatures wanting voice, that done, partake
   The season, prime for sweetest Sents and Aires:                     200
   Then commune how that day they best may ply
   Thir growing work: for much thir work outgrew
   The hands dispatch of two Gardning so wide.
   And Eve first to her Husband thus began.
   Adam, well may we labour still to dress
   This Garden, still to tend Plant, Herb and Flour.
   Our pleasant task enjoyn'd, but till more hands
   Aid us, the work under our labour grows,
   Luxurious by restraint; what we by day
   Lop overgrown, or prune, or prop, or bind,                          210
   One night or two with wanton growth derides
   Tending to wilde. Thou therefore now advise
   Or hear what to my mind first thoughts present,
   Let us divide our labours, thou where choice
   Leads thee, or where most needs, whether to wind
   The Woodbine round this Arbour, or direct
   The clasping Ivie where to climb, while I
   In yonder Spring of Roses intermixt
   With Myrtle, find what to redress till Noon:
   For while so near each other thus all day                           220
   Our task we choose, what wonder if so near
   Looks intervene and smiles, or object new
   Casual discourse draw on, which intermits
   Our dayes work brought to little, though begun
   Early, and th' hour of Supper comes unearn'd.
   To whom mild answer Adam thus return'd.
   Sole Eve, Associate sole, to me beyond
   Compare above all living Creatures deare,
   Well hast thou motion'd, wel thy thoughts imployd
   How we might best fulfill the work which here                       230
   God hath assign'd us, nor of me shalt pass
   Unprais'd: for nothing lovelier can be found
   In woman, then to studie houshold good,
   And good workes in her Husband to promote.
   Yet not so strictly hath our Lord impos'd
   Labour, as to debarr us when we need
   Refreshment, whether food, or talk between,
   Food of the mind, or this sweet intercourse
   Of looks and smiles, for smiles from Reason flow,
   To brute deni'd, and are of Love the food,                          240
   Love not the lowest end of human life.
   For not to irksom toile, but to delight
   He made us, and delight to Reason joyn'd.
   These paths and Bowers doubt not but our joynt hands
   Will keep from Wilderness with ease, as wide
   As we need walk, till younger hands ere long
   Assist us: But if much converse perhaps
   Thee satiate, to short absence I could yeild.
   For solitude somtimes is best societie,
   And short retirement urges sweet returne.                           250
   But other doubt possesses me, least harm
   Befall thee sever'd from me; for thou knowst
   What hath bin warn'd us, what malicious Foe
   Envying our happiness, and of his own
   Despairing, seeks to work us woe and shame
   By sly assault; and somwhere nigh at hand
   Watches, no doubt, with greedy hope to find
   His wish and best advantage, us asunder,
   Hopeless to circumvent us joynd, where each
   To other speedie aide might lend at need;                           260
   Whether his first design be to withdraw
   Our fealtie from God, or to disturb
   Conjugal Love, then which perhaps no bliss
   Enjoy'd by us excites his envie more;
   Or this, or worse, leave not the faithful side
   That gave thee being, stil shades thee and protects.
   The Wife, where danger or dishonour lurks,
   Safest and seemliest by her Husband staies,
   Who guards her, or with her the worst endures.
   To whom the Virgin Majestie of Eve,                                 270
   As one who loves, and some unkindness meets,
   With sweet austeer composure thus reply'd.
   Ofspring of Heav'n and Earth, and all Earths Lord,
   That such an enemie we have, who seeks
   Our ruin, both by thee informd I learne,
   And from the parting Angel over-heard
   As in a shadie nook I stood behind,
   Just then returnd at shut of Evening Flours.
   But that thou shouldst my firmness therefore doubt
   To God or thee, because we have a foe                               280
   May tempt it, I expected not to hear.
   His violence thou fearst not, being such,
   As wee, not capable of death or paine,
   Can either not receave, or can repell.
   His fraud is then thy fear, which plain inferrs
   Thy equal fear that my firm Faith and Love
   Can by his fraud be shak'n or seduc't;
   Thoughts, which how found they harbour in thy Brest,
   Adam, misthought of her to thee so dear?
   To whom with healing words Adam reply'd.                            290
   Daughter of God and Man, immortal Eve,
   For such thou art, from sin and blame entire:
   Not diffident of thee do I dissuade
   Thy absence from my sight, but to avoid
   Th' attempt it self, intended by our Foe.
   For hee who tempts, though in vain, at least asperses
   The tempted with dishonour foul, suppos'd
   Not incorruptible of Faith, not prooff
   Against temptation: thou thy self with scorne
   And anger wouldst resent the offer'd wrong,                         300
   Though ineffectual found: misdeem not then,
   If such affront I labour to avert
   From thee alone, which on us both at once
   The Enemie, though bold, will hardly dare,
   Or daring, first on mee th' assault shall light.
   Nor thou his malice and false guile contemn;
   Suttle he needs must be, who could seduce
   Angels, nor think superfluous others aid.
   I from the influence of thy looks receave
   Access in every Vertue, in thy sight                                310
   More wise, more watchful, stronger, if need were
   Of outward strength; while shame, thou looking on,
   Shame to be overcome or over-reacht
   Would utmost vigor raise, and rais'd unite.
   Why shouldst not thou like sense within thee feel
   When I am present, and thy trial choose
   With me, best witness of thy Vertue tri'd.
   So spake domestick Adam in his care
   And Matrimonial Love, but Eve, who thought
   Less attributed to her Faith sincere,                               320
   Thus her reply with accent sweet renewd.
   If this be our condition, thus to dwell
   In narrow circuit strait'nd by a Foe,
   Suttle or violent, we not endu'd
   Single with like defence, wherever met,
   How are we happie, still in fear of harm?
   But harm precedes not sin: onely our Foe
   Tempting affronts us with his foul esteem
   Of our integritie: his foul esteeme
   Sticks no dishonor on our Front, but turns                          330
   Foul on himself; then wherfore shund or feard
   By us? who rather double honour gaine
   From his surmise prov'd false, finde peace within,
   Favour from Heav'n, our witness from th' event.
   And what is Faith, Love, Vertue unassaid
   Alone, without exterior help sustaind?
   Let us not then suspect our happie State
   Left so imperfet by the Maker wise,
   As not secure to single or combin'd.
   Fraile is our happiness, if this be so,                             340
   And Eden were no Eden thus expos'd.
   To whom thus Adam fervently repli'd.
   O Woman, best are all things as the will
   Of God ordaind them, his creating hand
   Nothing imperfet or deficient left
   Of all that he Created, much less Man,
   Or ought that might his happie State secure,
   Secure from outward force; within himself
   The danger lies, yet lies within his power:
   Against his will he can receave no harme.                           350
   But God left free the Will, for what obeyes
   Reason, is free, and Reason he made right,
   But bid her well beware, and still erect,
   Least by some faire appeering good surpris'd
   She dictate false, and missinforme the Will
   To do what God expresly hath forbid.
   Not then mistrust, but tender love enjoynes,
   That I should mind thee oft, and mind thou me.
   Firm we subsist, yet possible to swerve,
   Since Reason not impossibly may meet                                360
   Some specious object by the Foe subornd,
   And fall into deception unaware,
   Not keeping strictest watch, as she was warnd.
   Seek not temptation then, which to avoide
   Were better, and most likelie if from mee
   Thou sever not; Trial will come unsought.
   Wouldst thou approve thy constancie, approve
   First thy obedience; th' other who can know,
   Not seeing thee attempted, who attest?
   But if thou think, trial unsought may finde                         370
   Us both securer then thus warnd thou seemst,
   Go; for thy stay, not free, absents thee more;
   Go in thy native innocence, relie
   On what thou hast of vertue, summon all,
   For God towards thee hath done his part, do thine.
   So spake the Patriarch of Mankinde, but Eve
   Persisted, yet submiss, though last, repli'd.
   With thy permission then, and thus forewarnd
   Chiefly by what thy own last reasoning words
   Touchd onely, that our trial, when least sought,                    380
   May finde us both perhaps farr less prepar'd,
   The willinger I goe, nor much expect
   A Foe so proud will first the weaker seek;
   So bent, the more shall shame him his repulse.
   Thus saying, from her Husbands hand her hand
   Soft she withdrew, and like a Wood-Nymph light
   Oread or Dryad, or of Delia's Traine,
   Betook her to the Groves, but Delia's self
   In gate surpass'd and Goddess-like deport,
   Though not as shee with Bow and Quiver armd,                        390
   But with such Gardning Tools as Art yet rude,
   Guiltless of fire had formd, or Angels brought,
   To Pales, or Pomona, thus adornd,
   Likest she seemd, Pomona when she fled
   Vertumnus, or to Ceres in her Prime,
   Yet Virgin of Proserpina from Jove.
   Her long with ardent look his Eye pursu'd
   Delighted, but desiring more her stay.
   Oft he to her his charge of quick returne,
   Repeated, shee to him as oft engag'd                                400
   To be returnd by Noon amid the Bowre,
   And all things in best order to invite
   Noontide repast, or Afternoons repose.
   O much deceav'd, much failing, hapless Eve,
   Of thy presum'd return! event perverse!
   Thou never from that houre in Paradise
   Foundst either sweet repast, or sound repose;
   Such ambush hid among sweet Flours and Shades
   Waited with hellish rancor imminent
   To intercept thy way, or send thee back                             410
   Despoild of Innocence, of Faith, of Bliss.
   For now, and since first break of dawne the Fiend,
   Meer Serpent in appearance, forth was come,
   And on his Quest, where likeliest he might finde
   The onely two of Mankinde, but in them
   The whole included Race, his purposd prey.
   In Bowre and Field he sought, where any tuft
   Of Grove or Garden-Plot more pleasant lay,
   Thir tendance or Plantation for delight,
   By Fountain or by shadie Rivulet                                    420
   He sought them both, but wish'd his hap might find
   Eve separate, he wish'd, but not with hope
   Of what so seldom chanc'd, when to his wish,
   Beyond his hope, Eve separate he spies,
   Veild in a Cloud of Fragrance, where she stood,
   Half spi'd, so thick the Roses bushing round
   About her glowd, oft stooping to support
   Each Flour of slender stalk, whose head though gay
   Carnation, Purple, Azure, or spect with Gold,
   Hung drooping unsustaind, them she upstaies                         430
   Gently with Mirtle band, mindless the while,
   Her self, though fairest unsupported Flour,
   From her best prop so farr, and storm so nigh.
   Neerer he drew, and many a walk travers'd
   Of stateliest Covert, Cedar, Pine, or Palme,
   Then voluble and bold, now hid, now seen
   Among thick-wov'n Arborets and Flours
   Imborderd on each Bank, the hand of Eve:
   Spot more delicious then those Gardens feign'd
   Or of reviv'd Adonis, or renownd                                    440
   Alcinous, host of old Laertes Son,
   Or that, not Mystic, where the Sapient King
   Held dalliance with his faire Egyptian Spouse.
   Much hee the Place admir'd, the Person more.
   As one who long in populous City pent,
   Where Houses thick and Sewers annoy the Aire,
   Forth issuing on a Summers Morn, to breathe
   Among the pleasant Villages and Farmes
   Adjoynd, from each thing met conceaves delight,
   The smell of Grain, or tedded Grass, or Kine,                       450
   Or Dairie, each rural sight, each rural sound;
   If chance with Nymphlike step fair Virgin pass,
   What pleasing seemd, for her now pleases more,
   She most, and in her look summs all Delight.
   Such Pleasure took the Serpent to behold
   This Flourie Plat, the sweet recess of Eve
   Thus earlie, thus alone; her Heav'nly forme
   Angelic, but more soft, and Feminine,
   Her graceful Innocence, her every Aire
   Of gesture or lest action overawd                                   460
   His Malice, and with rapine sweet bereav'd
   His fierceness of the fierce intent it brought:
   That space the Evil one abstracted stood
   From his own evil, and for the time remaind
   Stupidly good, of enmitie disarm'd,
   Of guile, of hate, of envie, of revenge;
   But the hot Hell that alwayes in him burnes,
   Though in mid Heav'n, soon ended his delight,
   And tortures him now more, the more he sees
   Of pleasure not for him ordain'd: then soon                         470
   Fierce hate he recollects, and all his thoughts
   Of mischief, gratulating, thus excites.
   Thoughts, whither have he led me, with what sweet
   Compulsion thus transported to forget
   What hither brought us, hate, not love, nor hope
   Of Paradise for Hell, hope here to taste
   Of pleasure, but all pleasure to destroy,
   Save what is in destroying, other joy
   To me is lost. Then let me not let pass
   Occasion which now smiles, behold alone                             480
   The Woman, opportune to all attempts,
   Her Husband, for I view far round, not nigh,
   Whose higher intellectual more I shun,
   And strength, of courage hautie, and of limb
   Heroic built, though of terrestrial mould,
   Foe not informidable, exempt from wound,
   I not; so much hath Hell debas'd, and paine
   Infeebl'd me, to what I was in Heav'n.
   Shee fair, divinely fair, fit Love for Gods,
   Not terrible, though terrour be in Love                             490
   And beautie, not approacht by stronger hate,
   Hate stronger, under shew of Love well feign'd,
   The way which to her ruin now I tend.
   So spake the Enemie of Mankind, enclos'd
   In Serpent, Inmate bad, and toward Eve
   Address'd his way, not with indented wave,
   Prone on the ground, as since, but on his reare,
   Circular base of rising foulds, that tour'd
   Fould above fould a surging Maze, his Head
   Crested aloft, and Carbuncle his Eyes;                              500
   With burnisht Neck of verdant Gold, erect
   Amidst his circling Spires, that on the grass
   Floted redundant: pleasing was his shape,
   And lovely, never since of Serpent kind
   Lovelier, not those that in Illyria chang'd
   Hermione and Cadmus, or the God
   In Epidaurus; nor to which transformd
   Ammonian Jove, or Capitoline was seen,
   Hee with Olympias, this with her who bore
   Scipio the highth of Rome. With tract oblique                       510
   At first, as one who sought access, but feard
   To interrupt, side-long he works his way.
   As when a Ship by skilful Stearsman wrought
   Nigh Rivers mouth or Foreland, where the Wind
   Veres oft, as oft so steers, and shifts her Saile;
   So varied hee, and of his tortuous Traine
   Curld many a wanton wreath in sight of Eve,
   To lure her Eye; shee busied heard the sound
   Of rusling Leaves, but minded not, as us'd
   To such disport before her through the Field,                       520
   From every Beast, more duteous at her call,
   Then at Circean call the Herd disguis'd.
   Hee boulder now, uncall'd before her stood;
   But as in gaze admiring: Oft he bowd
   His turret Crest, and sleek enamel'd Neck,
   Fawning, and lick'd the ground whereon she trod.
   His gentle dumb expression turnd at length
   The Eye of Eve to mark his play; he glad
   Of her attention gaind, with Serpent Tongue
   Organic, or impulse of vocal Air,                                   530
   His fraudulent temptation thus began.
   Wonder not, sovran Mistress, if perhaps
   Thou canst, who art sole Wonder, much less arm
   Thy looks, the Heav'n of mildness, with disdain,
   Displeas'd that I approach thee thus, and gaze
   Insatiate, I thus single; nor have feard
   Thy awful brow, more awful thus retir'd.
   Fairest resemblance of thy Maker faire,
   Thee all things living gaze on, all things thine
   By gift, and thy Celestial Beautie adore                            540
   With ravishment beheld, there best beheld
   Where universally admir'd; but here
   In this enclosure wild, these Beasts among,
   Beholders rude, and shallow to discerne
   Half what in thee is fair, one man except,
   Who sees thee? (and what is one?) who shouldst be seen
   A Goddess among Gods, ador'd and serv'd
   By Angels numberless, thy daily Train.
   So gloz'd the Tempter, and his Proem tun'd;
   Into the Heart of Eve his words made way,                           550
   Though at the voice much marveling; at length
   Not unamaz'd she thus in answer spake.
   What may this mean? Language of Man pronounc't
   By Tongue of Brute, and human sense exprest?
   The first at lest of these I thought deni'd
   To Beasts, whom God on their Creation-Day
   Created mute to all articulat sound;
   The latter I demurre, for in thir looks
   Much reason, and in thir actions oft appeers.
   Thee, Serpent, suttlest beast of all the field                      560
   I knew, but not with human voice endu'd;
   Redouble then this miracle, and say,
   How cam'st thou speakable of mute, and how
   To me so friendly grown above the rest
   Of brutal kind, that daily are in sight?
   Say, for such wonder claims attention due.
   To whom the guileful Tempter thus reply'd.
   Empress of this fair World, resplendent Eve,
   Easie to mee it is to tell thee all
   What thou commandst, and right thou shouldst be obeyd:              570
   I was at first as other Beasts that graze
   The trodden Herb, of abject thoughts and low,
   As was my food, nor aught but food discern'd
   Or Sex, and apprehended nothing high:
   Till on a day roaving the field, I chanc'd
   A goodly Tree farr distant to behold
   Loaden with fruit of fairest colours mixt,
   Ruddie and Gold: I nearer drew to gaze;
   When from the boughes a savorie odour blow'n,
   Grateful to appetite, more pleas'd my sense                         580
   Then smell of sweetest Fenel, or the Teats
   Of Ewe or Goat dropping with Milk at Eevn,
   Unsuckt of Lamb or Kid, that tend thir play.
   To satisfie the sharp desire I had
   Of tasting those fair Apples, I resolv'd
   Not to deferr; hunger and thirst at once,
   Powerful perswaders, quick'nd at the scent
   Of that alluring fruit, urg'd me so keene.
   About the Mossie Trunk I wound me soon,
   For high from ground the branches would require                     590
   Thy utmost reach or Adams: Round the Tree
   All other Beasts that saw, with like desire
   Longing and envying stood, but could not reach.
   Amid the Tree now got, where plentie hung
   Tempting so nigh, to pluck and eat my fill
   I spar'd not, for such pleasure till that hour
   At Feed or Fountain never had I found.
   Sated at length, ere long I might perceave
   Strange alteration in me, to degree
   Of Reason in my inward Powers, and Speech                           600
   Wanted not long, though to this shape retaind.
   Thenceforth to Speculations high or deep
   I turnd my thoughts, and with capacious mind
   Considerd all things visible in Heav'n,
   Or Earth, or Middle, all things fair and good;
   But all that fair and good in thy Divine
   Semblance, and in thy Beauties heav'nly Ray
   United I beheld; no Fair to thine
   Equivalent or second, which compel'd
   Mee thus, though importune perhaps, to come                         610
   And gaze, and worship thee of right declar'd
   Sovran of Creatures, universal Dame.
   So talk'd the spirited sly Snake; and Eve
   Yet more amaz'd unwarie thus reply'd.
   Serpent, thy overpraising leaves in doubt
   The vertue of that Fruit, in thee first prov'd:
   But say, where grows the Tree, from hence how far?
   For many are the Trees of God that grow
   In Paradise, and various, yet unknown
   To us, in such abundance lies our choice,                           620
   As leaves a greater store of Fruit untoucht,
   Still hanging incorruptible, till men
   Grow up to thir provision, and more hands
   Help to disburden Nature of her Bearth.
   To whom the wilie Adder, blithe and glad.
   Empress, the way is readie, and not long,
   Beyond a row of Myrtles, on a Flat,
   Fast by a Fountain, one small Thicket past
   Of blowing Myrrh and Balme; if thou accept
   My conduct, I can bring thee thither soon.                          630
   Lead then, said Eve. Hee leading swiftly rowld
   In tangles, and make intricate seem strait,
   To mischief swift. Hope elevates, and joy
   Bright'ns his Crest, as when a wandring Fire
   Compact of unctuous vapor, which the Night
   Condenses, and the cold invirons round,
   Kindl'd through agitation to a Flame,
   Which oft, they say, some evil Spirit attends,
   Hovering and blazing with delusive Light,
   Misleads th' amaz'd Night-wanderer from his way                     640
   To Boggs and Mires, & oft through Pond or Poole,
   There swallow'd up and lost, from succour farr.
   So glister'd the dire Snake and into fraud
   Led Eve our credulous Mother, to the Tree
   Of prohibition, root of all our woe;
   Which when she saw, thus to her guide she spake.
   Serpent, we might have spar'd our coming hither,
   Fruitless to me, though Fruit be here to excess,
   The credit of whose vertue rest with thee,
   Wondrous indeed, if cause of such effects.                          650
   But of this Tree we may not taste nor touch;
   God so commanded, and left that Command
   Sole Daughter of his voice; the rest, we live
   Law to our selves, our Reason is our Law.
   To whom the Tempter guilefully repli'd.
   Indeed? hath God then said that of the Fruit
   Of all these Garden Trees ye shall not eate,
   Yet Lords declar'd of all in Earth or Aire?
   To whom thus Eve yet sinless. Of the Fruit
   Of each Tree in the Garden we may eate,                             660
   But of the Fruit of this fair Tree amidst
   The Garden, God hath said, Ye shall not eate
   Thereof, nor shall ye touch it, least ye die.
   She scarse had said, though brief, when now more bold
   The Tempter, but with shew of Zeale and Love
   To Man, and indignation at his wrong,
   New part puts on, and as to passion mov'd,
   Fluctuats disturbd, yet comely, and in act
   Rais'd, as of som great matter to begin.
   As when of old som Orator renound                                   670
   In Athens or free Rome, where Eloquence
   Flourishd, since mute, to som great cause addrest,
   Stood in himself collected, while each part,
   Motion, each act won audience ere the tongue,
   Somtimes in highth began, as no delay
   Of Preface brooking through his Zeal of Right.
   So standing, moving, or to highth upgrown
   The Tempter all impassiond thus began.
   O Sacred, Wise, and Wisdom-giving Plant,
   Mother of Science, Now I feel thy Power                             680
   Within me cleere, not onely to discerne
   Things in thir Causes, but to trace the wayes
   Of highest Agents, deemd however wise.
   Queen of this Universe, doe not believe
   Those rigid threats of Death; ye shall not Die:
   How should ye? by the Fruit? it gives you Life
   To Knowledge? By the Threatner, look on mee,
   Mee who have touch'd and tasted, yet both live,
   And life more perfet have attaind then Fate
   Meant mee, by ventring higher then my Lot.                          690
   Shall that be shut to Man, which to the Beast
   Is open? or will God incense his ire
   For such a pretty Trespass, and not praise
   Rather your dauntless vertue, whom the pain
   Of Death denounc't, whatever thing Death be,
   Deterrd not from atchieving what might leade
   To happier life, knowledge of Good and Evil;
   Of good, how just? of evil, if what is evil
   Be real, why not known, since easier shunnd?
   God therefore cannot hurt ye, and be just;                          700
   Not just, not God; not feard then, nor obeid:
   Your feare it self of Death removes the feare.
   Why then was this forbid? Why but to awe,
   Why but to keep ye low and ignorant,
   His worshippers; he knows that in the day
   Ye Eate thereof, your Eyes that seem so cleere,
   Yet are but dim, shall perfetly be then
   Op'nd and cleerd, and ye shall be as Gods,
   Knowing both Good and Evil as they know.
   That ye should be as Gods, since I as Man,                          710
   Internal Man, is but proportion meet,
   I of brute human, yee of human Gods.
   So ye shall die perhaps, by putting off
   Human, to put on Gods, death to be wisht,
   Though threat'nd, which no worse then this can bring
   And what are Gods that Man may not become
   As they, participating God-like food?
   The Gods are first, and that advantage use
   On our belief, that all from them proceeds,
   I question it, for this fair Earth I see,                           720
   Warm'd by the Sun, producing every kind,
   Them nothing: If they all things, who enclos'd
   Knowledge of Good and Evil in this Tree,
   That whoso eats thereof, forthwith attains
   Wisdom without their leave? and wherein lies
   Th' offence, that Man should thus attain to know?
   What can your knowledge hurt him, or this Tree
   Impart against his will if all be his?
   Or is it envie, and can envie dwell
   In heav'nly brests? these, these and many more                      730
   Causes import your need of this fair Fruit.
   Goddess humane, reach then, and freely taste.
   He ended, and his words replete with guile
   Into her heart too easie entrance won:
   Fixt on the Fruit she gaz'd, which to behold
   Might tempt alone, and in her ears the sound
   Yet rung of his perswasive words, impregn'd
   With Reason, to her seeming, and with Truth;
   Meanwhile the hour of Noon drew on, and wak'd
   An eager appetite, rais'd by the smell                              740
   So savorie of that Fruit, which with desire,
   Inclinable now grown to touch or taste,
   Sollicited her longing eye; yet first
   Pausing a while, thus to her self she mus'd.
   Great are thy Vertues, doubtless, best of Fruits,
   Though kept from Man, & worthy to be admir'd,
   Whose taste, too long forborn, at first assay
   Gave elocution to the mute, and taught
   The Tongue not made for Speech to speak thy praise:
   Thy praise hee also who forbids thy use,                            750
   Conceales not from us, naming thee the Tree
   Of Knowledge, knowledge both of good and evil;
   Forbids us then to taste, but his forbidding
   Commends thee more, while it inferrs the good
   By thee communicated, and our want:
   For good unknown, sure is not had, or had
   And yet unknown, is as not had at all.
   In plain then, what forbids he but to know,
   Forbids us good, forbids us to be wise?
   Such prohibitions binde not. But if Death                           760
   Bind us with after-bands, what profits then
   Our inward freedom? In the day we eate
   Of this fair Fruit, our doom is, we shall die.
   How dies the Serpent? hee hath eat'n and lives,
   And knows, and speaks, and reasons, and discernes,
   Irrational till then. For us alone
   Was death invented? or to us deni'd
   This intellectual food, for beasts reserv'd?
   For Beasts it seems: yet that one Beast which first
   Hath tasted, envies not, but brings with joy                        770
   The good befall'n him, Author unsuspect,
   Friendly to man, farr from deceit or guile.
   What fear I then, rather what know to feare
   Under this ignorance of Good and Evil,
   Of God or Death, of Law or Penaltie?
   Here grows the Cure of all, this Fruit Divine,
   Fair to the Eye, inviting to the Taste,
   Of vertue to make wise: what hinders then
   To reach, and feed at once both Bodie and Mind?
   So saying, her rash hand in evil hour                               780
   Forth reaching to the Fruit, she pluck'd, she eat:
   Earth felt the wound, and Nature from her seat
   Sighing through all her Works gave signs of woe,
   That all was lost. Back to the Thicket slunk
   The guiltie Serpent, and well might, for Eve
   Intent now wholly on her taste, naught else
   Regarded, such delight till then, as seemd,
   In Fruit she never tasted, whether true
   Or fansied so, through expectation high
   Of knowledg, nor was God-head from her thought.                     790
   Greedily she ingorg'd without restraint,
   And knew not eating Death: Satiate at length,
   And hight'nd as with Wine, jocond and boon,
   Thus to her self she pleasingly began.
   O Sovran, vertuous, precious of all Trees
   In Paradise, of operation blest
   To Sapience, hitherto obscur'd, infam'd,
   And thy fair Fruit let hang, as to no end
   Created; but henceforth my early care,
   Not without Song, each Morning, and due praise                      800
   Shall tend thee, and the fertil burden ease
   Of thy full branches offer'd free to all;
   Till dieted by thee I grow mature
   In knowledge, as the Gods who all things know;
   Though others envie what they cannot give;
   For had the gift bin theirs, it had not here
   Thus grown. Experience, next to thee I owe,
   Best guide; not following thee, I had remaind
   In ignorance, thou op'nst Wisdoms way,
   And giv'st access, though secret she retire.                        810
   And I perhaps am secret; Heav'n is high,
   High and remote to see from thence distinct
   Each thing on Earth; and other care perhaps
   May have diverted from continual watch
   Our great Forbidder, safe with all his Spies
   About him. But to Adam in what sort
   Shall I appeer? shall I to him make known
   As yet my change, and give him to partake
   Full happiness with mee, or rather not,
   But keep the odds of Knowledge in my power                          820
   Without Copartner? so to add what wants
   In Femal Sex, the more to draw his Love,
   And render me more equal, and perhaps
   A thing not undesireable, somtime
   Superior; for inferior who is free?
   This may be well: but what if God have seen,
   And Death ensue? then I shall be no more,
   And Adam wedded to another Eve,
   Shall live with her enjoying, I extinct;
   A death to think. Confirm'd then I resolve,                         830
   Adam shall share with me in bliss or woe:
   So dear I love him, that with him all deaths
   I could endure; without him live no life.
   So saying, from the Tree her step she turnd,
   But first low Reverence don, as to the power
   That dwelt within, whose presence had infus'd
   Into the plant sciential sap, deriv'd
   From Nectar, drink of Gods. Adam the while
   Waiting desirous her return, had wove
   Of choicest Flours a Garland to adorne                              840
   Her Tresses, and her rural labours crown
   As Reapers oft are wont thir Harvest Queen.
   Great joy he promis'd to his thoughts, and new
   Solace in her return, so long delay'd;
   Yet oft his heart, divine of somthing ill,
   Misgave him; hee the faultring measure felt;
   And forth to meet her went, the way she took
   That Morn when first they parted; by the Tree
   Of Knowledge he must pass, there he her met,
   Scarse from the Tree returning; in her hand                         850
   A bough of fairest fruit that downie smil'd,
   New gatherd, and ambrosial smell diffus'd.
   To him she hasted, in her face excuse
   Came Prologue, and Apologie to prompt,
   Which with bland words at will she thus addrest.
   Hast thou not wonderd, Adam, at my stay?
   Thee I have misst, and thought it long, depriv'd
   Thy presence, agonie of love till now
   Not felt, nor shall be twice, for never more
   Mean I to trie, what rash untri'd I sought,                         860
   The paine of absence from thy sight. But strange
   Hath bin the cause, and wonderful to heare:
   This Tree is not as we are told, a Tree
   Of danger tasted, nor to evil unknown
   Op'ning the way, but of Divine effect
   To open Eyes, and make them Gods who taste;
   And hath bin tasted such; the Serpent wise,
   Or not restraind as wee, or not obeying,
   Hath eat'n of the fruit, and is become,
   Not dead, as we are threatn'd, but thenceforth                      870
   Endu'd with human voice and human sense,
   Reasoning to admiration, and with mee
   Perswasively hath so prevaild, that I
   Have also tasted, and have also found
   Th' effects to correspond, opener mine Eyes,
   Dimm erst, dilated Spirits, ampler Heart,
   And growing up to Godhead; which for thee
   Chiefly I sought, without thee can despise.
   For bliss, as thou hast part, to me is bliss,
   Tedious, unshar'd with thee, and odious soon.                       880
   Thou therefore also taste, that equal Lot
   May joyne us, equal Joy, as equal Love;
   Least thou not tasting, different degree
   Disjoyne us, and I then too late renounce
   Deitie for thee, when Fate will not permit.
   Thus Eve with Countnance blithe her storie told;
   But in her Cheek distemper flushing glowd.
   On th' other side, Adam, soon as he heard
   The fatal Trespass don by Eve, amaz'd,
   Astonied stood and Blank, while horror chill                        890
   Ran through his veins, and all his joynts relax'd;
   From his slack hand the Garland wreath'd for Eve
   Down drop'd, and all the faded Roses shed:
   Speechless he stood and pale, till thus at length
   First to himself he inward silence broke.
   O fairest of Creation, last and best
   Of all Gods Works, Creature in whom excell'd
   Whatever can to sight or thought be found,
   Holy, divine, good, amiable, or sweet!
   How art thou lost, how on a sudden lost,                            900
   Defac't, deflourd, and now to Death devote?
   Rather how hast thou yeelded to transgress
   The strict forbiddance, how to violate
   The sacred Fruit forbidd'n! som cursed fraud
   Of Enemie hath beguil'd thee, yet unknown,
   And mee with thee hath ruind, for with thee
   Certain my resolution is to Die;
   How can I live without thee, how forgoe
   Thy sweet Converse and Love so dearly joyn'd,
   To live again in these wilde Woods forlorn?                         910
   Should God create another Eve, and I
   Another Rib afford, yet loss of thee
   Would never from my heart; no no, I feel
   The Link of Nature draw me: Flesh of Flesh,
   Bone of my Bone thou art, and from thy State
   Mine never shall be parted, bliss or woe.
   So having said, as one from sad dismay
   Recomforted, and after thoughts disturbd
   Submitting to what seemd remediless,
   Thus in calme mood his Words to Eve he turnd.                       920
   Bold deed thou hast presum'd, adventrous Eve,
   And peril great provok't, who thus hast dar'd
   Had it bin onely coveting to Eye
   That sacred Fruit, sacred to abstinence,
   Much more to taste it under banne to touch.
   But past who can recall, or don undoe?
   Not God omnipotent, nor Fate, yet so
   Perhaps thou shalt not Die, perhaps the Fact
   Is not so hainous now, foretasted Fruit,
   Profan'd first by the Serpent, by him first                         930
   Made common and unhallowd: ere our taste
   Nor yet on him found deadly; he yet lives,
   Lives, as thou saidst, and gaines to live as Man
   Higher degree of Life, inducement strong
   To us, as likely tasting to attaine
   Proportional ascent, which cannot be
   But to be Gods, or Angels Demi-gods.
   Nor can I think that God, Creator wise,
   Though threatning, will in earnest so destroy
   Us his prime Creatures, dignifi'd so high,                          940
   Set over all his Works, which in our Fall,
   For us created, needs with us must faile,
   Dependent made; so God shall uncreate,
   Be frustrate, do, undo, and labour loose,
   Not well conceav'd of God, who though his Power
   Creation could repeate, yet would be loath
   Us to abolish, least the Adversary
   Triumph and say; Fickle their State whom God
   Most Favors, who can please him long? Mee first
   He ruind, now Mankind; whom will he next?                           950
   Matter of scorne, not to be given the Foe.
   However I with thee have fixt my Lot,
   Certain to undergoe like doom, if Death
   Consort with thee, Death is to mee as Life;
   So forcible within my heart I feel
   The Bond of Nature draw me to my owne,
   My own in thee, for what thou art is mine;
   Our State cannot be severd, we are one,
   One Flesh; to loose thee were to loose my self.
   So Adam, and thus Eve to him repli'd.                               960
   O glorious trial of exceeding Love,
   Illustrious evidence, example high!
   Ingaging me to emulate, but short
   Of thy perfection, how shall I attaine,
   Adam, from whose deare side I boast me sprung,
   And gladly of our Union heare thee speak,
   One Heart, one Soul in both; whereof good prooff
   This day affords, declaring thee resolvd,
   Rather then Death or aught then Death more dread
   Shall separate us, linkt in Love so deare,                          970
   To undergoe with mee one Guilt, one Crime,
   If any be, of tasting this fair Fruit,
   Whose vertue, for of good still good proceeds,
   Direct, or by occasion hath presented
   This happie trial of thy Love, which else
   So eminently never had bin known.
   Were it I thought Death menac't would ensue
   This my attempt, I would sustain alone
   The worst, and not perswade thee, rather die
   Deserted, then oblige thee with a fact                              980
   Pernicious to thy Peace, chiefly assur'd
   Remarkably so late of thy so true,
   So faithful Love unequald; but I feel
   Farr otherwise th' event, not Death, but Life
   Augmented, op'nd Eyes, new Hopes, new Joyes,
   Taste so Divine, that what of sweet before
   Hath toucht my sense, flat seems to this, and harsh.
   On my experience, Adam, freely taste,
   And fear of Death deliver to the Windes.
   So saying, she embrac'd him, and for joy                            990
   Tenderly wept, much won that he his Love
   Had so enobl'd, as of choice to incurr
   Divine displeasure for her sake, or Death.
   In recompence (for such compliance bad
   Such recompence best merits) from the bough
   She gave him of that fair enticing Fruit
   With liberal hand: he scrupl'd not to eat
   Against his better knowledge, not deceav'd,
   But fondly overcome with Femal charm.
   Earth trembl'd from her entrails, as again                         1000
   In pangs, and Nature gave a second groan,
   Skie lowr'd, and muttering Thunder, som sad drops
   Wept at compleating of the mortal Sin
   Original; while Adam took no thought,
   Eating his fill, nor Eve to iterate
   Her former trespass fear'd, the more to soothe
   Him with her lov'd societie, that now
   As with new Wine intoxicated both
   They swim in mirth, and fansie that they feel
   Divinitie within them breeding wings                               1010
   Wherewith to scorn the Earth: but that false Fruit
   Farr other operation first displaid,
   Carnal desire enflaming, hee on Eve
   Began to cast lascivious Eyes, she him
   As wantonly repaid; in Lust they burne:
   Till Adam thus 'gan Eve to dalliance move.
   Eve, now I see thou art exact of taste,
   And elegant, of Sapience no small part,
   Since to each meaning savour we apply,
   And Palate call judicious; I the praise                            1020
   Yeild thee, so well this day thou hast purvey'd.
   Much pleasure we have lost, while we abstain'd
   From this delightful Fruit, nor known till now
   True relish, tasting; if such pleasure be
   In things to us forbidden, it might be wish'd,
   For this one Tree had bin forbidden ten.
   But come, so well refresh't, now let us play,
   As meet is, after such delicious Fare;
   For never did thy Beautie since the day
   I saw thee first and wedded thee, adorn'd                          1030
   With all perfections, so enflame my sense
   With ardor to enjoy thee, fairer now
   Then ever, bountie of this vertuous Tree.
   So said he, and forbore not glance or toy
   Of amorous intent, well understood
   Of Eve, whose Eye darted contagious Fire.
   Her hand he seis'd, and to a shadie bank,
   Thick overhead with verdant roof imbowr'd
   He led her nothing loath; Flours were the Couch,
   Pansies, and Violets, and Asphodel,                                1040
   And Hyacinth, Earths freshest softest lap.
   There they thir fill of Love and Loves disport
   Took largely, of thir mutual guilt the Seale,
   The solace of thir sin, till dewie sleep
   Oppress'd them, wearied with thir amorous play.
   Soon as the force of that fallacious Fruit,
   That with exhilerating vapour bland
   About thir spirits had plaid, and inmost powers
   Made erre, was now exhal'd, and grosser sleep
   Bred of unkindly fumes, with conscious dreams                      1050
   Encumberd, now had left them, up they rose
   As from unrest, and each the other viewing,
   Soon found thir Eyes how op'nd, and thir minds
   How dark'nd; innocence, that as a veile
   Had shadow'd them from knowing ill, was gon,
   Just confidence, and native righteousness,
   And honour from about them, naked left
   To guiltie shame: hee cover'd, but his Robe
   Uncover'd more. So rose the Danite strong
   Herculean Samson from the Harlot-lap                               1060
   Of Philistean Dalilah, and wak'd
   Shorn of his strength, They destitute and bare
   Of all thir vertue: silent, and in face
   Confounded long they sate, as struck'n mute,
   Till Adam, though not less then Eve abasht,
   At length gave utterance to these words constraind.
   O Eve, in evil hour thou didst give eare
   To that false Worm, of whomsoever taught
   To counterfet Mans voice, true in our Fall,
   False in our promis'd Rising; since our Eyes                       1070
   Op'nd we find indeed, and find we know
   Both Good and Evil, Good lost and Evil got,
   Bad Fruit of Knowledge, if this be to know,
   Which leaves us naked thus, of Honour void,
   Of Innocence, of Faith, of Puritie,
   Our wonted Ornaments now soild and staind,
   And in our Faces evident the signes
   Of foul concupiscence; whence evil store;
   Even shame, the last of evils; of the first
   Be sure then. How shall I behold the face                          1080
   Henceforth of God or Angel, earst with joy
   And rapture so oft beheld? those heav'nly shapes
   Will dazle now this earthly, with thir blaze
   Insufferably bright. O might I here
   In solitude live savage, in some glade
   Obscur'd, where highest Woods impenetrable
   To Starr or Sun-light, spread thir umbrage broad,
   And brown as Evening: Cover me ye Pines,
   Ye Cedars, with innumerable boughs
   Hide me, where I may never see them more.                          1090
   But let us now, as in bad plight, devise
   What best may for the present serve to hide
   The Parts of each from other, that seem most
   To shame obnoxious, and unseemliest seen,
   Some Tree whose broad smooth Leaves together sowd,
   And girded on our loyns, may cover round
   Those middle parts, that this new commer, Shame,
   There sit not, and reproach us as unclean.
   So counsel'd hee, and both together went
   Into the thickest Wood, there soon they chose                      1100
   The Figtree, not that kind for Fruit renown'd,
   But such as at this day to Indians known
   In Malabar or Decan spreds her Armes
   Braunching so broad and long, that in the ground
   The bended Twigs take root, and Daughters grow
   About the Mother Tree, a Pillard shade
   High overarch't, and echoing Walks between;
   There oft the Indian Herdsman shunning heate
   Shelters in coole, and tends his pasturing Herds
   At Loopholes cut through thickest shade: Those Leaves              1110
   They gatherd, broad as Amazonian Targe,
   And with what skill they had, together sowd,
   To gird thir waste, vain Covering if to hide
   Thir guilt and dreaded shame; O how unlike
   To that first naked Glorie. Such of late
   Columbus found th' American so girt
   With featherd Cincture, naked else and wilde
   Among the Trees on Iles and woodie Shores.
   Thus fenc't, and as they thought, thir shame in part
   Coverd, but not at rest or ease of Mind,                           1120
   They sate them down to weep, nor onely Teares
   Raind at thir Eyes, but high Winds worse within
   Began to rise, high Passions, Anger, Hate,
   Mistrust, Suspicion, Discord, and shook sore
   Thir inward State of Mind, calme Region once
   And full of Peace, now tost and turbulent:
   For Understanding rul'd not, and the Will
   Heard not her lore, both in subjection now
   To sensual Appetite, who from beneathe
   Usurping over sovran Reason claimd                                 1130
   Superior sway: From thus distemperd brest,
   Adam, estrang'd in look and alterd stile,
   Speech intermitted thus to Eve renewd.
   Would thou hadst heark'nd to my words, & stai'd
   With me, as I besought thee, when that strange
   Desire of wandring this unhappie Morn,
   I know not whence possessd thee; we had then
   Remaind still happie, not as now, despoild
   Of all our good, sham'd, naked, miserable.
   Let none henceforth seek needless cause to approve                 1140
   The Faith they owe; when earnestly they seek
   Such proof, conclude, they then begin to faile.
   To whom soon mov'd with touch of blame thus Eve.
   What words have past thy Lips, Adam severe,
   Imput'st thou that to my default, or will
   Of wandering, as thou call'st it, which who knows
   But might as ill have happ'nd thou being by,
   Or to thy self perhaps: hadst thou bin there,
   Or here th' attempt, thou couldst not have discernd
   Fraud in the Serpent, speaking as he spake;                        1150
   No ground of enmitie between us known,
   Why hee should mean me ill, or seek to harme.
   Was I to have never parted from thy side?
   As good have grown there still a liveless Rib.
   Being as I am, why didst not thou the Head
   Command me absolutely not to go,
   Going into such danger as thou saidst?
   Too facil then thou didst not much gainsay,
   Nay, didst permit, approve, and fair dismiss.
   Hadst thou bin firm and fixt in thy dissent,                       1160
   Neither had I transgress'd, nor thou with mee.
   To whom then first incenst Adam repli'd.
   Is this the Love, is the recompence
   Of mine to thee, ingrateful Eve, exprest
   Immutable when thou wert lost, not I,
   Who might have liv'd and joyd immortal bliss,
   Yet willingly chose rather Death with thee:
   And am I now upbraided, as the cause
   Of thy transgressing? not enough severe,
   It seems, in thy restraint: what could I more?                     1170
   I warn'd thee, I admonish'd thee, foretold
   The danger, and the lurking Enemie
   That lay in wait; beyond this had bin force,
   And force upon free Will hath here no place.
   But confidence then bore thee on, secure
   Either to meet no danger, or to finde
   Matter of glorious trial; and perhaps
   I also err'd in overmuch admiring
   What seemd in thee so perfet, that I thought
   No evil durst attempt thee, but I rue                              1180
   That errour now, which is become my crime,
   And thou th' accuser. Thus it shall befall
   Him who to worth in Women overtrusting
   Lets her Will rule; restraint she will not brook,
   And left to her self, if evil thence ensue,
   Shee first his weak indulgence will accuse.
   Thus they in mutual accusation spent
   The fruitless hours, but neither self-condemning
   And of thir vain contest appeer'd no end.
 
   Notes:
   186 not] nor 1674.
   213 hear] bear 1674.
   394 Likest] likeliest 1674.
   922 hast] hath 1674.
 
   The End Of The Ninth Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK X.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 Mans transgression known, the Guardian Angels forsake Paradise, and
 return up to Heaven to approve thir vigilance, and are approv'd, God
 declaring that The entrance of Satan could not be by them prevented. He
 sends his Son to judge the Transgressors, who descends and gives
 Sentence accordingly; then in pity cloaths them both, and reascends. Sin
 and Death sitting till then at the Gates of Hell by wondrous sympathie
 feeling the success of Satan in this new World, and the sin by Man there
 committed, resolve to sit no longer confin'd in Hell, but to follow
 Satan thir Sire up to the place of Man:  To make the way easier from
 Hell to this World to and fro, they pave a broad Highway or Bridge over
 Chaos, according to the Track that Satan first made; then preparing for
 Earth, they meet him proud of his success returning to Hell; thir mutual
 gratulation. Satan arrives at Pandemonium, in full assembly relates with
 boasting his success against Man; instead of applause is entertained
 with a general hiss by all his audience, transform'd with himself also
 suddenly into Serpents, according to his doom giv'n in Paradise; then
 deluded with a shew of the forbidden Tree springing up before them, they
 greedily reaching to take of the Fruit, chew dust and bitter ashes.The
 proceedings of Sin and Death; God foretels the final Victory of his Son
 over them, and the renewing of all things; but for the present commands
 his Angels to make several alterations in the Heavens and Elements. Adam
 more and more perceiving his fall'n condition heavily bewailes, rejects
 the condolement of Eve; she persists and at length appeases him: then to
 evade the Curse likely to fall on thir Ofspring, proposes to Adam
 violent wayes, which he approves not, but conceiving better hope, puts
 her in mind of the late Promise made them, that her Seed should be
 reveng'd on the Serpent, and exhorts her with him to seek Peace of the
 offended Deity, by repentance and supplication.
 
   Meanwhile the hainous and despightfull act
   Of Satan done in Paradise, and how
   Hee in the Serpent had perverted Eve,
   Her Husband shee, to taste the fatall fruit,
   Was known in Heav'n; for what can scape the Eye
   Of God All-seeing, or deceave his Heart
   Omniscient, who in all things wise and just,
   Hinder'd not Satan to attempt the minde
   Of Man, with strength entire, and free Will arm'd,
   Complete to have discover'd and repulst                              10
   Whatever wiles of Foe or seeming Friend.
   For still they knew, and ought to have still remember'd
   The high Injunction not to taste that Fruit,
   Whoever tempted; which they not obeying,
   Incurr'd, what could they less, the penaltie,
   And manifold in sin, deserv'd to fall.
   Up into Heav'n from Paradise in hast
   Th' Angelic Guards ascended, mute and sad
   For Man, for of his state by this they knew,
   Much wondring how the suttle Fiend had stoln                         20
   Entrance unseen. Soon as th' unwelcome news
   From Earth arriv'd at Heaven Gate, displeas'd
   All were who heard, dim sadness did not spare
   That time Celestial visages, yet mixt
   With pitie, violated not thir bliss.
   About the new-arriv'd, in multitudes
   Th' ethereal People ran, to hear and know
   How all befell: they towards the Throne Supream
   Accountable made haste to make appear
   With righteous plea, thir utmost vigilance,                          30
   And easily approv'd; when the most High
   Eternal Father from his secret Cloud,
   Amidst in Thunder utter'd thus his voice.
   Assembl'd Angels, and ye Powers return'd
   From unsuccessful charge, be not dismaid,
   Nor troubl'd at these tidings from the Earth,
   Which your sincerest care could not prevent,
   Foretold so lately what would come to pass,
   When first this Tempter cross'd the Gulf from Hell.
   I told ye then he should prevail and speed                           40
   On his bad Errand, Man should be seduc't
   And flatter'd out of all, believing lies
   Against his Maker; no Decree of mine
   Concurring to necessitate his Fall,
   Or touch with lightest moment of impulse
   His free Will, to her own inclining left
   In eevn scale. But fall'n he is, and now
   What rests, but that the mortal Sentence pass
   On his transgression, Death denounc't that day,
   Which he presumes already vain and void,                             50
   Because not yet inflicted, as he fear'd,
   By some immediate stroak; but soon shall find
   Forbearance no acquittance ere day end.
   Justice shall not return as bountie scorn'd.
   But whom send I to judge them? whom but thee
   Vicegerent Son, to thee I have transferr'd
   All Judgement, whether in Heav'n, or Earth; or Hell.
   Easie it may be seen that I intend
   Mercie collegue with Justice, sending thee
   Mans Friend, his Mediator, his design'd                              60
   Both Ransom and Redeemer voluntarie,
   And destin'd Man himself to judge Man fall'n.
   So spake the Father, and unfoulding bright
   Toward the right hand his Glorie, on the Son
   Blaz'd forth unclouded Deitie; he full
   Resplendent all his Father manifest
   Express'd, and thus divinely answer'd milde.
   Father Eternal, thine is to decree,
   Mine both in Heav'n and Earth to do thy will
   Supream, that thou in mee thy Son belov'd                            70
   Mayst ever rest well pleas'd. I go to judge
   On Earth these thy transgressors, but thou knowst,
   Whoever judg'd, the worst on mee must light,
   When time shall be, for so I undertook
   Before thee; and not repenting, this obtaine
   Of right, that I may mitigate thir doom
   On me deriv'd, yet I shall temper so
   Justice with Mercie, as may illustrate most
   Them fully satisfied, and thee appease.
   Attendance none shall need, nor Train, where none                    80
   Are to behold the Judgement, but the judg'd,
   Those two; the third best absent is condemn'd,
   Convict by flight, and Rebel to all Law
   Conviction to the Serpent none belongs.
   Thus saying, from his radiant Seat he rose
   Of high collateral glorie: him Thrones and Powers,
   Princedoms, and Dominations ministrant
   Accompanied to Heaven Gate, from whence
   Eden and all the Coast in prospect lay.
   Down he descended strait; the speed of Gods                          90
   Time counts not, though with swiftest minutes wing'd.
   Now was the Sun in Western cadence low
   From Noon, and gentle Aires due at thir hour
   To fan the Earth now wak'd, and usher in
   The Eevning coole when he from wrauth more coole
   Came the mild Judge and Intercessor both
   To sentence Man: the voice of God they heard
   Now walking in the Garden, by soft windes
   Brought to thir Ears, while day declin'd, they heard
   And from his presence hid themselves among                          100
   The thickest Trees, both Man and Wife, till God
   Approaching, thus to Adam call'd aloud.
   Where art thou Adam, wont with joy to meet
   My coming seen far off? I miss thee here,
   Not pleas'd, thus entertaind with solitude,
   Where obvious dutie erewhile appear'd unsaught:
   Or come I less conspicuous, or what change
   Absents thee, or what chance detains? Come forth.
   He came, and with him Eve, more loth, though first
   To offend, discount'nanc't both, and discompos'd;                   110
   Love was not in thir looks, either to God
   Or to each other, but apparent guilt,
   And shame, and perturbation, and despaire,
   Anger, and obstinacie, and hate, and guile.
   Whence Adam faultring long, thus answer'd brief.
   I heard thee in the Garden, and of thy voice
   Affraid, being naked, hid my self. To whom
   The gracious Judge without revile repli'd.
   My voice thou oft hast heard, and hast not fear'd,
   But still rejoyc't, how is it now become                            120
   So dreadful to thee? that thou art naked, who
   Hath told thee? hast thou eaten of the Tree
   Whereof I gave thee charge thou shouldst not eat?
   To whom thus Adam sore beset repli'd.
   O Heav'n! in evil strait this day I stand
   Before my Judge, either to undergoe
   My self the total Crime, or to accuse
   My other self, the partner of my life;
   Whose failing, while her Faith to me remaines,
   I should conceal, and not expose to blame                           130
   By my complaint; but strict necessitie
   Subdues me, and calamitous constraint,
   Least on my head both sin and punishment,
   However insupportable, be all
   Devolv'd; though should I hold my peace, yet thou
   Wouldst easily detect what I conceale.
   This Woman whom thou mad'st to be my help,
   And gav'st me as thy perfet gift, so good,
   So fit, so acceptable, so Divine,
   That from her hand I could suspect no ill,                          140
   And what she did, whatever in it self,
   Her doing seem'd to justifie the deed;
   Shee gave me of the Tree, and I did eate.
   To whom the sovran Presence thus repli'd.
   Was shee thy God, that her thou didst obey
   Before his voice, or was shee made thy guide,
   Superior, or but equal, that to her
   Thou did'st resigne thy Manhood, and the Place
   Wherein God set thee above her made of thee,
   And for thee, whose perfection farr excell'd                        150
   Hers in all real dignitie: Adornd
   She was indeed, and lovely to attract
   Thy Love, not thy Subjection, and her Gifts
   Were such as under Government well seem'd,
   Unseemly to beare rule, which was thy part
   And person, had'st thou known thy self aright.
   So having said, he thus to Eve in few:
   Say Woman, what is this which thou hast done?
   To whom sad Eve with shame nigh overwhelm'd,
   Confessing soon, yet not before her Judge                           160
   Bold or loquacious, thus abasht repli'd.
   The Serpent me beguil'd and I did eate.
   Which when the Lord God heard, without delay
   To Judgement he proceeded on th' accus'd
   Serpent though brute, unable to transferre
   The Guilt on him who made him instrument
   Of mischief, and polluted from the end
   Of his Creation; justly then accurst,
   As vitiated in Nature: more to know
   Concern'd not Man (since he no further knew)                        170
   Nor alter'd his offence; yet God at last
   To Satan first in sin his doom apply'd,
   Though in mysterious terms, judg'd as then best:
   And on the Serpent thus his curse let fall.
   Because thou hast done this, thou art accurst
   Above all Cattel, each Beast of the Field;
   Upon thy Belly groveling thou shalt goe,
   And dust shalt eat all the days of thy Life.
   Between Thee and the Woman I will put
   Enmitie, and between thine and her Seed;                            180
   Her Seed shall bruise thy head, thou bruise his heel.
   So spake this Oracle, then verifi'd
   When Jesus son of Mary second Eve,
   Saw Satan fall like Lightning down from Heav'n,
   Prince of the Aire; then rising from his Grave
   Spoild Principalities and Powers, triumpht
   In open shew, and with ascention bright
   Captivity led captive through the Aire,
   The Realme it self of Satan long usurpt,
   Whom he shall tread at last under our feet;                         190
   Eevn hee who now foretold his fatal bruise,
   And to the Woman thus his Sentence turn'd.
   Thy sorrow I will greatly multiplie
   By thy Conception; Children thou shalt bring
   In sorrow forth, and to thy Husbands will
   Thine shall submit, hee over thee shall rule.
   On Adam last thus judgement he pronounc'd.
   Because thou hast heark'nd to the voice of thy Wife,
   And eaten of the Tree concerning which
   I charg'd thee, saying: Thou shalt not eate thereof,                200
   Curs'd is the ground for thy sake, thou in sorrow
   Shalt eate thereof all the days of thy Life;
   Thornes also and Thistles it shall bring thee forth
   Unbid, and thou shalt eate th' Herb of th' Field,
   In the sweat of thy Face shalt thou eate Bread,
   Till thou return unto the ground, for thou
   Out of the ground wast taken, know thy Birth,
   For dust thou art, and shalt to dust returne.
   So judg'd he Man, both Judge and Saviour sent,
   And th' instant stroke of Death denounc't that day                  210
   Remov'd farr off; then pittying how they stood
   Before him naked to the aire, that now
   Must suffer change, disdain'd not to begin
   Thenceforth the forme of servant to assume,
   As when he wash'd his servants feet, so now
   As Father of his Familie he clad
   Thir nakedness with Skins of Beasts, or slain,
   Or as the Snake with youthful Coate repaid;
   And thought not much to cloath his Enemies:
   Nor hee thir outward onely with the Skins                           220
   Of Beasts, but inward nakedness, much more
   Opprobrious, with his Robe of righteousness,
   Araying cover'd from his Fathers sight.
   To him with swift ascent he up returnd,
   Into his blissful bosom reassum'd
   In glory as of old, to him appeas'd
   All, though all-knowing, what had past with Man
   Recounted, mixing intercession sweet.
   Meanwhile ere thus was sin'd and judg'd on Earth,
   Within the Gates of Hell sate Sin and Death,                        230
   In counterview within the Gates, that now
   Stood open wide, belching outrageous flame
   Farr into Chaos, since the Fiend pass'd through,
   Sin opening, who thus now to Death began.
   O Son, why sit we here each other viewing
   Idlely, while Satan our great Author thrives
   In other Worlds, and happier Seat provides
   For us his ofspring deare? It cannot be
   But that success attends him; if mishap,
   Ere this he had return'd, with fury driv'n                          240
   By his Avenger, since no place like this
   Can fit his punishment, or their revenge.
   Methinks I feel new strength within me rise,
   Wings growing, and Dominion giv'n me large
   Beyond this Deep; whatever drawes me on,
   Or sympathie, or som connatural force
   Powerful at greatest distance to unite
   With secret amity things of like kinde
   By secretest conveyance. Thou my Shade
   Inseparable must with mee along:                                    250
   For Death from Sin no power can separate.
   But least the difficultie of passing back
   Stay his returne perhaps over this Gulfe
   Impassable, impervious, let us try
   Adventrous work, yet to thy power and mine
   Not unagreeable, to found a path
   Over this Maine from Hell to that new World
   Where Satan now prevailes, a Monument
   Of merit high to all th' infernal Host,
   Easing thir passage hence, for intercourse,                         260
   Or transmigration, as thir lot shall lead.
   Nor can I miss the way, so strongly drawn
   By this new felt attraction and instinct.
   Whom thus the meager Shadow answerd soon.
   Goe whither Fate and inclination strong
   Leads thee, I shall not lag behinde, nor erre
   The way, thou leading, such a sent I draw
   Of carnage, prey innumerable, and taste
   The savour of Death from all things there that live:
   Nor shall I to the work thou enterprisest                           270
   Be wanting, but afford thee equal aid.
   So saying, with delight he snuff'd the smell
   Of mortal change on Earth. As when a flock
   Of ravenous Fowl, though many a League remote,
   Against the day of Battel, to a Field,
   Where Armies lie encampt, come flying, lur'd
   With sent of living Carcasses design'd
   For death, the following day, in bloodie fight.
   So sented the grim Feature, and upturn'd
   His Nostril wide into the murkie Air,                               280
   Sagacious of his Quarrey from so farr.
   Then Both from out Hell Gates into the waste
   Wide Anarchie of Chaos damp and dark
   Flew divers, & with Power (thir Power was great)
   Hovering upon the Waters; what they met
   Solid or slimie, as in raging Sea
   Tost up and down, together crowded drove
   From each side shoaling towards the mouth of Hell.
   As when two Polar Winds blowing adverse
   Upon the Cronian Sea, together drive                                290
   Mountains of Ice, that stop th' imagin'd way
   Beyond Petsora Eastward, to the rich
   Cathaian Coast. The aggregated Soyle
   Death with his Mace petrific, cold and dry,
   As with a Trident smote, and fix't as firm
   As Delos floating once; the rest his look
   Bound with Gorgonian rigor not to move,
   And with Asphaltic slime; broad as the Gate,
   Deep to the Roots of Hell the gather'd beach
   They fasten'd, and the Mole immense wraught on                      300
   Over the foaming deep high Archt, a Bridge
   Of length prodigious joyning to the Wall
   Immoveable of this now fenceless world
   Forfeit to Death; from hence a passage broad,
   Smooth, easie, inoffensive down to Hell.
   So, if great things to small may be compar'd,
   Xerxes, the Libertie of Greece to yoke,
   From Susa his Memnonian Palace high
   Came to the Sea, and over Hellespont
   Bridging his way, Europe with Asia joyn'd,                          310
   And scourg'd with many a stroak th' indignant waves.
   Now had they brought the work by wondrous Art
   Pontifical, a ridge of pendent Rock
   Over the vext Abyss, following the track
   Of Satan, to the selfsame place where hee
   First lighted from his Wing, and landed safe
   From out of Chaos to the outside bare
   Of this round World: with Pinns of Adamant
   And Chains they made all fast, too fast they made
   And durable; and now in little space                                320
   The Confines met of Empyrean Heav'n
   And of this World, and on the left hand Hell
   With long reach interpos'd; three sev'ral wayes
   In sight, to each of these three places led.
   And now thir way to Earth they had descri'd,
   To Paradise first tending, when behold
   Satan in likeness of an Angel bright
   Betwixt the Centaure and the Scorpion stearing
   His Zenith, while the Sun in Aries rose:
   Disguis'd he came, but those his Children dear                      330
   Thir Parent soon discern'd, though in disguise.
   Hee, after Eve seduc't, unminded slunk
   Into the Wood fast by, and changing shape
   To observe the sequel, saw his guileful act
   By Eve, though all unweeting, seconded
   Upon her Husband, saw thir shame that sought
   Vain covertures; but when he saw descend
   The Son of God to judge them, terrifi'd
   Hee fled, not hoping to escape, but shun
   The present, fearing guiltie what his wrauth                        340
   Might suddenly inflict; that past, return'd
   By Night, and listning where the hapless Paire
   Sate in thir sad discourse, and various plaint,
   Thence gatherd his own doom, which understood
   Not instant, but of future time. With joy
   And tidings fraught, to Hell he now return'd,
   And at the brink of Chaos, neer the foot
   Of this new wondrous Pontifice, unhop't
   Met who to meet him came, his Ofspring dear.
   Great joy was at thir meeting, and at sight                         350
   Of that stupendious Bridge his joy encreas'd.
   Long hee admiring stood, till Sin, his faire
   Inchanting Daughter, thus the silence broke.
   O Parent, these are thy magnific deeds,
   Thy Trophies, which thou view'st as not thine own,
   Thou art thir Author and prime Architect:
   For I no sooner in my Heart divin'd,
   My Heart, which by a secret harmonie
   Still moves with thine, joyn'd in connexion sweet,
   That thou on Earth hadst prosper'd, which thy looks                 360
   Now also evidence, but straight I felt
   Though distant from thee Worlds between, yet felt
   That I must after thee with this thy Son;
   Such fatal consequence unites us three:
   Hell could no longer hold us in her bounds,
   Nor this unvoyageable Gulf obscure
   Detain from following thy illustrious track.
   Thou hast atchiev'd our libertie, confin'd
   Within Hell Gates till now, thou us impow'rd
   To fortifie thus farr, and overlay                                  370
   With this portentous Bridge the dark Abyss.
   Thine now is all this World, thy vertue hath won
   What thy hands builded not, thy Wisdom gain'd
   With odds what Warr hath lost, and fully aveng'd
   Our foile in Heav'n; here thou shalt Monarch reign,
   There didst not; there let him still Victor sway,
   As Battel hath adjudg'd, from this new World
   Retiring, by his own doom alienated,
   And henceforth Monarchie with thee divide
   Of all things, parted by th' Empyreal bounds,                       380
   His Quadrature, from thy Orbicular World,
   Or trie thee now more dang'rous to his Throne.
   Whom thus the Prince of Darkness answerd glad.
   Fair Daughter, and thou Son and Grandchild both,
   High proof ye now have giv'n to be the Race
   Of Satan (for I glorie in the name,
   Antagonist of Heav'ns Almightie King)
   Amply have merited of me, of all
   Th' Infernal Empire, that so neer Heav'ns dore
   Triumphal with triumphal act have met,                              390
   Mine with this glorious Work, & made one Realm
   Hell and this World, one Realm, one Continent
   Of easie thorough-fare. Therefore while I
   Descend through Darkness, on your Rode with ease
   To my associate Powers, them to acquaint
   With these successes, and with them rejoyce,
   You two this way, among those numerous Orbs
   All yours, right down to Paradise descend;
   There dwell & Reign in bliss, thence on the Earth
   Dominion exercise and in the Aire,                                  400
   Chiefly on Man, sole Lord of all declar'd,
   Him first make sure your thrall, and lastly kill.
   My Substitutes I send ye, and Create
   Plenipotent on Earth, of matchless might
   Issuing from mee: on your joynt vigor now
   My hold of this new Kingdom all depends,
   Through Sin to Death expos'd by my exploit.
   If your joynt power prevaile, th' affaires of Hell
   No detriment need feare, goe and be strong.
   So saying he dismiss'd them, they with speed                        410
   Thir course through thickest Constellations held
   Spreading thir bane; the blasted Starrs lookt wan,
   And Planets, Planet-strook, real Eclips
   Then sufferd. Th' other way Satan went down
   The Causey to Hell Gate; on either side
   Disparted Chaos over built exclaimd,
   And with rebounding surge the barrs assaild,
   That scorn'd his indignation: through the Gate,
   Wide open and unguarded, Satan pass'd,
   And all about found desolate; for those                             420
   Appointed to sit there, had left thir charge,
   Flown to the upper World; the rest were all
   Farr to the inland retir'd, about the walls
   Of Pandemonium, Citie and proud seate
   Of Lucifer, so by allusion calld,
   Of that bright Starr to Satan paragond.
   There kept thir Watch the Legions, while the Grand
   In Council sate, sollicitous what chance
   Might intercept thir Emperour sent, so hee
   Departing gave command, and they observ'd.                          430
   As when the Tartar from his Russian Foe
   By Astracan over the Snowie Plaines
   Retires, or Bactrian Sophi from the hornes
   Of Turkish Crescent, leaves all waste beyond
   The Realme of Aladule, in his retreate
   To Tauris or Casbeen. So these the late
   Heav'n-banisht Host, left desert utmost Hell
   Many a dark League, reduc't in careful Watch
   Round thir Metropolis, and now expecting
   Each hour their great adventurer from the search                    440
   Of Forrein Worlds: he through the midst unmarkt,
   In shew plebeian Angel militant
   Of lowest order, past; and from the dore
   Of that Plutonian Hall, invisible
   Ascended his high Throne, which under state
   Of richest texture spred, at th' upper end
   Was plac't in regal lustre. Down a while
   He sate, and round about him saw unseen:
   At last as from a Cloud his fulgent head
   And shape Starr bright appeer'd, or brighter, clad                  450
   With what permissive glory since his fall
   Was left him, or false glitter: All amaz'd
   At that so sudden blaze the Stygian throng
   Bent thir aspect, and whom they wish'd beheld,
   Thir mighty Chief returnd: loud was th' acclaime:
   Forth rush'd in haste the great consulting Peers,
   Rais'd from thir dark Divan, and with like joy
   Congratulant approach'd him, who with hand
   Silence, and with these words attention won.
   Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Vertues, Powers,                  460
   For in possession such, not onely of right,
   I call ye and declare ye now, returnd
   Successful beyond hope, to lead ye forth
   Triumphant out of this infernal Pit
   Abominable, accurst, the house of woe,
   And Dungeon of our Tyrant: Now possess,
   As Lords, a spacious World, to our native Heaven
   Little inferiour, by my adventure hard
   With peril great atchiev'd. Long were to tell
   What I have don, what sufferd, with what paine                      470
   Voyag'd the unreal, vast, unbounded deep
   Of horrible confusion, over which
   By Sin and Death a broad way now is pav'd
   To expedite your glorious march; but I
   Toild out my uncouth passage, forc't to ride
   Th' untractable Abysse, plung'd in the womb
   Of unoriginal Night and Chaos wilde,
   That jealous of thir secrets fiercely oppos'd
   My journey strange, with clamorous uproare
   Protesting Fate supreame; thence how I found                        480
   The new created World, which fame in Heav'n
   Long had foretold, a Fabrick wonderful
   Of absolute perfection, therein Man
   Plac't in a Paradise, by our exile
   Made happie: Him by fraud I have seduc'd
   From his Creator, and the more to increase
   Your wonder, with an Apple; he thereat
   Offended, worth your laughter, hath giv'n up
   Both his beloved Man and all his World,
   To Sin and Death a prey, and so to us,                              490
   Without our hazard, labour or allarme,
   To range in, and to dwell, and over Man
   To rule, as over all he should have rul'd.
   True is, mee also he hath judg'd, or rather
   Mee not, but the brute Serpent in whose shape
   Man I deceav'd: that which to mee belongs,
   Is enmity, which he will put between
   Mee and Mankinde; I am to bruise his heel;
   His Seed, when is not set, shall bruise my head:
   A World who would not purchase with a bruise,                       500
   Or much more grievous pain? Ye have th' account
   Of my performance: What remaines, ye Gods,
   But up and enter now into full bliss.
   So having said, a while he stood, expecting
   Thir universal shout and high applause
   To fill his eare, when contrary he hears
   On all sides, from innumerable tongues
   A dismal universal hiss, the sound
   Of public scorn; he wonderd, but not long
   Had leasure, wondring at himself now more;                          510
   His Visage drawn he felt to sharp and spare,
   His Armes clung to his Ribs, his Leggs entwining
   Each other, till supplanted down he fell
   A monstrous Serpent on his Belly prone,
   Reluctant, but in vaine, a greater power
   Now rul'd him, punisht in the shape he sin'd,
   According to his doom: he would have spoke,
   But hiss for hiss returnd with forked tongue
   To forked tongue, for now were all transform'd
   Alike, to Serpents all as accessories                               520
   To his bold Riot: dreadful was the din
   Of hissing through the Hall, thick swarming now
   With complicated monsters, head and taile,
   Scorpion and Asp, and Amphisbaena dire,
   Cerastes hornd, Hydrus, and Ellops drear,
   And Dipsas (Not so thick swarm'd once the Soil
   Bedropt with blood of Gorgon, or the Isle
   Ophiusa) but still greatest hee the midst,
   Now Dragon grown, larger then whom the Sun
   Ingenderd in the Pythian Vale on slime,                             530
   Huge Python, and his Power no less he seem'd
   Above the rest still to retain; they all
   Him follow'd issuing forth to th' open Field,
   Where all yet left of that revolted Rout
   Heav'n-fall'n, in station stood or just array,
   Sublime with expectation when to see
   In Triumph issuing forth thir glorious Chief;
   They saw, but other sight instead, a crowd
   Of ugly Serpents; horror on them fell,
   And horrid sympathie; for what they saw,                            540
   They felt themselvs now changing; down thir arms,
   Down fell both Spear and Shield, down they as fast,
   And the dire hiss renew'd, and the dire form
   Catcht by Contagion, like in punishment,
   As in thir crime. Thus was th' applause they meant,
   Turnd to exploding hiss, triumph to shame
   Cast on themselves from thir own mouths. There stood
   A Grove hard by, sprung up with this thir change,
   His will who reigns above, to aggravate
   Thir penance, laden with fair Fruit, like that                      550
   Which grew in Paradise, the bait of Eve
   Us'd by the Tempter: on that prospect strange
   Thir earnest eyes they fix'd, imagining
   For one forbidden Tree a multitude
   Now ris'n, to work them furder woe or shame;
   Yet parcht with scalding thurst and hunger fierce,
   Though to delude them sent, could not abstain,
   But on they rould in heaps, and up the Trees
   Climbing, sat thicker then the snakie locks
   That curld Megaera: greedily they pluck'd                           560
   The Frutage fair to sight, like that which grew
   Neer that bituminous Lake where Sodom flam'd;
   This more delusive, not the touch, but taste
   Deceav'd; they fondly thinking to allay
   Thir appetite with gust, instead of Fruit
   Chewd bitter Ashes, which th' offended taste
   With spattering noise rejected: oft they assayd,
   Hunger and thirst constraining, drugd as oft,
   With hatefullest disrelish writh'd thir jaws
   With soot and cinders fill'd; so oft they fell                      570
   Into the same illusion, not as Man
   Whom they triumph'd once lapst. Thus were they plagu'd
   And worn with Famin, long and ceasless hiss,
   Till thir lost shape, permitted, they resum'd,
   Yearly enjoynd, some say, to undergo
   This annual humbling certain number'd days,
   To dash thir pride, and joy for Man seduc't.
   However some tradition they dispers'd
   Among the Heathen of thir purchase got,
   And Fabl'd how the Serpent, whom they calld                         580
   Ophion with Eurynome, the wide-
   Encroaching Eve perhaps, had first the rule
   Of high Olympus, thence by Saturn driv'n
   And Ops, ere yet Dictaean Jove was born.
   Mean while in Paradise the hellish pair
   Too soon arriv'd, Sin there in power before,
   Once actual, now in body, and to dwell
   Habitual habitant; behind her Death
   Close following pace for pace, not mounted yet
   On his pale Horse: to whom Sin thus began.                          590
   Second of Satan sprung, all conquering Death,
   What thinkst thou of our Empire now, though earnd
   With travail difficult, not better farr
   Then stil at Hels dark threshold to have sate watch,
   Unnam'd, undreaded, and thy self half starv'd?
   Whom thus the Sin-born Monster answerd soon.
   To mee, who with eternal Famin pine,
   Alike is Hell, or Paradise, or Heaven,
   There best, where most with ravin I may meet;
   Which here, though plenteous, all too little seems                  600
   To stuff this Maw, this vast unhide-bound Corps.
   To whom th' incestuous Mother thus repli'd.
   Thou therefore on these Herbs, and Fruits, & Flours
   Feed first, on each Beast next, and Fish, and Fowle,
   No homely morsels, and whatever thing
   The Sithe of Time mowes down, devour unspar'd,
   Till I in Man residing through the Race,
   His thoughts, his looks, words, actions all infect,
   And season him thy last and sweetest prey.
   This said, they both betook them several wayes,                     610
   Both to destroy, or unimmortal make
   All kinds, and for destruction to mature
   Sooner or later; which th' Almightie seeing,
   From his transcendent Seat the Saints among,
   To those bright Orders utterd thus his voice.
   See with what heat these Dogs of Hell advance
   To waste and havoc yonder World, which I
   So fair and good created, and had still
   Kept in that state, had not the folly of Man
   Let in these wastful Furies, who impute                             620
   Folly to mee, so doth the Prince of Hell
   And his Adherents, that with so much ease
   I suffer them to enter and possess
   A place so heav'nly, and conniving seem
   To gratifie my scornful Enemies,
   That laugh, as if transported with some fit
   Of Passion, I to them had quitted all,
   At random yeilded up to their misrule;
   And know not that I call'd and drew them thither
   My Hell-hounds, to lick up the draff and filth                      630
   Which mans polluting Sin with taint hath shed
   On what was pure, till cramm'd and gorg'd, nigh burst
   With suckt and glutted offal, at one fling
   Of thy victorious Arm, well-pleasing Son,
   Both Sin, and Death, and yawning Grave at last
   Through Chaos hurld, obstruct the mouth of Hell
   For ever, and seal up his ravenous Jawes.
   Then Heav'n and Earth renewd shall be made pure
   To sanctitie that shall receive no staine:
   Till then the Curse pronounc't on both precedes.                    640
   Hee ended, and the heav'nly Audience loud
   Sung Halleluia, as the sound of Seas,
   Through multitude that sung: Just are thy ways,
   Righteous are thy Decrees on all thy Works;
   Who can extenuate thee? Next, to the Son,
   Destin'd restorer of Mankind, by whom
   New Heav'n and Earth shall to the Ages rise,
   Or down from Heav'n descend. Such was thir song,
   While the Creator calling forth by name
   His mightie Angels gave them several charge,                        650
   As sorted best with present things. The Sun
   Had first his precept so to move, so shine,
   As might affect the Earth with cold and heat
   Scarce tollerable, and from the North to call
   Decrepit Winter, from the South to bring
   Solstitial summers heat. To the blanc Moone
   Her office they prescrib'd, to th' other five
   Thir planetarie motions and aspects
   In Sextile, Square, and Trine, and Opposite,
   Of noxious efficacie, and when to joyne                             660
   In Synod unbenigne, and taught the fixt
   Thir influence malignant when to showre,
   Which of them rising with the Sun, or falling,
   Should prove tempestuous: To the Winds they set
   Thir corners, when with bluster to confound
   Sea, Aire, and Shoar, the Thunder when to rowle
   With terror through the dark Aereal Hall.
   Some say he bid his Angels turne ascanse
   The Poles of Earth twice ten degrees and more
   From the Suns Axle; they with labour push'd                         670
   Oblique the Centric Globe: Som say the Sun
   Was bid turn Reines from th' Equinoctial Rode
   Like distant breadth to Taurus with the Seav'n
   Atlantick Sisters, and the Spartan Twins
   Up to the Tropic Crab; thence down amaine
   By Leo and the Virgin and the Scales,
   As deep as Capricorne, to bring in change
   Of Seasons to each Clime; else had the Spring
   Perpetual smil'd on Earth with vernant Flours,
   Equal in Days and Nights, except to those                           680
   Beyond the Polar Circles; to them Day
   Had unbenighted shon, while the low Sun
   To recompence his distance, in thir sight
   Had rounded still th' Horizon, and not known
   Or East or West, which had forbid the Snow
   From cold Estotiland, and South as farr
   Beneath Magellan. At that tasted Fruit
   The Sun, as from Thyestean Banquet, turn'd
   His course intended; else how had the World
   Inhabited, though sinless, more then now,                           690
   Avoided pinching cold and scorching heate?
   These changes in the Heav'ns, though slow, produc'd
   Like change on Sea and Land, sideral blast,
   Vapour, and Mist, and Exhalation hot,
   Corrupt and Pestilent: Now from the North
   Of Norumbega, and the Samoed shoar
   Bursting thir brazen Dungeon, armd with ice
   And snow and haile and stormie gust and flaw,
   Boreas and Caecias and Argestes loud
   And Thrascias rend the Woods and Seas upturn;                       700
   With adverse blast up-turns them from the South
   Notus and Afer black with thundrous Clouds
   From Serraliona; thwart of these as fierce
   Forth rush the Levant and the Ponent Windes
   Eurus and Zephir with thir lateral noise,
   Sirocco, and Libecchio. Thus began
   Outrage from liveless things; but Discord first
   Daughter of Sin, among th' irrational,
   Death introduc'd through fierce antipathie:
   Beast now with Beast gan war, & Fowle with Fowle,                   710
   And Fish with Fish; to graze the Herb all leaving,
   Devourd each other; nor stood much in awe
   Of Man, but fled him, or with count'nance grim
   Glar'd on him passing: these were from without
   The growing miseries, which Adam saw
   Alreadie in part, though hid in gloomiest shade,
   To sorrow abandond, but worse felt within,
   And in a troubl'd Sea of passion tost,
   Thus to disburd'n sought with sad complaint.
   O miserable of happie! is this the end                              720
   Of this new glorious World, and mee so late
   The Glory of that Glory, who now becom
   Accurst of blessed, hide me from the face
   Of God, whom to behold was then my highth
   Of happiness: yet well, if here would end
   The miserie, I deserv'd it, and would beare
   My own deservings; but this will not serve;
   All that I eate or drink, or shall beget,
   Is propagated curse. O voice once heard
   Delightfully, Encrease And Multiply,                                730
   Now death to heare! for what can I encrease
   Or multiplie, but curses on my head?
   Who of all Ages to succeed, but feeling
   The evil on him brought by me, will curse
   My Head, Ill fare our Ancestor impure,
   For this we may thank Adam; but his thanks
   Shall be the execration; so besides
   Mine own that bide upon me, all from mee
   Shall with a fierce reflux on mee redound,
   On mee as on thir natural center light                              740
   Heavie, though in thir place. O fleeting joyes
   Of Paradise, deare bought with lasting woes!
   Did I request thee, Maker, from my Clay
   To mould me Man, did I sollicite thee
   From darkness to promote me, or here place
   In this delicious Garden? as my Will
   Concurd not to my being, it were but right
   And equal to reduce me to my dust,
   Desirous to resigne, and render back
   All I receav'd, unable to performe                                  750
   Thy terms too hard, by which I was to hold
   The good I sought not. To the loss of that,
   Sufficient penaltie, why hast thou added
   The sense of endless woes? inexplicable
   Thy Justice seems; yet to say truth, too late,
   I thus contest; then should have been refusd
   Those terms whatever, when they were propos'd:
   Thou didst accept them; wilt thou enjoy the good,
   Then cavil the conditions? and though God
   Made thee without thy leave, what if thy Son                        760
   Prove disobedient, and reprov'd, retort,
   Wherefore didst thou beget me? I sought it not:
   Wouldst thou admit for his contempt of thee
   That proud excuse? yet him not thy election,
   But Natural necessity begot.
   God made thee of choice his own, and of his own
   To serve him, thy reward was of his grace,
   Thy punishment then justly is at his Will.
   Be it so, for I submit, his doom is fair,
   That dust I am, and shall to dust returne:                          770
   O welcom hour whenever! why delayes
   His hand to execute what his Decree
   Fixd on this day? why do I overlive,
   Why am I mockt with death, and length'nd out
   To deathless pain? how gladly would I meet
   Mortalitie my sentence, and be Earth
   Insensible, how glad would lay me down
   As in my Mothers lap? there I should rest
   And sleep secure; his dreadful voice no more
   Would Thunder in my ears, no fear of worse                          780
   To mee and to my ofspring would torment me
   With cruel expectation. Yet one doubt
   Pursues me still, least all I cannot die,
   Least that pure breath of Life, the Spirit of Man
   Which God inspir'd, cannot together perish
   With this corporeal Clod; then in the Grave,
   Or in some other dismal place, who knows
   But I shall die a living Death? O thought
   Horrid, if true! yet why? it was but breath
   Of Life that sinn'd; what dies but what had life                    790
   And sin? the Bodie properly hath neither.
   All of me then shall die: let this appease
   The doubt, since humane reach no further knows.
   For though the Lord of all be infinite,
   Is his wrauth also? be it, man is not so,
   But mortal doom'd. How can he exercise
   Wrath without end on Man whom Death must end?
   Can he make deathless Death? that were to make
   Strange contradiction, which to God himself
   Impossible is held, as Argument                                     800
   Of weakness, not of Power. Will he, draw out,
   For angers sake, finite to infinite
   In punisht man, to satisfie his rigour
   Satisfi'd never; that were to extend
   His Sentence beyond dust and Natures Law,
   By which all Causes else according still
   To the reception of thir matter act,
   Not to th' extent of thir own Spheare. But say
   That Death be not one stroak, as I suppos'd,
   Bereaving sense, but endless miserie                                810
   From this day onward, which I feel begun
   Both in me, and without me, and so last
   To perpetuitie; Ay me, that fear
   Comes thundring back with dreadful revolution
   On my defensless head; both Death and I
   Am found Eternal, and incorporate both,
   Nor I on my part single, in mee all
   Posteritie stands curst: Fair Patrimonie
   That I must leave ye, Sons; O were I able
   To waste it all my self, and leave ye none!                         820
   So disinherited how would ye bless
   Me now your Curse! Ah, why should all mankind
   For one mans fault thus guiltless be condemn'd,
   If guiltless? But from mee what can proceed,
   But all corrupt, both Mind and Will deprav'd,
   Not to do onely, but to will the same
   With me? how can they acquitted stand
   In sight of God? Him after all Disputes
   Forc't I absolve: all my evasions vain
   And reasonings, though through Mazes, lead me still                 830
   But to my own conviction: first and last
   On mee, mee onely, as the sourse and spring
   Of all corruption, all the blame lights due;
   So might the wrauth, Fond wish! couldst thou support
   That burden heavier then the Earth to bear,
   Then all the world much heavier, though divided
   With that bad Woman? Thus what thou desir'st,
   And what thou fearst, alike destroyes all hope
   Of refuge, and concludes thee miserable
   Beyond all past example and future,                                 840
   To Satan onely like both crime and doom.
   O Conscience, into what Abyss of fears
   And horrors hast thou driv'n me; out of which
   I find no way, from deep to deeper plung'd!
   Thus Adam to himself lamented loud
   Through the still Night, not now, as ere man fell,
   Wholsom and cool, and mild, but with black Air
   Accompanied, with damps and dreadful gloom,
   Which to his evil Conscience represented
   All things with double terror: On the ground                        850
   Outstretcht he lay, on the cold ground, and oft
   Curs'd his Creation, Death as oft accus'd
   Of tardie execution, since denounc't
   The day of his offence. Why comes not Death,
   Said hee, with one thrice acceptable stroke
   To end me? Shall Truth fail to keep her word,
   Justice Divine not hast'n to be just?
   But Death comes not at call, Justice Divine
   Mends not her slowest pace for prayers or cries.
   O Woods, O Fountains, Hillocks, Dales and Bowrs,                    860
   With other echo farr I taught your Shades
   To answer, and resound farr other Song.
   Whom thus afflicted when sad Eve beheld,
   Desolate where she sate, approaching nigh,
   Soft words to his fierce passion she assay'd:
   But her with stern regard he thus repell'd.
   Out of my sight, thou Serpent, that name best
   Befits thee with him leagu'd, thy self as false
   And hateful; nothing wants, but that thy shape,
   Like his, and colour Serpentine may shew                            870
   Thy inward fraud, to warn all Creatures from thee
   Henceforth; least that too heav'nly form, pretended
   To hellish falshood, snare them. But for thee
   I had persisted happie, had not thy pride
   And wandring vanitie, when lest was safe,
   Rejected my forewarning, and disdain'd
   Not to be trusted, longing to be seen
   Though by the Devil himself, him overweening
   To over-reach, but with the Serpent meeting
   Fool'd and beguil'd, by him thou, I by thee,                        880
   To trust thee from my side, imagin'd wise,
   Constant, mature, proof against all assaults,
   And understood not all was but a shew
   Rather then solid vertu, all but a Rib
   Crooked by nature, bent, as now appears,
   More to the part sinister from me drawn,
   Well if thrown out, as supernumerarie
   To my just number found. O why did God,
   Creator wise, that peopl'd highest Heav'n
   With Spirits Masculine, create at last                              890
   This noveltie on Earth, this fair defect
   Of Nature, and not fill the World at once
   With Men as Angels without Feminine,
   Or find some other way to generate
   Mankind? this mischief had not then befall'n,
   And more that shall befall, innumerable
   Disturbances on Earth through Femal snares,
   And straight conjunction with this Sex: for either
   He never shall find out fit Mate, but such
   As some misfortune brings him, or mistake,                          900
   Or whom he wishes most shall seldom gain
   Through her perverseness, but shall see her gaind
   By a farr worse, or if she love, withheld
   By Parents, or his happiest choice too late
   Shall meet, alreadie linkt and Wedlock-bound
   To a fell Adversarie, his hate or shame:
   Which infinite calamitie shall cause
   To humane life, and houshold peace confound.
   He added not, and from her turn'd, but Eve
   Not so repulst, with Tears that ceas'd not flowing,                 910
   And tresses all disorderd, at his feet
   Fell humble, and imbracing them, besaught
   His peace, and thus proceeded in her plaint.
   Forsake me not thus, Adam, witness Heav'n
   What love sincere, and reverence in my heart
   I beare thee, and unweeting have offended,
   Unhappilie deceav'd; thy suppliant
   I beg, and clasp thy knees; bereave me not,
   Whereon I live, thy gentle looks, thy aid,
   Thy counsel in this uttermost distress,                             920
   My onely strength and stay: forlorn of thee,
   Whither shall I betake me, where subsist?
   While yet we live, scarse one short hour perhaps,
   Between us two let there be peace, both joyning,
   As joyn'd in injuries, one enmitie
   Against a Foe by doom express assign'd us,
   That cruel Serpent: On me exercise not
   Thy hatred for this miserie befall'n,
   On me already lost, mee then thy self
   More miserable; both have sin'd, but thou                           930
   Against God onely, I against God and thee,
   And to the place of judgement will return,
   There with my cries importune Heaven, that all
   The sentence from thy head remov'd may light
   On me, sole cause to thee of all this woe,
   Mee mee onely just object of his ire.
   She ended weeping, and her lowlie plight,
   Immoveable till peace obtain'd from fault
   Acknowledg'd and deplor'd, in Adam wraught
   Commiseration; soon his heart relented                              940
   Towards her, his life so late and sole delight,
   Now at his feet submissive in distress,
   Creature so faire his reconcilement seeking,
   His counsel whom she had displeas'd, his aide;
   As one disarm'd, his anger all he lost,
   And thus with peaceful words uprais'd her soon.
   Unwarie, and too desirous, as before,
   So now of what thou knowst not, who desir'st
   The punishment all on thy self; alas,
   Beare thine own first, ill able to sustaine                         950
   His full wrauth whose thou feelst as yet lest part,
   And my displeasure bearst so ill. If Prayers
   Could alter high Decrees, I to that place
   Would speed before thee, and be louder heard,
   That on my head all might be visited,
   Thy frailtie and infirmer Sex forgiv'n,
   To me committed and by me expos'd.
   But rise, let us no more contend, nor blame
   Each other, blam'd enough elsewhere, but strive
   In offices of Love, how we may light'n                              960
   Each others burden in our share of woe;
   Since this days Death denounc't, if ought I see,
   Will prove no sudden, but a slow-pac't evill,
   A long days dying to augment our paine,
   And to our Seed (O hapless Seed!) deriv'd.
   To whom thus Eve, recovering heart, repli'd.
   Adam, by sad experiment I know
   How little weight my words with thee can finde,
   Found so erroneous, thence by just event
   Found so unfortunate; nevertheless,                                 970
   Restor'd by thee, vile as I am, to place
   Of new acceptance, hopeful to regaine
   Thy Love, the sole contentment of my heart,
   Living or dying from thee I will not hide
   What thoughts in my unquiet brest are ris'n,
   Tending to som relief of our extremes,
   Or end, though sharp and sad, yet tolerable,
   As in our evils, and of easier choice.
   If care of our descent perplex us most,
   Which must be born to certain woe, devourd                          980
   By Death at last, and miserable it is
   To be to others cause of misery,
   Our own begotten, and of our Loines to bring
   Into this cursed World a woful Race,
   That after wretched Life must be at last
   Food for so foule a Monster, in thy power
   It lies, yet ere Conception to prevent
   The Race unblest, to being yet unbegot.
   Childless thou art, Childless remaine:
   So Death shall be deceav'd his glut, and with us two                990
   Be forc'd to satisfie his Rav'nous Maw.
   But if thou judge it hard and difficult,
   Conversing, looking, loving, to abstain
   From Loves due Rites, Nuptial embraces sweet,
   And with desire to languish without hope,
   Before the present object languishing
   With like desire, which would be miserie
   And torment less then none of what we dread,
   Then both our selves and Seed at once to free
   From what we fear for both, let us make short,                     1000
   Let us seek Death, or hee not found, supply
   With our own hands his Office on our selves;
   Why stand we longer shivering under feares,
   That shew no end but Death, and have the power,
   Of many wayes to die the shortest choosing,
   Destruction with destruction to destroy.
   She ended heer, or vehement despaire
   Broke off the rest; so much of Death her thoughts
   Had entertaind, as di'd her Cheeks with pale.
   But Adam with such counsel nothing sway'd,                         1010
   To better hopes his more attentive minde
   Labouring had rais'd, and thus to Eve repli'd.
   Eve, thy contempt of life and pleasure seems
   To argue in thee somthing more sublime
   And excellent then what thy minde contemnes;
   But self-destruction therefore saught, refutes
   That excellence thought in thee, and implies,
   Not thy contempt, but anguish and regret
   For loss of life and pleasure overlov'd.
   Or if thou covet death, as utmost end                              1020
   Of miserie, so thinking to evade
   The penaltie pronounc't, doubt not but God
   Hath wiselier arm'd his vengeful ire then so
   To be forestall'd; much more I fear least Death
   So snatcht will not exempt us from the paine
   We are by doom to pay; rather such acts
   Of contumacie will provoke the highest
   To make death in us live: Then let us seek
   Som safer resolution, which methinks
   I have in view, calling to minde with heed                         1030
   Part of our Sentence, that thy Seed shall bruise
   The Serpents head; piteous amends, unless
   Be meant, whom I conjecture, our grand Foe
   Satan, who in the Serpent hath contriv'd
   Against us this deceit: to crush his head
   Would be revenge indeed; which will be lost
   By death brought on our selves, or childless days
   Resolv'd, as thou proposest; so our Foe
   Shall scape his punishment ordain'd, and wee
   Instead shall double ours upon our heads.                          1040
   No more be mention'd then of violence
   Against our selves, and wilful barrenness,
   That cuts us off from hope, and savours onely
   Rancor and pride, impatience and despite,
   Reluctance against God and his just yoke
   Laid on our Necks. Remember with what mild
   And gracious temper he both heard and judg'd
   Without wrauth or reviling; wee expected
   Immediate dissolution, which we thought
   Was meant by Death that day, when lo, to thee                      1050
   Pains onely in Child-bearing were foretold,
   And bringing forth, soon recompenc't with joy,
   Fruit of thy Womb: On mee the Curse aslope
   Glanc'd on the ground, with labour I must earne
   My bread; what harm? Idleness had bin worse;
   My labour will sustain me; and least Cold
   Or Heat should injure us, his timely care
   Hath unbesaught provided, and his hands
   Cloath'd us unworthie, pitying while he judg'd;
   How much more, if we pray him, will his ear                        1060
   Be open, and his heart to pitie incline,
   And teach us further by what means to shun
   Th' inclement Seasons, Rain, Ice, Hail and Snow,
   Which now the Skie with various Face begins
   To shew us in this Mountain, while the Winds
   Blow moist and keen, shattering the graceful locks
   Of these fair spreading Trees; which bids us seek
   Som better shroud, som better warmth to cherish
   Our Limbs benumm'd, ere this diurnal Starr
   Leave cold the Night, how we his gather'd beams                    1070
   Reflected, may with matter sere foment,
   Or by collision of two bodies grinde
   The Air attrite to Fire, as late the Clouds
   Justling or pusht with Winds rude in thir shock
   Tine the slant Lightning, whose thwart flame driv'n down
   Kindles the gummie bark of Firr or Pine,
   And sends a comfortable heat from farr,
   Which might supplie the Sun: such Fire to use,
   And what may else be remedie or cure
   To evils which our own misdeeds have wrought,                      1080
   Hee will instruct us praying, and of Grace
   Beseeching him, so as we need not fear
   To pass commodiously this life, sustain'd
   By him with many comforts, till we end
   In dust, our final rest and native home.
   What better can we do, then to the place
   Repairing where he judg'd us, prostrate fall
   Before him reverent, and there confess
   Humbly our faults, and pardon beg, with tears
   Watering the ground, and with our sighs the Air                    1090
   Frequenting, sent from hearts contrite, in sign
   Of sorrow unfeign'd, and humiliation meek.
   Undoubtedly he will relent and turn
   From his displeasure; in whose look serene,
   When angry most he seem'd and most severe,
   What else but favor, grace, and mercie shon?
   So spake our Father penitent, nor Eve
   Felt less remorse: they forthwith to the place
   Repairing where he judg'd them prostrate fell
   Before him reverent, and both confess'd                            1100
   Humbly thir faults, and pardon beg'd, with tears
   Watering the ground, and with thir sighs the Air
   Frequenting, sent from hearts contrite, in sign
   Of sorrow unfeign'd, and humiliation meek.
 
   Notes:
   58 may] might 1674.
   241 Avenger] Avengers 1674.
   397 those] these 1674.
   827 they acquitted] they then acquitted 1674.
 
   The End Of The Tenth Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK XI.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 The Son of God presents to his Father the Prayers of our first Parents
 now repenting, and intercedes for them: God accepts them, but declares
 that they must no longer abide in Paradise; sends Michael with a Band of
 Cherubim to dispossess them; but first to reveal to Adam future things:
 Michaels coming down, Adam shews to Eve certain ominous signs; he
 discerns Michaels approach, goes out to meet him: the Angel denounces
 thir departure.  Eve's Lamentation. Adam pleads, but submits: The Angel
 leads him up to a high Hill, sets before him in a vision what shall
 happ'n till the Flood.
 
   Thus they in lowliest plight repentant stood
   Praying, for from the Mercie-seat above
   Prevenient Grace descending had remov'd
   The stonie from thir hearts, and made new flesh
   Regenerat grow instead, that sighs now breath'd
   Unutterable, which the Spirit of prayer
   Inspir'd, and wing'd for Heav'n with speedier flight
   Then loudest Oratorie: yet thir port
   Not of mean suiters, nor important less
   Seem'd thir Petition, then when th' ancient Pair                     10
   In Fables old, less ancient yet then these,
   Deucalion and chaste Pyrrha to restore
   The Race of Mankind drownd, before the Shrine
   Of Themis stood devout. To Heav'n thir prayers
   Flew up, nor missed the way, by envious windes
   Blow'n vagabond or frustrate: in they passd
   Dimentionless through Heav'nly dores; then clad
   With incense, where the Golden Altar fum'd,
   By thir great Intercessor, came in sight
   Before the Fathers Throne: Them the glad Son                         20
   Presenting, thus to intercede began.
   See Father, what first fruits on Earth are sprung
   From thy implanted Grace in Man, these Sighs
   And Prayers, which in this Golden Censer, mixt
   With Incense, I thy Priest before thee bring,
   Fruits of more pleasing savour from thy seed
   Sow'n with contrition in his heart, then those
   Which his own hand manuring all the Trees
   Of Paradise could have produc't, ere fall'n
   From innocence. Now therefore bend thine eare                        30
   To supplication, heare his sighs though mute;
   Unskilful with what words to pray, let mee
   Interpret for him, mee his Advocate
   And propitiation, all his works on mee
   Good or not good ingraft, my Merit those
   Shall perfet, and for these my Death shall pay.
   Accept me, and in mee from these receave
   The smell of peace toward Mankinde, let him live
   Before thee reconcil'd, at least his days
   Numberd, though sad, till Death, his doom (which I                   40
   To mitigate thus plead, not to reverse)
   To better life shall yeeld him, where with mee
   All my redeemd may dwell in joy and bliss,
   Made one with me as I with thee am one.
   To whom the Father, without Cloud, serene.
   All thy request for Man, accepted Son,
   Obtain, all thy request was my Decree:
   But longer in that Paradise to dwell,
   The Law I gave to Nature him forbids:
   Those pure immortal Elements that know                               50
   No gross, no unharmoneous mixture foule,
   Eject him tainted now, and purge him off
   As a distemper, gross to aire as gross,
   And mortal food, as may dispose him best
   For dissolution wrought by Sin, that first
   Distemperd all things, and of incorrupt
   Corrupted. I at first with two fair gifts
   Created him endowd, with Happiness
   And Immortalitie: that fondly lost,
   This other serv'd but to eternize woe;                               60
   Till I provided Death; so Death becomes
   His final remedie, and after Life
   Tri'd in sharp tribulation, and refin'd
   By Faith and faithful works, to second Life,
   Wak't in the renovation of the just,
   Resignes him up with Heav'n and Earth renewd.
   But let us call to Synod all the Blest
   Through Heav'ns wide bounds; from them I will not hide
   My judgments, how with Mankind I proceed,
   As how with peccant Angels late they saw;                            70
   And in thir state, though firm, stood more confirmd.
   He ended, and the Son gave signal high
   To the bright Minister that watchd, hee blew
   His Trumpet, heard in Oreb since perhaps
   When God descended, and perhaps once more
   To sound at general Doom. Th' Angelic blast
   Filld all the Regions: from thir blissful Bowrs
   Of Amarantin Shade, Fountain or Spring,
   By the waters of Life, where ere they sate
   In fellowships of joy: the Sons of Light                             80
   Hasted, resorting to the Summons high,
   And took thir Seats; till from his Throne supream
   Th' Almighty thus pronounced his sovran Will.
   O Sons, like one of us Man is become
   To know both Good and Evil, since his taste
   Of that defended Fruit; but let him boast
   His knowledge of Good lost, and Evil got,
   Happier, had it suffic'd him to have known
   Good by it self, and Evil not at all.
   He sorrows now, repents, and prayes contrite,                        90
   My motions in him, longer then they move,
   His heart I know, how variable and vain
   Self-left. Least therefore his now bolder hand
   Reach also of the Tree of Life, and eat,
   And live for ever, dream at least to live
   Forever, to remove him I decree,
   And send him from the Garden forth to Till
   The Ground whence he was taken, fitter soile.
   Michael, this my behest have thou in charge,
   Take to thee from among the Cherubim                                100
   Thy choice of flaming Warriours, least the Fiend
   Or in behalf of Man, or to invade
   Vacant possession som new trouble raise:
   Hast thee, and from the Paradise of God
   Without remorse drive out the sinful Pair,
   From hallowd ground th' unholie, and denounce
   To them and to thir Progenie from thence
   Perpetual banishment. Yet least they faint
   At the sad Sentence rigorously urg'd,
   For I behold them soft'nd and with tears                            110
   Bewailing thir excess, all terror hide.
   If patiently thy bidding they obey,
   Dismiss them not disconsolate; reveale
   To Adam what shall come in future dayes,
   As I shall thee enlighten, intermix
   My Cov'nant in the Womans seed renewd;
   So send them forth, though sorrowing, yet in peace:
   And on the East side of the Garden place,
   Where entrance up from Eden easiest climbes,
   Cherubic watch, and of a Sword the flame                            120
   Wide waving, all approach farr off to fright,
   And guard all passage to the Tree of Life:
   Least Paradise a receptacle prove
   To Spirits foule, and all my Trees thir prey,
   With whose stol'n Fruit Man once more to delude.
   He ceas'd; and th' Archangelic Power prepar'd
   For swift descent, with him the Cohort bright
   Of watchful Cherubim; four faces each
   Had, like a double Janus, all thir shape
   Spangl'd with eyes more numerous then those                         130
   Of Argus, and more wakeful then to drouze,
   Charm'd with Arcadian Pipe, the Pastoral Reed
   Of Hermes, or his opiate Rod. Meanwhile
   To resalute the World with sacred Light
   Leucothea wak'd, and with fresh dews imbalmd
   The Earth, when Adam and first Matron Eve
   Had ended now thir Orisons, and found,
   Strength added from above, new hope to spring
   Out of despaire, joy, but with fear yet linkt;
   Which thus to Eve his welcome words renewd.                         140
   Eve, easily may Faith admit, that all
   The good which we enjoy, from Heav'n descends
   But that from us ought should ascend to Heav'n
   So prevalent as to concerne the mind
   Of God high blest, or to incline his will,
   Hard to belief may seem; yet this will Prayer,
   Or one short sigh of humane breath, up-borne
   Ev'n to the Seat of God. For since I saught
   By Prayer th' offended Deitie to appease,
   Kneel'd and before him humbl'd all my heart,                        150
   Methought I saw him placable and mild,
   Bending his eare; perswasion in me grew
   That I was heard with favour; peace returnd
   Home to my brest, and to my memorie
   His promise, that thy Seed shall bruise our Foe;
   Which then not minded in dismay, yet now
   Assures me that the bitterness of death
   Is past, and we shall live. Whence Haile to thee,
   Eve rightly call'd, Mother of all Mankind,
   Mother of all things living, since by thee                          160
   Man is to live, and all things live for Man.
   To whom thus Eve with sad demeanour meek.
   Ill worthie I such title should belong
   To me transgressour, who for thee ordaind
   A help, became thy snare; to mee reproach
   Rather belongs, distrust and all dispraise:
   But infinite in pardon was my Judge,
   That I who first brought Death on all, am grac't
   The sourse of life; next favourable thou,
   Who highly thus to entitle me voutsaf't,                            170
   Farr other name deserving. But the Field
   To labour calls us now with sweat impos'd,
   Though after sleepless Night; for see the Morn,
   All unconcern'd with our unrest, begins
   Her rosie progress smiling; let us forth,
   I never from thy side henceforth to stray,
   Wherere our days work lies, though now enjoind
   Laborious, till day droop; while here we dwell,
   What can be toilsom in these pleasant Walkes?
   Here let us live, though in fall'n state, content.                  180
   So spake, so wish'd much-humbl'd Eve, but Fate
   Subscrib'd not; Nature first gave Signs, imprest
   On Bird, Beast, Aire, Aire suddenly eclips'd
   After short blush of Morn; nigh in her sight
   The Bird of Jove, stoopt from his aerie tour,
   Two Birds of gayest plume before him drove:
   Down from a Hill the Beast that reigns in Woods,
   First Hunter then, pursu'd a gentle brace,
   Goodliest of all the Forrest, Hart and Hinde;
   Direct to th' Eastern Gate was bent thir flight.                    190
   Adam observ'd, and with his Eye the chase
   Pursuing, not unmov'd to Eve thus spake.
   O Eve, some furder change awaits us nigh,
   Which Heav'n by these mute signs in Nature shews
   Forerunners of his purpose, or to warn
   Us haply too secure of our discharge
   From penaltie, because from death releast
   Some days; how long, and what till then our life,
   Who knows, or more then this, that we are dust,
   And thither must return and be no more.                             200
   Why else this double object in our sight
   Of flight pursu'd in th' Air and ore the ground
   One way the self-same hour? why in the East
   Darkness ere Dayes mid-course, and Morning light
   More orient in yon Western Cloud that draws
   O're the blew Firmament a radiant white,
   And slow descends, with somthing heav'nly fraught.
   He err'd not, for by this the heav'nly Bands
   Down from a Skie of Jasper lighted now
   In Paradise, and on a Hill made alt,                                210
   A glorious Apparition, had not doubt
   And carnal fear that day dimm'd Adams eye.
   Not that more glorious, when the Angels met
   Jacob in Mahanaim, where he saw
   The field Pavilion'd with his Guardians bright;
   Nor that which on the flaming Mount appeerd
   In Dothan, cover'd with a Camp of Fire,
   Against the Syrian King, who to surprize
   One man, Assassin-like had levied Warr,
   Warr unproclam'd. The Princely Hierarch                             220
   In thir bright stand, there left his Powers to seise
   Possession of the Garden; hee alone,
   To finde where Adam shelterd, took his way,
   Not unperceav'd of Adam, who to Eve,
   While the great Visitant approachd, thus spake.
   Eve, now expect great tidings, which perhaps
   Of us will soon determin, or impose
   New Laws to be observ'd; for I descrie
   From yonder blazing Cloud that veils the Hill
   One of the heav'nly Host, and by his Gate                           230
   None of the meanest, some great Potentate
   Or of the Thrones above, such Majestie
   Invests him coming; yet not terrible,
   That I should fear, nor sociably mild,
   As Raphael, that I should much confide,
   But solemn and sublime, whom not to offend,
   With reverence I must meet, and thou retire.
   He ended; and th' Arch-Angel soon drew nigh,
   Not in his shape Celestial, but as Man
   Clad to meet Man; over his lucid Armes                              240
   A militarie Vest of purple flowd
   Livelier then Meliboean, or the graine
   Of Sarra, worn by Kings and Hero's old
   In time of Truce; Iris had dipt the wooff;
   His starrie Helme unbuckl'd shew'd him prime
   In Manhood where Youth ended; by his side
   As in a glistering Zodiac hung the Sword,
   Satans dire dread, and in his hand the Spear.
   Adam bowd low, hee Kingly from his State
   Inclin'd not, but his coming thus declar'd.                         250
   Adam, Heav'ns high behest no Preface needs:
   Sufficient that thy Prayers are heard, and Death,
   Then due by sentence when thou didst transgress,
   Defeated of his seisure many dayes
   Giv'n thee of Grace, wherein thou may'st repent,
   And one bad act with many deeds well done
   Mayst cover: well may then thy Lord appeas'd
   Redeem thee quite from Deaths rapacious claimes;
   But longer in this Paradise to dwell
   Permits not; to remove thee I am come,                              260
   And send thee from the Garden forth to till
   The ground whence thou wast tak'n, fitter Soile.
   He added not, for Adam at the newes
   Heart-strook with chilling gripe of sorrow stood,
   That all his senses bound; Eve, who unseen
   Yet all had heard, with audible lament
   Discover'd soon the place of her retire.
   O unexpected stroke, worse then of Death!
   Must I thus leave thee Paradise? thus leave
   Thee Native Soile, these happie Walks and Shades,                   270
   Fit haunt of Gods? where I had hope to spend,
   Quiet though sad, the respit of that day
   That must be mortal to us both. O flours,
   That never will in other Climate grow,
   My early visitation, and my last
   At Eev'n, which I bred up with tender hand
   From the first op'ning bud, and gave ye Names,
   Who now shall reare ye to the Sun, or ranke
   Your Tribes, and water from th' ambrosial Fount?
   Thee lastly nuptial Bowre, by mee adornd                            280
   With what to sight or smell was sweet; from thee
   How shall I part, and whither wander down
   Into a lower World, to this obscure
   And wilde, how shall we breath in other Aire
   Less pure, accustomd to immortal Fruits?
   Whom thus the Angel interrupted milde.
   Lament not Eve, but patiently resigne
   What justly thou hast lost; nor set thy heart,
   Thus over fond, on that which is not thine;
   Thy going is not lonely, with thee goes                             290
   Thy Husband, him to follow thou art bound;
   Where he abides, think there thy native soile.
   Adam by this from the cold sudden damp
   Recovering, and his scatterd spirits returnd,
   To Michael thus his humble words addressd.
   Celestial, whether among the Thrones, or nam'd
   Of them the Highest, for such of shape may seem
   Prince above Princes, gently hast thou tould
   Thy message, which might else in telling wound,
   And in performing end us; what besides                              300
   Of sorrow and dejection and despair
   Our frailtie can sustain, thy tidings bring,
   Departure from this happy place, our sweet
   Recess, and onely consolation left
   Familiar to our eyes, all places else
   Inhospitable appeer and desolate,
   Nor knowing us nor known: and if by prayer
   Incessant I could hope to change the will
   Of him who all things can, I would not cease
   To wearie him with my assiduous cries:                              310
   But prayer against his absolute Decree
   No more availes then breath against the winde,
   Blown stifling back on him that breaths it forth:
   Therefore to his great bidding I submit.
   This most afflicts me, that departing hence,
   As from his face I shall be hid, deprivd
   His blessed count'nance; here I could frequent,
   With worship, place by place where he voutsaf'd
   Presence Divine, and to my Sons relate;
   On this Mount he appeerd, under this Tree                           320
   Stood visible, among these Pines his voice
   I heard, here with him at this Fountain talk'd:
   So many grateful Altars I would reare
   Of grassie Terfe, and pile up every Stone
   Of lustre from the brook, in memorie,
   Or monument to Ages, and thereon
   Offer sweet smelling Gumms & Fruits and Flours:
   In yonder nether World where shall I seek
   His bright appearances, or footstep trace?
   For though I fled him angrie, yet recall'd                          330
   To life prolongd and promisd Race, I now
   Gladly behold though but his utmost skirts
   Of glory, and farr off his steps adore.
   To whom thus Michael with regard benigne.
   Adam, thou know'st Heav'n his, and all the Earth
   Not this Rock onely; his Omnipresence fills
   Land, Sea, and Aire, and every kinde that lives,
   Fomented by his virtual power and warmd:
   All th' Earth he gave thee to possess and rule,
   No despicable gift; surmise not then                                340
   His presence to these narrow bounds confin'd
   Of Paradise or Eden: this had been
   Perhaps thy Capital Seate, from whence had spred
   All generations, and had hither come
   From all the ends of th' Earth, to celebrate
   And reverence thee thir great Progenitor.
   But this praeeminence thou hast lost, brought down
   To dwell on eeven ground now with thy Sons:
   Yet doubt not but in Vallie and in Plaine
   God is as here, and will be found alike                             350
   Present, and of his presence many a signe
   Still following thee, still compassing thee round
   With goodness and paternal Love, his Face
   Express, and of his steps the track Divine.
   Which that thou mayst beleeve, and be confirmd,
   Ere thou from hence depart, know I am sent
   To shew thee what shall come in future dayes
   To thee and to thy Ofspring; good with bad
   Expect to hear, supernal Grace contending
   With sinfulness of Men; thereby to learn                            360
   True patience, and to temper joy with fear
   And pious sorrow, equally enur'd
   By moderation either state to beare,
   Prosperous or adverse: so shalt thou lead
   Safest thy life, and best prepar'd endure
   Thy mortal passage when it comes. Ascend
   This Hill; let Eve (for I have drencht her eyes)
   Here sleep below while thou to foresight wak'st,
   As once thou slepst, while Shee to life was formd.
   To whom thus Adam gratefully repli'd.                               370
   Ascend, I follow thee, safe Guide, the path
   Thou lead'st me, and to the hand of Heav'n submit,
   However chast'ning, to the evil turne
   My obvious breast, arming to overcom
   By suffering, and earne rest from labour won,
   If so I may attain. So both ascend
   In the Visions of God: It was a Hill
   Of Paradise the highest, from whose top
   The Hemisphere of Earth in cleerest Ken
   Stretcht out to amplest reach of prospect lay.                      380
   Not higher that Hill nor wider looking round,
   Whereon for different cause the Tempter set
   Our second Adam in the Wilderness,
   To shew him all Earths Kingdomes and thir Glory.
   His Eye might there command wherever stood
   City of old or modern Fame, the Seat
   Of mightiest Empire, from the destind Walls
   Of Cambalu, seat of Cathaian Can
   And Samarchand by Oxus, Temirs Throne,
   To Paquin of Sinaean Kings, and thence                              390
   To Agra and Lahor of great Mogul
   Down to the golden Chersonese, or where
   The Persian in Ecbatan sate, or since
   In Hispahan, or where the Russian Ksar
   In Mosco, or the Sultan in Bizance,
   Turchestan-born; nor could his eye not ken
   Th' Empire of Negus to his utmost Port
   Ercoco and the less Maritine Kings
   Mombaza, and Quiloa, and Melind,
   And Sofala thought Ophir, to the Realme                             400
   Of Congo, and Angola fardest South;
   Or thence from Niger Flood to Atlas Mount
   The Kingdoms of Almansor, Fez, and Sus,
   Marocco and Algiers, and Tremisen;
   On Europe thence, and where Rome was to sway
   The World: in Spirit perhaps he also saw
   Rich Mexico the seat of Motezume,
   And Cusco in Peru, the richer seat
   Of Atabalipa, and yet unspoil'd
   Guiana, whose great Citie Geryons Sons                              410
   Call El Dorado: but to nobler sights
   Michael from Adams eyes the Filme remov'd
   Which that false Fruit that promis'd clearer sight
   Had bred; then purg'd with Euphrasie and Rue
   The visual Nerve, for he had much to see;
   And from the Well of Life three drops instill'd.
   So deep the power of these Ingredients pierc'd,
   Eevn to the inmost seat of mental sight,
   That Adam now enforc't to close his eyes,
   Sunk down and all his Spirits became intranst:                      420
   But him the gentle Angel by the hand
   Soon rais'd, and his attention thus recall'd.
   Adam, now ope thine eyes, and first behold
   Th' effects which thy original crime hath wrought
   In some to spring from thee, who never touch'd
   Th' excepted Tree, nor with the Snake conspir'd,
   Nor sinn'd thy sin, yet from that sin derive
   Corruption to bring forth more violent deeds.
   His eyes he op'nd, and beheld a field,
   Part arable and tilth, whereon were Sheaves                         430
   New reapt, the other part sheep-walks and foulds;
   Ith' midst an Altar as the Land-mark stood
   Rustic, of grassie sord; thither anon
   A sweatie Reaper from his Tillage brought
   First Fruits, the green Eare, and the yellow Sheaf,
   Uncull'd, as came to hand; a Shepherd next
   More meek came with the Firstlings of his Flock
   Choicest and best; then sacrificing, laid
   The Inwards and thir Fat, with Incense strew'd,
   On the cleft Wood, and all due Rites perform'd.                     440
   His Offring soon propitious Fire from Heav'n
   Consum'd with nimble glance, and grateful steame;
   The others not, for his was not sincere;
   Whereat hee inlie rag'd, and as they talk'd,
   Smote him into the Midriff with a stone
   That beat out life; he fell, and deadly pale
   Groand out his Soul with gushing bloud effus'd.
   Much at that sight was Adam in his heart
   Dismai'd, and thus in haste to th' Angel cri'd.
   O Teacher, some great mischief hath befall'n                        450
   To that meek man, who well had sacrific'd;
   Is Pietie thus and pure Devotion paid?
   T' whom Michael thus, hee also mov'd, repli'd.
   These two are Brethren, Adam, and to come
   Out of thy loyns; th' unjust the just hath slain,
   For envie that his Brothers Offering found
   From Heav'n acceptance; but the bloodie Fact
   Will be aveng'd, and th' others Faith approv'd
   Loose no reward, though here thou see him die,
   Rowling in dust and gore. To which our Sire.                        460
   Alas, both for the deed and for the cause!
   But have I now seen Death? Is this the way
   I must return to native dust? O sight
   Of terrour, foul and ugly to behold,
   Horrid to think, how horrible to feel!
   To whom thus Michael. Death thou hast seen
   In his first shape on man; but many shapes
   Of Death, and many are the wayes that lead
   To his grim Cave, all dismal; yet to sense
   More terrible at th' entrance then within.                          470
   Some, as thou saw'st, by violent stroke shall die,
   By Fire, Flood, Famin, by Intemperance more
   In Meats and Drinks, which on the Earth shal bring
   Diseases dire, of which a monstrous crew
   Before thee shall appear; that thou mayst know
   What miserie th' inabstinence of Eve
   Shall bring on men. Immediately a place
   Before his eyes appeard, sad, noysom, dark,
   A Lazar-house it seemd, wherein were laid
   Numbers of all diseas'd, all maladies                               480
   Of gastly Spasm, or racking torture, qualmes
   Of heart-sick Agonie, all feavorous kinds,
   Convulsions, Epilepsies, fierce Catarrhs,
   Intestin Stone and Ulcer, Colic pangs,
   Dropsies, and Asthma's, and Joint-racking Rheums.
   Dire was the tossing, deep the groans, despair
   Tended the sick busiest from Couch to Couch;
   And over them triumphant Death his Dart
   Shook, but delaid to strike, though oft invok't
   With vows, as thir chief good, and final hope.                      490
   Sight so deform what heart of Rock could long
   Drie-ey'd behold? Adam could not, but wept,
   Though not of Woman born; compassion quell'd
   His best of Man, and gave him up to tears
   A space, till firmer thoughts restraind excess,
   And scarce recovering words his plaint renew'd.
   O miserable Mankind, to what fall
   Degraded, to what wretched state reserv'd?
   Better end heer unborn. Why is life giv'n
   To be thus wrested from us? rather why                              500
   Obtruded on us thus? who if we knew
   What we receive, would either not accept
   Life offer'd, or soon beg to lay it down,
   Glad to be so dismist in peace. Can thus
   Th' Image of God in man created once
   So goodly and erect, though faultie since,
   To such unsightly sufferings be debas't
   Under inhuman pains? Why should not Man,
   Retaining still Divine similitude
   In part, from such deformities be free,                             510
   And for his Makers Image sake exempt?
   Thir Makers Image, answerd Michael, then
   Forsook them, when themselves they villifi'd
   To serve ungovern'd appetite, and took
   His Image whom they serv'd, a brutish vice,
   Inductive mainly to the sin of Eve.
   Therefore so abject is thir punishment,
   Disfiguring not Gods likeness, but thir own,
   Or if his likeness, by themselves defac't
   While they pervert pure Natures healthful rules                     520
   To loathsom sickness, worthily, since they
   Gods Image did not reverence in themselves.
   I yeild it just, said Adam, and submit.
   But is there yet no other way, besides
   These painful passages, how we may come
   To Death, and mix with our connatural dust?
   There is, said Michael, if thou well observe
   The rule of not too much, by temperance taught
   In what thou eatst and drinkst, seeking from thence
   Due nourishment, not gluttonous delight,                            530
   Till many years over thy head return:
   So maist thou live, till like ripe Fruit thou drop
   Into thy Mothers lap, or be with ease
   Gatherd, not harshly pluckt, for death mature:
   This is old age; but then thou must outlive
   Thy youth, thy strength, thy beauty, which will change
   To witherd weak & gray; thy Senses then
   Obtuse, all taste of pleasure must forgoe,
   To what thou hast, and for the Aire of youth
   Hopeful and cheerful, in thy blood will reigne                      540
   A melancholly damp of cold and dry
   To waigh thy spirits down, and last consume
   The Balme of Life. To whom our Ancestor.
   Henceforth I flie not Death, nor would prolong
   Life much, bent rather how I may be quit
   Fairest and easiest of this combrous charge,
   Which I must keep till my appointed day
   Of rendring up, Michael to him repli'd.
   Nor love thy Life, nor hate; but what thou livst
   Live well, how long or short permit to Heav'n:                      550
   And now prepare thee for another sight.
   He lookd and saw a spacious Plaine, whereon
   Were Tents of various hue; by some were herds
   Of Cattel grazing: others, whence the sound
   Of Instruments that made melodious chime
   Was heard, of Harp and Organ; and who moovd
   Thir stops and chords was seen: his volant touch
   Instinct through all proportions low and high
   Fled and pursu'd transverse the resonant fugue.
   In other part stood one who at the Forge                            560
   Labouring, two massie clods of Iron and Brass
   Had melted (whether found where casual fire
   Had wasted woods on Mountain or in Vale,
   Down to the veins of Earth, thence gliding hot
   To som Caves mouth, or whether washt by stream
   From underground) the liquid Ore he dreind
   Into fit moulds prepar'd; from which he formd
   First his own Tooles; then, what might else be wrought
   Fusile or grav'n in mettle. After these,
   But on the hether side a different sort                             570
   From the high neighbouring Hills, which was thir Seat,
   Down to the Plain descended: by thir guise
   Just men they seemd, and all thir study bent
   To worship God aright, and know his works
   Not hid, nor those things lost which might preserve
   Freedom and Peace to men: they on the Plain
   Long had not walkt, when from the Tents behold
   A Beavie of fair Women, richly gay
   In Gems and wanton dress; to the Harp they sung
   Soft amorous Ditties, and in dance came on:                         580
   The Men though grave, ey'd them, and let thir eyes
   Rove without rein, till in the amorous Net
   Fast caught, they lik'd, and each his liking chose;
   And now of love they treat till th' Eevning Star
   Loves Harbinger appeerd; then all in heat
   They light the Nuptial Torch, and bid invoke
   Hymen, then first to marriage Rites invok't;
   With Feast and Musick all the Tents resound.
   Such happy interview and fair event
   Of love & youth not lost, Songs, Garlands, Flours,                  590
   And charming Symphonies attach'd the heart
   Of Adam, soon enclin'd to admit delight,
   The bent of Nature; which he thus express'd.
   True opener of mine eyes, prime Angel blest,
   Much better seems this Vision, and more hope
   Of peaceful dayes portends, then those two past;
   Those were of hate and death, or pain much worse,
   Here Nature seems fulfilld in all her ends.
   To whom thus Michael. Judg not what is best
   By pleasure, though to Nature seeming meet,                         600
   Created, as thou art, to nobler end
   Holie and pure, conformitie divine.
   Those Tents thou sawst so pleasant, were the Tents
   Of wickedness, wherein shall dwell his Race
   Who slew his Brother; studious they appere
   Of Arts that polish Life, Inventers rare,
   Unmindful of thir Maker, though his Spirit
   Taught them, but they his gifts acknowledg'd none.
   Yet they a beauteous ofspring shall beget;
   For that fair femal Troop thou sawst, that seemd                    610
   Of Goddesses, so blithe, so smooth, so gay,
   Yet empty of all good wherein consists
   Womans domestic honour and chief praise;
   Bred onely and completed to the taste
   Of lustful appetence, to sing, to dance,
   To dress, and troule the Tongue, and roule the Eye.
   To these that sober Race of Men, whose lives
   Religious titl'd them the Sons of God,
   Shall yeild up all thir vertue, all thir fame
   Ignobly, to the trains and to the smiles                            620
   Of these fair Atheists, and now swim in joy,
   (Erelong to swim at larg) and laugh; for which
   The world erelong a world of tears must weepe.
   To whom thus Adam of short joy bereft.
   O pittie and shame, that they who to live well
   Enterd so faire, should turn aside to tread
   Paths indirect, or in the mid way faint!
   But still I see the tenor of Mans woe
   Holds on the same, from Woman to begin.
   From Mans effeminate slackness it begins,                           630
   Said th' Angel, who should better hold his place
   By wisdome, and superiour gifts receavd.
   But now prepare thee for another Scene.
   He lookd and saw wide Territorie spred
   Before him, Towns, and rural works between,
   Cities of Men with lofty Gates and Towrs,
   Concours in Arms, fierce Faces threatning Warr,
   Giants of mightie Bone, and bould emprise;
   Part wield thir Arms, part courb the foaming Steed,
   Single or in Array of Battel rang'd                                 640
   Both Horse and Foot, nor idely mustring stood;
   One way a Band select from forage drives
   A herd of Beeves, faire Oxen and faire Kine
   From a fat Meddow ground; or fleecy Flock,
   Ewes and thir bleating Lambs over the Plaine,
   Thir Bootie; scarce with Life the Shepherds flye,
   But call in aide, which tacks a bloody Fray;
   With cruel Tournament the Squadrons joine;
   Where Cattel pastur'd late, now scatterd lies
   With Carcasses and Arms th' ensanguind Field                        650
   Deserted: Others to a Citie strong
   Lay Siege, encampt; by Batterie, Scale, and Mine,
   Assaulting; others from the Wall defend
   With Dart and Jav'lin, Stones and sulfurous Fire;
   On each hand slaughter and gigantic deeds.
   In other part the scepter'd Haralds call
   To Council in the Citie Gates: anon
   Grey-headed men and grave, with Warriours mixt,
   Assemble, and Harangues are heard, but soon
   In factious opposition, till at last                                660
   Of middle Age one rising, eminent
   In wise deport, spake much of Right and Wrong,
   Of Justice, of Religion, Truth and Peace,
   And Judgement from above: him old and young
   Exploded, and had seiz'd with violent hands,
   Had not a Cloud descending snatch'd him thence
   Unseen amid the throng: so violence
   Proceeded, and Oppression, and Sword-Law
   Through all the Plain, and refuge none was found.
   Adam was all in tears, and to his guide                             670
   Lamenting turnd full sad; O what are these,
   Deaths Ministers, not Men, who thus deal Death
   Inhumanly to men, and multiply
   Ten thousand fould the sin of him who slew
   His Brother; for of whom such massacher
   Make they but of thir Brethren, men of men?
   But who was that Just Man, whom had not Heav'n
   Rescu'd, had in his Righteousness bin lost?
   To whom thus Michael; These are the product
   Of those ill-mated Marriages thou saw'st;                           680
   Where good with bad were matcht, who of themselves
   Abhor to joyn; and by imprudence mixt,
   Produce prodigious Births of bodie or mind.
   Such were these Giants, men of high renown;
   For in those dayes Might onely shall be admir'd,
   And Valour and Heroic Vertu call'd;
   To overcome in Battel, and subdue
   Nations, and bring home spoils with infinite
   Man-slaughter, shall be held the highest pitch
   Of human Glorie, and for Glorie done                                690
   Of triumph, to be styl'd great Conquerours,
   Patrons of Mankind, Gods, and Sons of Gods,
   Destroyers rightlier call'd and Plagues of men.
   Thus Fame shall be achiev'd, renown on Earth,
   And what most merits fame in silence hid.
   But hee the seventh from thee, whom thou beheldst
   The onely righteous in a World perverse,
   And therefore hated, therefore so beset
   With Foes for daring single to be just,
   And utter odious Truth, that God would come                         700
   To judge them with his Saints: Him the most High
   Rapt in a balmie Cloud with winged Steeds
   Did, as thou sawst, receave, to walk with God
   High in Salvation and the Climes of bliss,
   Exempt from Death; to shew thee what reward
   Awaits the good, the rest what punishment;
   Which now direct thine eyes and soon behold.
   He look'd, & saw the face of things quite chang'd;
   The brazen Throat of Warr had ceast to roar,
   All now was turn'd to jollitie and game,                            710
   To luxurie and riot, feast and dance,
   Marrying or prostituting, as befell,
   Rape or Adulterie, where passing faire
   Allurd them; thence from Cups to civil Broiles.
   At length a Reverend Sire among them came,
   And of thir doings great dislike declar'd,
   And testifi'd against thir wayes; hee oft
   Frequented thir Assemblies, whereso met,
   Triumphs or Festivals, and to them preachd
   Conversion and Repentance, as to Souls                              720
   In prison under Judgements imminent:
   But all in vain: which when he saw, he ceas'd
   Contending, and remov'd his Tents farr off;
   Then from the Mountain hewing Timber tall,
   Began to build a Vessel of huge bulk,
   Measur'd by Cubit, length, & breadth, and highth,
   Smeard round with Pitch, and in the side a dore
   Contriv'd, and of provisions laid in large
   For Man and Beast: when loe a wonder strange!
   Of everie Beast, and Bird, and Insect small                         730
   Came seavens, and pairs, and enterd in, as taught
   Thir order; last the Sire, and his three Sons
   With thir four Wives, and God made fast the dore.
   Meanwhile the Southwind rose, & with black wings
   Wide hovering, all the Clouds together drove
   From under Heav'n; the Hills to their supplie
   Vapour, and Exhalation dusk and moist,
   Sent up amain; and now the thick'nd Skie
   Like a dark Ceeling stood; down rush'd the Rain
   Impetuous, and continu'd till the Earth                             740
   No more was seen; the floating Vessel swum
   Uplifted; and secure with beaked prow
   Rode tilting o're the Waves, all dwellings else
   Flood overwhelmd, and them with all thir pomp
   Deep under water rould; Sea cover'd Sea,
   Sea without shoar; and in thir Palaces
   Where luxurie late reign'd, Sea-monsters whelp'd
   And stabl'd; of Mankind, so numerous late,
   All left, in one small bottom swum imbark't.
   How didst thou grieve then, Adam, to behold                         750
   The end of all thy Ofspring, end so sad,
   Depopulation; thee another Floud,
   Of tears and sorrow a Floud thee also drown'd,
   And sunk thee as thy Sons; till gently reard
   By th' Angel, on thy feet thou stoodst at last,
   Though comfortless, as when a Father mourns
   His Childern, all in view destroyd at once;
   And scarce to th' Angel utterdst thus thy plaint.
   O Visions ill foreseen! better had I
   Liv'd ignorant of future, so had borne                              760
   My part of evil onely, each dayes lot
   Anough to bear; those now, that were dispenst
   The burd'n of many Ages, on me light
   At once, by my foreknowledge gaining Birth
   Abortive, to torment me ere thir being,
   With thought that they must be. Let no man seek
   Henceforth to be foretold what shall befall
   Him or his Childern, evil he may be sure,
   Which neither his foreknowing can prevent,
   And hee the future evil shall no less                               770
   In apprehension then in substance feel
   Grievous to bear: but that care now is past,
   Man is not whom to warne: those few escap't
   Famin and anguish will at last consume
   Wandring that watrie Desert: I had hope
   When violence was ceas't, and Warr on Earth,
   All would have then gon well, peace would have crownd
   With length of happy days the race of man;
   But I was farr deceav'd; for now I see
   Peace to corrupt no less then Warr to waste.                        780
   How comes it thus? unfould, Celestial Guide,
   And whether here the Race of man will end.
   To whom thus Michael. Those whom last thou sawst
   In triumph and luxurious wealth, are they
   First seen in acts of prowess eminent
   And great exploits, but of true vertu void;
   Who having spilt much blood, and don much waste
   Subduing Nations, and achievd thereby
   Fame in the World, high titles, and rich prey,
   Shall change thir course to pleasure, ease, and sloth,              790
   Surfet, and lust, till wantonness and pride
   Raise out of friendship hostil deeds in Peace.
   The conquerd also, and enslav'd by Warr
   Shall with thir freedom lost all vertu loose
   And feare of God, from whom thir pietie feign'd
   In sharp contest of Battel found no aide
   Against invaders; therefore coold in zeale
   Thenceforth shall practice how to live secure,
   Worldlie or dissolute, on what thir Lords
   Shall leave them to enjoy; for th' Earth shall bear                 800
   More then anough, that temperance may be tri'd:
   So all shall turn degenerate, all deprav'd,
   Justice and Temperance, Truth and Faith forgot;
   One Man except, the onely Son of light
   In a dark Age, against example good,
   Against allurement, custom, and a World
   Offended; fearless of reproach and scorn,
   Or violence, hee of thir wicked wayes
   Shall them admonish, and before them set
   The paths of righteousness, how much more safe,                     810
   And full of peace, denouncing wrauth to come
   On thir impenitence; and shall returne
   Of them derided, but of God observd
   The one just Man alive; by his command
   Shall build a wondrous Ark, as thou beheldst,
   To save himself and houshold from amidst
   A World devote to universal rack.
   No sooner hee with them of Man and Beast
   Select for life shall in the Ark be lodg'd,
   And shelterd round, but all the Cataracts                           820
   Of Heav'n set open on the Earth shall powre
   Raine day and night, all fountaines of the Deep
   Broke up, shall heave the Ocean to usurp
   Beyond all bounds, till inundation rise
   Above the highest Hills: then shall this Mount
   Of Paradise by might of Waves be moovd
   Out of his place, pushd by the horned floud,
   With all his verdure spoil'd, and Trees adrift
   Down the great River to the op'ning Gulf,
   And there take root an Iland salt and bare,                         830
   The haunt of Seales and Orcs, and Sea-mews clang.
   To teach thee that God attributes to place
   No sanctitie, if none be thither brought
   By Men who there frequent, or therein dwell.
   And now what further shall ensue, behold.
   He lookd, and saw the Ark hull on the floud,
   Which now abated, for the Clouds were fled,
   Drivn by a keen North-winde, that blowing drie
   Wrinkl'd the face of Deluge, as decai'd;
   And the cleer Sun on his wide watrie Glass                          840
   Gaz'd hot, and of the fresh Wave largely drew,
   As after thirst, which made thir flowing shrink
   From standing lake to tripping ebbe, that stole
   With soft foot towards the deep, who now had stopt
   His Sluces, as the Heav'n his windows shut.
   The Ark no more now flotes, but seems on ground
   Fast on the top of som high mountain fixt.
   And now the tops of Hills as Rocks appeer;
   With clamor thence the rapid Currents drive
   Towards the retreating Sea thir furious tyde.                       850
   Forthwith from out the Arke a Raven flies,
   And after him, the surer messenger,
   A Dove sent forth once and agen to spie
   Green Tree or ground whereon his foot may light;
   The second time returning, in his Bill
   An Olive leafe he brings, pacific signe:
   Anon drie ground appeers, and from his Arke
   The ancient Sire descends with all his Train;
   Then with uplifted hands, and eyes devout,
   Grateful to Heav'n, over his head beholds                           860
   A dewie Cloud, and in the Cloud a Bow
   Conspicuous with three lifted colours gay,
   Betok'ning peace from God, and Cov'nant new.
   Whereat the heart of Adam erst so sad
   Greatly rejoyc'd, and thus his joy broke forth.
   O thou that future things canst represent
   As present, Heav'nly instructer, I revive
   At this last sight, assur'd that Man shall live
   With all the Creatures, and thir seed preserve.
   Farr less I now lament for one whole World                          870
   Of wicked Sons destroyd, then I rejoyce
   For one Man found so perfet and so just,
   That God voutsafes to raise another World
   From him, and all his anger to forget.
   But say, what mean those colourd streaks in Heavn,
   Distended as the Brow of God appeas'd,
   Or serve they as a flourie verge to binde
   The fluid skirts of that same watrie Cloud,
   Least it again dissolve and showr the Earth?
   To whom th' Archangel. Dextrously thou aim'st;                      880
   So willingly doth God remit his Ire,
   Though late repenting him of Man deprav'd,
   Griev'd at his heart, when looking down he saw
   The whole Earth fill'd with violence, and all flesh
   Corrupting each thir way; yet those remoov'd,
   Such grace shall one just Man find in his sight,
   That he relents, not to blot out mankind,
   And makes a Covenant never to destroy
   The Earth again by flood, nor let the Sea
   Surpass his bounds, nor Rain to drown the World                     890
   With Man therein or Beast; but when he brings
   Over the Earth a Cloud, will therein set
   His triple-colour'd Bow, whereon to look
   And call to mind his Cov'nant: Day and Night,
   Seed time and Harvest, Heat and hoary Frost
   Shall hold thir course, till fire purge all things new,
   Both Heav'n and Earth, wherein the just shall dwell.
 
   Notes:
   484 After this line, 1674 adds:
       Daemoniac Phrenzie, moaping Melancholie
       And Moon struck madness, pining Atrophie,
       Marasmus, and wide wasting Pestilence,
   548 Of rendring up, and patiently attend
       My dissolution.  Michael repli'd 1674.
   647 tacks] makes 1674.
   866 that] who 1674.
 
   The end of the Eleventh Book.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK XII.
 
 
   THE ARGUMENT.
 
 The Angel Michael continues from the Flood to relate what shall succeed;
 then, in the mention of Abraham, comes by degrees to explain who that
 Seed of the Woman shall be, which was promised Adam and Eve in the Fall;
 his Incarnation, Death, Resurrection, and Ascention; the state of the
 Church till his second Coming. Adam greatly satisfied and recomforted by
 these Relations and Promises descends the Hill with Michael; wakens Eve,
 who all this while had slept, but with gentle dreams compos'd to
 quietness of mind and submission. Michael in either hand leads them out
 of Paradise, the fiery Sword waving behind them, and the Cherubim taking
 thir Stations to guard the Place.
 
   [As one who in his journey bates at Noone
   Though bent on speed, so heer the Archangel' paus'd
   Betwixt the world destroy'd and world restor'd,
   If Adam aught perhaps might interpose;
   Then with transition sweet new Speech resumes]
   Thus thou hast seen one World begin and end;
   And Man as from a second stock proceed.
   Much thou hast yet to see, but I perceave
   Thy mortal sight to faile; objects divine
   Must needs impaire and wearie human sense:                           10
   Henceforth what is to com I will relate,
   Thou therefore give due audience, and attend.
   This second sours of Men, while yet but few,
   And while the dread of judgement past remains
   Fresh in thir mindes, fearing the Deitie,
   With some regard to what is just and right
   Shall lead thir lives, and multiplie apace,
   Labouring the soile, and reaping plenteous crop,
   Corn wine and oyle; and from the herd or flock,
   Oft sacrificing Bullock, Lamb, or Kid,                               20
   With large Wine-offerings pour'd, and sacred Feast
   Shal spend thir dayes in joy unblam'd, and dwell
   Long time in peace by Families and Tribes
   Under paternal rule; till one shall rise
   Of proud ambitious heart, who not content
   With fair equalitie, fraternal state,
   Will arrogate Dominion undeserv'd
   Over his brethren, and quite dispossess
   Concord and law of Nature from the Earth;
   Hunting (and Men not Beasts shall be his game)                       30
   With Warr and hostile snare such as refuse
   Subjection to his Empire tyrannous:
   A mightie Hunter thence he shall be styl'd
   Before the Lord, as in despite of Heav'n,
   Or from Heav'n claming second Sovrantie;
   And from Rebellion shall derive his name,
   Though of Rebellion others he accuse.
   Hee with a crew, whom like Ambition joyns
   With him or under him to tyrannize,
   Marching from Eden towards the West, shall finde                     40
   The Plain, wherein a black bituminous gurge
   Boiles out from under ground, the mouth of Hell;
   Of Brick, and of that stuff they cast to build
   A Citie & Towre, whose top may reach to Heav'n;
   And get themselves a name, least far disperst
   In foraign Lands thir memorie be lost,
   Regardless whether good or evil fame.
   But God who oft descends to visit men
   Unseen, and through thir habitations walks
   To mark thir doings, them beholding soon,                            50
   Comes down to see thir Citie, ere the Tower
   Obstruct Heav'n Towrs, and in derision sets
   Upon thir Tongues a various Spirit to rase
   Quite out thir Native Language, and instead
   To sow a jangling noise of words unknown:
   Forthwith a hideous gabble rises loud
   Among the Builders; each to other calls
   Not understood, till hoarse, and all in rage,
   As mockt they storm; great laughter was in Heav'n
   And looking down, to see the hubbub strange                          60
   And hear the din; thus was the building left
   Ridiculous, and the work Confusion nam'd.
   Whereto thus Adam fatherly displeas'd.
   O execrable Son so to aspire
   Above his Brethren, to himself affirming
   Authoritie usurpt, from God not giv'n:
   He gave us onely over Beast, Fish, Fowl
   Dominion absolute; that right we hold
   By his donation; but Man over men
   He made not Lord; such title to himself                              70
   Reserving, human left from human free.
   But this Usurper his encroachment proud
   Stayes not on Man; to God his Tower intends
   Siege and defiance: Wretched man! what food
   Will he convey up thither to sustain
   Himself and his rash Armie, where thin Aire
   Above the Clouds will pine his entrails gross,
   And famish him of Breath, if not of Bread?
   To whom thus Michael. Justly thou abhorr'st
   That Son, who on the quiet state of men                              80
   Such trouble brought, affecting to subdue
   Rational Libertie; yet know withall,
   Since thy original lapse, true Libertie
   Is lost, which alwayes with right Reason dwells
   Twinn'd, and from her hath no dividual being:
   Reason in man obscur'd, or not obeyd,
   Immediately inordinate desires
   And upstart Passions catch the Government
   From Reason, and to servitude reduce
   Man till then free. Therefore since hee permits                      90
   Within himself unworthie Powers to reign
   Over free Reason, God in Judgement just
   Subjects him from without to violent Lords;
   Who oft as undeservedly enthrall
   His outward freedom: Tyrannie must be,
   Though to the Tyrant thereby no excuse.
   Yet somtimes Nations will decline so low
   From vertue, which is reason, that no wrong,
   But Justice, and some fatal curse annext
   Deprives them of thir outward libertie,                             100
   Thir inward lost: Witness th' irreverent Son
   Of him who built the Ark, who for the shame
   Don to his Father, heard this heavie curse,
   Servant Of Servants, on his vitious Race.
   Thus will this latter, as the former World,
   Still tend from bad to worse, till God at last
   Wearied with their iniquities, withdraw
   His presence from among them, and avert
   His holy Eyes; resolving from thenceforth
   To leave them to thir own polluted wayes;                           110
   And one peculiar Nation to select
   From all the rest, of whom to be invok'd,
   A Nation from one faithful man to spring:
   Him on this side Euphrates yet residing,
   Bred up in Idol-worship; O that men
   (Canst thou believe?) should be so stupid grown,
   While yet the Patriark liv'd, who scap'd the Flood,
   As to forsake the living God, and fall
   To-worship thir own work in Wood and Stone
   For Gods! yet him God the most High voutsafes                       120
   To call by Vision from his Fathers house,
   His kindred and false Gods, into a Land
   Which he will shew him, and from him will raise
   A mightie Nation, and upon him showre
   His benediction so, that in his Seed
   All Nations shall be blest; hee straight obeys,
   Not knowing to what Land, yet firm believes:
   I see him, but thou canst not, with what Faith
   He leaves his Gods, his Friends, and native Soile
   Ur of Chaldaea, passing now the Ford                                130
   To Haran, after him a cumbrous Train
   Of Herds and Flocks, and numerous servitude;
   Not wandring poor, but trusting all his wealth
   With God, who call'd him, in a land unknown.
   Canaan he now attains, I see his Tents
   Pitcht about Sechem, and the neighbouring Plaine
   Of Moreb; there by promise he receaves
   Gift to his Progenie of all that Land;
   From Hamath Northward to the Desert South
   (Things by thir names I call, though yet unnam'd)                   140
   From Hermon East to the great Western Sea,
   Mount Hermon, yonder Sea, each place behold
   In prospect, as I point them; on the shoare
   Mount Carmel; here the double-founted stream
   Jordan, true limit Eastward; but his Sons
   Shall dwell to Senir, that long ridge of Hills.
   This ponder, that all Nations of the Earth
   Shall in his Seed be blessed; by that Seed
   Is meant thy great deliverer, who shall bruise
   The Serpents head; whereof to thee anon                             150
   Plainlier shall be reveald. This Patriarch blest,
   Whom Faithful Abraham due time shall call,
   A Son, and of his Son a Grand-childe leaves,
   Like him in faith, in wisdom, and renown;
   The Grandchilde with twelve Sons increast, departs
   From Canaan, to a Land hereafter call'd
   Egypt, divided by the River Nile;
   See where it flows, disgorging at seaven mouthes
   Into the Sea: to sojourn in that Land
   He comes invited by a yonger Son                                    160
   In time of dearth, a Son whose worthy deeds
   Raise him to be the second in that Realme
   Of Pharao: there he dies, and leaves his Race
   Growing into a Nation, and now grown
   Suspected to a sequent King, who seeks
   To stop thir overgrowth, as inmate guests
   Too numerous; whence of guests he makes them slaves
   Inhospitably, and kills thir infant Males:
   Till by two brethren (those two brethren call
   Moses and Aaron) sent from God to claime                            170
   His people from enthralment, they return
   With glory and spoile back to thir promis'd Land.
   But first the lawless Tyrant, who denies
   To know thir God, or message to regard,
   Must be compelld by Signes and Judgements dire;
   To blood unshed the Rivers must be turnd,
   Frogs, Lice and Flies must all his Palace fill
   With loath'd intrusion, and fill all the land;
   His Cattel must of Rot and Murren die,
   Botches and blaines must all his flesh imboss,                      180
   And all his people; Thunder mixt with Haile,
   Haile mixt with fire must rend th' Egyptian Skie
   And wheel on th' Earth, devouring where it rouls;
   What it devours not, Herb, or Fruit, or Graine,
   A darksom Cloud of Locusts swarming down
   Must eat, and on the ground leave nothing green:
   Darkness must overshadow all his bounds,
   Palpable darkness, and blot out three dayes;
   Last with one midnight stroke all the first-born
   Of Egypt must lie dead. Thus with ten wounds                        190
   This River-dragon tam'd at length submits
   To let his sojourners depart, and oft
   Humbles his stubborn heart, but still as Ice
   More hard'nd after thaw, till in his rage
   Pursuing whom he late dismissd, the Sea
   Swallows him with his Host, but them lets pass
   As on drie land between two christal walls,
   Aw'd by the rod of Moses so to stand
   Divided, till his rescu'd gain thir shoar:
   Such wondrous power God to his Saint will lend,                     200
   Though present in his Angel, who shall goe
   Before them in a Cloud, and Pillar of Fire,
   To guide them in thir journey, and remove
   Behinde them, while th' obdurat King pursues:
   All night he will pursue, but his approach
   Darkness defends between till morning Watch;
   Then through the Firey Pillar and the Cloud
   God looking forth will trouble all his Host
   And craze thir Chariot wheels: when by command
   Moses once more his potent Rod extends                              210
   Over the Sea; the Sea his Rod obeys;
   On thir imbattelld ranks the Waves return,
   And overwhelm thir Warr: the Race elect
   Safe towards Canaan from the shoar advance
   Through the wilde Desert, not the readiest way,
   Least entring on the Canaanite allarmd
   Warr terrifie them inexpert, and feare
   Return them back to Egypt, choosing rather
   Inglorious life with servitude; for life
   To noble and ignoble is more sweet                                  220
   Untraind in Armes, where rashness leads not on.
   This also shall they gain by thir delay
   In the wide Wilderness, there they shall found
   Thir government, and thir great Senate choose
   Through the twelve Tribes, to rule by Laws ordaind:
   God from the Mount of Sinai, whose gray top
   Shall tremble, he descending, will himself
   In Thunder Lightning and loud Trumpets sound
   Ordaine them Lawes; part such as appertaine
   To civil Justice, part religious Rites                              230
   Of sacrifice, informing them, by types
   And shadowes, of that destind Seed to bruise
   The Serpent, by what meanes he shall achieve
   Mankinds deliverance. But the voice of God
   To mortal eare is dreadful; they beseech
   That Moses might report to them his will,
   And terror cease; he grants them thir desire,
   Instructed that to God is no access
   Without Mediator, whose high Office now
   Moses in figure beares, to introduce                                240
   One greater, of whose day he shall foretell,
   And all the Prophets in thir Age the times
   Of great Messiah shall sing. Thus Laws and Rites
   Establisht, such delight hath God in Men
   Obedient to his will, that he voutsafes
   Among them to set up his Tabernacle,
   The holy One with mortal Men to dwell:
   By his prescript a Sanctuary is fram'd
   Of Cedar, overlaid with Gold, therein
   An Ark, and in the Ark his Testimony,                               250
   The Records of his Cov'nant, over these
   A Mercie-seat of Gold between the wings
   Of two bright Cherubim, before him burn
   Seaven Lamps as in a Zodiac representing
   The Heav'nly fires; over the Tent a Cloud
   Shall rest by Day, a fierie gleame by Night,
   Save when they journie, and at length they come,
   Conducted by his Angel to the Land
   Promisd to Abraham and his Seed: the rest
   Were long to tell, how many Battels fought,                         260
   How many Kings destroyd, and Kingdoms won,
   Or how the Sun shall in mid Heav'n stand still
   A day entire, and Nights due course adjourne,
   Mans voice commanding, Sun in Gibeon stand,
   And thou Moon in the vale of Aialon,
   Till Israel overcome; so call the third
   From Abraham, Son of Isaac, and from him
   His whole descent, who thus shall Canaan win.
   Here Adam interpos'd. O sent from Heav'n,
   Enlightner of my darkness, gracious things                          270
   Thou hast reveald, those chiefly which concerne
   Just Abraham and his Seed: now first I finde
   Mine eyes true op'ning, and my heart much eas'd,
   Erwhile perplext with thoughts what would becom
   Of mee and all Mankind; but now I see
   His day, in whom all Nations shall be blest,
   Favour unmerited by me, who sought
   Forbidd'n knowledge by forbidd'n means.
   This yet I apprehend not, why to those
   Among whom God will deigne to dwell on Earth                        280
   So many and so various Laws are giv'n;
   So many Laws argue so many sins
   Among them; how can God with such reside?
   To whom thus Michael. Doubt not but that sin
   Will reign among them, as of thee begot;
   And therefore was Law given them to evince
   Thir natural pravitie, by stirring up
   Sin against Law to fight; that when they see
   Law can discover sin, but not remove,
   Save by those shadowie expiations weak,                             290
   The bloud of Bulls and Goats, they may conclude
   Some bloud more precious must be paid for Man,
   Just for unjust, that in such righteousness
   To them by Faith imputed, they may finde
   Justification towards God, and peace
   Of Conscience, which the Law by Ceremonies
   Cannot appease, nor Man the moral part
   Perform, and not performing cannot live.
   So Law appears imperfet, and but giv'n
   With purpose to resign them in full time                            300
   Up to a better Cov'nant, disciplin'd
   From shadowie Types to Truth, from Flesh to Spirit,
   From imposition of strict Laws, to free
   Acceptance of large Grace, from servil fear
   To filial, works of Law to works of Faith.
   And therefore shall not Moses, though of God
   Highly belov'd, being but the Minister
   Of Law, his people into Canaan lead;
   But Joshua whom the Gentiles Jesus call,
   His Name and Office bearing, who shall quell                        310
   The adversarie Serpent, and bring back
   Through the worlds wilderness long wanderd man
   Safe to eternal Paradise of rest.
   Meanwhile they in thir earthly Canaan plac't
   Long time shall dwell and prosper, but when sins
   National interrupt thir public peace,
   Provoking God to raise them enemies:
   From whom as oft he saves them penitent
   By Judges first, then under Kings; of whom
   The second, both for pietie renownd                                 320
   And puissant deeds, a promise shall receive
   Irrevocable, that his Regal Throne
   For ever shall endure; the like shall sing
   All Prophecie, That of the Royal Stock
   Of David (so I name this King) shall rise
   A Son, the Womans Seed to thee foretold,
   Foretold to Abraham, as in whom shall trust
   All Nations, and to Kings foretold, of Kings
   The last, for of his Reign shall be no end.
   But first a long succession must ensue,                             330
   And his next Son for Wealth and Wisdom fam'd,
   The clouded Ark of God till then in Tents
   Wandring, shall in a glorious Temple enshrine.
   Such follow him, as shall be registerd
   Part good, part bad, of bad the longer scrowle,
   Whose foul Idolatries, and other faults
   Heapt to the popular summe, will so incense
   God, as to leave them, and expose thir Land,
   Thir Citie, his Temple, and his holy Ark
   With all his sacred things, a scorn and prey                        340
   To that proud Citie, whose high Walls thou saw'st
   Left in confusion, Babylon thence call'd.
   There in captivitie he lets them dwell
   The space of seventie years, then brings them back,
   Remembring mercie, and his Cov'nant sworn
   To David, stablisht as the dayes of Heav'n.
   Returnd from Babylon by leave of Kings
   Thir Lords, whom God dispos'd, the house of God
   They first re-edifie, and for a while
   In mean estate live moderate, till grown                            350
   In wealth and multitude, factious they grow;
   But first among the Priests dissension springs,
   Men who attend the Altar, and should most
   Endeavour Peace: thir strife pollution brings
   Upon the Temple it self: at last they seise
   The Scepter, and regard not Davids Sons,
   Then loose it to a stranger, that the true
   Anointed King Messiah might be born
   Barr'd of his right; yet at his Birth a Starr
   Unseen before in Heav'n proclaims him com,                          360
   And guides the Eastern Sages, who enquire
   His place, to offer Incense, Myrrh, and Gold;
   His place of birth a solemn Angel tells
   To simple Shepherds, keeping watch by night;
   They gladly thither haste, and by a Quire
   Of squadrond Angels hear his Carol sung.
   A Virgin is his Mother, but his Sire
   The Power of the most High; he shall ascend
   The Throne hereditarie, and bound his Reign
   With earths wide bounds, his glory with the Heav'ns.                370
   He ceas'd, discerning Adam with such joy
   Surcharg'd, as had like grief bin dew'd in tears,
   Without the vent of words, which these he breathd.
   O Prophet of glad tidings, finisher
   Of utmost hope! now clear I understand
   What oft my steddiest thoughts have searcht in vain,
   Why our great expectation should be call'd
   The seed of Woman: Virgin Mother, Haile,
   High in the love of Heav'n, yet from my Loynes
   Thou shalt proceed, and from thy Womb the Son                       380
   Of God most High; So God with man unites.
   Needs must the Serpent now his capital bruise
   Expect with mortal paine: say where and when
   Thir fight, what stroke shall bruise the Victors heel.
   To whom thus Michael. Dream not of thir fight,
   As of a Duel, or the local wounds
   Of head or heel: not therefore joynes the Son
   Manhood to God-head, with more strength to foil
   Thy enemie; nor so is overcome
   Satan, whose fall from Heav'n, a deadlier bruise,                   390
   Disabl'd not to give thee thy deaths wound:
   Which hee, who comes thy Saviour, shall recure,
   Not by destroying Satan, but his works
   In thee and in thy Seed: nor can this be,
   But by fulfilling that which thou didst want,
   Obedience to the Law of God, impos'd
   On penaltie of death, and suffering death,
   The penaltie to thy transgression due,
   And due to theirs which out of thine will grow:
   So onely can high Justice rest appaid.                              400
   The Law of God exact he shall fulfill
   Both by obedience and by love, though love
   Alone fulfill the Law; thy punishment
   He shall endure by coming in the Flesh
   To a reproachful life and cursed death,
   Proclaiming Life to all who shall believe
   In his redemption, and that his obedience
   Imputed becomes theirs by Faith, his merits
   To save them, not thir own, though legal works.
   For this he shall live hated, be blasphem'd,                        410
   Seis'd on by force, judg'd, and to death condemnd
   A shameful and accurst, naild to the Cross
   By his own Nation, slaine for bringing Life;
   But to the Cross he nailes thy Enemies,
   The Law that is against thee, and the sins
   Of all mankinde, with him there crucifi'd,
   Never to hurt them more who rightly trust
   In this his satisfaction; so he dies,
   But soon revives, Death over him no power
   Shall long usurp; ere the third dawning light                       420
   Returne, the Starres of Morn shall see him rise
   Out of his grave, fresh as the dawning light,
   Thy ransom paid, which Man from death redeems,
   His death for Man, as many as offerd Life
   Neglect not, and the benefit imbrace
   By Faith not void of works: this God-like act
   Annuls thy doom, the death thou shouldst have dy'd,
   In sin for ever lost from life; this act
   Shall bruise the head of Satan, crush his strength
   Defeating Sin and Death, his two maine armes,                       430
   And fix farr deeper in his head thir stings
   Then temporal death shall bruise the Victors heel,
   Or theirs whom he redeems, a death like sleep,
   A gentle wafting to immortal Life.
   Nor after resurrection shall he stay
   Longer on Earth then certaine times to appeer
   To his Disciples, Men who in his Life
   Still follow'd him; to them shall leave in charge
   To teach all nations what of him they learn'd
   And his Salvation, them who shall beleeve                           440
   Baptizing in the profluent streame, the signe
   Of washing them from guilt of sin to Life
   Pure, and in mind prepar'd, if so befall,
   For death, like that which the redeemer dy'd.
   All Nations they shall teach; for from that day
   Not onely to the Sons of Abrahams Loines
   Salvation shall be Preacht, but to the Sons
   Of Abrahams Faith wherever through the world;
   So in his seed all Nations shall be blest.
   Then to the Heav'n of Heav'ns he shall ascend                       450
   With victory, triumphing through the aire
   Over his foes and thine; there shall surprise
   The Serpent, Prince of aire, and drag in Chaines
   Through all his realme, & there confounded leave;
   Then enter into glory, and resume
   His Seat at Gods right hand, exalted high
   Above all names in Heav'n; and thence shall come,
   When this worlds dissolution shall be ripe,
   With glory and power to judge both quick & dead,
   To judge th' unfaithful dead, but to reward                         460
   His faithful, and receave them into bliss,
   Whether in Heav'n or Earth, for then the Earth
   Shall all be Paradise, far happier place
   Then this of Eden, and far happier daies.
   So spake th' Archangel Michael, then paus'd,
   As at the Worlds great period; and our Sire
   Replete with joy and wonder thus repli'd.
   O goodness infinite, goodness immense!
   That all this good of evil shall produce,
   And evil turn to good; more wonderful                               470
   Then that which by creation first brought forth
   Light out of darkness! full of doubt I stand,
   Whether I should repent me now of sin
   By mee done and occasiond, or rejoyce
   Much more, that much more good thereof shall spring,
   To God more glory, more good will to Men
   From God, and over wrauth grace shall abound.
   But say, if our deliverer up to Heav'n
   Must reascend, what will betide the few
   His faithful, left among th' unfaithful herd,                       480
   The enemies of truth; who then shall guide
   His people, who defend? will they not deale
   Wors with his followers then with him they dealt?
   Be sure they will, said th' Angel; but from Heav'n
   Hee to his own a Comforter will send,
   The promise of the Father, who shall dwell
   His Spirit within them, and the Law of Faith
   Working through love, upon thir hearts shall write,
   To guide them in all truth, and also arme
   With spiritual Armour, able to resist                               490
   Satans assaults, and quench his fierie darts
   What Man can do against them, not affraid,
   Though to the death, against such cruelties
   With inward consolations recompenc't,
   And oft supported so as shall amaze
   Thir proudest persecuters: for the Spirit
   Powrd first on his Apostles, whom he sends
   To evangelize the Nations, then on all
   Baptiz'd, shall them with wondrous gifts endue
   To speak all Tongues, and do all Miracles,                          500
   As did thir Lord before them. Thus they win
   Great numbers of each Nation to receave
   With joy the tidings brought from Heav'n: at length
   Thir Ministry perform'd, and race well run,
   Thir doctrine and thir story written left,
   They die; but in thir room, as they forewarne,
   Wolves shall succeed for teachers, grievous Wolves,
   Who all the sacred mysteries of Heav'n
   To thir own vile advantages shall turne
   Of lucre and ambition, and the truth                                510
   With superstitions and traditions taint,
   Left onely in those written Records pure,
   Though not but by the Spirit understood.
   Then shall they seek to avail themselves of names,
   Places and titles, and with these to joine
   Secular power, though feigning still to act
   By spiritual, to themselves appropriating
   The Spirit of God, promisd alike and giv'n
   To all Beleevers; and from that pretense,
   Spiritual Lawes by carnal power shall force                         520
   On every conscience; Laws which none shall finde
   Left them inrould, or what the Spirit within
   Shall on the heart engrave. What will they then
   But force the Spirit of Grace it self, and binde
   His consort Libertie; what, but unbuild
   His living Temples, built by Faith to stand,
   Thir own Faith not anothers: for on Earth
   Who against Faith and Conscience can be heard
   Infallible? yet many will presume:
   Whence heavie persecution shall arise                               530
   On all who in the worship persevere
   Of Spirit and Truth; the rest, farr greater part,
   Will deem in outward Rites and specious formes
   Religion satisfi'd; Truth shall retire
   Bestuck with slandrous darts, and works of Faith
   Rarely be found: so shall the World goe on,
   To good malignant, to bad men benigne,
   Under her own waight groaning, till the day
   Appeer of respiration to the just,
   And vengeance to the wicked, at return                              540
   Of him so lately promis'd to thy aid,
   The Womans seed, obscurely then foretold,
   Now amplier known thy Saviour and thy Lord,
   Last in the Clouds from Heav'n to be reveald
   In glory of the Father, to dissolve
   Satan with his perverted World, then raise
   From the conflagrant mass, purg'd and refin'd,
   New Heav'ns, new Earth, Ages of endless date
   Founded in righteousness and peace and love,
   To bring forth fruits Joy and eternal Bliss.                        550
   He ended; and thus Adam last reply'd.
   How soon hath thy prediction, Seer blest,
   Measur'd this transient World, the Race of time,
   Till time stand fixt: beyond is all abyss,
   Eternitie, whose end no eye can reach.
   Greatly instructed I shall hence depart,
   Greatly in peace of thought, and have my fill
   Of knowledge, what this vessel can containe;
   Beyond which was my folly to aspire.
   Henceforth I learne, that to obey is best,                          560
   And love with feare the onely God, to walk
   As in his presence, ever to observe
   His providence, and on him sole depend,
   Merciful over all his works, with good
   Still overcoming evil, and by small
   Accomplishing great things, by things deemd weak
   Subverting worldly strong, and worldly wise
   By simply meek; that suffering for Truths sake
   Is fortitude to highest victorie,
   And to the faithful Death the Gate of Life;                         570
   Taught this by his example whom I now
   Acknowledge my Redeemer ever blest.
   To whom thus also th' Angel last repli'd:
   This having learnt, thou hast attaind the summe
   Of wisdom; hope no higher, though all the Starrs
   Thou knewst by name, and all th' ethereal Powers,
   All secrets of the deep, all Natures works,
   Or works of God in Heav'n, Air, Earth, or Sea,
   And all the riches of this World enjoydst,
   And all the rule, one Empire; onely add                             580
   Deeds to thy knowledge answerable, add Faith,
   Add Vertue, Patience, Temperance, add Love,
   By name to come call'd Charitie, the soul
   Of all the rest: then wilt thou not be loath
   To leave this Paradise, but shalt possess
   A Paradise within thee, happier farr.
   Let us descend now therefore from this top
   Of Speculation; for the hour precise
   Exacts our parting hence; and see the Guards,
   By mee encampt on yonder Hill, expect                               590
   Thir motion, at whose Front a flaming Sword,
   In signal of remove, waves fiercely round;
   We may no longer stay: go, waken Eve;
   Her also I with gentle Dreams have calm'd
   Portending good, and all her spirits compos'd
   To meek submission: thou at season fit
   Let her with thee partake what thou hast heard,
   Chiefly what may concern her Faith to know,
   The great deliverance by her Seed to come
   (For by the Womans Seed) on all Mankind.                            600
   That ye may live, which will be many dayes,
   Both in one Faith unanimous though sad,
   With cause for evils past, yet much more cheer'd
   With meditation on the happie end.
   He ended, and they both descend the Hill;
   Descended, Adam to the Bowre where Eve
   Lay sleeping ran before, but found her wak't;
   And thus with words not sad she him receav'd.
   Whence thou returnst, & whither wentst, I know;
   For God is also in sleep, and Dreams advise,                        610
   Which he hath sent propitious, some great good
   Presaging, since with sorrow and hearts distress
   Wearied I fell asleep: but now lead on;
   In mee is no delay; with thee to goe,
   Is to stay here; without thee here to stay,
   Is to go hence unwilling; thou to mee
   Art all things under Heav'n, all places thou,
   Who for my wilful crime art banisht hence.
   This further consolation yet secure
   I carry hence; though all by mee is lost,                           620
   Such favour I unworthie am voutsaft,
   By mee the Promis'd Seed shall all restore.
   So spake our Mother Eve, and Adam heard
   Well pleas'd, but answer'd not; for now too nigh
   Th' Archangel stood, and from the other Hill
   To thir fixt Station, all in bright array
   The Cherubim descended; on the ground
   Gliding meteorous, as Ev'ning Mist
   Ris'n from a River o're the marish glides,
   And gathers ground fast at the Labourers heel                       630
   Homeward returning. High in Front advanc't,
   The brandisht Sword of God before them blaz'd
   Fierce as a Comet; which with torrid heat,
   And vapour as the Libyan Air adust,
   Began to parch that temperate Clime; whereat
   In either hand the hastning Angel caught
   Our lingring Parents, and to th' Eastern Gate
   Let them direct, and down the Cliff as fast
   To the subjected Plaine; then disappeer'd.
   They looking back, all th' Eastern side beheld                      640
   Of Paradise, so late thir happie seat,
   Wav'd over by that flaming Brand, the Gate
   With dreadful Faces throng'd and fierie Armes:
   Som natural tears they drop'd, but wip'd them soon;
   The World was all before them, where to choose
   Thir place of rest, and Providence thir guide:
   They hand in hand with wandring steps and slow,
   Through Eden took thir solitarie way.
 
   Notes:
   Argument:  The Angel.... seed] Thence from the Flood relates,
   and by degrees explains who that seed 1667.
   1-5 These five lines were added in the Second Edition (1674) when
   the original tenth book was divided into an eleventh and twelfth.
 
   The End.
 
 
 
 Transcriber's Note: Title page of first edition of Paradise
 Regained follows:
 
 
                            PARADISE
                            REGAIND.
                               A
                              POEM.
                           In IV BOOKS
                        To which is added
                        SAMSON AGONISTES
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                           The Author
                           JOHN MILTON
   ------------------------------------------------------------
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                             LONDON.
              Printed by J.M. for John Starkey at the
               Mitre in Fleetstreet, near Temple-Bar.
                             MDCLXXI
 
 
 
 
 PARADISE REGAIN'D.
 
 
 
 
 The First Book.
 
 
   I WHO e're while the happy Garden sung,
   By one mans disobedience lost, now sing
   Recover'd Paradise to all mankind,
   By one mans firm obedience fully tri'd
   Through all temptation, and the Tempter foil'd
   In all his wiles, defeated and repuls't,
   And Eden rais'd in the wast Wilderness.
   Thou Spirit who ledst this glorious Eremite
   Into the Desert, his Victorious Field
   Against the Spiritual Foe, and broughtst him thence                  10
   By proof the undoubted Son of God, inspire,
   As thou art wont, my prompted Song else mute,
   And bear through highth or depth of natures bounds
   With prosperous wing full summ'd to tell of deeds
   Above Heroic, though in secret done,
   And unrecorded left through many an Age,
   Worthy t' have not remain'd so long unsung.
   Now had the great Proclaimer with a voice
   More awful then the sound of Trumpet, cri'd
   Repentance, and Heavens Kingdom nigh at hand                         20
   To all Baptiz'd: to his great Baptism flock'd
   With aw the Regions round, and with them came
   From Nazareth the Son of Joseph deem'd
   To the flood Jordan, came as then obscure,
   Unmarkt, unknown; but him the Baptist soon
   Descri'd, divinely warn'd, and witness bore
   As to his worthier, and would have resign'd
   To him his Heavenly Office, nor was long
   His witness unconfirm'd: on him baptiz'd
   Heaven open'd, and in likeness of a Dove                             30
   The Spirit descended, while the Fathers voice
   From Heav'n pronounc'd him his beloved Son
   That heard the Adversary, who roving still
   About the world, at that assembly fam'd
   Would not be last, and with the voice divine
   Nigh Thunder-struck, th' exalted man, to whom
   Such high attest was giv'n, a while survey'd
   With wonder, then with envy fraught and rage
   Flies to his place, nor rests, but in mid air
   To Councel summons all his mighty Peers,                             40
   Within thick Clouds and dark ten-fold involv'd,
   A gloomy Consistory; and them amidst
   With looks agast and sad he thus bespake.
   O ancient Powers of Air and this wide world,
   For much more willingly I mention Air,
   This our old Conquest, then remember Hell
   Our hated habitation; well ye know
   How many Ages, as the years of men,
   This Universe we have possest, and rul'd
   In manner at our will th' affairs of Earth,                          50
   Since Adam and his facil consort Eve
   Lost Paradise deceiv'd by me, though since
   With dread attending when that fatal wound
   Shall be inflicted by the Seed of Eve
   Upon my head, long the decrees of Heav'n
   Delay, for longest time to him is short;
   And now too soon for us the circling hours
   This dreaded time have compast, wherein we
   Must bide the stroak of that long threatn'd wound,
   At least if so we can, and by the head                               60
   Broken be not intended all our power
   To be infring'd, our freedom and our being
   In this fair Empire won of Earth and Air;
   For this ill news I bring, the Womans seed
   Destin'd to this, is late of woman born,
   His birth to our just fear gave no small cause,
   But his growth now to youths full flowr, displaying
   All vertue, grace and wisdom to atchieve
   Things highest, greatest, multiplies my fear.
   Before him a great Prophet, to proclaim                              70
   His coming is sent Harbinger, who all
   Invites, and in the Consecrated stream
   Pretends to wash off sin and fit them so
   Purified to receive him pure, or rather
   To do him honour as their King; all come,
   And he himself among them was baptiz'd,
   Not thence to be more pure, but to receive
   The testimony of Heaven, that who he is
   Thenceforth the Nations may not doubt; I saw
   The Prophet do him reverence, on him rising                          80
   Out of the water, Heav'n above the Clouds
   Unfold her Crystal Dores, thence on his head
   A perfect Dove descend, what e're it meant
   And out of Heav'n the Sov'raign voice I heard,
   This is my Son belov'd, in him am pleas'd.
   His Mother then is mortal, but his Sire,
   He who obtains the Monarchy of Heav'n,
   And what will he not do to advance his Son?
   His first-begot we know, and sore have felt,
   When his fierce thunder drove us to the deep;                        90
   Who this is we must learn, for man he seems
   In all his lineaments, though in his face
   The glimpses of his Fathers glory shine.
   Ye see our danger on the utmost edge
   Of hazard, which admits no long debate,
   But must with something sudden be oppos'd,
   Not force, but well couch't fraud, well woven snares,
   E're in the head of Nations he appear
   Their King, their Leader, and Supream on Earth.
   I, when no other durst, sole undertook                              100
   The dismal expedition to find out
   And ruine Adam, and the exploit perform'd
   Successfully; a calmer voyage now
   Will waft me; and the way found prosperous once
   Induces best to hope of like success.
   He ended, and his words impression left
   Of much amazement to th' infernal Crew,
   Distracted and surpriz'd with deep dismay
   At these sad tidings; but no time was then
   For long indulgence to their fears or grief:                        110
   Unanimous they all commit the care
   And management of this main enterprize
   To him their great Dictator, whose attempt
   At first against mankind so well had thriv'd
   In Adam's overthrow, and led thir march
   From Hell's deep-vaulted Den to dwell in light,
   Regents and Potentates, and Kings, yea gods
   Of many a pleasant Realm and Province wide.
   So to the Coast of Jordan he directs
   His easie steps; girded with snaky wiles,                           120
   Where he might likeliest find this new-declar'd,
   This man of men, attested Son of God,
   Temptation and all guile on him to try;
   So to subvert whom he suspected rais'd
   To end his Raign on Earth so long enjoy'd:
   But contrary unweeting he fulfill'd
   The purpos'd Counsel pre-ordain'd and fixt
   Of the most High, who in full frequence bright
   Of Angels, thus to Gabriel smiling spake.
   Gabriel this day by proof thou shalt behold,                        130
   Thou and all Angels conversant on Earth
   With man or mens affairs, how I begin
   To verifie that solemn message late,
   On which I sent thee to the Virgin pure
   In Galilee, that she should bear a Son
   Great in Renown, and call'd the Son of God;
   Then toldst her doubting how these things could be
   To her a Virgin, that on her should come
   The Holy Ghost, and the power of the highest
   O're-shadow her: this man born and now up-grown,                    140
   To shew him worthy of his birth divine
   And high prediction, henceforth I expose
   To Satan; let him tempt and now assay
   His utmost subtilty, because he boasts
   And vaunts of his great cunning to the throng
   Of his Apostasie; he might have learnt
   Less over-weening, since he fail'd in Job,
   Whose constant perseverance overcame
   Whate're his cruel malice could invent.
   He now shall know I can produce a man                               150
   Of female Seed, far abler to resist
   All his sollicitations, and at length
   All his vast force, and drive him back to Hell,
   Winning by Conquest what the first man lost
   By fallacy surpriz'd.  But first I mean
   To exercise him in the Wilderness,
   There he shall first lay down the rudiments
   Of his great warfare, e're I send him forth
   To conquer Sin and Death the two grand foes,
   By Humiliation and strong Sufferance:                               160
   His weakness shall o'recome Satanic strength
   And all the world, and mass of sinful flesh;
   That all the Angels and Aetherial Powers,
   They now, and men hereafter may discern,
   From what consummate vertue I have chose
   This perfect Man, by merit call'd my Son,
   To earn Salvation for the Sons of men.
   So spake the Eternal Father, and all Heaven
   Admiring stood a space, then into Hymns
   Burst forth, and in Celestial measures mov'd,                       170
   Circling the Throne and Singing, while the hand
   Sung with the voice, and this the argument.
   Victory and Triumph to the Son of God
   Now entring his great duel, not of arms,
   But to vanquish by wisdom hellish wiles.
   The Father knows the Son; therefore secure
   Ventures his filial Vertue, though untri'd,
   Against whate're may tempt, whate're seduce,
   Allure, or terrifie, or undermine.
   Be frustrate all ye stratagems of Hell,                             180
   And devilish machinations come to nought.
   So they in Heav'n their Odes and Vigils tun'd:
   Mean while the Son of God, who yet some days
   Lodg'd in Bethabara where John baptiz'd,
   Musing and much revolving in his brest,
   How best the mighty work he might begin
   Of Saviour to mankind, and which way first
   Publish his God-like office now mature,
   One day forth walk'd alone, the Spirit leading;
   And his deep thoughts, the better to converse                       190
   With solitude, till far from track of men,
   Thought following thought, and step by step led on,
   He entred now the bordering Desert wild,
   And with dark shades and rocks environ'd round,
   His holy Meditations thus persu'd.
   O what a multitude of thoughts at once
   Awakn'd in me swarm, while I consider
   What from within I feel my self and hear
   What from without comes often to my ears,
   Ill sorting with my present state compar'd.                         200
   When I was yet a child, no childish play
   To me was pleasing, all my mind was set
   Serious to learn and know, and thence to do
   What might be publick good; my self I thought
   Born to that end, born to promote all truth,
   All righteous things: therefore above my years,
   The Law of God I read, and found it sweet,
   Made it my whole delight, and in it grew
   To such perfection, that e're yet my age
   Had measur'd twice six years, at our great Feast                    210
   I went into the Temple, there to hear
   The Teachers of our Law, and to propose
   What might improve my knowledge or their own;
   And was admir'd by all, yet this not all
   To which my Spirit aspir'd, victorious deeds
   Flam'd in my heart, heroic acts, one while
   To rescue Israel from the Roman yoke,
   Thence to subdue and quell o're all the earth
   Brute violence and proud Tyrannick pow'r,
   Till truth were freed, and equity restor'd:                        220
   Yet held it more humane, more heavenly first
   By winning words to conquer willing hearts,
   And make perswasion do the work of fear;
   At least to try, and teach the erring Soul
   Not wilfully mis-doing, but unware
   Misled: the stubborn only to subdue.
   These growing thoughts my Mother soon perceiving
   By words at times cast forth inly rejoyc'd,
   And said to me apart, high are thy thoughts
   O Son, but nourish them and let them soar                           230
   To what highth sacred vertue and true worth
   Can raise them, though above example high;
   By matchless Deeds express thy matchless Sire.
   For know, thou art no Son of mortal man,
   Though men esteem thee low of Parentage,
   Thy Father is the Eternal King, who rules
   All Heaven and Earth, Angels and Sons of men,
   A messenger from God fore-told thy birth
   Conceiv'd in me a Virgin, he fore-told
   Thou shouldst be great and sit on David's Throne.                   240
   And of thy Kingdom there should be no end.
   At thy Nativity a glorious Quire
   Of Angels in the fields of Bethlehem sung
   To Shepherds watching at their folds by night,
   And told them the Messiah now was born,
   Where they might see him, and to thee they came;
   Directed to the Manger where thou lais't,
   For in the Inn was left no better room:
   A Star, not seen before in Heaven appearing
   Guided the Wise Men thither from the East,                          250
   To honour thee with Incense, Myrrh, and Gold,
   By whose bright course led on they found the place,
   Affirming it thy Star new grav'n in Heaven,
   By which they knew thee King of Israel born.
   Just Simeon and Prophetic Anna, warn'd
   By Vision, found thee in the Temple, and spake
   Before the Altar and the vested Priest,
   Like things of thee to all that present stood.
   This having heard, strait I again revolv'd
   The Law and Prophets, searching what was writ                       260
   Concerning the Messiah, to our Scribes
   Known partly, and soon found of whom they spake
   I am; this chiefly, that my way must lie
   Through many a hard assay even to the death,
   E're I the promis'd Kingdom can attain,
   Or work redemption for mankind, whose sins
   Full weight must be transferr'd upon my head.
   Yet neither thus disheartn'd or dismay'd,
   The time prefixt I waited, when behold
   The Baptist, (of whose birth I oft had heard,                       270
   Not knew by sight) now come, who was to come
   Before Messiah and his way prepare.
   I as all others to his Baptism came,
   Which I believ'd was from above; but he
   Strait knew me, and with loudest voice proclaim'd
   Me him (for it was shew'n him so from Heaven)
   Me him whose Harbinger he was; and first
   Refus'd on me his Baptism to confer,
   As much his greater, and was hardly won;
   But as I rose out of the laving stream,                             280
   Heaven open'd her eternal doors, from whence
   The Spirit descended on me like a Dove,
   And last the sum of all, my Father's voice,
   Audibly heard from Heav'n, pronounc'd me his,
   Me his beloved Son, in whom alone
   He was well pleas'd; by which I knew the time
   Now full, that I no more should live obscure,
   But openly begin, as best becomes
   The Authority which I deriv'd from Heaven.
   And now by some strong motion I am led                              290
   Into this wilderness, to what intent
   I learn not yet, perhaps I need not know;
   For what concerns my knowledge God reveals.
   So spake our Morning Star then in his rise,
   And looking round on every side beheld
   A pathless Desert, dusk with horrid shades;
   The way he came not having mark'd, return
   Was difficult, by humane steps untrod;
   And he still on was led, but with such thoughts
   Accompanied of things past and to come                              300
   Lodg'd in his brest, as well might recommend
   Such Solitude before choicest Society.
   Full forty days he pass'd, whether on hill
   Sometimes, anon in shady vale, each night
   Under the covert of some ancient Oak,
   Or Cedar, to defend him from the dew,
   Or harbour'd in one Cave, is not reveal'd;
   Nor tasted humane food, nor hunger felt
   Till those days ended, hunger'd then at last
   Among wild Beasts: they at his sight grew mild,                    310
   Nor sleeping him nor waking harm'd, his walk
   The fiery Serpent fled, and noxious Worm,
   The Lion and fierce Tiger glar'd aloof.
   But now an aged man in Rural weeds,
   Following, as seem'd, the quest of some stray Ewe,
   Or wither'd sticks to gather; which might serve
   Against a Winters day when winds blow keen,
   To warm him wet return'd from field at Eve,
   He saw approach, who first with curious eye
   Perus'd him, then with words thus utt'red spake.                    320
   Sir, what ill chance hath brought thee to this place
   So far from path or road of men, who pass
   In Troop or Caravan, for single  none
   Durst ever, who return'd, and dropt not here
   His Carcass,  pin'd with hunger and with droughth?
   I ask the rather and the more admire,
   For that to me thou seem'st the man, whom late
   Our new baptizing Prophet at the Ford
   Of Jordan honour'd so, and call'd thee Son
   Of God: I saw and heard, for we sometimes                           330
   Who dwell this wild, constrain'd by want, come forth
   To Town or Village nigh (nighest is far)
   Where ought we hear, and curious are to hear,
   What happ'ns new; Fame also finds us out.
   To whom the Son of God.  Who brought me hither
   Will bring me hence, no other Guide I seek,
   By Miracle he may, reply'd the Swain,
   What other way I see not, for we here
   Live on tough roots and stubs, to thirst inur'd
   More then the Camel, and to drink go far,                           340
   Men to much misery and hardship born;
   But if thou be the Son of God, Command
   That out of these hard stones be made thee bread;
   So shalt thou save thy self and us relieve
   With Food, whereof we wretched seldom taste.
   He ended, and the Son of God reply'd.
   Think'st thou such force in Bread? is it not written
   (For I discern thee other then thou seem'st)
   Man lives not by Bread only, but each Word
   Proceeding from the mouth of God; who fed                           350
   Our Fathers here with Manna; in the Mount
   Moses was forty days, nor eat nor drank,
   And forty days Eliah without food
   Wandred this barren waste, the same I now:
   Why dost thou then suggest to me distrust,
   Knowing who I am, as I know who thou art?
   Whom thus answer'd th' Arch Fiend now undisguis'd.
   'Tis true, I am that Spirit unfortunate,
   Who leagu'd with millions more in rash revolt
   Kept not my happy Station, but was driv'n                           360
   With them from bliss to the bottomless deep,
   Vet to that hideous place not so confin'd
   By rigour unconniving, but that oft
   Leaving my dolorous Prison I enjoy
   Large liberty to round this Globe of Earth,
   Or range in th' Air, nor from the Heav'n of Heav'ns
   Hath he excluded my resort sometimes.
   I came among the Sons of God, when he
   Gave up into my hands Uzzean Job
   To prove him, and illustrate his high worth;                        370
   And when to all his Angels he propos'd
   To draw the proud King Ahab into fraud
   That he might fall in Ramoth, they demurring,
   I undertook that office, and the tongues
   Of all his flattering Prophets glibb'd with lyes
   To his destruction, as I had in charge.
   For what he bids I do; though I have lost
   Much lustre of my native brightness, lost
   To be belov'd of God, I have not lost
   To love, at least contemplate and admire                            380
   What I see excellent in good, or fair,
   Or vertuous, I should so have lost all sense.
   What can be then less in me then desire
   To see thee and approach thee, whom I know
   Declar'd the Son of God, to hear attent
   Thy wisdom, and behold thy God-like deeds?
   Men generally think me much a foe
   To all mankind: why should I? they to me
   Never did wrong or violence, by them
   I lost not what I lost, rather by them                              390
   I gain'd what I have gain'd, and with them dwell
   Copartner in these Regions of the World,
   If not disposer; lend them oft my aid,
   Oft my advice by presages and signs,
   And answers, oracles, portents and dreams,
   Whereby they may direct their future life.
   Envy they say excites me, thus to gain
   Companions of my misery and wo.
   At first it may be; but long since with wo
   Nearer acquainted, now I feel by proof,                             400
   That fellowship in pain divides not smart,
   Nor lightens aught each mans peculiar load.
   Small consolation then, were Man adjoyn'd:
   This wounds me most (what can it less) that Man,
   Man fall'n shall be restor'd, I never more.
   To whom our Saviour sternly thus reply'd.
   Deservedly thou griev'st, compos'd of lyes
   From the beginning, and in lies wilt end;
   Who boast'st release from Hell, and leave to come
   Into the Heav'n of Heavens; thou com'st indeed,                     410
   As a poor miserable captive thrall,
   Comes to the place where he before had sat
   Among the Prime in Splendour, now depos'd,
   Ejected, emptyed, gaz'd, unpityed, shun'd,
   A spectacle of ruin or of scorn
   To all the Host of Heaven; the happy place
   Imparts to thee no happiness, no joy,
   Rather inflames thy torment, representing
   Lost bliss, to thee no more communicable,
   So never more in Hell then when in Heaven.                          420
   But thou art serviceable to Heaven's King.
   Wilt thou impute to obedience what thy fear
   Extorts, or pleasure to do ill excites?
   What but thy malice mov'd thee to misdeem
   Of righteous Job, then cruelly to afflict him
   With all inflictions, but his patience won?
   The other service was thy chosen task,
   To be a lyer in four hundred mouths;
   For lying is thy sustenance, thy food.
   Yet thou pretend'st to truth; all Oracles                           430
   By thee are giv'n, and what confest more true
   Among the Nations? that hath been thy craft,
   By mixing somewhat true to vent more lyes.
   But what have been thy answers, what but dark
   Ambiguous and with double sense deluding,
   Which they who ask'd have seldom understood,
   And not well understood as good not known?
   Who ever by consulting at thy shrine
   Return'd the wiser, or the more instruct
   To flye or follow what concern'd him most,                          440
   And run not sooner to his fatal snare?
   For God hath justly giv'n the Nations up
   To thy Delusions; justly, since they fell
   Idolatrous, but when his purpose is
   Among them to declare his Providence
   To thee not known, whence hast thou then thy truth,
   But from him or his Angels President
   In every Province, who themselves disdaining
   To approach thy Temples, give thee in command
   What to the smallest tittle thou shalt say                          450
   To thy Adorers; thou with trembling fear,
   Or like a Fawning Parasite obey'st;
   Then to thy self ascrib'st the truth fore-told.
   But this thy glory shall be soon retrench'd;
   No more shalt thou by oracling abuse
   The Gentiles; henceforth Oracles are ceast,
   And thou no more with Pomp and Sacrifice
   Shalt be enquir'd at Delphos or elsewhere,
   At least in vain, for they shall find thee mute.
   God hath now sent his living Oracle                                 460
   Into the World, to teach his final will,
   And sends his Spirit of Truth henceforth to dwell
   In pious Hearts, an inward Oracle
   To all truth requisite for men to know.
   So spake our Saviour; but the subtle Fiend,
   Though inly stung with anger and disdain,
   Dissembl'd, and this answer smooth return'd.
   Sharply thou hast insisted on rebuke,
   And urg'd me hard with doings, which not will
   But misery hath rested from me; where                               470
   Easily canst thou find one miserable,
   And not inforc'd oft-times to part from truth;
   If it may stand him more in stead to lye,
   Say and unsay, feign, flatter, or abjure?
   But thou art plac't above me, thou art Lord;
   From thee I can and must submiss endure
   Check or reproof, and glad to scape so quit.
   Hard are the ways of truth, and rough to walk,
   Smooth on the tongue discourst, pleasing to th' ear,
   And tuneable as Silvan Pipe or Song;                               480
   What wonder then if I delight to hear
   Her dictates from thy mouth? most men admire
   Vertue, who follow not her lore: permit me
   To hear thee when I come (since no man comes)
   And talk at least, though I despair to attain.
   Thy Father, who is holy, wise and pure,
   Suffers the Hypocrite or Atheous Priest
   To tread his Sacred Courts, and minister
   About his Altar, handling holy things,
   Praying or vowing, and vouchsaf'd his voice                         490
   To Balaam reprobate, a Prophet yet
   Inspir'd; disdain not such access to me.
   To whom our Saviour with unalter'd brow
   Thy coming hither, though I know thy scope,
   I bid not or forbid; do as thou find'st
   Permission from above; thou canst not more.
   He added not; and Satan bowing low
   His gray dissimulation, disappear'd
   Into thin Air diffus'd: for now began
   Night with her sullen wing to double-shade                          500
   The Desert Fowls in thir clay nests were couch't;
   And now wild Beasts came forth the woods to roam.
 
   The End of the First Book.
 
 
 
 
 The Second Book.
 
 
   MEAN while the new-baptiz'd, who yet remain'd
   At Jordan with the Baptist, and had seen
   Him whom they heard so late expresly call'd
   Jesus Messiah Son of God declar'd,
   And on that high Authority had believ'd,
   And with him talkt, and with him lodg'd, I mean
   Andrew and Simon, famous after known
   With others though in Holy Writ not nam'd,
   Now missing him thir joy so lately found,
   So lately found, and so abruptly gone,                               10
   Began to doubt, and doubted many days,
   And as the days increas'd, increas'd thir doubt:
   Sometimes they thought he might be only shewn,
   And for a time caught up to God, as once
   Moses was in the Mount, and missing long;
   And the great Thisbite who on fiery wheels
   Rode up to Heaven, yet once again to come.
   Therefore as those young Prophets then with care
   Sought lost Eliah, so in each place these
   Nigh to Bethabara; in Jerico                                         20
   The City of Palms, Aenon, and Salem Old,
   Machaerus and each Town or City wall'd
   On this side the broad lake Genezaret
   Or in Perea, but return'd in vain.
   Then on the bank of Jordan, by a Creek:
   Where winds with Reeds, and Osiers whisp'ring play
   Plain Fishermen, no greater men them call,
   Close in a Cottage low together got
   Thir unexpected loss and plaints out breath'd.
   Alas from what high hope to what relapse                             30
   Unlook'd for are we fall'n, our eyes beheld
   Messiah certainly now come, so long
   Expected of our Fathers; we have heard
   His words, his wisdom full of grace and truth,
   Now, now, for sure, deliverance is at hand,
   The Kingdom shall to Israel be restor'd:
   Thus we rejoyc'd, but soon our joy is turn'd
   Into perplexity and new amaze:
   For whither is he gone, what accident
   Hath rapt him from us? will he now retire                            40
   After appearance, and again prolong
   Our expectation?  God of Israel,
   Send thy Messiah forth, the time is come;
   Behold the Kings of the Earth how they oppress
   Thy chosen, to what highth thir pow'r unjust
   They have exalted, and behind them cast
   All fear of thee, arise and vindicate
   Thy Glory, free thy people from thir yoke,
   But let us wait; thus far he hath perform'd,
   Sent his Anointed, and to us reveal'd him,                           50
   By his great Prophet, pointed at and shown,
   In publick, and  with him we have convers'd;
   Let us be glad of this, and all our fears
   Lay on his Providence; he will not fail
   Nor will withdraw him now, nor will recall,
   Mock us with his blest sight, then snatch him hence,
   Soon we shall see our hope, our joy return.
   Thus they out of their plaints new hope resume
   To find whom at the first they found unsought:
   But to his Mother Mary, when she saw                                 60
   Others return'd from Baptism, not her Son,
   Nor left at Jordan, tydings of him none;
   Within her brest, though calm; her brest though pure,
   Motherly cares and fears got head, and rais'd
   Some troubl'd thoughts, which she in sighs thus clad.
   O what avails me now that honour high
   To have conceiv'd of God, or that salute
   Hale highly favour'd, among women blest;
   While I to sorrows am no less advanc't,
   And fears as eminent, above the lot                                  70
   Of other women, by the birth I bore,
   In such a season born when scarce a Shed
   Could be obtain'd to shelter him or me
   From the bleak air; a Stable was our warmth,
   A Manger his, yet soon enforc't to flye
   Thence into Egypt, till the Murd'rous King
   Were dead, who sought his life, and missing fill'd
   With Infant blood the streets of Bethlehem;
   From Egypt home return'd, in Nazareth
   Hath been our dwelling many years, his life                          80
   Private, unactive, calm, contemplative,
   Little suspicious to any King; but now
   Full grown to Man, acknowledg'd, as I hear,
   By John the Baptist, and in publick shown,
   Son own'd from Heaven by his Father's voice;
   I  look't for some great change; to Honour? no,
   But trouble, as old Simeon plain foretold,
   That to the fall and rising he should be
   Of  Many in Israel, and to a sign
   Spoken against, that through my very Soul                            90
   A sword shall pierce, this is my favour'd lot,
   My Exaltation to Afflictions high;
   Afflicted I may be, it seems, and blest;
   I will not argue that, nor will repine.
   But where delays he now? some great intent
   Conceals him: when twelve years he scarce had seen,
   I lost him, but so found, as well I saw
   He could not lose himself; but went about
   His Father's business; what he meant I mus'd,
   Since understand; much more his absence now                         100
   Thus long to some great purpose he obscures.
   But I to wait with patience am inur'd;
   My heart hath been a store-house long of things
   And sayings laid up, portending strange events.
   Thus Mary pondering oft, and oft to mind
   Recalling what remarkably had pass'd
   Since first her Salutation heard, with thoughts
   Meekly compos'd awaited the fulfilling:
   The while her Son tracing the Desert wild,
   Sole but with holiest Meditations fed,                              110
   Into himself descended, and at once
   All his great work to come before him set;
   How to begin, how to accomplish best
   His end of being on Earth, and mission high:
   For Satan with slye preface to return
   Had left him vacant, and with speed was gon
   Up to the middle Region of thick Air,
   Where all his Potentates in Council sate;
   There without sign of boast, or sign of joy,
   Sollicitous and blank he thus began.                                120
   Princes, Heavens antient Sons, Aethereal Thrones,
   Demonian Spirits now, from the Element
   Each of his reign allotted, rightlier call'd,
   Powers of Fire, Air, Water, and Earth beneath,
   So may we hold our place and these mild seats
   Without new trouble; such an Enemy
   Is ris'n to invade us, who no less
   Threat'ns then our expulsion down to Hell;
   I, as I undertook, and with the vote
   Consenting in full frequence was impowr'd,                          130
   Have found him, view'd him, tasted him, but find
   Far other labour to be undergon
   Then when I dealt with Adam first of Men,
   Though Adam by his Wives allurement fell,
   However to this Man inferior far,
   If he be Man by Mothers side at least,
   With more then humane gifts from Heav'n adorn'd,
   Perfections absolute, Graces divine,
   And amplitude of mind to greatest Deeds.
   Therefore I am return'd, lest confidence                            140
   Of my success with Eve in Paradise
   Deceive ye to perswasion over-sure
   Of like succeeding here; I summon all
   Rather to be in readiness, with hand
   Or counsel to assist; lest I who erst
   Thought none my equal, now be over-match'd.
   So spake the old Serpent doubting, and from all
   With clamour was assur'd thir utmost aid
   At his command; when from amidst them rose
   Belial the dissolutest Spirit that fell                             150
   The sensuallest, and after Asmodai
   The fleshliest Incubus, and thus advis'd.
   Set women in his eye and in his walk,
   Among daughters of men the fairest found;
   Many are in each Region passing fair
   As the noon Skie; more like to Goddesses
   Then Mortal Creatures, graceful and discreet,
   Expert in amorous Arts, enchanting tongues
   Perswasive, Virgin majesty with mild
   And sweet allay'd, yet terrible to approach,                        160
   Skill'd to retire, and in retiring draw
   Hearts after them tangl'd in Amorous Nets.
   Such object hath the power to soft'n and tame
   Severest temper, smooth the rugged'st brow,
   Enerve, and with voluptuous hope dissolve,
   Draw out with credulous desire, and lead
   At will the manliest, resolutest brest,
   As the Magnetic hardest Iron draws.
   Women, when nothing else, beguil'd the heart
   Of wisest Solomon, and made him build,                              170
   And made him bow to the Gods of his Wives.
   To whom quick answer Satan thus return'd
   Belial in much uneven scale thou weigh'st
   All others by thy self; because of old
   Thou thy self doat'st on womankind, admiring
   Thir shape, thir colour, and attractive grace,
   None are, thou think'st, but taken with such toys.
   Before the Flood thou with thy lusty Crew,
   False titl'd Sons of God, roaming the Earth
   Cast wanton eyes on the daughters of men,                           180
   And coupl'd with them, and begot a race.
   Have we not seen, or by relation heard,
   In Courts and Regal Chambers how thou lurk'st,
   In Wood or Grove by mossie Fountain side,
   In Valley or Green Meadow to way-lay
   Some beauty rare, Calisto, Clymene,
   Daphne, or Semele, Antiopa,
   Or Amymone, Syrinx, many more
   Too long, then lay'st thy scapes on names ador'd,
   Apollo, Neptune, Jupiter, or Pan,                                   190
   Satyr, or Fawn, or Silvan? But these haunts
   Delight not all; among the Sons of Men,
   How many have with a smile made small account
   Of beauty and her lures, easily scorn'd
   All her assaults, on worthier things intent?
   Remember that Pellean Conquerour,
   A youth, how all the Beauties of the East
   He slightly view'd, and slightly over-pass'd;
   How hee sirnam'd of Africa dismiss'd
   In his prime youth the fair Iberian maid.                           200
   For Solomon he liv'd at ease, and full
   Of honour, wealth, high fare, aim'd not beyond
   Higher design then to enjoy his State;
   Thence to the bait of Women lay expos'd;
   But he whom we attempt is wiser far
   Then Solomon, of more exalted mind,
   Made and set wholly on the accomplishment
   Of greatest things; what woman will you find,
   Though of this Age the wonder and the fame,
   On whom his leisure will vouchsafe an eye                           210
   Of fond desire? or should she confident,
   As sitting Queen ador'd on Beauties Throne,
   Descend with all her winning charms begirt
   To enamour, as the Zone of Venus once
   Wrought that effect on Jove, so Fables tell;
   How would one look from his Majestick brow
   Seated as on the top of Vertues hill,
   Discount'nance her despis'd, and put to rout
   All her array; her female pride deject,
   Or turn to reverent awe? for Beauty stands                          220
   In the admiration only of weak minds
   Led captive; cease to admire, and all her Plumes
   Fall flat and shrink into a trivial toy,
   At every sudden slighting quite abasht:
   Therefore with manlier objects we must try
   His constancy, with such as have more shew
   Of worth, of honour, glory, and popular praise;
   Rocks whereon greatest men have oftest wreck'd;
   Or that which only seems to satisfie
   Lawful desires of Nature, not beyond;                               230
   And now I know he hungers where no food
   Is to be found, in the wide Wilderness;
   The rest commit to me, I shall let pass
   No advantage, and his strength as oft assay.
   He ceas'd, and heard thir grant in loud acclaim;
   Then forthwith to him takes a chosen band
   Of Spirits likest to himself in guile
   To be at hand, and at his beck appear,
   If cause were to unfold some active Scene
   Of various persons each to know his part;                           240
   Then to the Desert takes with these his flight;
   Where still from shade to shade the Son of God
   After forty days fasting had remain'd,
   Now hungring first, and to himself thus said.
   Where will this end? four times ten days I have pass'd
   Wandring this woody maze, and humane food
   Nor tasted, nor had appetite: that Fast
   To Vertue I impute not, or count part
   Of what I suffer here; if Nature need not,
   Or God support Nature without repast                                250
   Though needing, what praise is it to endure?
   But now I feel I hunger, which declares,
   Nature hath need of what she asks; yet God
   Can satisfie that need some other way,
   Though hunger still remain: so it remain
   Without this bodies wasting, I content me,
   And from the sting of Famine fear no harm,
   Nor mind it, fed with better thoughts that feed
   Mee hungring more to do my Fathers will.
   It was the hour of night, when thus the Son                         260
   Commun'd in silent walk, then laid him down
   Under the hospitable covert nigh
   Of Trees thick interwoven; there he slept,
   And dream'd, as appetite is wont to dream,
   Of meats and drinks, Natures refreshment sweet;
   Him thought, he by the Brook of Cherith stood
   And saw the Ravens with thir horny beaks
   Food to Elijah bringing Even and Morn,
   Though ravenous, taught to abstain from what they brought:
   He saw the Prophet also how he fled                                 270
   Into the Desert, and how there he slept
   Under a Juniper; then how awakt,
   He found his Supper on the coals prepar'd,
   And by the Angel was bid rise and eat,
   And eat the second time after repose,
   The strength whereof suffic'd him forty days;
   Sometimes that with Elijah he partook,
   Or as a guest with Daniel at his pulse.
   Thus wore out night, and now the Herald Lark
   Left his ground-nest, high towring to descry                        280
   The morns approach, and greet her with his Song:
   As lightly from his grassy Couch up rose
   Our Saviour, and found all was but a dream,
   Fasting he went to sleep, and fasting wak'd.
   Up to a hill anon his steps he rear'd,
   From whose high top to ken the prospect round,
   If Cottage were in view, Sheep-cote or Herd;
   But Cottage, Herd or Sheep-cote none he saw,
   Only in a bottom saw a pleasant Grove,
   With chaunt of tuneful Birds resounding loud;                       290
   Thither he bent his way, determin'd there
   To rest at noon, and entr'd soon the shade
   High rooft and walks beneath, and alleys brown
   That open'd in the midst a woody Scene,
   Natures own work it seem'd (Nature taught Art)
   And to a Superstitious eye the haunt
   Of Wood-Gods and Wood-Nymphs; he view'd it round,
   When suddenly a man before him stood,
   Not rustic as before, but seemlier clad,
   As one in City, or Court, or Palace bred,                           300
   And with fair speech these words to him address'd.
   With granted leave officious I return,
   But much more wonder that the Son of God
   In this wild solitude so long should bide
   Of all things destitute, and well I know,
   Not without hunger.  Others of some note,
   As story tells, have trod this Wilderness;
   The Fugitive Bond-woman with her Son
   Out cast Nebaioth, yet found he relief
   By a providing Angel; all the race                                  310
   Of Israel here had famish'd, had not God
   Rain'd from Heaven Manna, and that Prophet bold
   Native of Thebes wandring here was fed
   Twice by a voice inviting him to eat.
   Of thee these forty days none hath regard,
   Forty and more deserted here indeed.
   To whom thus Jesus; what conclud'st thou hence?
   They all had need, I as thou seest have none.
   How hast thou hunger then?  Satan reply'd,
   Tell me if Food were now before thee set,                           320
   Would'st thou not eat?  Thereafter as I like
   The giver, answer'd Jesus. Why should that
   Cause thy refusal, said the subtle Fiend,
   Hast thou not right to all Created things,
   Owe not all Creatures by just right to thee
   Duty and Service, nor to stay till bid,
   But tender all their power? nor mention I
   Meats by the Law unclean, or offer'd first
   To Idols, those young Daniel could refuse;
   Nor proffer'd by an Enemy, though who                               330
   Would scruple that, with want opprest? behold
   Nature asham'd, or better to express,
   Troubl'd that thou should'st hunger, hath purvey'd
   From all the Elements her choicest store
   To treat thee as beseems, and as her Lord
   With honour, only deign to sit and eat.
   He spake no dream, for as his words had end,
   Our Saviour lifting up his eyes beheld
   In ample space under the broadest shade
   A Table richly spred, in regal mode,                                340
   With dishes pil'd, and meats of noblest sort
   And savour, Beasts of chase, or Fowl of game,
   In pastry built, or from the spit, or boyl'd,
   Gris-amber-steam'd; all Fish from Sea or Shore,
   Freshet, or purling Brook, of shell or fin,
   And exquisitest name, for which was drain'd
   Pontus and Lucrine Bay, and Afric Coast.
   Alas how simple, to these Cates compar'd,
   Was that crude Apple that diverted Eve!
   And at a stately side-board by the wine                             350
   That fragrant smell diffus'd, in order stood
   Tall stripling youths rich clad, of fairer hew
   Then Ganymed or Hylas, distant more
   Under the Trees now trip'd, now solemn stood
   Nymphs of Diana's train, and Naiades
   With fruits and flowers from Amalthea's horn,
   And Ladies of th' Hesperides, that seem'd
   Fairer then feign'd of old, or fabl'd since
   Of Fairy Damsels met in Forest wide
   By Knights of Logres, or of Lyones,                                 360
   Lancelot or Pelleas, or Pellenore,
   And all the while Harmonious Airs were heard
   Of chiming strings, or charming pipes and winds
   Of gentlest gale Arabian odors fann'd
   From their soft wings, and flora's earliest smells.
   Such was the Splendour, and the Tempter now
   His invitation earnestly renew'd.
   What doubts the Son of God to sit and eat?
   These are not Fruits forbidden, no interdict
   Defends the touching of these viands pure,                          370
   Thir taste no knowledge works, at least of evil,
   But life preserves, destroys life's enemy,
   Hunger, with sweet restorative delight.
   All these are Spirits of Air, and Woods, and Springs,
   Thy gentle Ministers, who come to pay
   Thee homage, and acknowledge thee thir Lord:
   What doubt'st thou Son of God? sit down and eat.
   To whom thus Jesus temperately reply'd:
   Said'st thou not that to all things I had right?
   And who withholds my pow'r that right to use?                       380
   Shall I receive by gift what of my own,
   When and where likes me best, I can command?
   I can at will, doubt not, as soon as thou,
   Command a Table in this Wilderness,
   And call swift flights of Angels ministrant
   Array'd in Glory on my cup to attend:
   Why shouldst thou then obtrude this diligence,
   In vain, where no acceptance it can find,
   And with my hunger what hast thou to do?
   Thy pompous Delicacies I contemn,                                   390
   And count thy specious gifts no gifts but guiles.
   To whom thus answer'd Satan malecontent:
   That I have also power to give thou seest,
   If of that pow'r I bring thee voluntary
   What I might have bestow'd on whom I pleas'd.
   And rather opportunely in this place
   Chose to impart to thy apparent need,
   Why shouldst thou not accept it? but I see
   What I can do or offer is suspect;
   Of these things others quickly will dispose                         400
   Whose pains have earn'd the far fet spoil.  With that
   Both Table and Provision vanish'd quite
   With sound of Harpies wings, and Talons heard;
   Only the importune Tempter still remain'd,
   And with these words his temptation pursu'd.
   By hunger, that each other Creature tames,
   Thou art not to be harm'd, therefore not mov'd;
   Thy temperance invincible besides,
   For no allurement yields to appetite,
   And all thy heart is set on high designs,                           410
   High actions: but wherewith to be atchiev'd?
   Great acts require great means of enterprise,
   Thou art unknown, unfriended, low of birth,
   A Carpenter thy Father known, thy self
   Bred up in poverty and streights at home;
   Lost in a Desert here and hunger-bit:
   Which way or from what hope dost thou aspire
   To greatness? whence Authority deriv'st,
   What Followers, what Retinue canst thou gain,
   Or at thy heels the dizzy Multitude,                                420
   Longer then thou canst feed them on thy cost?
   Money brings Honour, Friends, Conquest, and Realms;
   What rais'd Antipater the Edomite,
   And his Son Herod plac'd on Juda's Throne;
   (Thy throne) but gold that got him puissant friends?
   Therefore, if at great things thou wouldst arrive,
   Get Riches first, get Wealth, and Treasure heap,
   Not difficult, if thou hearken to me,
   Riches are mine, Fortune is in my hand;
   They whom I favour thrive in wealth amain,                          430
   While Virtue, Valour, Wisdom sit in want.
   To whom thus Jesus patiently reply'd;
   Yet Wealth without these three is impotent,
   To gain dominion or to keep it gain'd.
   Witness those antient Empires of the Earth,
   In highth of all thir flowing wealth dissolv'd:
   But men endu'd with these have oft attain'd
   In lowest poverty to highest deeds;
   Gideon and Jephtha, and the Shepherd lad,
   Whose off-spring on the Throne of Juda sat                          440
   So many Ages, and shall yet regain
   That seat, and reign in Israel without end.
   Among the Heathen, (for throughout the World
   To me is not unknown what hath been done
   Worthy of Memorial) canst thou not remember
   Quintius, Fabricius, Curius, Regulus?
   For I esteem those names of men so poor
   Who could do mighty things, and could contemn
   Riches though offer'd from the hand of Kings.
   And what in me seems wanting, but that I                            450
   May also in this poverty as soon
   Accomplish what they did, perhaps and more?
   Extol not Riches then, the toyl of Fools
   The wise mans cumbrance if not snare, more apt
   To slacken Virtue, and abate her edge,
   Then prompt her to do aught may merit praise.
   What if with like aversion I reject
   Riches and Realms; yet not for that a Crown,
   Golden in shew, is but a wreath of thorns,
   Brings dangers, troubles, cares, and sleepless nights               460
   To him who wears the Regal Diadem,
   When on his shoulders each mans burden lies;
   For therein stands the office of a King,
   His Honour, Vertue, Merit and chief Praise,
   That for the Publick all this weight he bears.
   Yet he who reigns within himself, and rules
   Passions, Desires, and Fears, is more a King;
   Which every wise and vertuous man attains:
   And who attains not, ill aspires to rule
   Cities of men, or head-strong Multitudes,                           470
   Subject himself to Anarchy within,
   Or lawless passions in him which he serves.
   But to guide Nations in the way of truth
   By saving Doctrine, and from errour lead
   To know, and knowing worship God aright,
   Is yet more Kingly, this attracts the Soul,
   Governs the inner man, the nobler part,
   That other o're the body only reigns,
   And oft by force, which to a generous mind
   So reigning can be no sincere delight.                              480
   Besides to give a Kingdom hath been thought
   Greater and nobler done, and to lay down
   Far more magnanimous, then to assume.
   Riches are needless then, both for themselves,
   And for thy reason why they should be sought,
   To gain a Scepter, oftest better miss't.
 
   Note: 309 he] here 1695.
 
   The End of the Second Book.
 
 
 
 
 The Third Book.
 
 
   So spake the Son of God, and Satan stood
   A while as mute confounded what to say,
   What to reply, confuted and convinc't
   Of his weak arguing, and fallacious drift;
   At length collecting all his Serpent wiles,
   With soothing words renew'd, him thus accosts.
   I see thou know'st what is of use to know,
   What best to say canst say, to do canst do;
   Thy actions to thy words accord, thy words
   To thy large heart give utterance due, thy heart                     10
   Conteins of good, wise, just, the perfect shape.
   Should Kings and Nations from thy mouth consult,
   Thy Counsel would be as the Oracle
   Urim and Thummin, those oraculous gems
   On Aaron's breast: or tongue of Seers old
   Infallible; or wert thou sought to deeds
   That might require th' array of war, thy skill
   Of conduct would be such, that all the world
   Could not sustain thy Prowess, or subsist
   In battel, though against thy few in arms.                           20
   These God-like Vertues wherefore dost thou hide?
   Affecting private life, or more obscure
   In savage Wilderness, wherefore deprive
   All Earth her wonder at thy acts, thy self
   The fame and glory, glory the reward
   That sole excites to high attempts the flame
   Of most erected Spirits, most temper'd pure
   Aetherial, who all pleasures else despise,
   All treasures and all gain esteem as dross,
   And dignities and powers all but the highest?                        30
   Thy years are ripe, and over-ripe, the Son
   Of Macedonian Philip had e're these
   Won Asia and the Throne of Cyrus held
   At his dispose, young Scipio had brought down
   The Carthaginian pride, young Pompey quell'd
   The Pontic King and in triumph had rode.
   Yet years, and to ripe years judgment mature,
   Quench not the thirst of glory, but augment.
   Great Julius, whom now all the world admires,
   The more he grew in years, the more inflam'd                         40
   With glory, wept that he had liv'd so long
   Inglorious: but thou yet art not too late.
   To whom our Saviour calmly thus reply'd.
   Thou neither dost perswade me to seek wealth
   For Empires sake, nor Empire to affect
   For glories sake by all thy argument.
   For what is glory but the blaze of fame,
   The peoples praise, if always praise unmixt?
   And what the people but a herd confus'd,
   A miscellaneous rabble, who extol                                    50
   Things vulgar, & well weigh'd, scarce worth the praise,
   They praise and they admire they know not what;
   And know not whom, but as one leads the other;
   And what delight to be by such extoll'd,
   To live upon thir tongues and be thir talk,
   Of whom to be disprais'd were no small praise?
   His lot who dares be singularly good.
   Th' intelligent among them and the wise
   Are few; and glory scarce of few is rais'd.
   This is true glory and renown, when God                              60
   Looking on the Earth, with approbation marks
   The just man, and divulges him through Heaven
   To all his Angels, who with true applause
   Recount his praises; thus he did to Job,
   When to extend his fame through Heaven & Earth,
   As thou to thy reproach mayst well remember,
   He ask'd thee, hast thou seen my servant Job?
   Famous he was in Heaven, on Earth less known;
   Where glory is false glory, attributed
   To things not glorious, men not worthy of fame.                      70
   They err who count it glorious to subdue
   By Conquest far and wide, to over-run
   Large Countries, and in field great Battels win,
   Great Cities by assault: what do these Worthies,
   But rob and spoil, burn, slaughter, and enslave
   Peaceable Nations, neighbouring, or remote,
   Made Captive, yet deserving freedom more
   Then those thir Conquerours, who leave behind
   Nothing but ruin wheresoe're they rove,
   And all the flourishing works of peace destroy,                      80
   Then swell with pride, and must be titl'd Gods,
   Great Benefactors of mankind, Deliverers,
   Worship't with Temple, Priest and Sacrifice;
   One is the Son of Jove, of Mars the other,
   Till Conquerour Death discover them scarce men,
   Rowling in brutish vices, and deform'd,
   Violent or shameful death thir due reward.
   But if there be in glory aught of good,
   It may by means far different be attain'd
   Without ambition, war, or violence;                                  90
   By deeds of peace, by wisdom eminent,
   By patience, temperance; I mention still
   Him whom thy wrongs with Saintly patience born,
   Made famous in a Land and times obscure;
   Who names not now with honour patient Job?
   Poor Socrates (who next more memorable?)
   By what he taught and suffer'd for so doing,
   For truths sake suffering death unjust, lives now
   Equal in fame to proudest Conquerours.
   Yet if for fame and glory aught be done,                            100
   Aught suffer'd; if young African for fame
   His wasted Country freed from Punic rage,
   The deed becomes unprais'd, the man at least,
   And loses, though but verbal, his reward.
   Shall I seek glory then, as vain men seek
   Oft not deserv'd?  I seek not mine, but his
   Who sent me, and thereby witness whence I am.
   To whom the Tempter murmuring thus reply'd.
   Think not so slight of glory; therein least,
   Resembling thy great Father: he seeks glory,                        110
   And for his glory all things made, all things
   Orders and governs, nor content in Heaven
   By all his Angels glorifi'd, requires
   Glory from men, from all men good or bad,
   Wise or unwise, no difference, no exemption;
   Above all Sacrifice, or hallow'd gift
   Glory he requires, and glory he receives
   Promiscuous from all Nations, Jew, or Greek,
   Or Barbarous, nor exception hath declar'd;
   From us his foes pronounc't glory he exacts.                        120
   To whom our Saviour fervently reply'd.
   And reason; since his word all things produc'd,
   Though chiefly not for glory as prime end,
   But to shew forth his goodness, and impart
   His good communicable to every soul
   Freely; of whom what could he less expect
   Then glory and benediction, that is thanks,
   The slightest, easiest, readiest recompence
   From them who could return him nothing else,
   And not returning that would likeliest render                       130
   Contempt instead, dishonour, obloquy?
   Hard recompence, unsutable return
   For so much good, so much beneficence.
   But why should man seek glory? who of his own
   Hath nothing, and to whom nothing belongs
   But condemnation, ignominy, and shame?
   Who for so many benefits receiv'd
   Turn'd recreant to God, ingrate and false,
   And so of all true good himself despoil'd,
   Yet, sacrilegious, to himself would take                            140
   That which to God alone of right belongs;
   Yet so much bounty is in God, such grace,
   That who advance his glory, not thir own,
   Them he himself to glory will advance.
   So spake the Son of God; and here again
   Satan had not to answer, but stood struck
   With guilt of his own sin, for he himself
   Insatiable of glory had lost all,
   Yet of another Plea bethought him soon.
   Of glory as thou wilt, said he, so deem,                            150
   Worth or not worth the seeking, let it pass:
   But to a Kingdom thou art born, ordain'd
   To sit upon thy Father David's Throne;
   By Mother's side thy Father, though thy right
   Be now in powerful hands, that will not part
   Easily from possession won with arms;
   Judaea now and all the promis'd land
   Reduc't a Province under Roman yoke,
   Obeys Tiberius; nor is always rul'd
   With temperate sway; oft have they violated                         160
   The Temple, oft the Law with foul affronts,
   Abominations rather, as did once
   Antiochus: and think'st thou to regain
   Thy right by sitting still or thus retiring?
   So did not Machabeus: he indeed
   Retir'd unto the Desert, but with arms;
   And o're a mighty King so oft prevail'd,
   That by strong hand his Family obtain'd,
   Though Priests, the Crown, and David's Throne usurp'd,
   With Modin and her Suburbs once content.                            170
   If Kingdom move thee not, let move thee Zeal,
   And Duty; Zeal and Duty are not slow;
   But on Occasions forelock watchful wait.
   They themselves rather are occasion best,
   Zeal of thy Fathers house, Duty to free
   Thy Country from her Heathen servitude;
   So shalt thou best fullfil, best verifie
   The Prophets old, who sung thy endless raign,
   The happier raign the sooner it begins,
   Raign then; what canst thou better do the while?                    180
   To whom our saviour answer thus return'd.
   All things are best fullfil'd in thir due time,
   And time there is for all things, Truth hath said:
   If of my raign Prophetic Writ hath told
   That it shall never end, so when begin
   The Father in his purpose hath decreed,
   He in whose hand all times and seasons roul.
   What if he hath decreed that I shall first
   Be try'd in humble state, and things adverse,
   By tribulations, injuries, insults,                                 190
   Contempts, and scorns, and snares, and violence,
   Suffering, abstaining, quietly expecting
   Without distrust or doubt, that he may know
   What I can suffer, how obey? who best
   Can suffer, best can do; best reign, who first
   Well hath obey'd; just tryal e're I merit
   My exaltation without change or end.
   But what concerns it thee when I begin
   My everlasting Kingdom, why art thou
   Sollicitous, what moves thy inquisition?                            200
   Know'st thou not that my rising is thy fall,
   And my promotion will be thy destruction?
   To whom the Tempter inly rackt reply'd.
   Let that come when it comes; all hope is lost
   Of my reception into grace; what worse?
   For where no hope is left, is left no fear;
   If there be worse, the expectation more
   Of worse torments me then the feeling can.
   I would be at the worst; worst is my Port.
   My harbour and my ultimate repose,                                  210
   The end I would attain, my final good.
   My error was my error, and my crime
   My crime; whatever for it self condemn'd
   And will alike be punish'd; whether thou
   Raign or raign not; though to that gentle brow
   Willingly I could flye, and hope thy raign,
   From that placid aspect and meek regard,
   Rather then aggravate my evil state,
   Would stand between me and thy Fathers ire,
   (Whose ire I dread more then the fire of Hell,)                     220
   A shelter and a kind of shading cool
   Interposition, as a summers cloud.
   If I then to the worst that can be hast,
   Why move thy feet so slow to what is best,
   Happiest both to thy self and all the world,
   That thou who worthiest art should'st be thir King?
   Perhaps thou linger'st in deep thoughts detain d
   Of the enterprize so hazardous and high;
   No wonder, for though in thee be united
   What of perfection can in man be found,                             230
   Or human nature can receive, consider
   Thy life hath yet been private, most part spent
   At home, scarce view'd the Gallilean Towns
   And once a year Jerusalem, few days
   Short sojourn; and what thence could'st thou observe?
   The world thou hast not seen, much less her glory,
   Empires, and Monarchs, and thir radiant Courts
   Best school of best experience, quickest in sight
   In all things that to greatest actions lead.
   The wisest, unexperienc't, will be ever                             240
   Timorous and loth, with novice modesty,
   (As he who seeking Asses found a Kingdom)
   Irresolute, unhardy, unadventrous:
   But I will bring thee where thou soon shalt quit
   Those rudiments, and see before thine eyes
   The Monarchies of the Earth, thir pomp and state,
   Sufficient introduction to inform
   Thee, of thy self so apt, in regal Arts,
   And regal Mysteries; that thou may'st know
   How best their opposition to withstand.                             250
   With that (such power was giv'n him then) he took
   The Son of God up to a Mountain high.
   It was a Mountain at whose verdant feet
   A spatious plain out strech't in circuit wide
   Lay pleasant; from his side two rivers flow'd,
   Th' one winding, the other strait and left between
   Fair Champain with less rivers interveind,
   Then meeting joyn'd thir tribute to the Sea:
   Fertil of corn the glebe, of oyl and wine,
   With herds the pastures throng'd, with flocks the hills,            260
   Huge Cities and high towr'd, that well might seem
   The seats of mightiest Monarchs, and so large
   The Prospect was, that here and there was room
   For barren desert fountainless and dry.
   To this high mountain top the Tempter brought
   Our Saviour, and new train of words began.
   Well have we speeded, and o're hill and dale,
   Forest and field, and flood, Temples and Towers
   Cut shorter many a league; here thou behold'st
   Assyria and her Empires antient bounds,                             270
   Araxes and the Caspian lake, thence on
   As far as Indus East, Euphrates West,
   And oft beyond; to South the Persian Bay,
   And inaccessible the Arabian drouth:
   Here Ninevee, of length within her wall
   Several days journey, built by Ninus old,
   Of that first golden Monarchy the seat,
   And seat of Salmanassar, whose success
   Israel in long captivity still mourns;
   There Babylon the wonder of all tongues,                            280
   As antient, but rebuilt by him who twice
   Judah and all thy Father David's house
   Led captive, and Jerusalem laid waste,
   Till Cyrus set them free; Persepolis
   His City there thou seest, and Bactra there;
   Ecbatana her structure vast there shews,
   And Hecatompylos her hunderd gates,
   There Susa by Choaspes, amber stream,
   The drink of none but Kings; of later fame
   Built by Emathian, or by Parthian hands,                            290
   The great Seleucia, Nisibis, and there
   Artaxata, Teredon, Tesiphon,
   Turning with easie eye thou may'st behold.
   All these the Parthian, now some Ages past,
   By great Arsaces led, who founded first
   That Empire, under his dominion holds
   From the luxurious Kings of Antioch won.
   And just in time thou com'st to have a view
   Of his great power; for now the Parthian King
   In Ctesiphon hath gather'd all his Host                             300
   Against the Scythian, whose incursions wild
   Have wasted Sogdiana; to her aid
   He marches now in hast; see, though from far,
   His thousands, in what martial equipage
   They issue forth, Steel Bows, and Shafts their arms
   Of equal dread in flight, or in pursuit;
   All Horsemen, in which fight they most excel;
   See how in warlike muster they appear,
   In Rhombs and wedges, and half moons, and wings.
   He look't and saw what numbers numberless                           310
   The City gates out powr'd, light armed Troops
   In coats of Mail and military pride;
   In Mail thir horses clad, yet fleet and strong,
   Prauncing their riders bore, the flower and choice
   Of many Provinces from bound to bound;
   From Arachosia, from Candaor East,
   And Margiana to the Hyrcanian cliffs
   Of Caucasus, and dark Iberian dales,
   From Atropatia and the neighbouring plains
   Of Adiabene, Media, and the South                                   320
   Of Susiana to Balsara's hav'n.
   He saw them in thir forms of battell rang'd,
   How quick they wheel'd, and flying behind them shot
   Sharp sleet of arrowie showers against the face
   Of thir pursuers, and overcame by flight;
   The field all iron cast a gleaming brown,
   Nor wanted clouds of foot, nor on each horn,
   Cuirassiers all in steel for standing fight;
   Chariots or Elephants endorst with Towers
   Of Archers, nor of labouring Pioners                                330
   A multitude with Spades and Axes arm'd
   To lay hills plain, fell woods, or valleys fill,
   Or where plain was raise hill, or over-lay
   With bridges rivers proud, as with a yoke;
   Mules after these, Camels and Dromedaries,
   And Waggons fraught with Utensils of war.
   Such forces met not, nor so wide a camp,
   When Agrican with all his Northern powers
   Besieg'd Albracca, as Romances tell;
   The City of Gallaphrone, from thence to win                         340
   The fairest of her Sex Angelica
   His daughter, sought by many Prowest Knights,
   Both Paynim, and the Peers of Charlemane.
   Such and so numerous was thir Chivalrie;
   At sight whereof the Fiend yet more presum'd,
   And to our Saviour thus his words renew'd.
   That thou may'st know I seek not to engage
   Thy Vertue, and not every way secure
   On no slight grounds thy safety; hear, and mark
   To what end I have brought thee hither and shewn                    350
   All this fair sight; thy Kingdom though foretold
   By Prophet or by Angel, unless thou
   Endeavour, as thy Father David did,
   Thou never shalt obtain; prediction still
   In all things, and all men, supposes means,
   Without means us'd, what it predicts revokes.
   But say thou wer't possess'd of David's Throne
   By free consent of all, none opposite,
   Samaritan or Jew; how could'st thou hope
   Long to enjoy it quiet and secure,                                  360
   Between two such enclosing enemies
   Roman and Parthian? therefore one of these
   Thou must make sure thy own, the Parthian first
   By my advice, as nearer and of late
   Found able by invasion to annoy
   Thy country, and captive lead away her Kings
   Antigonus, and old Hyrcanus bound,
   Maugre the Roman: it shall be my task
   To render thee the Parthian at dispose;
   Chuse which thou wilt by conquest or by league                      370
   By him thou shalt regain, without him not,
   That which alone can truly reinstall thee
   In David's royal seat, his true Successour,
   Deliverance of thy brethren, those ten Tribes
   Whose off-spring in his Territory yet serve
   In Habor, and among the Medes dispers't,
   Ten Sons of Jacob, two of Joseph lost
   Thus long from Israel; serving as of old
   Thir Fathers in the land of Egypt serv'd,
   This offer sets before thee to deliver.                             380
   These if from servitude thou shalt restore
   To thir inheritance, then, nor till then,
   Thou on the Throne of David in full glory,
   From Egypt to Euphrates and beyond
   Shalt raign, and Rome or Caesar not need fear.
   To whom our Saviour answer'd thus unmov'd.
   Much ostentation vain of fleshly arm,
   And fragile arms, much instrument of war
   Long in preparing, soon to nothing brought,
   Before mine eyes thou hast set; and in my ear                       390
   Vented much policy, and projects deep
   Of enemies, of aids, battels and leagues,
   Plausible to the world, to me worth naught.
   Means I must use thou say'st, prediction else
   Will unpredict and fail me of the Throne:
   My time I told thee, (and that time for thee
   Were better farthest off) is not yet come;
   When that comes think not thou to find me slack
   On my part aught endeavouring, or to need
   Thy politic maxims, or that cumbersome                              400
   Luggage of war there shewn me, argument
   Of human weakness rather then of strength.
   My brethren, as thou call'st them; those Ten Tribes
   I must deliver, if I mean to raign
   David's true heir, and his full Scepter sway
   To just extent over all Israel's Sons;
   But whence to thee this zeal, where was it then
   For Israel or for David, or his Throne,
   When thou stood'st up his Tempter to the pride
   Of numbring Israel which cost the lives                             410
   Of threescore and ten thousand Israelites
   By three days Pestilence? such was thy zeal
   To Israel then, the same that now to me.
   As for those captive Tribes, themselves were they
   Who wrought their own captivity, fell off
   From God to worship Calves, the Deities
   Of Egypt, Baal next and Ashtaroth,
   And all the Idolatries of Heathen round,
   Besides thir other worse then heathenish crimes;
   Nor in the land of their captivity                                  420
   Humbled themselves, or penitent besought
   The God of their fore-fathers; but so dy'd
   Impenitent, and left a race behind
   Like to themselves, distinguishable scarce
   From Gentils, but by Circumcision vain,
   And God with Idols in their worship joyn'd.
   Should I of these the liberty regard,
   Who freed, as to their antient Patrimony,
   Unhumbl'd, unrepentant, unreform'd,
   Headlong would follow; and to thir Gods perhaps                     430
   Of Bethel and of Dan? no, let them serve
   Thir enemies, who serve Idols with God.
   Yet he at length, time to himself best known,
   Remembring Abraham by some wond'rous call
   May bring them back repentant and sincere,
   And at their passing cleave the Assyrian flood,
   While to their native land with joy they hast,
   As the Red Sea and Jordan once he cleft,
   When to the promis'd land thir Fathers pass'd;
   To his due time and providence I leave them.                        440
   So spake Israel's true King, and to the Fiend
   Made answer meet, that made void all his wiles.
   So fares it when with truth falshood contends.
 
   The End of the Third Book.
 
 
 
 
 The Fourth Book.
 
 
   PERPLEX'D and troubl'd at his bad success
   The Tempter stood, nor had what to reply,
   Discover'd in his fraud, thrown from his hope,
   So oft, and the perswasive Rhetoric
   That sleek't his tongue, and won so much on Eve,
   So little here, nay lost; but Eve was Eve,
   This far his over-match, who self deceiv'd
   And rash, before-hand had no better weigh'd
   The strength he was to cope with, or his own:
   But as a man who had been matchless held                             10
   In cunning, over-reach't where least he thought,
   To salve his credit, and for very spight
   Still will be tempting him who foyls him still,
   And never cease, though to his shame the more;
   Or as a swarm of flies in vintage time,
   About the wine-press where sweet moust is powr'd,
   Beat off; returns as oft with humming sound;
   Or surging waves against a solid rock,
   Though all to shivers dash't, the assault renew,
   Vain battry, and in froth or bubbles end:                            20
   So Satan, whom repulse upon repulse
   Met ever; and to shameful silence brought,
   Yet gives not o're though desperate of success,
   And his vain importunity pursues.
   He brought our Saviour to the western side
   Of that high mountain, whence he might behold
   Another plain, long but in bredth not wide;
   Wash'd by the Southern Sea, and on the North
   To equal length back'd with a ridge of hills
   That screen'd the fruits of the earth and seats of men               30
   From cold Septentrion blasts, thence in the midst
   Divided by a river, of whose banks
   On each side an Imperial City stood,
   With Towers and Temples proudly elevate
   On seven small Hills, with Palaces adorn'd,
   Porches and Theatres, Baths, Aqueducts,
   Statues and Trophees, and Triumphal Arcs,
   Gardens and Groves presented to his eyes,
   Above the highth of Mountains interpos'd.
   By what strange Parallax or Optic skill                              40
   Of vision multiplyed through air or glass
   Of Telescope, were curious to enquire:
   And now the Tempter thus his silence broke.
   The City which thou seest no other deem
   Then great and glorious Rome, Queen of the Earth
   So far renown'd, and with the spoils enricht
   Of Nations; there the Capitol thou seest
   Above the rest lifting his stately head
   On the Tarpeian rock, her Cittadel
   Impregnable, and there Mount Palatine                                50
   The Imperial Palace, compass huge, and high
   The Structure, skill of noblest Architects,
   With gilded battlements, conspicuous far,
   Turrets and Terrases, and glittering Spires.
   Many a fair Edifice besides, more like
   Houses of Gods (so well I have dispos'd
   My Aerie Microscope) thou may'st behold
   Outside and inside both, pillars and roofs
   Carv'd work, the hand of fam'd Artificers
   In Cedar, Marble, Ivory or Gold.                                     60
   Thence to the gates cast round thine eye, and see
   What conflux issuing forth, or entring in,
   Pretors, Proconsuls to thir Provinces
   Hasting or on return, in robes of State;
   Lictors and rods the ensigns of thir power,
   Legions and Cohorts, turmes of horse and wings:
   Or Embassies from Regions far remote
   In various habits on the Appian road,
   Or on the Aemilian, some from farthest South,
   Syene, and where the shadow both way falls,                          70
   Meroe, Nilotic Isle, and more to West,
   The Realm of Bocchus to the Black-moor Sea;
   From the Asian Kings and Parthian among these,
   From India 'and the golden Chersoness,
   And utmost Indian Isle Taprobane,
   Dusk faces with white silken Turbants wreath'd:
   From Gallia, Gades, and the Brittish West,
   Germans and Scythians, and Sarmatians North
   Beyond Danubius to the Tauric Pool.
   All Nations now to Rome obedience pay,                               80
   To Rome's great Emperour, whose wide domain
   In ample Territory, wealth and power,
   Civility of Manners, Arts, and Arms,
   And long Renown thou justly may'st prefer
   Before the Parthian; these two Thrones except,
   The rest are barbarous, and scarce worth the sight,
   Shar'd among petty Kings too far remov'd;
   These having shewn thee, I have shewn thee all
   The Kingdoms of the world, and all thir glory.
   This Emperour hath no Son, and now is old,                           90
   Old, and lascivious, and from Rome retir'd
   To Capreae an Island small but strong
   On the Campanian shore, with purpose there
   His horrid lusts in private to enjoy,
   Committing to a wicked Favourite
   All publick cares, and yet of him suspicious,
   Hated of all, and hating; with what ease
   Indu'd with Regal Vertues as thou art,
   Appearing, and beginning noble deeds,
   Might'st thou expel this monster from his Throne                    100
   Now made a stye, and in his place ascending
   A victor people free from servile yoke?
   And with my help thou may'st; to me the power
   Is given, and by that right I give it thee.
   Aim therefore at no less then all the world,
   Aim at the highest, without the highest attain'd
   Will be for thee no sitting, or not long
   On Davids Throne, be propheci'd what will,
   To whom the Son of God unmov'd reply'd.
   Nor doth this grandeur and majestic show                            110
   Of luxury, though call'd magnificence,
   More then of arms before, allure mine eye,
   Much less my mind; though thou should'st add to tell
   Thir sumptuous gluttonies, and gorgeous feasts
   On Cittron tables or Atlantic stone;
   (For I have also heard, perhaps have read)
   Their wines of Setia, Cales, and Falerne,
   Chios and Creet, and how they quaff in Gold,
   Crystal and Myrrhine cups imboss'd with Gems
   And studs of Pearl, to me should'st tell who thirst                 120
   And hunger still: then Embassies thou shew'st
   From Nations far and nigh; what honour that,
   But tedious wast of time to sit and hear
   So many hollow complements and lies,
   Outlandish flatteries? then proceed'st to talk
   Of the Emperour, how easily subdu'd,
   How gloriously; I shall, thou say'st, expel
   A brutish monster: what if I withal
   Expel a Devil who first made him such?
   Let his tormenter Conscience find him out,                          130
   For him I was not sent, nor yet to free
   That people victor once, now vile and base,
   Deservedly made vassal, who once just,
   Frugal, and mild, and temperate, conquer'd well,
   But govern ill the Nations under yoke,
   Peeling thir Provinces, exhausted all
   By lust and rapine; first ambitious grown
   Of triumph that insulting vanity;
   Then cruel, by thir sports to blood enur'd
   Of fighting beasts, and men to beasts expos'd,                      140
   Luxurious by thir wealth, and greedier still,
   And from the daily Scene effeminate.
   What wise and valiant man would seek to free
   These thus degenerate, by themselves enslav'd,
   Or could of inward slaves make outward free?
   Know therefore when my season comes to sit
   On David's Throne, it shall be like a tree
   Spreading and over-shadowing all the Earth,
   Or as a stone that shall to pieces dash
   All Monarchies besides throughout the world,                        150
   And of my Kingdom there shall be no end:
   Means there shall be to this, but what the means,
   Is not for thee to know, nor me to tell.
   To whom the Tempter impudent repli'd.
   I see all offers made by me how slight
   Thou valu'st, because offer'd, and reject'st:
   Nothing will please the difficult and nice,
   Or nothing more then still to contradict:
   On the other side know also thou, that I
   On what I offer set as high esteem,                                 160
   Nor what I part with mean to give for naught;
   All these which in a moment thou behold'st,
   The Kingdoms of the world to thee I give;
   For giv'n to me, I give to whom I please,
   No trifle; yet with this reserve, not else,
   On this condition, if thou wilt fall down,
   And worship me as thy superior Lord,
   Easily done, and hold them all of me;
   For what can less so great a gift deserve?
   Whom thus our Saviour answer'd with disdain.                        170
   I never lik'd thy talk, thy offers less,
   Now both abhor, since thou hast dar'd to utter
   The abominable terms, impious condition;
   But I endure the time, till which expir'd,
   Thou hast permission on me.  It is written
   The first of all Commandments, Thou shalt worship
   The Lord thy God, and only him shalt serve;
   And dar'st thou to the Son of God propound
   To worship thee accurst, now more accurst
   For this attempt bolder then that on Eve,                           180
   And more blasphemous? which expect to rue.
   The Kingdoms of the world to thee were giv'n,
   Permitted rather, and by thee usurp't,
   Other donation none thou canst produce:
   If given, by whom but by the King of Kings,
   God over all supreme? if giv'n to thee,
   By thee how fairly is the Giver now
   Repaid? But gratitude in thee is lost
   Long since.  Wert thou so void of fear or shame,
   As offer them to me the Son of God,                                 190
   To me my own, on such abhorred pact,
   That I fall down and worship thee as God?
   Get thee behind me; plain thou now appear'st
   That Evil one, Satan for ever damn'd.
   To whom the Fiend with fear abasht reply'd.
   Be not so sore offended, Son of God;
   Though Sons of God both Angels are and Men,
   If I to try whether in higher sort
   Then these thou bear'st that title, have propos'd
   What both from Men and Angels I receive,                            200
   Tetrarchs of fire, air, flood, and on the earth
   Nations besides from all the quarter'd winds,
   God of this world invok't and world beneath;
   Who then thou art, whose coming is foretold
   To me so fatal, me it most concerns.
   The tryal hath indamag'd thee no way,
   Rather more honour left and more esteem;
   Me naught advantag'd, missing what I aim'd.
   Therefore let pass, as they are transitory,
   The Kingdoms of this world; I shall no more                         210
   Advise thee, gain them as thou canst, or not.
   And thou thy self seem'st otherwise inclin'd
   Then to a worldly Crown, addicted more
   To contemplation and profound dispute,
   As by that early action may be judg'd,
   When slipping from thy Mothers eye thou went'st
   Alone into the Temple; there was found
   Among the gravest Rabbies disputant
   On points and questions fitting Moses Chair,
   Teaching not taught; the childhood shews the man,                   220
   As morning shews the day.  Be famous then
   By wisdom; as thy Empire must extend,
   So let extend thy mind o're all the world,
   In knowledge, all things in it comprehend,
   All knowledge is not couch't in Moses Law,
   The Pentateuch or what the Prophets wrote,
   The Gentiles also know, and write, and teach
   To admiration, led by Natures light;
   And with the Gentiles much thou must converse,
   Ruling them by perswasion as thou mean'st,                          230
   Without thir learning how wilt thou with them,
   Or they with thee hold conversation meet?
   How wilt thou reason with them, how refute
   Thir Idolisms, Traditions, Paradoxes?
   Error by his own arms is best evinc't.
   Look once more e're we leave this specular Mount
   Westward, much nearer by Southwest, behold
   Where on the Aegean shore a City stands
   Built nobly, pure the air, and light the soil,
   Athens the eye of Greece, Mother of Arts                            240
   And Eloquence, native to famous wits
   Or hospitable, in her sweet recess,
   City or Suburban, studious walks and shades;
   See there the Olive Grove of Academe,
   Plato's retirement, where the Attic Bird
   Trills her thick-warbl'd notes the summer long,
   There flowrie hill Hymettus with the sound
   Of Bees industrious murmur oft invites
   To studious musing; there Ilissus rouls
   His whispering stream; within the walls then view                   250
   The schools of antient Sages; his who bred
   Great Alexander to subdue the world,
   Lyceum there, and painted Stoa next:
   There thou shalt hear and learn the secret power
   Of harmony in tones and numbers hit
   By voice or hand, and various-measur'd verse,
   Aeolian charms and Dorian Lyric Odes,
   And his who gave them breath, but higher sung,
   Blind Melesigenes thence Homer call'd,
   Whose Poem Phoebus challeng'd for his own.                          260
   Thence what the lofty grave Tragoedians taught
   In Chorus or Iambic, teachers best
   Of moral prudence, with delight receiv'd
   In brief sententious precepts, while they treat
   Of fate, and chance, and change in human life;
   High actions, and high passions best describing;
   Thence to the famous Orators repair,
   Those antient, whose resistless eloquence
   Wielded at will that fierce Democratie,
   Shook the Arsenal and fulmin'd over Greece,                         270
   To Macedon, and Artaxerxes Throne;
   To sage Philosophy next lend thine ear,
   From Heaven descended to the low-rooft house
   Of Socrates, see there his Tenement,
   Whom well inspir'd the Oracle pronounc'd
   Wisest of men; from whose mouth issu'd forth
   Mellifluous streams that water'd all the schools
   Of Academics old and new, with those
   Sirnam'd Peripatetics, and the Sect
   Epicurean, and the Stoic severe;                                    280
   These here revolve, or, as thou lik'st, at home,
   Till time mature thee to a Kingdom's waight;
   These rules will render thee a King compleat
   Within thy self, much more with Empire joyn'd.
   To whom our Saviour sagely thus repli'd.
   Think not but that I know these things, or think
   I know them not; not therefore am I short
   Of knowing what I aught: he who receives
   Light from above, from the fountain of light,
   No other doctrine needs, though granted true;                       290
   But these are false, or little else but dreams,
   Conjectures, fancies, built on nothing firm.
   The first and wisest of them all profess'd
   To know this only, that he nothing knew;
   The next to fabling fell and smooth conceits,
   A third sort doubted all things, though plain sence;
   Others in vertue plac'd felicity,
   But vertue joyn'd with riches and long life,
   In corporal pleasure he, and careless ease,
   The Stoic last in Philosophic pride,                                300
   By him call'd vertue; and his vertuous man,
   Wise, perfect in himself, and all possessing
   Equal to God, oft shames not to prefer,
   As fearing God nor man, contemning all
   Wealth, pleasure, pain or torment, death and life,
   Which when he lists, he leaves, or boasts he can,
   For all his tedious talk is but vain boast,
   Or subtle shifts conviction to evade.
   Alas what can they teach, and not mislead;
   Ignorant of themselves, of God much more,                           310
   And how the world began, and how man fell
   Degraded by himself, on grace depending?
   Much of the Soul they talk, but all awrie,
   And in themselves seek vertue, and to themselves
   All glory arrogate, to God give none,
   Rather accuse him under usual names,
   Fortune and Fate, as one regardless quite
   Of mortal things.  Who therefore seeks in these
   True wisdom, finds her not, or by delusion
   Far worse, her false resemblance only meets,                        320
   An empty cloud.  However many books
   Wise men have said are wearisom; who reads
   Incessantly, and to his reading brings not
   A spirit and judgment equal or superior,
   (And what he brings, what needs he elsewhere seek)
   Uncertain and unsettl'd still remains
   Deep verst in books and shallow in himself;
   Crude or intoxicate, collecting toys,
   And trifles for choice matters, worth a spunge;
   As Children gathering pibles on the shore.                          330
   Or if I would delight my private hours
   With Music or with Poem, where so soon
   As in our native Language can I find
   That solace?  All our Law and Story strew'd
   With Hymns, our Psalms with artful terms inscrib'd,
   Our Hebrew Songs and Harps in Babylon,
   That pleas'd so well our Victors ear, declare
   That rather Greece from us these Arts deriv'd;
   Ill imitated, while they loudest sing
   The vices of thir Deities, and thir own                             340
   In Fable, Hymn, or Song, so personating
   Thir Gods ridiculous, and themselves past shame.
   Remove their swelling Epithetes thick laid
   As varnish on a Harlots cheek, the rest,
   Thin sown with aught of profit or delight,
   Will far be found unworthy to compare
   With Sion's songs, to all true tasts excelling,
   Where God is prais'd aright, and Godlike men,
   The Holiest of Holies, and his Saints;
   Such are from God inspir'd, not such from thee;                     350
   Unless where moral vertue is express't
   By light of Nature not in all quite lost.
   Thir Orators thou then extoll'st, as those
   The top of Eloquence, Statists indeed,
   And lovers of thir Country, as may seem;
   But herein to our Prophets far beneath,
   As men divinely taught, and better teaching
   The solid rules of Civil Government
   In thir majestic unaffected stile
   Then all the Oratory of Greece and Rome.                            360
   In them is plainest taught, and easiest learnt,
   What makes a Nation happy, and keeps it so,
   What ruins Kingdoms, and lays Cities flat;
   These only with our Law best form a King.
   So spake the Son of God; but Satan now
   Quite at a loss, for all his darts were spent,
   Thus to our Saviour with stern brow reply'd.
   Since neither wealth, nor honour, arms nor arts,
   Kingdom nor Empire pleases thee, nor aught
   By me propos'd in life contemplative,
   Or active, tended on by glory, or fame,                             370
   What dost thou in this World? the Wilderness
   For thee is fittest place, I found thee there,
   And thither will return thee, yet remember
   What I foretell thee, soon thou shalt have cause
   To wish thou never hadst rejected thus
   Nicely or cautiously my offer'd aid,
   Which would have set thee in short time with ease
   On David's Throne; or Throne of all the world,
   Now at full age, fulness of time, thy season,                       380
   When Prophesies of thee are best fullfill'd.
   Now contrary, if I read aught in Heaven,
   Or Heav'n write aught of Fate, by what the Stars
   Voluminous, or single characters,
   In thir conjunction met, give me to spell,
   Sorrows, and labours, Opposition, hate,
   Attends thee, scorns, reproaches, injuries,
   Violence and stripes, and lastly cruel death,
   A Kingdom they portend thee, but what Kingdom,
   Real or Allegoric I discern not,                                    390
   Nor when, eternal sure, as without end,
   Without beginning; for no date prefixt
   Directs me in the Starry Rubric set.
   So saying he took (for still he knew his power
   Not yet expir'd) and to the Wilderness
   Brought back the Son of God, and left him there,
   Feigning to disappear.  Darkness now rose,
   As day-light sunk, and brought in lowring night
   Her shadowy off-spring unsubstantial both,
   Privation meer of light and absent day.                             400
   Our Saviour meek and with untroubl'd mind
   After his aerie jaunt, though hurried sore,
   Hungry and cold betook him to his rest,
   Wherever, under some concourse of shades
   Whose branching arms thick intertwind might shield
   From dews and damps of night his shelter'd head,
   But shelter'd slept in vain, for at his head
   The Tempter watch'd, and soon with ugly dreams
   Disturb'd his sleep; and either Tropic now
   'Gan thunder, and both ends of Heav'n, the Clouds                   410
   From many a horrid rift abortive pour'd
   Fierce rain with lightning mixt, water with fire
   In ruine reconcil'd: nor slept the winds
   Within thir stony caves, but rush'd abroad
   From the four hinges of the world, and fell
   On the vext Wilderness, whose tallest Pines,
   Though rooted deep as high, and sturdiest Oaks
   Bow'd thir Stiff necks, loaden with stormy blasts,
   Or torn up sheer: ill wast thou shrouded then,
   O patient Son of God, yet only stoodst                              420
   Unshaken; nor yet staid the terror there,
   Infernal Ghosts, and Hellish Furies, round
   Environ'd thee, some howl'd, some yell'd, some shriek'd,
   Some bent at thee thir fiery darts, while thou
   Sat'st unappall'd in calm and sinless peace.
   Thus pass'd the night so foul till morning fair
   Came forth with Pilgrim steps in amice gray;
   Who with her radiant finger still'd the roar
   Of thunder, chas'd the clouds, and laid the winds,
   And grisly Spectres, which the Fiend had rais'd                     430
   To tempt the Son of God with terrors dire.
   And now the Sun with more effectual beams
   Had chear'd the face of Earth, and dry'd the wet
   From drooping plant, or dropping tree; the birds
   Who all things now behold more fresh and green,
   After a night of storm so ruinous,
   Clear'd up their choicest notes in bush and spray
   To gratulate the sweet return of morn;
   Nor yet amidst this joy and brightest morn
   Was absent, after all his mischief done,                            440
   The Prince of darkness, glad would also seem
   Of this fair change, and to our Saviour came,
   Yet with no new device, they all were spent,
   Rather by this his last affront resolv'd,
   Desperate of better course, to vent his rage,
   And mad despight to be so oft repell'd.
   Him walking on a Sunny hill he found,
   Back'd on the North and West by a thick wood,
   Out of the wood he starts in wonted shape;
   And in a careless mood thus to him said.                            450
   Fair morning yet betides thee Son of God,
   After a dismal night; I heard the rack
   As Earth and Skie would mingle; but my self
   Was distant; and these flaws, though mortals fear them
   As dangerous to the pillard frame of Heaven,
   Or to the Earths dark basis underneath,
   Are to the main as inconsiderable,
   And harmless, if not wholsom, as a sneeze
   To mans less universe, and soon are gone;
   Yet as being oft times noxious where they light                     460
   On man, beast, plant, wastful and turbulent,
   Like turbulencies in the affairs of men,
   Over whose heads they rore, and seem to point,
   They oft fore-signifie and threaten ill:
   This Tempest at this Desert most was bent;
   Of men at thee, for only thou here dwell'st.
   Did I not tell thee, if thou didst reject
   The perfet season offer'd with my aid
   To win thy destin'd seat, but wilt prolong
   All to the push of Fate, persue thy way                             470
   Of gaining David's Throne no man knows when,
   For both the when and how is no where told,
   Thou shalt be what thou art ordain'd, no doubt;
   For Angels have proclaim'd it, but concealing
   The time and means: each act is rightliest done,
   Not when it must, but when it may be best.
   If thou observe not this, be sure to find,
   What I foretold thee, many a hard assay
   Of dangers, and adversities and pains,
   E're thou of Israel's Scepter get fast hold;                        480
   Whereof this ominous night that clos'd thee round,
   So many terrors, voices, prodigies
   May warn thee, as a sure fore-going sign.
   So talk'd he, while the Son of God went on
   And staid not, but in brief him answer'd thus.
   Mee worse then wet thou find'st not; other harm
   Those terrors which thou speak'st of did me none;
   I never fear'd they could, though noising loud
   And threatning nigh; what they can do as signs
   Betok'ning, or ill boding, I contemn                                490
   As false portents, not sent from God, but thee;
   Who knowing I shall raign past thy preventing.
   Obtrud'st thy offer'd aid, that I accepting
   At least might seem to hold all power of thee,
   Ambitious spirit, and wouldst be thought my God,
   And storm'st refus'd, thinking to terrifie
   Mee to thy will; desist, thou art discern'd
   And toil'st in vain, nor me in vain molest.
   To whom the Fiend now swoln with rage reply'd:
   Then hear, O Son of David, Virgin-born;                             500
   For Son of God to me is yet in doubt,
   Of the Messiah I have heard foretold
   By all the Prophets; of thy birth at length
   Announc't by Gabriel with the first I knew,
   And of the Angelic Song in Bethlehem field,
   On thy birth-night, that sung thee Saviour born.
   From that time seldom have I ceas'd to eye
   Thy infancy, thy childhood, and thy youth,
   Thy manhood last, though yet in private bred;
   Till at the Ford of Jordan whither all                              510
   Flock'd to the Baptist, I among the rest,
   Though not to be Baptiz'd, by voice from Heav'n
   Heard thee pronounc'd the Son of God belov'd.
   Thenceforth I thought thee worth my nearer view
   And narrower Scrutiny, that I might learn
   In what degree or meaning thou art call'd
   The Son of God, which bears no single sence;
   The Son of God I also am, or was,
   And if I was, I am; relation stands;
   All men are Sons of God; yet thee I thought                         520
   In some respect far higher so declar'd.
   Therefore I watch'd thy footsteps from that hour,
   And follow'd thee still on to this wast wild;
   Where by all best conjectures I collect
   Thou art to be my fatal enemy.
   Good reason then, if I before-hand seek
   To understand my Adversary, who
   And what he is; his wisdom, power, intent,
   By parl, or composition, truce, or league
   To win him, or win from him what I can.                             530
   And opportunity I here have had
   To try thee, sift thee, and confess have found thee
   Proof against all temptation as a rock
   Of Adamant, and as a Center, firm
   To the utmost of meer man both wise and good,
   Not more; for Honours, Riches, Kingdoms, Glory
   Have been before contemn'd, and may agen:
   Therefore to know what more thou art then man,
   Worth naming Son of God by voice from Heav'n,
   Another method I must now begin.                                    540
   So saying he caught him up, and without wing
   Of Hippogrif bore through the Air sublime
   Over the Wilderness and o're the Plain;
   Till underneath them fair Jerusalem,
   The holy City lifted high her Towers,
   And higher yet the glorious Temple rear'd
   Her pile, far off appearing like a Mount
   Of Alabaster, top't with golden Spires:
   There on the highest Pinacle he set
   The Son of God; and added thus in scorn:                            550
   There stand, if thou wilt stand; to stand upright
   Will ask thee skill; I to thy Fathers house
   Have brought thee, and highest plac't, highest is best,
   Now shew thy Progeny; if not to stand,
   Cast thy self down; safely if Son of God:
   For it is written, He will give command
   Concerning thee to his Angels, in thir hands
   They shall up lift thee, lest at any time
   Thou chance to dash thy foot against a stone.
   To whom thus Jesus: also it is written,                             560
   Tempt not the Lord thy God, he said and stood.
   But Satan smitten with amazement fell
   As when Earths Son Antaeus (to compare
   Small things with greatest) in Irassa strove
   With Joves Alcides and oft foil'd still rose,
   Receiving from his mother Earth new strength,
   Fresh from his fall, and fiercer grapple joyn'd,
   Throttl'd at length in the Air, expir'd and fell;
   So after many a foil the Tempter proud,
   Renewing fresh assaults, amidst his pride                           570
   Fell whence he stood to see his Victor fall.
   And as that Theban Monster that propos'd
   Her riddle, and him, who solv'd it not, devour'd;
   That once found out and solv'd, for grief and spight
   Cast her self headlong from th' Ismenian steep,
   So strook with dread and anguish fell the Fiend,
   And to his crew, that sat consulting, brought
   Joyless triumphals of his hop't success,
   Ruin, and desperation, and dismay,
   Who durst so proudly tempt the Son of God.                          580
   So Satan fell and strait a fiery Globe
   Of Angels on full sail of wing flew nigh,
   Who on their plumy Vans receiv'd him soft
   From his uneasie station, and upbore
   As on a floating couch through the blithe Air,
   Then in a flowry valley set him down
   On a green bank, and set before him spred
   A table of Celestial Food, Divine,
   Ambrosial, Fruits fetcht from the tree of life,
   And from the fount of life Ambrosial drink,                         590
   That soon refresh'd him wearied, and repair'd
   What hunger, if aught hunger had impair'd,
   Or thirst, and as he fed, Angelic Quires
   Sung Heavenly Anthems of his victory
   Over temptation, and the Tempter proud.
   True Image of the Father whether thron'd
   In the bosom of bliss, and light of light
   Conceiving, or remote from Heaven, enshrin'd
   In fleshly Tabernacle, and human form,
   Wandring the Wilderness, whatever place,                            600
   Habit, or state, or motion, still expressing
   The Son of God, with Godlike force indu'd
   Against th' Attempter of thy Fathers Throne,
   And Thief of Paradise; him long of old
   Thou didst debel, and down from Heav'n cast
   With all his Army, now thou hast aveng'd
   Supplanted Adam, and by vanquishing
   Temptation, hast regain'd lost Paradise,
   And frustrated the conquest fraudulent:
   He never more henceforth will dare set foot                         610
   In Paradise to tempt; his snares are broke:
   For though that seat of earthly bliss be fail'd,
   A fairer Paradise is founded now
   For Adam and his chosen Sons, whom thou
   A Saviour art come down to re-install.
   Where they shall dwell secure, when time shall be
   Of Tempter and Temptation without fear.
   But thou, Infernal Serpent, shalt not long
   Rule in the Clouds; like an Autumnal Star
   Or Lightning thou shalt fall from Heav'n trod down                  620
   Under his feet: for proof, e're this thou feel'st
   Thy wound, yet not thy last and deadliest wound
   By this repulse receiv'd, and hold'st in Hell
   No triumph; in all her gates Abaddon rues
   Thy bold attempt; hereafter learn with awe
   To dread the Son of God: he all unarm'd
   Shall chase thee with the terror of his voice
   From  thy Demoniac holds, possession foul,
   Thee and thy Legions, yelling they shall flye,
   And beg to hide them in a herd of Swine,                            630
   Lest he command them down into the deep
   Bound, and to torment sent before thir time.
   Hail Son of the most High, heir of both worlds,
   Queller of Satan, on thy glorious work
   Now enter, and begin to save mankind.
   Thus they the Son of God our Saviour meek
   Sung Victor, and from Heavenly Feast refresht
   Brought on his way with joy; hee unobserv'd
   Home to his Mothers house private return'd.
 
   The End.
 
 
 
 Transcriber's Note: Title page of first edition of Samson Agonistes
 follows:
 
 
                             SAMSON
                            AGONISTES,
                               A
                         DRAMATIC POEM.
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                           The Author
                           JOHN MILTON
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                      Aristot. Poet. Cap. 6.
              Tragedia mimeis praxeos spadaias, &c.
   Tragedia est imitatio actionis seriae. &c. Per misericordiam &
      metum perficiens talium affectuum lustrationem.
   ------------------------------------------------------------
   ------------------------------------------------------------
                             LONDON.
              Printed by J.M. for John Starkey at the
               Mitre in Fleetstreet, near Temple-Bar.
                             MDCLXXI
 
 
 
 
 SAMSON AGONISTES
 
 
 
 
 Of that sort of Dramatic Poem which is call'd Tragedy.
 
 
 TRAGEDY, as it was antiently compos'd, hath been ever held the gravest,
 moralest, and most profitable of all other Poems: therefore said by
 Aristotle to be of power by raising pity and fear, or terror, to purge
 the mind of those and such like passions, that is to temper and reduce
 them to just measure with a kind of delight, stirr'd up by reading or
 seeing those passions well imitated. Nor is Nature wanting in her own
 effects to make good his assertion: for so in Physic things of
 melancholic hue and quality are us'd against melancholy, sowr against
 sowr, salt to remove salt humours. Hence Philosophers and other gravest
 Writers, as Cicero, Plutarch and others, frequently cite out of Tragic
 Poets, both to adorn and illustrate thir discourse.  The Apostle Paul
 himself thought it not unworthy to insert a verse of Euripides into the
 Text of Holy Scripture, I Cor. 15. 33. and Paraeus commenting on the
 Revelation, divides the whole Book as a Tragedy, into Acts distinguisht
 each by a Chorus of Heavenly Harpings and Song between.  Heretofore Men
 in highest dignity have labour'd not a little to be thought able to
 compose a Tragedy.  Of that honour Dionysius the elder was no less
 ambitious, then before of his attaining to the Tyranny. Augustus Caesar
 also had begun his Ajax, but unable to please his own judgment with what
 he had begun, left it unfinisht.  Seneca the Philosopher is by some
 thought the Author of those Tragedies (at lest the best of them) that go
 under that name.  Gregory Nazianzen a Father of the Church, thought it
 not unbeseeming the sanctity of his person to write a Tragedy which he
 entitl'd, Christ suffering. This is mention'd to vindicate Tragedy from
 the small esteem, or rather infamy, which in the account of many it
 undergoes at this day with other common Interludes; hap'ning through the
 Poets error of intermixing Comic stuff with Tragic sadness and gravity;
 or introducing trivial and vulgar persons, which by all judicious hath
 bin counted absurd; and brought in without discretion, corruptly to
 gratifie the people. And though antient Tragedy use no Prologue, yet
 using sometimes, in case of self defence, or explanation, that which
 Martial calls an Epistle; in behalf of this Tragedy coming forth after
 the antient manner, much different from what among us passes for best,
 thus much before-hand may be Epistl'd; that Chorus is here introduc'd
 after the Greek manner, not antient only but modern, and still in use
 among the Italians. In the modelling therefore of this Poem with good
 reason, the Antients and Italians are rather follow'd, as of much more
 authority and fame. The measure of Verse us'd in the Chorus is of all
 sorts, call'd by the Greeks Monostrophic, or rather Apolelymenon,
 without regard had to Strophe, Antistrophe or Epod, which were a kind of
 Stanza's fram'd only for the Music, then us'd with the Chorus that sung;
 not essential to the Poem, and therefore not material; or being divided
 into Stanza's or Pauses they may be call'd Allaeostropha.  Division into
 Act and Scene referring chiefly to the Stage (to which this work never
 was intended) is here omitted.
 
 It suffices if the whole Drama be found not produc't beyond the fift
 Act, of the style and uniformitie, and that commonly call'd the Plot,
 whether intricate or explicit, which is nothing indeed but such
 oeconomy, or disposition of the fable as may stand best with
 verisimilitude and decorum; they only will best judge who are not
 unacquainted with Aeschulus, Sophocles, and Euripides, the three Tragic
 Poets unequall'd yet by any, and the best rule to all who endeavour to
 write Tragedy. The circumscription of time wherein the whole Drama
 begins and ends, is according to antient rule, and best example, within
 the space of 24 hours.
 
 
 
 
 The Argument.
 
 
 Samson made Captive, Blind, and now in the Prison at Gaza, there to
 labour as in a common work-house, on a Festival day, in the general
 cessation from labour, comes forth into the open Air, to a place nigh,
 somewhat retir'd there to sit a while and bemoan his condition. Where he
 happens at length to be visited by certain friends and equals of his
 tribe, which make the Chorus, who seek to comfort him what they can;
 then by his old Father Manoa, who endeavours the like, and withal tells
 him his purpose to procure his liberty by ransom; lastly, that this
 Feast was proclaim'd by the Philistins as a day of Thanksgiving for thir
 deliverance from the hands of Samson, which yet more troubles him.
 Manoa then departs to prosecute his endeavour with the Philistian Lords
 for Samson's redemption; who in the mean while is visited by other
 persons; and lastly by a publick Officer to require coming to the Feast
 before the Lords and People, to play or shew his strength in thir
 presence; he at first refuses, dismissing the publick officer with
 absolute denyal to come; at length perswaded inwardly that this was from
 God, he yields to go along with him, who came now the second time with
 great threatnings to fetch him; the Chorus yet remaining on the place,
 Manoa returns full of joyful hope, to procure e're long his Sons
 deliverance: in the midst of which discourse an Ebrew comes in haste
 confusedly at first; and afterward more distinctly relating the
 Catastrophe, what Samson had done to the Philistins, and by accident to
 himself; wherewith the Tragedy ends.
 
 
   The Persons
 
   Samson.
   Manoa the father of Samson.
   Dalila his wife.
   Harapha of Gath.
   Publick Officer.
   Messenger.
   Chorus of Danites
 
 
   The Scene before the Prison in Gaza.
 
   Sam:  A little onward lend thy guiding hand
   To these dark steps, a little further on;
   For yonder bank hath choice of Sun or shade,
   There I am wont to sit, when any chance
   Relieves me from my task of servile toyl,
   Daily in the common Prison else enjoyn'd me,
   Where I a Prisoner chain'd, scarce freely draw
   The air imprison'd also, close and damp,
   Unwholsom draught: but here I feel amends,
   The breath of Heav'n fresh-blowing, pure and sweet,                  10
   With day-spring born; here leave me to respire.
   This day a solemn Feast the people hold
   To Dagon thir Sea-Idol, and forbid
   Laborious works, unwillingly this rest
   Thir Superstition yields me; hence with leave
   Retiring from the popular noise, I seek
   This unfrequented place to find some ease,
   Ease to the body some, none to the mind
   From restless thoughts, that like a deadly swarm
   Of Hornets arm'd, no sooner found alone,                             20
   But rush upon me thronging, and present
   Times past, what once I was, and what am now.
   O wherefore was my birth from Heaven foretold
   Twice by an Angel, who at last in sight
   Of both my Parents all in flames ascended
   From off the Altar, where an Off'ring burn'd,
   As in a fiery column charioting
   His Godlike presence, and from some great act
   Or benefit reveal'd to Abraham's race?
   Why was my breeding order'd and prescrib'd                           30
   As of a person separate to God,
   Design'd for great exploits; if I must dye
   Betray'd, Captiv'd, and both my Eyes put out,
   Made of my Enemies the scorn and gaze;
   To grind in Brazen Fetters under task
   With this Heav'n-gifted strength? O glorious strength
   Put to the labour of a Beast, debas't
   Lower then bondslave! Promise was that I
   Should Israel from Philistian yoke deliver;
   Ask for this great Deliverer now, and find him                       40
   Eyeless in Gaza at the Mill with slaves,
   Himself in bonds under Philistian yoke;
   Yet stay, let me not rashly call in doubt
   Divine Prediction; what if all foretold
   Had been fulfilld but through mine own default,
   Whom have I to complain of but my self?
   Who this high gift of strength committed to me,
   In what part lodg'd, how easily bereft me,
   Under the Seal of silence could not keep,
   But weakly to a woman must reveal it                                 50
   O'recome with importunity and tears.
   O impotence of mind, in body strong!
   But what is strength without a double share
   Of wisdom, vast, unwieldy, burdensom,
   Proudly secure, yet liable to fall
   By weakest suttleties, not made to rule,
   But to subserve where wisdom bears command.
   God, when he gave me strength, to shew withal
   How slight the gift was, hung it in my Hair.
   But peace, I must not quarrel with the will                          60
   Of highest dispensation, which herein
   Happ'ly had ends above my reach to know:
   Suffices that to me strength is my bane,
   And proves the sourse of all my miseries;
   So many, and so huge, that each apart
   Would ask a life to wail, but chief of all,
   O loss of sight, of thee I most complain!
   Blind among enemies, O worse then chains,
   Dungeon, or beggery, or decrepit age!
   Light the prime work of God to me is extinct,
   And all her various objects of delight
   Annull'd, which might in part my grief have eas'd,
   Inferiour to the vilest now become
   Of man or worm; the vilest here excel me,
   They creep, yet see, I dark in light expos'd
   To daily fraud, contempt, abuse and wrong,
   Within doors, or without, still as a fool,
   In power of others, never in my own;
   Scarce half I seem to live, dead more then half.
   O dark, dark, dark, amid the blaze of noon,                          80
   Irrecoverably dark, total Eclipse
   Without all hope of day!
   O first created Beam, and thou great Word,
   Let there be light, and light was over all;
   Why am I thus bereav'd thy prime decree?
   The Sun to me is dark
   And silent as the Moon,
   When she deserts the night
   Hid in her vacant interlunar cave.
   Since light so necessary is to life,                                 90
   And almost life itself, if it be true
   That light is in the Soul,
   She all in every part; why was the sight
   To such a tender ball as th' eye confin'd?
   So obvious and so easie to be quench't,
   And not as feeling through all parts diffus'd,
   That she might look at will through every pore?
   Then had I not been thus exil'd from light;
   As in the land of darkness yet in light,
   To live a life half dead, a living death,                           100
   And buried; but O yet more miserable!
   My self, my Sepulcher, a moving Grave,
   Buried, yet not exempt
   By priviledge of death and burial
   From worst of other evils, pains and wrongs,
   But made hereby obnoxious more
   To all the miseries of life,
   Life in captivity
   Among inhuman foes.
   But who are these? for with joint pace I hear                       110
   The tread of many feet stearing this way;
   Perhaps my enemies who come to stare
   At my affliction, and perhaps to insult,
   Thir daily practice to afflict me more.
 
   Chor:  This, this is he; softly a while,
   Let us not break in upon him;
   O change beyond report, thought, or belief!
   See how he lies at random, carelessly diffus'd,
   With languish't head unpropt,
   As one past hope, abandon'd                                         120
   And by himself given over;
   In slavish habit, ill-fitted weeds
   O're worn and soild;
   Or do my eyes misrepresent?  Can this be hee,
   That Heroic, that Renown'd,
   Irresistible Samson? whom unarm'd
   No strength of man, or fiercest wild beast could withstand;
   Who tore the Lion, as the Lion tears the Kid,
   Ran on embattelld Armies clad in Iron,
   And weaponless himself,                                             130
   Made Arms ridiculous, useless the forgery
   Of brazen shield and spear, the hammer'd Cuirass,
   Chalybean temper'd steel, and frock of mail
   Adamantean Proof;
   But safest he who stood aloof,
   When insupportably his foot advanc't,
   In scorn of thir proud arms and warlike tools,
   Spurn'd them to death by Troops.  The bold Ascalonite
   Fled from his Lion ramp, old Warriors turn'd
   Thir plated backs under his heel;                                   140
   Or grovling soild thir crested helmets in the dust.
   Then with what trivial weapon came to Hand,
   The Jaw of a dead Ass, his sword of bone,
   A thousand fore-skins fell, the flower of Palestin
   In Ramath-lechi famous to this day:
   Then by main force pull'd up, and on his shoulders bore
   The Gates of Azza, Post, and massie Bar
   Up to the Hill by Hebron, seat of Giants old,
   No journey of a Sabbath day, and loaded so;
   Like whom the Gentiles feign to bear up Heav'n.                     150
   Which shall I first bewail,
   Thy Bondage or lost Sight,
   Prison within Prison
   Inseparably dark?
   Thou art become (O worst imprisonment!)
   The Dungeon of thy self; thy Soul
    (Which Men enjoying sight oft without cause complain)
   Imprison'd now indeed,
   In real darkness of the body dwells,
   Shut up from outward light                                          160
   To incorporate with gloomy night;
   For inward light alas
   Puts forth no visual beam.
   O mirror of our fickle state,
   Since man on earth unparallel'd!
   The rarer thy example stands,
   By how much from the top of wondrous glory,
   Strongest of mortal men,
   To lowest pitch of abject fortune thou art fall'n.
   For him I reckon not in high estate                                 170
   Whom long descent of birth
   Or the sphear of fortune raises;
   But thee whose strength, while vertue was her mate
   Might have subdu'd the Earth,
   Universally crown'd with highest praises.
 
   Sam:  I hear the sound of words, thir sense the air
   Dissolves unjointed e're it reach my ear.
 
   Chor:  Hee speaks, let us draw nigh.  Matchless in might,
   The glory late of Israel, now the grief;
   We come thy friends and neighbours not unknown                      180
   From Eshtaol and Zora's fruitful Vale
   To visit or bewail thee, or if better,
   Counsel or Consolation we may bring,
   Salve to thy Sores, apt words have power to swage
   The tumors of a troubl'd mind,
   And are as Balm to fester'd wounds.
 
   Sam:  Your coming, Friends, revives me, for I learn
   Now of my own experience, not by talk,
   How counterfeit a coin they are who friends
   Bear in their Superscription (of the most                           190
   I would be understood) in prosperous days
   They swarm, but in adverse withdraw their head
   Not to be found, though sought.  Wee see, O friends.
   How many evils have enclos'd me round;
   Yet that which was the worst now least afflicts me,
   Blindness, for had I sight, confus'd with shame,
   How could I once look up, or heave the head,
   Who like a foolish Pilot have shipwrack't,
   My Vessel trusted to me from above,
   Gloriously rigg'd; and for a word, a tear,                          200
   Fool, have divulg'd the secret gift of God
   To a deceitful Woman: tell me Friends,
   Am I not sung and proverbd for a Fool
   In every street, do they not say, how well
   Are come upon him his deserts? yet why?
   Immeasurable strength they might behold
   In me, of wisdom nothing more then mean;
   This with the other should, at least, have paird,
   These two proportiond ill drove me transverse.
 
   Chor:  Tax not divine disposal, wisest Men                          210
   Have err'd, and by bad Women been deceiv'd;
   And shall again, pretend they ne're so wise.
   Deject not then so overmuch thy self,
   Who hast of sorrow thy full load besides;
   Yet truth to say, I oft have heard men wonder
   Why thou shouldst wed Philistian women rather
   Then of thine own Tribe fairer, or as fair,
   At least of thy own Nation, and as noble.
 
   Sam:  The first I saw at Timna, and she pleas'd
   Mee, not my Parents, that I sought to wed,                          220
   The daughter of an Infidel: they knew not
   That what I motion'd was of God; I knew
   From intimate impulse, and therefore urg'd
   The Marriage on; that by occasion hence
   I might begin Israel's Deliverance,
   The work to which I was divinely call'd;
   She proving false, the next I took to Wife
   (O that I never had! fond wish too late)
   Was in the Vale of Sorec, Dalila,
   That specious Monster, my accomplisht snare.                        230
   I thought it lawful from my former act,
   And the same end; still watching to oppress
   Israel's oppressours: of what now I suffer
   She was not the prime cause, but I my self,
   Who vanquisht with a peal of words (O weakness!)
   Gave up my fort of silence to a Woman.
 
   Chor:  In seeking just occasion to provoke
   The Philistine, thy Countries Enemy,
   Thou never wast remiss, I hear thee witness:
   Yet Israel still serves with all his Sons.                          240
 
   Sam:  That fault I take not on me, but transfer
   On Israel's Governours, and Heads of Tribes,
   Who seeing those great acts which God had done
   Singly by me against their Conquerours
   Acknowledg'd not, or not at all consider'd
   Deliverance offerd: I on th' other side
   Us'd no ambition to commend my deeds,
   The deeds themselves, though mute, spoke loud the dooer;
   But they persisted deaf, and would not seem
   To count them things worth notice, till at length                   250
   Thir Lords the Philistines with gather'd powers
   Enterd Judea seeking mee, who then
   Safe to the rock of Etham was retir'd,
   Not flying, but fore-casting in what place
   To set upon them, what advantag'd best;
   Mean while the men of Judah to prevent
   The harrass of thir Land, beset me round;
   I willingly on some conditions came
   Into thir hands, and they as gladly yield me
   To the uncircumcis'd a welcom prey,                                 260
   Bound with two cords; but cords to me were threds
   Toucht with the flame: on thir whole Host I flew
   Unarm'd, and with a trivial weapon fell'd
   Thir choicest youth; they only liv'd who fled.
   Had Judah that day join'd, or one whole Tribe,
   They had by this possess'd the Towers of Gath,
   And lorded over them whom now they serve;
   But what more oft in Nations grown corrupt,
   And by thir vices brought to servitude,
   Then to love Bondage more then Liberty,                             270
   Bondage with ease then strenuous liberty;
   And to despise, or envy, or suspect
   Whom God hath of his special favour rais'd
   As thir Deliverer; if he aught begin,
   How frequent to desert him, and at last
   To heap ingratitude on worthiest deeds?
 
   Chor:  Thy words to my remembrance bring
   How Succoth and the Fort of Penuel
   Thir great Deliverer contemn'd,
   The matchless Gideon in pursuit                                     280
   Of Madian and her vanquisht Kings;
   And how ingrateful Ephraim
   Not worse then by his shield and spear
   Had dealt with Jephtha, who by argument,
   Defended Israel from the Ammonite,
   Had not his prowess quell'd thir pride
   In that sore battel when so many dy'd
   Without Reprieve adjudg'd to death,
   For want of well pronouncing Shibboleth.
 
   Sam:  Of such examples adde mee to the roul,                        290
   Mee easily indeed mine may neglect,
   But Gods propos'd deliverance not so.
 
   Chor: Just are the ways of God,
   And justifiable to Men;
   Unless there be who think not God at all,
   If any be, they walk obscure;
   For of such Doctrine never was there School,
   But the heart of the Fool,
   And no man therein Doctor but himself.
   Yet more there be who doubt his ways not just,                      300
   As to his own edicts, found contradicting,
   Then give the rains to wandring thought,
   Regardless of his glories diminution;
   Till by thir own perplexities involv'd
   They ravel more, still less resolv'd,
   But never find self-satisfying solution.
   As if they would confine th' interminable,
   And tie him to his own prescript,
   Who made our Laws to bind us, not himself,
   And hath full right to exempt                                       310
   Whom so it pleases him by choice
   From National obstriction, without taint
   Of sin, or legal debt;
   For with his own Laws he can best dispence.
   He would not else who never wanted means,
   Nor in respect of the enemy just cause
   To set his people free,
   Have prompted this Heroic Nazarite,
   Against his vow of strictest purity,
   To seek in marriage that fallacious Bride,                          320
   Unclean, unchaste.
   Down Reason then, at least vain reasonings down,
   Though Reason here aver
   That moral verdit quits her of unclean:
   Unchaste was subsequent, her stain not his.
   But see here comes thy reverend Sire
   With careful step, Locks white as doune,
   Old Manoah: advise
   Forthwith how thou oughtst to receive him.
 
   Sam:  Ay me, another inward grief awak't,                           330
   With mention of that name renews th' assault.
 
   Man:  Brethren and men of Dan, for such ye seem,
   Though in this uncouth place; if old respect,
   As I suppose, towards your once gloried friend,
   My Son now Captive, hither hath inform'd
   Your younger feet, while mine cast back with age
   Came lagging after; say if he be here.
 
   Chor:  As signal now in low dejected state,
   As earst in highest; behold him where he lies.
 
   Man:  O miserable change! is this the man,                          340
   That invincible Samson, far renown'd,
   The dread of Israel's foes, who with a strength
   Equivalent to Angels walk'd thir streets,
   None offering fight; who single combatant
   Duell'd thir Armies rank't in proud array,
   Himself an Army, now unequal match
   To save himself against a coward arm'd
   At one spears length.  O ever failing trust
   In mortal strength! and oh what not in man
   Deceivable and vain! Nay what thing good                            350
   Pray'd for, but often proves our woe, our bane?
   I pray'd for Children, and thought barrenness
   In wedlock a reproach; I gain'd a Son,
   And such a Son as all Men hail'd me happy;
   Who would be now a Father in my stead?
   O wherefore did God grant me my request,
   And as a blessing with such pomp adorn'd?
   Why are his gifts desirable, to tempt
   Our earnest Prayers, then giv'n with solemn hand
   As Graces, draw a Scorpions tail behind?                            360
   For this did the Angel twice descend? for this
   Ordain'd thy nurture holy, as of a Plant;
   Select, and Sacred, Glorious for a while,
   The miracle of men: then in an hour
   Ensnar'd, assaulted, overcome, led bound,
   Thy Foes derision, Captive, Poor, and Blind
   Into a Dungeon thrust, to work with Slaves?
   Alas methinks whom God hath chosen once
   To worthiest deeds, if he through frailty err,
   He should not so o'rewhelm, and as a thrall                         370
   Subject him to so foul indignities,
   Be it but for honours sake of former deeds.
 
   Sam:  Appoint not heavenly disposition, Father,
   Nothing of all these evils hath befall'n me
   But justly; I my self have brought them on,
   Sole Author I, sole cause: if aught seem vile,
   As vile hath been my folly, who have profan'd
   The mystery of God giv'n me under pledge
   Of vow, and have betray'd it to a woman,
   A Canaanite, my faithless enemy.                                    380
   This well I knew, nor was at all surpris'd,
   But warn'd by oft experience: did not she
   Of Timna first betray me, and reveal
   The secret wrested from me in her highth
   Of Nuptial Love profest, carrying it strait
   To them who had corrupted her, my Spies,
   And Rivals? In this other was there found
   More Faith? who also in her prime of love,
   Spousal embraces, vitiated with Gold,
   Though offer'd only, by the sent conceiv'd                          390
   Her spurious first-born; Treason against me?
   Thrice she assay'd with flattering prayers and sighs,
   And amorous reproaches to win from me
   My capital secret, in what part my strength
   Lay stor'd in what part summ'd, that she might know:
   Thrice I deluded her, and turn'd to sport
   Her importunity, each time perceiving
   How openly, and with what impudence
   She purpos'd to betray me, and (which was worse
   Then undissembl'd hate) with what contempt                          400
   She sought to make me Traytor to my self;
   Yet the fourth time, when mustring all her wiles,
   With blandisht parlies, feminine assaults,
   Tongue-batteries, she surceas'd not day nor night
   To storm me over-watch't, and wearied out.
   At times when men seek most repose and rest,
   I yielded, and unlock'd her all my heart,
   Who with a grain of manhood well resolv'd
   Might easily have shook off all her snares:
   But foul effeminacy held me yok't                                   410
   Her Bond-slave; O indignity, O blot
   To Honour and Religion! servil mind
   Rewarded well with servil punishment!
   The base degree to which I now am fall'n,
   These rags, this grinding, is not yet so base
   As was my former servitude, ignoble,
   Unmanly, ignominious, infamous,
   True slavery, and that blindness worse then this,
   That saw not how degeneratly I serv'd.
 
   Man:  I cannot praise thy Marriage choises, Son,                    420
   Rather approv'd them not; but thou didst plead
   Divine impulsion prompting how thou might'st
   Find some occasion to infest our Foes.
   I state not that; this I am sure; our Foes
   Found soon occasion thereby to make thee
   Thir Captive, and thir triumph; thou the sooner
   Temptation found'st, or over-potent charms
   To violate the sacred trust of silence
   Deposited within thee; which to have kept
   Tacit, was in thy power; true; and thou hear'st                     430
   Enough, and more the burden of that fault;
   Bitterly hast thou paid, and still art paying
   That rigid score.  A worse thing yet remains,
   This day the Philistines a popular Feast
   Here celebrate in Gaza, and proclaim
   Great Pomp, and Sacrifice, and Praises loud
   To Dagon, as their God who hath deliver'd
   Thee Samson bound and blind into thir hands,
   Them out of thine, who slew'st them many a slain.
   So Dagon shall be magnifi'd, and God,                               440
   Besides whom is no God, compar'd with Idols,
   Disglorifi'd, blasphem'd, and had in scorn
   By th' Idolatrous rout amidst thir wine;
   Which to have come to pass by means of thee,
   Samson, of all thy sufferings think the heaviest,
   Of all reproach the most with shame that ever
   Could have befall'n thee and thy Fathers house.
 
   Sam:  Father, I do acknowledge and confess
   That I this honour, I this pomp have brought
   To Dagon, and advanc'd his praises high                             450
   Among the Heathen round; to God have brought
   Dishonour, obloquie, and op't the mouths
   Of Idolists, and Atheists; have brought scandal
   To Israel diffidence of God, and doubt
   In feeble hearts, propense anough before
   To waver, or fall off and joyn with Idols:
   Which is my chief affliction, shame and sorrow,
   The anguish of my Soul, that suffers not
   Mine eie to harbour sleep, or thoughts to rest.
   This only hope relieves me, that the strife                         460
   With me hath end; all the contest is now
   'Twixt God and Dagon; Dagon hath presum'd,
   Me overthrown, to enter lists with God,
   His Deity comparing and preferring
   Before the God of Abraham. He, be sure,
   Will not connive, or linger, thus provok'd,
   But will arise and his great name assert:
   Dagon must stoop, and shall e're long receive
   Such a discomfit, as shall quite despoil him
   Of all these boasted Trophies won on me,                            470
   And with confusion blank his Worshippers.
 
   Man: With cause this hope relieves thee, and these words
   I as a Prophecy receive: for God,
   Nothing more certain, will not long defer
   To vindicate the glory of his name
   Against all competition, nor will long
   Endure it, doubtful whether God be Lord,
   Or Dagon.  But for thee what shall be done?
   Thou must not in the mean while here forgot
   Lie in this miserable loathsom plight                               480
   Neglected.  I already have made way
   To some Philistian Lords, with whom to treat
   About thy ransom: well they may by this
   Have satisfi'd thir utmost of revenge
   By pains and slaveries, worse then death inflicted
   On thee, who now no more canst do them harm.
 
   Sam:  Spare that proposal, Father, spare the trouble
   Of that sollicitation; let me here,
   As I deserve, pay on my punishment;
   And expiate, if possible, my crime,                                 490
   Shameful garrulity.  To have reveal'd
   Secrets of men, the secrets of a friend,
   How hainous had the fact been, how deserving
   Contempt, and scorn of all, to be excluded
   All friendship, and avoided as a blab,
   The mark of fool set on his front?
   But I Gods counsel have not kept, his holy  secret
   Presumptuously have publish'd, impiously,
   Weakly at least, and shamefully: A sin
   That Gentiles in thir Parables condemn                              500
   To thir abyss and horrid pains confin'd.
 
   Man:  Be penitent and for thy fault contrite,
   But act not in thy own affliction, Son,
   Repent the sin, but if the punishment
   Thou canst avoid, selfpreservation bids;
   Or th' execution leave to high disposal,
   And let another hand, not thine, exact
   Thy penal forfeit from thy self; perhaps
   God will relent, and quit thee all his debt;
   Who evermore approves and more accepts                              510
   (Best pleas'd with humble and filial submission)
   Him who imploring mercy sues for life,
   Then who selfrigorous chooses death as due;
   Which argues overjust, and self-displeas'd
   For self-offence, more then for God offended.
   Reject not then what offerd means, who knows
   But God hath set before us, to return thee
   Home to thy countrey and his sacred house,
   Where thou mayst bring thy off'rings, to avert
   His further ire, with praiers and vows renew'd.                     520
 
   Sam:  His pardon I implore; but as for life,
   To what end should I seek it? when in strength
   All mortals I excell'd, and great in hopes
   With youthful courage and magnanimous thoughts
   Of birth from  Heav'n foretold and high exploits,
   Full of divine instinct, after some proof
   Of acts indeed heroic, far beyond
   The Sons of Anac, famous now and blaz'd,
   Fearless of danger, like a petty God
   I walk'd about admir'd of all and dreaded                           530
   On hostile ground, none daring my affront.
   Then swoll'n with pride into the snare I fell
   Of fair fallacious looks, venereal trains,
   Softn'd with pleasure and voluptuous life;
   At length to lay my head and hallow'd pledge
   Of all my strength in the lascivious lap
   Of a deceitful Concubine who shore me
   Like a tame Weather, all my precious fleece,
   Then turn'd me out ridiculous, despoil'd,
   Shav'n, and disarm'd among my enemies.                              540
 
   Chor.  Desire of wine and all delicious drinks,
   Which many a famous Warriour overturns,
   Thou couldst repress, nor did the dancing Rubie
   Sparkling; out-pow'rd, the flavor, or the smell,
   Or taste that cheers the heart of Gods and men,
   Allure thee from the cool Crystalline stream.
 
   Sam. Where ever fountain or fresh current flow'd
   Against the Eastern ray, translucent, pure,
   With touch aetherial of Heav'ns fiery rod
   I drank, from the clear milkie juice allaying                       550
   Thirst, and refresht; nor envy'd them the grape
   Whose heads that turbulent liquor fills with fumes.
 
   Chor.  O madness, to think use of strongest wines
   And strongest drinks our chief support of health,
   When God with these forbid'n made choice to rear
   His mighty Champion, strong above compare,
   Whose drink was only from the liquid brook.
 
    Sam.  But what avail'd this temperance, not compleat
   Against another object more enticing?
   What boots it at one gate to make defence,                          560
   And at another to let in the foe
   Effeminatly vanquish't? by which means,
   Now blind, disheartn'd, sham'd, dishonour'd, quell'd,
   To what can I be useful, wherein serve
   My Nation, and the work from Heav'n impos'd,
   But to sit idle on the houshold hearth,
   A burdenous drone; to visitants a gaze,
   Or pitied object, these redundant locks
   Robustious to no purpose clustring down,
   Vain monument of strength; till length of years                     570
   And sedentary numness craze my limbs
   To a contemptible old age obscure.
   Here rather let me drudge and earn my bread,
   Till vermin or the draff of servil food
   Consume me, and oft-invocated death
   Hast'n the welcom end of all my pains.
 
   Man.  Wilt thou then serve the Philistines with that gift
   Which was expresly giv'n thee to annoy them?
   Better at home lie bed-rid, not only idle,
   Inglorious, unimploy'd, with age out-worn.                          580
   But God who caus'd a fountain at thy prayer
   From the dry ground to spring, thy thirst to allay
   After the brunt of battel, can as easie
   Cause light again within thy eies to spring,
   Wherewith to serve him better then thou hast;
   And I perswade me so; why else this strength
   Miraculous yet remaining in those locks?
   His might continues in thee not for naught,
   Nor shall his wondrous gifts be frustrate thus.
 
   Sam:  All otherwise to me my thoughts portend,                      590
   That these dark orbs no more shall treat with light,
   Nor th' other light of life continue long,
   But yield to double darkness nigh at hand:
   So much I feel my genial spirits droop,
   My hopes all flat, nature within me seems
   In all her functions weary of herself;
   My race of glory run, and race of shame,
   And I shall shortly be with them that rest.
 
   Man.  Believe not these suggestions which proceed
   From anguish of the mind and humours black,                         600
   That mingle with thy fancy.  I however
   Must not omit a Fathers timely care
   To prosecute the means of thy deliverance
   By ransom or how else: mean while be calm,
   And healing words from these thy friends admit.
 
   Sam.  O that torment should not be confin'd
   To the bodies wounds and sores
   With maladies innumerable
   In heart, head, brest, and reins;
   But must secret passage find                                        610
   To th' inmost mind,
   There exercise all his fierce accidents,
   And on her purest spirits prey,
   As on entrails, joints, and limbs,
   With answerable pains, but more intense,
   'Though void of corporal sense.
   My griefs not only pain me
   As a lingring disease,
   But finding no redress, ferment and rage,
   Nor less then wounds immedicable                                    620
   Ranckle, and fester, and gangrene,
   To black mortification.
   Thoughts my Tormenters arm'd with deadly stings
   Mangle my apprehensive tenderest parts,
   Exasperate, exulcerate, and raise
   Dire inflammation which no cooling herb
   Or medcinal liquor can asswage,
   Nor breath of Vernal Air from snowy Alp.
   Sleep hath forsook and giv'n me o're
   To deaths benumming Opium as my only cure.                          630
   Thence faintings, swounings of despair,
   And sense of Heav'ns desertion.
   I was his nursling once and choice delight,
   His destin'd from the womb,
   Promisd by Heavenly message twice descending.
   Under his special eie
   Abstemious I grew up and thriv'd amain;
   He led me on to mightiest deeds
   Above the nerve of mortal arm
   Against the uncircumcis'd, our enemies.                             640
   But now hath cast me off as never known,
   And to those cruel enemies,
   Whom I by his appointment had provok't,
   Left me all helpless with th' irreparable loss
   Of sight, reserv'd alive to be repeated
   The subject of thir cruelty, or scorn.
   Nor am I in the list of them that hope;
   Hopeless are all my evils, all remediless;
   This one prayer yet remains, might I be heard,
   No long petition, speedy death,                                     650
   The close of all my miseries, and the balm.
 
   Chor:  Many are the sayings of the wise
   In antient and in modern books enroll'd;
   Extolling Patience as the truest fortitude;
   And to the bearing well of all calamities,
   All chances incident to mans frail life
   Consolatories writ
   With studied argument, and much perswasion sought
   Lenient of grief and anxious thought,
   But with th' afflicted in his pangs thir sound                      680
   Little prevails, or rather seems a tune,
   Harsh, and of dissonant mood from his complaint,
   Unless he feel within
   Some sourse of consolation from above;
   Secret refreshings, that repair his strength,
   And fainting spirits uphold.
   God of our Fathers, what is man!
   That thou towards him with hand so various,
   Or might I say contrarious,
   Temperst thy providence through his short course,                   670
   Not evenly, as thou rul'st
   The Angelic orders and inferiour creatures mute,
   Irrational and brute.
   Nor do I name of men the common rout,
   That wandring loose about
   Grow up and perish, as the summer flie,
   Heads without name no more rememberd,
   But such as thou hast solemnly elected,
   With gifts and graces eminently adorn'd
   To some great work, thy glory,                                      680
   And peoples safety, which in part they effect:
   Yet toward these thus dignifi'd, thou oft
   Amidst thir highth of noon,
   Changest thy countenance, and thy hand with no regard
   Of highest favours past
   From thee on them, or them to thee of service.
   Nor only dost degrade them, or remit
   To life obscur'd, which were a fair dismission,
   But throw'st them lower then thou didst exalt them high,
   Unseemly falls in human eie,                                        690
   Too grievous for the trespass or omission,
   Oft leav'st them to the hostile sword
   Of Heathen and prophane, thir carkasses
   To dogs and fowls a prey, or else captiv'd:
   Or to the unjust tribunals, under change of times,
   And condemnation of the ingrateful multitude.
   If these they scape, perhaps in poverty
   With sickness and disease thou bow'st them down,
   Painful diseases and deform'd,                                      700
   In crude old age;
   Though not disordinate, yet causless suffring
   The punishment of dissolute days, in fine,
   Just or unjust, alike seem miserable,
   For oft alike, both come to evil end.
   So deal not with this once thy glorious Champion,
   The Image of thy strength, and mighty minister.
   What do I beg? how hast thou dealt already?
   Behold him in this state calamitous, and turn
   His labours, for thou canst, to peaceful end.
   But who is this, what thing of Sea or Land?                         710
   Femal of sex it seems,
   That so bedeckt, ornate, and gay,
   Comes this way sailing
   Like a stately Ship
   Of Tarsus, bound for th' Isles
   Of Javan or Gadier
   With all her bravery on, and tackle trim,
   Sails fill'd, and streamers waving,
   Courted by all the winds that hold them play,
   An Amber sent of odorous perfume                                    720
   Her harbinger, a damsel train behind;
   Some rich Philistian Matron she may seem,
   And now at nearer view, no other certain
   Than Dalila thy wife.
 
   Sam:  My Wife, my Traytress, let her not come near me.
 
   Cho:  Yet on she moves, now stands & eies thee fixt,
   About t'have spoke, but now, with head declin'd
   Like a fair flower surcharg'd with dew, she weeps
   And words addrest seem into tears dissolv'd,
   Wetting the borders of her silk'n veil:                             730
   But now again she makes address to speak.
 
   Dal:  With doubtful feet and wavering resolution
   I came, still dreading thy displeasure, Samson,
   Which to have merited, without excuse,
   I cannot but acknowledge; yet if tears
   May expiate (though the fact more evil drew
   In the perverse event then I foresaw)
   My penance hath not slack'n'd, though my pardon
   No way assur'd.  But conjugal affection
   Prevailing over fear, and timerous doubt                            740
   Hath led me on desirous to behold
   Once more thy face, and know of thy estate.
   If aught in my ability may serve
   To light'n what thou suffer'st, and appease
   Thy mind with what amends is in my power,
   Though late, yet in some part to recompense
   My rash but more unfortunate misdeed.
 
   Sam:  Out, out Hyaena; these are thy wonted arts,
   And arts of every woman false like thee,
   To break all faith, all vows, deceive, betray,                      750
   Then as repentant to submit, beseech,
   And reconcilement move with feign'd remorse,
   Confess, and promise wonders in her change,
   Not truly penitent, but chief to try
   Her husband, how far urg'd his patience bears,
   His vertue or weakness which way to assail:
   Then with more cautious and instructed skill
   Again transgresses, and again submits;
   That wisest and best men full oft beguil'd
   With goodness principl'd not to reject                              760
   The penitent, but ever to forgive,
   Are drawn to wear out miserable days,
   Entangl'd with a poysnous bosom snake,
   If not by quick destruction soon cut off
   As I by thee, to Ages an example.
 
   Dal: Yet hear me Samson; not that I endeavour
   To lessen or extenuate my offence,
   But that on th' other side if it be weigh'd
   By it self, with aggravations not surcharg'd,
   Or else with just allowance counterpois'd                           770
   I may, if possible, thy pardon find
   The easier towards me, or thy hatred less.
   First granting, as I do, it was a weakness
   In me, but incident to all our sex,
   Curiosity, inquisitive, importune
   Of secrets, then with like infirmity
   To publish them, both common female faults:
   Was it not weakness also to make known
   For importunity, that is for naught,
   Wherein consisted all thy strength and safety?                      780
   To what I did thou shewdst me first the way.
   But I to enemies reveal'd, and should not.
   Nor shouldst thou have trusted that to womans frailty
   E're I to thee, thou to thy self wast cruel.
   Let weakness then with weakness come to parl
   So near related, or the same of kind,
   Thine forgive mine; that men may censure thine
   The gentler, if severely thou exact not
   More strength from me, then in thy self was found.
   And what if Love, which thou interpret'st hate,                     790
   The jealousie of Love, powerful of sway
   In human hearts, nor less in mine towards thee,
   Caus'd what I did? I saw thee mutable
   Of fancy, feard lest one day thou wouldst leave me
   As her at Timna, sought by all means therefore
   How to endear, and hold thee to me firmest:
   No better way I saw then by importuning
   To learn thy secrets, get into my power
   Thy key of strength and safety: thou wilt say,
   Why then reveal'd? I was assur'd by those                           800
   Who tempted me, that nothing was design'd
   Against thee but safe custody, and hold:
   That made for me, I knew that liberty
   Would draw thee forth to perilous enterprises,
   While I at home sate full of cares and fears
   Wailing thy absence in my widow'd bed;
   Here I should still enjoy thee day and night
   Mine and Loves prisoner, not the Philistines,
   Whole to my self, unhazarded abroad,
   Fearless at home of partners in my love.                            810
   These reasons in Loves law have past for good,
   Though fond and reasonless to some perhaps:
   And Love hath oft, well meaning, wrought much wo,
   Yet always pity or pardon hath obtain'd.
   Be not unlike all others, not austere
   As thou art strong, inflexible as steel.
   If thou in strength all mortals dost exceed,
   In uncompassionate anger do not so.
 
   Sam:  How cunningly the sorceress displays
   Her own transgressions, to upbraid me mine!                         820
   That malice not repentance brought thee hither,
   By this appears: I gave, thou say'st, th' example,
   I led the way; bitter reproach, but true,
   I to my self was false e're thou to me,
   Such pardon therefore as I give my folly,
   Take to thy wicked deed: which when thou seest
   Impartial, self-severe, inexorable,
   Thou wilt renounce thy seeking, and much rather
   Confess it feign'd, weakness is thy excuse,
   And I believe it, weakness to resist                                830
   Philistian gold: if weakness may excuse,
   What Murtherer, what Traytor, Parricide,
   Incestuous, Sacrilegious, but may plead it?
   All wickedness is weakness: that plea therefore
   With God or Man will gain thee no remission.
   But Love constrain'd thee; call it furious rage
   To satisfie thy lust: Love seeks to have Love;
   My love how couldst thou hope, who tookst the way
   To raise in me inexpiable hate,
   Knowing, as needs I must, by thee betray'd?                        840
   In vain thou striv'st to cover shame with shame,
   Or by evasions thy crime uncoverst more.
 
   Dal:  Since thou determinst weakness for no plea
   In man or woman, though to thy own condemning,
   Hear what assaults I had, what snares besides,
   What sieges girt me round, e're I consented;
   Which might have aw'd the best resolv'd of men,
   The constantest to have yielded without blame.
   It was not gold, as to my charge thou lay'st,
   That wrought with me: thou know'st the Magistrates                  850
   And Princes of my countrey came in person,
   Sollicited, commanded, threatn'd, urg'd,
   Adjur'd by all the bonds of civil Duty
   And of Religion, press'd how just it was,
   How honourable, how glorious to entrap
   A common enemy, who had destroy'd
   Such numbers of our Nation: and the Priest
   Was not behind, but ever at my ear,
   Preaching how meritorious with the gods
   It would be to ensnare an irreligious                               860
   Dishonourer of Dagon: what had I
   To oppose against such powerful arguments?
   Only my love of thee held long debate;
   And combated in silence all these reasons
   With hard contest: at length that grounded maxim
   So rife and celebrated in the mouths
   Of wisest men; that to the public good
   Private respects must yield; with grave authority'
   Took full possession of me and prevail'd;
   Vertue, as I thought, truth, duty so enjoyning.                     870
 
   Sam:  I thought where all thy circling wiles would end;
   In feign'd Religion, smooth hypocrisie.
   But had thy love, still odiously pretended,
   Bin, as it ought, sincere, it would have taught thee
   Far other reasonings, brought forth other deeds.
   I before all the daughters of my Tribe
   And of my Nation chose thee from among
   My enemies, lov'd thee, as too well thou knew'st,
   Too well, unbosom'd all my secrets to thee,
   Not out of levity, but over-powr'd                                  880
   By thy request, who could deny thee nothing;
   Yet now am judg'd an enemy.  Why then
   Didst thou at first receive me for thy husband?
   Then, as since then, thy countries foe profest:
   Being once a wife, for me thou wast to leave
   Parents and countrey; nor was I their subject,
   Nor under their protection but my own,
   Thou mine, not theirs: if aught against my life
   Thy countrey sought of thee, it sought unjustly,
   Against the law of nature, law of nations,                          890
   No more thy countrey, but an impious crew
   Of men conspiring to uphold thir state
   By worse than hostile deeds, violating the ends
   For which our countrey is a name so dear;
   Not therefore to be obey'd.  But zeal mov'd thee;
   To please thy gods thou didst it; gods unable
   To acquit themselves and prosecute their foes
   But by ungodly deeds, the contradiction
   Of their own deity, Gods cannot be:
   Less therefore to be pleas'd, obey'd, or fear'd,                    900
   These false pretexts and varnish'd colours failing,
   Bare in thy guilt how foul must thou appear?
 
   Dal:  In argument with men a woman ever
   Goes by the worse, whatever be her cause.
 
   Sam:  For want of words no doubt, or lack of breath,
   Witness when I was worried with thy peals.
 
   Dal:  I was a fool, too rash, and quite mistaken
   In what I thought would have succeeded best.
   Let me obtain forgiveness of thee, Samson,
   Afford me place to shew what recompence                             910
   Towards thee I intend for what I have misdone,
   Misguided: only what remains past cure
   Bear not too sensibly, nor still insist
   To afflict thy self in vain: though sight be lost,
   Life yet hath many solaces, enjoy'd
   Where other senses want not their delights
   At home in leisure and domestic ease,
   Exempt from many a care and chance to which
   Eye-sight exposes daily men abroad.
   I to the Lords will intercede, not doubting                         920
   Thir favourable ear, that I may fetch thee
   From forth this loathsom prison-house, to abide
   With me, where my redoubl'd love and care
   With nursing diligence, to me glad office,
   May ever tend about thee to old age
   With all things grateful chear'd, and so suppli'd,
   That what by me thou hast lost thou least shalt miss.
 
   Sam:  No, no, of my condition take no care;
   It fits not; thou and I long since are twain;
   Nor think me so unwary or accurst                                   930
   To bring my feet again into the snare
   Where once I have been caught; I know thy trains
   Though dearly to my cost, thy ginns, and toyls;
   Thy fair enchanted cup, and warbling charms
   No more on me have power, their force is null'd,
   So much of Adders wisdom I have learn't
   To fence my ear against thy sorceries.
   If in my flower of youth and strength, when all men
   Lov'd, honour'd, fear'd me, thou alone could hate me
   Thy Husband, slight me, sell me, and forgo me;                      940
   How wouldst thou use me now, blind, and thereby
   Deceiveable, in most things as a child
   Helpless, thence easily contemn'd, and scorn'd,
   And last neglected? How wouldst thou insult
   When I must live uxorious to thy will
   In perfet thraldom, how again betray me,
   Bearing my words and doings to the Lords
   To gloss upon, and censuring, frown or smile?
   This Gaol I count the house of Liberty
   To thine whose doors my feet shall never enter.                     950
 
   Dal:  Let me approach at least, and touch thy hand.
 
   Sam:  Not for thy life, lest fierce remembrance wake
   My sudden rage to tear thee joint by joint.
   At distance I forgive thee, go with that;
   Bewail thy falshood, and the pious works
   It hath brought forth to make thee memorable
   Among illustrious women, faithful wives:
   Cherish thy hast'n'd widowhood with the gold
   Of Matrimonial treason: so farewel.
 
   Dal:  I see thou art implacable, more deaf                          960
   To prayers, then winds and seas, yet winds to seas
   Are reconcil'd at length, and Sea to Shore:
   Thy anger, unappeasable, still rages,
   Eternal tempest never to be calm'd.
   Why do I humble thus my self, and suing
   For peace, reap nothing but repulse and hate?
   Bid go with evil omen and the brand
   Of infamy upon my name denounc't?
   To mix with thy concernments I desist
   Henceforth, nor too much disapprove my own.                         970
   Fame if not double-fac't is double-mouth'd,
   And with contrary blast proclaims most deeds,
   On both his wings, one black, th' other white,
   Bears greatest names in his wild aerie flight.
   My name perhaps among the Circumcis'd
   In Dan, in Judah, and the bordering Tribes,
   To all posterity may stand defam'd,
   With malediction mention'd, and the blot
   Of falshood most unconjugal traduc't.
   But in my countrey where I most desire,                             980
   In Ecron, Gaza, Asdod, and in Gath
   I shall be nam'd among the famousest
   Of Women, sung at solemn festivals,
   Living and dead recorded, who to save
   Her countrey from a fierce destroyer, chose
   Above the faith of wedlock-bands, my tomb
   With odours visited and annual flowers.
   Not less renown'd then in Mount Ephraim,
   Jael who with inhospitable guile
   Smote Sisera sleeping through the Temples nail'd.                   990
   Nor shall I count it hainous to enjoy
   The public marks of honour and reward
   Conferr'd upon me, for the piety
   Which to my countrey I was judg'd to have shewn.
   At this who ever envies or repines
   I leave him to his lot, and like my own.
 
   Chor:  She's gone, a manifest Serpent by her sting
   Discover'd in the end, till now conceal'd.
 
   Sam:  So let her go, God sent her to debase me,
   And aggravate my folly who committed                               1000
   To such a viper his most sacred trust
   Of secresie, my safety, and my life.
 
   Chor:  Yet beauty, though injurious, hath strange power,
   After offence returning, to regain
   Love once possest, nor can be easily
   Repuls't, without much inward passion felt
   And secret sting of amorous remorse.
 
   Sam:  Love-quarrels oft in pleasing concord end,
   Not wedlock-trechery endangering life.
 
   Chor:  It is not vertue, wisdom, valour, wit,                      1010
   Strength, comliness of shape, or amplest merit
   That womans love can win or long inherit;
   But what it is, hard is to say,
   Harder to hit,
   (Which way soever men refer it)
   Much like thy riddle, Samson, in one day
   Or seven, though one should musing sit;
   If any of these or all, the Timnian bride
   Had not so soon preferr'd
   Thy Paranymph, worthless to thee compar'd,                         1020
   Successour in thy bed,
   Nor both so loosly disally'd
   Thir nuptials, nor this last so trecherously
   Had shorn the fatal harvest of thy head.
   Is it for that such outward ornament
   Was lavish't on thir Sex, that inward gifts
   Were left for hast unfinish't, judgment scant,
   Capacity not rais'd to apprehend
   Or value what is best
   In choice, but oftest to affect the wrong?                         1030
   Or was too much of self-love mixt,
   Of constancy no root infixt,
   That either they love nothing, or not long?
   What e're it be, to wisest men and best
   Seeming at first all heavenly under virgin veil,
   Soft, modest, meek, demure,
   Once join'd, the contrary she proves, a thorn
   Intestin, far within defensive arms
   A cleaving mischief, in his way to vertue
   Adverse and turbulent, or by her charms                            1040
   Draws him awry enslav'd
   With dotage, and his sense deprav'd
   To folly and shameful deeds which ruin ends.
   What Pilot so expert but needs must wreck
   Embarqu'd with such a Stears-mate at the Helm?
   Favour'd of Heav'n who finds
   One vertuous rarely found,
   That in domestic good combines:
   Happy that house! his way to peace is smooth:
   But vertue which breaks through all opposition,                    1050
   And all temptation can remove,
   Most shines and most is acceptable above.
   Therefore Gods universal Law
   Gave to the man despotic power
   Over his female in due awe,
   Nor from that right to part an hour,
   Smile she or lowre:
   So shall he least confusion draw
   On his whole life, not sway'd
   By female usurpation, nor dismay'd.                                1060
   But had we best retire, I see a storm?
 
   Sam:  Fair days have oft contracted wind and rain.
 
   Chor:  But this another kind of tempest brings.
 
   Sam:  Be less abstruse, my riddling days are past.
 
   Chor:  Look now for no inchanting voice, nor fear
   The bait of honied words; a rougher tongue
   Draws hitherward, I know him by his stride,
   The Giant Harapha of Gath, his look
   Haughty as is his pile high-built and proud.
   Comes he in peace? what wind hath blown him hither                 1070
   I less conjecture then when first I saw
   The sumptuous Dalila floating this way:
   His habit carries peace, his brow defiance.
 
   Sam:  Or peace or not, alike to me he comes.
 
   Chor:  His fraught we soon shall know, he now arrives.
 
   Har:  I come not Samson, to condole thy chance,
   As these perhaps, yet wish it had not been,
   Though for no friendly intent.  I am of Gath,
   Men call me Harapha, of stock renown'd
   As Og or Anak and the Emims old                                    1080
   That Kiriathaim held, thou knowst me now
   If thou at all art known.  Much I have heard
   Of thy prodigious might and feats perform'd
   Incredible to me, in this displeas'd,
   That I was never present on the place
   Of those encounters, where we might have tri'd
   Each others force in camp or listed field:
   And now am come to see of whom such noise
   Hath walk'd about, and each limb to survey,
   If thy appearance answer loud report.                              1090
 
   Sam:  The way to know were not to see but taste.
 
   Har:  Dost thou already single me; I thought
   Gives and the Mill had tam'd thee? O that fortune
   Had brought me to the field where thou art fam'd
   To have wrought such wonders with an Asses Jaw;
   I should have forc'd thee soon with other arms,
   Or left thy carkass where the Ass lay thrown:
   So had the glory of Prowess been recover'd
   To Palestine, won by a Philistine
   From the unforeskinn'd race, of whom thou hear'st                  1100
   The highest name for valiant Acts, that honour
   Certain to have won by mortal duel from thee,
   I lose, prevented by thy eyes put out.
 
   Sam:  Boast not of what thou wouldst have done, but do
   What then thou would'st, thou seest it in thy hand.
 
   Har:  To combat with a blind man I disdain
   And thou hast need much washing to be toucht.
 
   Sam:  Such usage as your honourable Lords
   Afford me assassinated and betray'd,
   Who durst not with thir whole united powers                        1110
   In fight withstand me single and unarm'd,
   Nor in the house with chamber Ambushes
   Close-banded durst attaque me, no not sleeping,
   Till they had hir'd a woman with their gold
   Breaking her Marriage Faith to circumvent me.
   Therefore without feign'd shifts let be assign'd
   Some narrow place enclos'd, where sight may give thee.
   Or rather flight, no great advantage on me;
   Then put on all thy gorgeous arms, thy Helmet
   And Brigandine of brass, thy broad Habergeon.                      1120
   Vant-brass and Greves, and Gauntlet, add thy Spear
   A Weavers beam, and seven-times-folded shield.
   I only with an Oak'n staff will meet thee,
   And raise such out-cries on thy clatter'd Iron,
   Which long shall not with-hold mee from thy head,
   That in a little time while breath remains thee,
   Thou oft shalt wish thy self at Gath to boast
   Again in safety what thou wouldst have done
   To Samson, but shalt never see Gath more.
 
   Har: Thou durst not thus disparage glorious arms                   1130
   Which greatest Heroes have in battel worn,
   Thir ornament and safety, had not spells
   And black enchantments, some Magicians Art
   Arm'd thee or charm'd thee strong, which thou from Heaven
   Feigndst at thy birth was giv'n thee in thy hair,
   Where strength can least abide, though all thy hairs
   Were bristles rang'd like those that ridge the back
   Of chaf't wild Boars, or ruffl'd Porcupines.
 
   Sam:  I know no Spells, use no forbidden Arts;
   My trust is in the living God who gave me                          1140
   At my Nativity this strength, diffus'd
   No less through all my sinews, joints and bones,
   Then thine, while I preserv'd these locks unshorn,
   The pledge of my unviolated vow.
   For proof hereof, if Dagon be thy god,
   Go to his Temple, invocate his aid
   With solemnest devotion, spread before him
   How highly it concerns his glory now
   To frustrate and dissolve these Magic spells,
   Which I to be the power of Israel's God                            1150
   Avow, and challenge Dagon to the test,
   Offering to combat thee his Champion bold,
   With th' utmost of his Godhead seconded:
   Then thou shalt see, or rather to thy sorrow
   Soon feel, whose God is strongest, thine or mine.
 
   Har:  Presume not on thy God, what e're he be,
   Thee he regards not, owns not, hath cut off
   Quite from his people, and delivered up
   Into thy Enemies hand, permitted them
   To put out both thine eyes, and fetter'd send thee                 1160
   Into the common Prison, there to grind
   Among the Slaves and Asses thy comrades,
   As good for nothing else, no better service
   With those, thy boyst'rous locks, no worthy match
   For valour to assail, nor by the sword
   Of noble Warriour, so to stain his honour,
   But by the Barbers razor best subdu'd.
 
   Sam:  All these indignities, for such they are
   From thine, these evils I deserve and more,
   Acknowledge them from God inflicted on me                          1170
   Justly, yet despair not of his final pardon
   Whose ear is ever open; and his eye
   Gracious to re-admit the suppliant;
   In confidence whereof I once again
   Defie thee to the trial of mortal fight,
   By combat to decide whose god is God,
   Thine or whom I with Israel's Sons adore.
 
   Har:  Fair honour that thou dost thy God, in trusting
   He will accept thee to defend his cause,
   A Murtherer, a Revolter, and a Robber.                             1180
 
   Sam: Tongue-doubtie Giant, how dost thou prove me these?
 
   Har:  Is not thy Nation subject to our Lords?
   Thir Magistrates confest it, when they took thee
   As a League-breaker and deliver'd bound
   Into our hands: for hadst thou not committed
   Notorious murder on those thirty men
   At Askalon, who never did thee harm,
   Then like a Robber stripdst them of thir robes?
   The Philistines, when thou hadst broke the league,
   Went up with armed powers thee only seeking,                       1190
   To others did no violence nor spoil.
 
   Sam:  Among the Daughters of the Philistines
   I chose a Wife, which argu'd me no foe;
   And in your City held my Nuptial Feast:
   But your ill-meaning Politician Lords,
   Under pretence of Bridal friends and guests,
   Appointed to await me thirty spies,
   Who threatning cruel death constrain'd the bride
   To wring from me and tell to them my secret,
   That solv'd the riddle which I had propos'd.                       1200
   When I perceiv'd all set on enmity,
   As on my enemies, where ever chanc'd,
   I us'd hostility, and took thir spoil
   To pay my underminers in thir coin.
   My Nation was subjected to your Lords.
   It was the force of Conquest; force with force
   Is well ejected when the Conquer'd can.
   But I a private person, whom my Countrey
   As a league-breaker gave up bound, presum'd
   Single Rebellion and did Hostile Acts.                             1210
   I was no private but a person rais'd
   With strength sufficient and command from Heav'n
   To free my Countrey; if their servile minds
   Me their Deliverer sent would not receive,
   But to thir Masters gave me up for nought,
   Th' unworthier they; whence to this day they serve.
   I was to do my part from Heav'n assign'd,
   And had perform'd it if my known offence
   Had not disabl'd me, not all your force:
   These shifts refuted, answer thy appellant                         1220
   Though by his blindness maim'd for high attempts,
   Who now defies thee thrice to single fight,
   As a petty enterprise of small enforce.
 
   Har:  With thee a Man condemn'd, a Slave enrol'd,
   Due by the Law to capital punishment?
   To fight with thee no man of arms will deign.
 
   Sam:  Cam'st thou for this, vain boaster, to survey me,
   To descant on my strength, and give thy verdit?
   Come nearer, part not hence so slight inform'd;
   But take good heed my hand survey not thee.                        1230
   Har:  O Baal-zebub! can my ears unus'd
   Hear these dishonours, and not render death?
 
   Sam:  No man with-holds thee, nothing from thy hand
   Fear I incurable; bring up thy van,
   My heels are fetter'd, but my fist is free.
 
   Har:  This insolence other kind of answer fits.
 
   Sam:  Go baffl'd coward, lest I run upon thee,
   Though in these chains, bulk without spirit vast,
   And with one buffet lay thy structure low,
   Or swing thee in the Air, then dash thee down                      1240
   To the hazard of thy brains and shatter'd sides.
 
   Har:  By Astaroth e're long thou shalt lament
   These braveries in Irons loaden on thee.
 
   Chor:  His Giantship is gone somewhat crestfall'n,
   Stalking with less unconsci'nable strides,
   And lower looks, but in a sultrie chafe.
 
   Sam: I dread him not, nor all his Giant-brood,
   Though Fame divulge him Father of five Sons
   All of Gigantic size, Goliah chief.
 
   Chor:  He will directly to the Lords, I fear,                      1250
   And with malitious counsel stir them up
   Some way or other yet further to afflict thee.
 
   Sam:  He must allege some cause, and offer'd fight
   Will not dare mention, lest a question rise
   Whether he durst accept the offer or not,
   And that he durst not plain enough appear'd.
   Much more affliction then already felt
   They cannot well impose, nor I sustain;
   If they intend advantage of my labours
   The work of many hands, which earns my keeping                     1260
   With no small profit daily to my owners.
   But come what will, my deadliest foe will prove
   My speediest friend, by death to rid me hence,
   The worst that he can give, to me the best.
   Yet so it may fall out, because thir end
   Is hate, not help to me, it may with mine
   Draw thir own ruin who attempt the deed.
 
   Chor:  Oh how comely it is and how reviving
   To the Spirits of just men long opprest!
   When God into the hands of thir deliverer                          1270
   Puts invincible might
   To quell the mighty of the Earth, th' oppressour,
   The brute and boist'rous force of violent men
   Hardy and industrious to support
   Tyrannic power, but raging to pursue
   The righteous and all such as honour Truth;
   He all thir Ammunition
   And feats of War defeats
   With plain Heroic magnitude of mind
   And celestial vigour arm'd,                                        1270
   Thir Armories and Magazins contemns,
   Renders them useless, while
   With winged expedition
   Swift as the lightning glance he executes
   His errand on the wicked, who surpris'd
   Lose thir defence distracted and amaz'd.
   But patience is more oft the exercise
   Of Saints, the trial of thir fortitude,
   Making them each his own Deliverer,
   And Victor over all                                                1290
   That tyrannie or fortune can inflict,
   Either of these is in thy lot,
   Samson, with might endu'd
   Above the Sons of men; but sight bereav'd
   May chance to number thee with those
   Whom Patience finally must crown.
   This Idols day hath bin to thee no day of rest,
   Labouring thy mind
   More then the working day thy hands,
   And yet perhaps more trouble is behind.                            1300
   For I descry this way
   Some other tending, in his hand
   A Scepter or quaint staff he bears,
   Comes on amain, speed in his look.
   By his habit I discern him now
   A Public Officer, and now at hand.
   His message will be short and voluble.
 
   Off: Ebrews, the Pris'ner Samson here I seek.
 
   Chor:  His manacles remark him, there he sits.
 
   Off: Samson, to thee our Lords thus bid me say;                    1310
   This day to Dagon is a solemn Feast,
   With Sacrifices, Triumph, Pomp, and Games;
   Thy strength they know surpassing human rate,
   And now some public proof thereof require
   To honour this great Feast, and great Assembly;
   Rise therefore with all speed and come along,
   Where I will see thee heartn'd and fresh clad
   To appear as fits before th' illustrious Lords.
 
   Sam:  Thou knowst I am an Ebrew, therefore tell them,
   Our Law forbids at thir Religious Rites                            1320
   My presence; for that cause I cannot come.
 
   Off: This answer, be assur'd, will not content them.
 
   Sam:  Have they not Sword-players, and ev'ry sort
   Of Gymnic Artists, Wrestlers, Riders, Runners,
   Juglers and Dancers, Antics, Mummers, Mimics,
   But they must pick me out with shackles tir'd,
   And over-labour'd at thir publick Mill,
   To make them sport with blind activity?
   Do they not seek occasion of new quarrels
   On my refusal to distress me more,                                 1330
   Or make a game of my calamities?
   Return the way thou cam'st, I will not come.
 
   Off:  Regard thy self, this will offend them highly.
 
   Sam: My self? my conscience and internal peace.
   Can they think me so broken, so debas'd
   With corporal servitude, that my mind ever
   Will condescend to such absurd commands?
   Although thir drudge, to be thir fool or jester,
   And in my midst of sorrow and heart-grief
   To shew them feats, and play before thir god,                      1340
   The worst of all indignities, yet on me
   Joyn'd with extream contempt? I will not come.
 
   Off: My message was impos'd on me with speed,
   Brooks no delay: is this thy resolution?
 
   Sam:  So take it with what speed thy message needs.
 
   Off: I am sorry what this stoutness will produce.
 
   Sam:  Perhaps thou shalt have cause to sorrow indeed.
 
   Chor:  Consider, Samson; matters now are strain'd
   Up to the highth, whether to bold or break;
   He's gone, and who knows how he may report                         1350
   Thy words by adding fuel to the flame?
   Expect another message more imperious,
   More Lordly thund'ring then thou well wilt bear.
 
   Sam:  Shall I abuse this Consecrated gift
   Of strength, again returning with my hair
   After my great transgression, so requite
   Favour renew'd, and add a greater sin
   By prostituting holy things to Idols;
   A Nazarite in place abominable
   Vaunting my strength in honour to thir Dagon?                      1360
   Besides, how vile, contemptible, ridiculous,
   What act more execrably unclean, prophane?
 
   Chor:  Yet with this strength thou serv'st the Philistines,
   Idolatrous, uncircumcis'd, unclean.
 
   Sam:  Not in thir Idol-worship, but by labour
   Honest and lawful to deserve my food
   Of those who have me in thir civil power.
 
   Chor:  Where the heart joins not, outward acts defile not
 
   Sam: Where outward force constrains, the sentence holds:
   But who constrains me to the Temple of Dagon,                      1370
   Not dragging? the Philistian Lords command.
   Commands are no constraints.  If I obey them,
   I do it freely; venturing to displease
   God for the fear of Man, and Man prefer,
   Set God behind: which in his jealousie
   Shall never, unrepented, find forgiveness.
   Yet that he may dispense with me or thee
   Present in Temples at Idolatrous Rites
   For some important cause, thou needst not doubt.
 
   Chor:  How thou wilt here come off surmounts my reach.             1380
 
   Sam:  Be of good courage, I begin to feel
   Some rouzing motions in me which dispose
   To something extraordinary my thoughts.
   I with this Messenger will go along,
   Nothing to do, be sure, that may dishonour
   Our Law, or stain my vow of Nazarite.
   If there be aught of presage in the mind,
   This day will be remarkable in my life
   By some great act, or of my days the last.
 
   Chor:  In time thou hast resolv'd, the man returns.                1390
 
   Off: Samson, this second message from our Lords
   To thee I am bid say. Art thou our Slave,
   Our Captive, at the public Mill our drudge,
   And dar'st thou at our sending and command
   Dispute thy coming? come without delay;
   Or we shall find such Engines to assail
   And hamper thee, as thou shalt come of force,
   Though thou wert firmlier fastn'd then a rock.
 
   Sam:  I could be well content to try thir Art,
   Which to no few of them would prove pernicious.                    1400
   Yet knowing thir advantages too many,
   Because they shall not trail me through thir streets
   Like a wild Beast, I am content to go.
   Masters commands come with a power resistless
   To such as owe them absolute subjection;
   And for a life who will not change his purpose?
   (So mutable are all the ways of men)
   Yet this be sure, in nothing to comply
   Scandalous or forbidden in our Law.
 
   Off:  I praise thy resolution, doff these links:                   1410
   By this compliance thou wilt win the Lords
   To favour, and perhaps to set thee free.
 
   Sam:  Brethren farewel, your company along
   I will not wish, lest it perhaps offend them
   To see me girt with Friends; and how the sight
   Of me as of a common Enemy,
   So dreaded once, may now exasperate them
   I know not.  Lords are Lordliest in thir wine,
   And the well-feasted Priest then soonest fir'd
   With zeal, if aught Religion seem concern'd:                       1420
   No less the people on thir Holy-days
   Impetuous, insolent, unquenchable;
   Happ'n what may, of me expect to hear
   Nothing dishonourable, impure, unworthy
   Our God, our Law, my Nation, or my self,
   The last of me or no I cannot warrant.
 
   Chor:  Go, and the Holy One
   Of Israel be thy guide
   To what may serve his glory best, & spread his name
   Great among the Heathen round:                                     1430
   Send thee the Angel of thy Birth, to stand
   Fast by thy side, who from thy Fathers field
   Rode up in flames after his message told
   Of thy conception, and be now a shield
   Of fire; that Spirit that first rusht on thee
   In the camp of Dan
   Be efficacious in thee now at need.
   For never was from Heaven imparted
   Measure of strength so great to mortal seed,
   As in thy wond'rous actions Hath been seen.                        1440
   But wherefore comes old Manoa in such hast
   With youthful steps? much livelier than e're while
   He seems: supposing here to find his Son,
   Or of him bringing to us some glad news?
 
   Man:  Peace with you brethren; my inducement hither
   Was not at present here to find my Son,
   By order of the Lords new parted hence
   To come and play before them at thir Feast.
   I heard all as I came, the City rings
   And numbers thither flock, I had no will,                          1450
   Lest I should see him forc't to things unseemly.
   But that which moved my coming now, was chiefly
   To give ye part with me what hope I have
   With good success to work his liberty.
 
   Chor:  That hope would much rejoyce us to partake
   With thee; say reverend Sire, we thirst to hear.
 
   Man:  I have attempted one by one the Lords
   Either at home, or through the high street passing,
   With supplication prone and Fathers tears
   To accept of ransom for my Son thir pris'ner,                      1460
   Some much averse I found and wondrous harsh,
   Contemptuous, proud, set on revenge and spite;
   That part most reverenc'd Dagon and his Priests,
   Others more moderate seeming, but thir aim
   Private reward, for which both God and State
   They easily would set to sale, a third
   More generous far and civil, who confess'd
   They had anough reveng'd, having reduc't
   Thir foe to misery beneath thir fears,
   The rest was magnanimity to remit,                                 1470
   If some convenient ransom were propos'd.
   What noise or shout was that? it tore the Skie.
 
   Chor:  Doubtless the people shouting to behold
   Thir once great dread, captive, & blind before them,
   Or at some proof of strength before them shown.
 
   Man:  His ransom, if my whole inheritance
   May compass it, shall willingly be paid
   And numberd down: much rather I shall chuse
   To live the poorest in my Tribe, then richest,
   And he in that calamitous prison left.                             1480
   No, I am fixt not to part hence without him.
   For his redemption all my Patrimony,
   If need be, I am ready to forgo
   And quit: not wanting him, I shall want nothing.
 
   Chor:  Fathers are wont to lay up for thir Sons,
   Thou for thy Son art bent to lay out all;
   Sons wont to nurse thir Parents in old age,
   Thou in old age car'st how to nurse thy Son,
   Made older then thy age through eye-sight lost.
 
   Man: It shall be my delight to tend his eyes,                      1490
   And view him sitting in the house, enobl'd
   With all those high exploits by him atchiev'd,
   And on his shoulders waving down those locks,
   That of a Nation arm'd the strength contain'd:
   And I perswade me God had not permitted
   His strength again to grow up with his hair
   Garrison'd round about him like a Camp
   Of faithful Souldiery, were not his purpose
   To use him further yet in some great service,
   Not to sit idle with so great a gift                               1500
   Useless, and thence ridiculous about him.
   And since his strength with eye-sight was not lost,
   God will restore him eye-sight to his strength.
 
   Chor:  Thy hopes are not ill founded nor seem vain
   Of his delivery, and thy joy thereon
   Conceiv'd, agreeable to a Fathers love,
   In both which we, as next participate.
 
   Man:  I know your friendly minds and--O what noise!
   Mercy of Heav'n what hideous noise was that!
   Horribly loud unlike the former shout.                             1510
 
   Chor:  Noise call you it or universal groan
   As if the whole inhabitation perish'd,
   Blood, death, and deathful deeds are in that noise,
   Ruin, destruction at the utmost point.
 
   Man:  Of ruin indeed methought I heard the noise,
   Oh it continues, they have slain my Son.
 
   Chor:  Thy Son is rather slaying them, that outcry
   From slaughter of one foe could not ascend.
 
   Man:  Some dismal accident it needs must be;
   What shall we do, stay here or run and see?                        1520
 
   Chor:  Best keep together here, lest running thither
   We unawares run into dangers mouth.
   This evil on the Philistines is fall'n
   From whom could else a general cry be heard?
   The sufferers then will scarce molest us here,
   From other hands we need not much to fear.
   What if his eye-sight (for to Israels God
   Nothing is hard) by miracle restor'd,
   He now be dealing dole among his foes,
   And over heaps of slaughter'd walk his way?                        1530
 
   Man:  That were a joy presumptuous to be thought.
 
   Chor:  Yet God hath wrought things as incredible
   For his people of old; what hinders now?
 
   Man:  He can I know, but doubt to think he will;
   Yet Hope would fain subscribe, and tempts Belief.
   A little stay will bring some notice hither.
 
   Chor:  Of good or bad so great, of bad the sooner;
   For evil news rides post, while good news baits.
   And to our wish I see one hither speeding,
   An Ebrew, as I guess, and of our Tribe.                            1540
 
   Mess:  O whither shall I run, or which way flie
   The sight of this so horrid spectacle
   Which earst my eyes beheld and yet behold;
   For dire imagination still persues me.
   But providence or instinct of nature seems,
   Or reason though disturb'd, and scarse consulted
   To have guided me aright, I know not how,
   To thee first reverend Manoa, and to these
   My Countreymen, whom here I knew remaining,
   As at some distance from the place of horrour,                     1550
   So in the sad event too much concern'd.
 
   Man:  The accident was loud, & here before thee
   With rueful cry, yet what it was we hear not,
   No Preface needs, thou seest we long to know.
 
   Mess:  It would burst forth, but I recover breath
   And sense distract, to know well what I utter.
 
   Man:  Tell us the sum, the circumstance defer.
 
   Mess:  Gaza yet stands, but all her Sons are fall'n,
   All in a moment overwhelm'd and fall'n.
 
   Man: Sad, but thou knowst to Israelites not saddest                1560
   The desolation of a Hostile City.
 
   Mess:  Feed on that first, there may in grief be surfet.
 
   Man:  Relate by whom.
                         Mess:  By Samson.
 
   Man:  That still lessens
   The sorrow, and converts it nigh to joy.
 
   Mess:  Ah Manoa I refrain, too suddenly
   To utter what will come at last too soon;
   Lest evil tidings with too rude irruption
   Hitting thy aged ear should pierce too deep.
 
   Man:  Suspense in news is torture, speak them out.
 
   Mess:  Then take the worst in brief, Samson is dead.               1570
 
   Man:  The worst indeed, O all my hope's defeated
   To free him hence! but death who sets all free
   Hath paid his ransom now and full discharge.
   What windy joy this day had I conceiv'd
   Hopeful of his Delivery, which now proves
   Abortive as the first-born bloom of spring
   Nipt with the lagging rear of winters frost.
   Yet e're I give the rains to grief, say first,
   How dy'd he? death to life is crown or shame.
   All by him fell thou say'st, by whom fell he,                      1580
   What glorious band gave Samson his deaths wound?
 
   Mess:  Unwounded of his enemies he fell.
 
   Man:  Wearied with slaughter then or how? explain.
 
   Mess: By his own hands.
                          Man: Self-violence? what cause
   Brought him so soon at variance with himself
   Among his foes?
                   Mess:  Inevitable cause
   At once both to destroy and be destroy'd;
   The Edifice where all were met to see him
   Upon thir heads and on his own he pull'd.
 
   Man:  O lastly over-strong against thy self!                       1590
   A dreadful way thou took'st to thy revenge.
   More than anough we know; but while things yet
   Are in confusion, give us if thou canst,
   Eye-witness of what first or last was done,
   Relation more particular and distinct.
 
   Mess:  Occasions drew me early to this City,
   And as the gates I enter'd with Sun-rise,
   The morning Trumpets Festival proclaim'd
   Through each high street: little I had dispatch't
   When all abroad was rumour'd that this day                         1600
   Samson should be brought forth to shew the people
   Proof of his mighty strength in feats and games;
   I sorrow'd at his captive state, but minded
   Not to be absent at that spectacle.
   The building was a spacious Theatre
   Half round on two main Pillars vaulted high,
   With seats where all the Lords and each degree
   Of sort, might sit in order to behold,
   The other side was op'n, where the throng
   On banks and scaffolds under Skie might stand;                     1610
   I among these aloof obscurely stood.
   The Feast and noon grew high, and Sacrifice
   Had fill'd thir hearts with mirth, high chear, & wine,
   When to thir sports they turn'd.  Immediately
   Was Samson as a public servant brought,
   In thir state Livery clad; before him Pipes
   And Timbrels, on each side went armed guards,
   Both horse and foot before him and behind
   Archers, and Slingers, Cataphracts and Spears.
   At sight of him the people with a shout                            1620
   Rifted the Air clamouring thir god with praise,
   Who had made thir dreadful enemy thir thrall.
   He patient but undaunted where they led him.
   Came to the place, and what was set before him
   Which without help of eye, might be assay'd,
   To heave, pull, draw, or break, he still perform'd
   All with incredible, stupendious force,
   None daring to appear Antagonist.
   At length for intermission sake they led him
   Between the pillars; he his guide requested                        1630
   (For so from such as nearer stood we heard)
   As over-tir'd to let him lean a while
   With both his arms on those two massie Pillars
   That to the arched roof gave main support.
   He unsuspitious led him; which when Samson
   Felt in his arms, with head a while enclin'd,
   And eyes fast fixt he stood, as one who pray'd,
   Or some great matter in his mind revolv'd.
   At last with head erect thus cryed aloud,
   Hitherto, Lords, what your commands impos'd                        1640
   I have perform'd, as reason was, obeying,
   Not without wonder or delight beheld.
   Now of my own accord such other tryal
   I mean to shew you of my strength, yet greater;
   As with amaze shall strike all who behold.
   This utter'd, straining all his nerves he bow'd,
   As with the force of winds and waters pent,
   When Mountains tremble, those two massie Pillars
   With horrible convulsion to and fro,
   He tugg'd, he shook, till down they came and drew                  1650
   The whole roof after them, with burst of thunder
   Upon the heads of all who sate beneath,
   Lords, Ladies, Captains, Councellors, or Priests,
   Thir choice nobility and flower, not only
   Of this but each Philistian City round
   Met from all parts to solemnize this Feast.
   Samson with these immixt, inevitably
   Pulld down the same destruction on himself;
   The vulgar only scap'd who stood without.
 
   Chor:  O dearly-bought revenge, yet glorious!                      1660
   Living or dying thou hast fulfill'd
   The work for which thou wast foretold
   To Israel and now ly'st victorious
   Among thy slain self-kill'd
   Not willingly, but tangl'd in the fold
   Of dire necessity, whose law in death conjoin'd
   Thee with thy slaughter'd foes in number more
   Then all thy life had slain before.
 
   Semichor:  While thir hearts were jocund and sublime
   Drunk with Idolatry, drunk with Wine,                              1670
   And fat regorg'd of Bulls and Goats,
   Chaunting thir Idol, and preferring
   Before our living Dread who dwells
   In Silo his bright Sanctuary:
   Among them he a spirit of phrenzie sent,
   Who hurt thir minds,
   And urg'd them on with mad desire
   To call in hast for thir destroyer;
   They only set on sport and play
   Unweetingly importun'd                                             1680
   Thir own destruction to come speedy upon them.
   So fond are mortal men
   Fall'n into wrath divine,
   As thir own ruin on themselves to invite,
   Insensate left, or to sense reprobate,
   And with blindness internal struck.
 
   Semichor:  But he though blind of sight,
   Despis'd and thought extinguish't quite,
   With inward eyes illuminated
   His fierie vertue rouz'd                                           1690
   From under ashes into sudden flame,
   And as an ev'ning Dragon came,
   Assailant on the perched roosts,
   And nests in order rang'd
   Of tame villatic Fowl; but as an Eagle
   His cloudless thunder bolted on thir heads.
   So vertue giv'n for lost,
   Deprest, and overthrown, as seem'd,
   Like that self-begott'n bird
   In the Arabian woods embost,                                       1700
   That no second knows nor third,
   And lay e're while a Holocaust,
   From out her ashie womb now teem'd
   Revives, reflourishes, then vigorous most
   When most unactive deem'd,
   And though her body die, her fame survives,
   A secular bird ages of lives.
 
   Man:  Come, come, no time for lamentation now,
   Nor much more cause, Samson hath quit himself
   Like Samson, and heroicly hath finish'd                            1710
   A life Heroic, on his Enemies
   Fully reveng'd, hath left them years of mourning,
   And lamentation to the Sons of Caphtor
   Through all Philistian bounds. To Israel
   Honour hath left, and freedom, let but them
   Find courage to lay hold on this occasion,
   To himself and Fathers house eternal fame;
   And which is best and happiest yet, all this
   With God not parted from him, as was feard,
   But favouring and assisting to the end.                            1720
   Nothing is here for tears, nothing to wail
   Or knock the breast, no weakness, no contempt,
   Dispraise, or blame, nothing but well and fair,
   And what may quiet us in a death so noble.
   Let us go find the body where it lies
   Sok't in his enemies blood, and from the stream
   With lavers pure and cleansing herbs wash off
   The clotted gore.  I with what speed the while
   (Gaza is not in plight to say us nay)
   Will send for all my kindred, all my friends                       1730
   To fetch him hence and solemnly attend
   With silent obsequie and funeral train
   Home to his Fathers house: there will I build him
   A Monument, and plant it round with shade
   Of Laurel ever green, and branching Palm,
   With all his Trophies hung, and Acts enroll'd
   In copious Legend, or sweet Lyric Song.
   Thither shall all the valiant youth resort,
   And from his memory inflame thir breasts
   To matchless valour, and adventures high:                          1740
   The Virgins also shall on feastful days
   Visit his Tomb with flowers, only bewailing
   His lot unfortunate in nuptial choice,
   From whence captivity and loss of eyes.
 
   Chor:  All is best, though we oft doubt,
   What th' unsearchable dispose
   Of highest wisdom brings about,
   And ever best found in the close.
   Oft he seems to hide his face,
   But unexpectedly returns                                           1750
   And to his faithful Champion hath in place
   Bore witness gloriously; whence Gaza mourns
   And all that band them to resist
   His uncontroulable intent,
   His servants he with new acquist
   Of true experience from this great event
   With peace and consolation hath dismist,
   And calm of mind all passion spent.
 
   The End.
 
 
 
 
 APPENDIX.
 
   Specimen of Milton's spelling, from the Cambridge autograph
   manuscript.
 
 
 
 
 ON TIME
 
   (Set on a clock case)
 
   Fly envious Time till thou run out thy race
   call on the lazie leaden-stepping howres
   whose speed is but the heavie plummets pace
   & glut thy selfe wth what thy womb devoures
   Wch is no more then what is false & vaine
   & meerly mortall drosse
   so little is our losse
   so little is thy gaine
   for when as each thing bad thou hast entomb'd
   & last of all thy greedie selfe consum'd                             10
   then long Aeternity shall greet our blisse
   wth an individuall kisse
   and Joy shall overtake us as a flood
   when every thing yt is sincerely good
   & pfectly divine
   with Truth, & Peace, & Love shall ever shine
   about the supreme throne
   of him t' whose happy-making sight alone
   when once our heav'nly-guided soule shall clime
   then all this earthie grossnesse quit                                20
   attir'd wth starres wee shall for ever sit
   Triumphing over Death, & Chance, & thee O Time.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Judy Boss
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 PARADISE LOST
 
 by John Milton
 
 
 
 
 Disclaimer:
 
 All persons concerned disclaim any and all reponsbility
 that this etext is perfectly accurate.  No pretenses in
 any manner are made that this text should be thought of
 as an authoritative edition in any respect.
 
 This book was TYPED in by Judy Boss
   eng003@zeus.unomaha.edu on Internet
   eng003@unoma1 on Bitnet
   (Judy now has a scanner)
 
 
 
   PARADISE LOST
 
   BOOK I.
 
 
     Of Mans First Disobedience, and the Fruit
   Of that Forbidden Tree, whose mortal tast
   Brought Death into the World, and all our woe,
   With loss of EDEN, till one greater Man
   Restore us, and regain the blissful Seat,
   Sing Heav'nly Muse, that on the secret top
   Of OREB, or of SINAI, didst inspire
   That Shepherd, who first taught the chosen Seed,
   In the Beginning how the Heav'ns and Earth
   Rose out of CHAOS: Or if SION Hill
   Delight thee more, and SILOA'S Brook that flow'd
   Fast by the Oracle of God; I thence
   Invoke thy aid to my adventrous Song,
   That with no middle flight intends to soar
   Above th' AONIAN Mount, while it pursues
   Things unattempted yet in Prose or Rhime.
   And chiefly Thou O Spirit, that dost prefer
   Before all Temples th' upright heart and pure,
   Instruct me, for Thou know'st; Thou from the first
   Wast present, and with mighty wings outspread
   Dove-like satst brooding on the vast Abyss
   And mad'st it pregnant: What in me is dark
   Illumine, what is low raise and support;
   That to the highth of this great Argument
   I may assert th' Eternal Providence,
   And justifie the wayes of God to men.
 
     Say first, for Heav'n hides nothing from thy view
   Nor the deep Tract of Hell, say first what cause
   Mov'd our Grand Parents in that happy State,
   Favour'd of Heav'n so highly, to fall off
   From their Creator, and transgress his Will
   For one restraint, Lords of the World besides?
   Who first seduc'd them to that fowl revolt?
   Th' infernal Serpent; he it was, whose guile
   Stird up with Envy and Revenge, deceiv'd
   The Mother of Mankinde, what time his Pride
   Had cast him out from Heav'n, with all his Host
   Of Rebel Angels, by whose aid aspiring
   To set himself in Glory above his Peers,
   He trusted to have equal'd the most High,
   If he oppos'd; and with ambitious aim
   Against the Throne and Monarchy of God
   Rais'd impious War in Heav'n and Battel proud
   With vain attempt.  Him the Almighty Power
   Hurld headlong flaming from th' Ethereal Skie
   With hideous ruine and combustion down
   To bottomless perdition, there to dwell
   In Adamantine Chains and penal Fire,
   Who durst defie th' Omnipotent to Arms.
   Nine times the Space that measures Day and Night
   To mortal men, he with his horrid crew
   Lay vanquisht, rowling in the fiery Gulfe
   Confounded though immortal: But his doom
   Reserv'd him to more wrath; for now the thought
   Both of lost happiness and lasting pain
   Torments him; round he throws his baleful eyes
   That witness'd huge affliction and dismay
   Mixt with obdurate pride and stedfast hate:
   At once as far as Angels kenn he views
   The dismal Situation waste and wilde,
   A Dungeon horrible, on all sides round
   As one great Furnace flam'd, yet from those flames
   No light, but rather darkness visible
   Serv'd only to discover sights of woe,
   Regions of sorrow, doleful shades, where peace
   And rest can never dwell, hope never comes
   That comes to all; but torture without end
   Still urges, and a fiery Deluge, fed
   With ever-burning Sulphur unconsum'd:
   Such place Eternal Justice had prepar'd
   For those rebellious, here their Prison ordain'd
   In utter darkness, and their portion set
   As far remov'd from God and light of Heav'n
   As from the Center thrice to th' utmost Pole.
   O how unlike the place from whence they fell!
   There the companions of his fall, o'rewhelm'd
   With Floods and Whirlwinds of tempestuous fire,
   He soon discerns, and weltring by his side
   One next himself in power, and next in crime,
   Long after known in PALESTINE, and nam'd
   BEELZEBUB.  To whom th' Arch-Enemy,
   And thence in Heav'n call'd Satan, with bold words
   Breaking the horrid silence thus began.
 
     If thou beest he; But O how fall'n! how chang'd
   From him, who in the happy Realms of Light
   Cloth'd with transcendent brightnes didst outshine
   Myriads though bright: If he whom mutual league,
   United thoughts and counsels, equal hope,
   And hazard in the Glorious Enterprize,
   Joynd with me once, now misery hath joynd
   In equal ruin: into what Pit thou seest
   From what highth fal'n, so much the stronger provd
   He with his Thunder: and till then who knew
   The force of those dire Arms? yet not for those
   Nor what the Potent Victor in his rage
   Can else inflict do I repent or change,
   Though chang'd in outward lustre; that fixt mind
   And high disdain, from sence of injur'd merit,
   That with the mightiest rais'd me to contend,
   And to the fierce contention brought along
   Innumerable force of Spirits arm'd
   That durst dislike his reign, and me preferring,
   His utmost power with adverse power oppos'd
   In dubious Battel on the Plains of Heav'n,
   And shook his throne.  What though the field be lost?
   All is not lost; the unconquerable Will,
   And study of revenge, immortal hate,
   And courage never to submit or yield:
   And what is else not to be overcome?
   That Glory never shall his wrath or might
   Extort from me.  To bow and sue for grace
   With suppliant knee, and deifie his power
   Who from the terrour of this Arm so late
   Doubted his Empire, that were low indeed,
   That were an ignominy and shame beneath
   This downfall; since by Fate the strength of Gods
   And this Empyreal substance cannot fail,
   Since through experience of this great event
   In Arms not worse, in foresight much advanc't,
   We may with more successful hope resolve
   To wage by force or guile eternal Warr
   Irreconcileable, to our grand Foe,
   Who now triumphs, and in th' excess of joy
   Sole reigning holds the Tyranny of Heav'n.
 
     So spake th' Apostate Angel, though in pain,
   Vaunting aloud, but rackt with deep despare:
   And him thus answer'd soon his bold Compeer.
 
     O Prince, O Chief of many Throned Powers,
   That led th' imbattelld Seraphim to Warr
   Under thy conduct, and in dreadful deeds
   Fearless, endanger'd Heav'ns perpetual King;
   And put to proof his high Supremacy,
   Whether upheld by strength, or Chance, or Fate,
   Too well I see and rue the dire event,
   That with sad overthrow and foul defeat
   Hath lost us Heav'n, and all this mighty Host
   In horrible destruction laid thus low,
   As far as Gods and Heav'nly Essences
   Can Perish: for the mind and spirit remains
   Invincible, and vigour soon returns,
   Though all our Glory extinct, and happy state
   Here swallow'd up in endless misery.
   But what if he our Conquerour, (whom I now
   Of force believe Almighty, since no less
   Then such could hav orepow'rd such force as ours)
   Have left us this our spirit and strength intire
   Strongly to suffer and support our pains,
   That we may so suffice his vengeful ire,
   Or do him mightier service as his thralls
   By right of Warr, what e're his business be
   Here in the heart of Hell to work in Fire,
   Or do his Errands in the gloomy Deep;
   What can it then avail though yet we feel
   Strength undiminisht, or eternal being
   To undergo eternal punishment?
   Whereto with speedy words th' Arch-fiend reply'd.
 
     Fall'n Cherube, to be weak is miserable
   Doing or Suffering: but of this be sure,
   To do ought good never will be our task,
   But ever to do ill our sole delight,
   As being the contrary to his high will
   Whom we resist.  If then his Providence
   Out of our evil seek to bring forth good,
   Our labour must be to pervert that end,
   And out of good still to find means of evil;
   Which oft times may succeed, so as perhaps
   Shall grieve him, if I fail not, and disturb
   His inmost counsels from their destind aim.
   But see the angry Victor hath recall'd
   His Ministers of vengeance and pursuit
   Back to the Gates of Heav'n: The Sulphurous Hail
   Shot after us in storm, oreblown hath laid
   The fiery Surge, that from the Precipice
   Of Heav'n receiv'd us falling, and the Thunder,
   Wing'd with red Lightning and impetuous rage,
   Perhaps hath spent his shafts, and ceases now
   To bellow through the vast and boundless Deep.
   Let us not slip th' occasion, whether scorn,
   Or satiate fury yield it from our Foe.
   Seest thou yon dreary Plain, forlorn and wilde,
   The seat of desolation, voyd of light,
   Save what the glimmering of these livid flames
   Casts pale and dreadful?  Thither let us tend
   From off the tossing of these fiery waves,
   There rest, if any rest can harbour there,
   And reassembling our afflicted Powers,
   Consult how we may henceforth most offend
   Our Enemy, our own loss how repair,
   How overcome this dire Calamity,
   What reinforcement we may gain from Hope,
   If not what resolution from despare.
 
     Thus Satan talking to his neerest Mate
   With Head up-lift above the wave, and Eyes
   That sparkling blaz'd, his other Parts besides
   Prone on the Flood, extended long and large
   Lay floating many a rood, in bulk as huge
   As whom the Fables name of monstrous size,
   TITANIAN, or EARTH-BORN, that warr'd on JOVE,
   BRIARIOS or TYPHON, whom the Den
   By ancient TARSUS held, or that Sea-beast
   LEVIATHAN, which God of all his works
   Created hugest that swim th' Ocean stream:
   Him haply slumbring on the NORWAY foam
   The Pilot of some small night-founder'd Skiff,
   Deeming some Island, oft, as Sea-men tell,
   With fixed Anchor in his skaly rind
   Moors by his side under the Lee, while Night
   Invests the Sea, and wished Morn delayes:
   So stretcht out huge in length the Arch-fiend lay
   Chain'd on the burning Lake, nor ever thence
   Had ris'n or heav'd his head, but that the will
   And high permission of all-ruling Heaven
   Left him at large to his own dark designs,
   That with reiterated crimes he might
   Heap on himself damnation, while he sought
   Evil to others, and enrag'd might see
   How all his malice serv'd but to bring forth
   Infinite goodness, grace and mercy shewn
   On Man by him seduc't, but on himself
   Treble confusion, wrath and vengeance pour'd.
   Forthwith upright he rears from off the Pool
   His mighty Stature; on each hand the flames
   Drivn backward slope their pointing spires, & rowld
   In billows, leave i'th' midst a horrid Vale.
   Then with expanded wings he stears his flight
   Aloft, incumbent on the dusky Air
   That felt unusual weight, till on dry Land
   He lights, if it were Land that ever burn'd
   With solid, as the Lake with liquid fire;
   And such appear'd in hue, as when the force
   Of subterranean wind transports a Hill
   Torn from PELORUS, or the shatter'd side
   Of thundring AETNA, whose combustible
   And fewel'd entrals thence conceiving Fire,
   Sublim'd with Mineral fury, aid the Winds,
   And leave a singed bottom all involv'd
   With stench and smoak: Such resting found the sole
   Of unblest feet.  Him followed his next Mate,
   Both glorying to have scap't the STYGIAN flood
   As Gods, and by their own recover'd strength,
   Not by the sufferance of supernal Power.
 
     Is this the Region, this the Soil, the Clime,
   Said then the lost Arch Angel, this the seat
   That we must change for Heav'n, this mournful gloom
   For that celestial light?  Be it so, since hee
   Who now is Sovran can dispose and bid
   What shall be right: fardest from him is best
   Whom reason hath equald, force hath made supream
   Above his equals.  Farewel happy Fields
   Where Joy for ever dwells: Hail horrours, hail
   Infernal world, and thou profoundest Hell
   Receive thy new Possessor: One who brings
   A mind not to be chang'd by Place or Time.
   The mind is its own place, and in it self
   Can make a Heav'n of Hell, a Hell of Heav'n.
   What matter where, if I be still the same,
   And what I should be, all but less then hee
   Whom Thunder hath made greater?  Here at least
   We shall be free; th' Almighty hath not built
   Here for his envy, will not drive us hence:
   Here we may reign secure, and in my choyce
   To reign is worth ambition though in Hell:
   Better to reign in Hell, then serve in Heav'n.
   But wherefore let we then our faithful friends,
   Th' associates and copartners of our loss
   Lye thus astonisht on th' oblivious Pool,
   And call them not to share with us their part
   In this unhappy Mansion, or once more
   With rallied Arms to try what may be yet
   Regaind in Heav'n, or what more lost in Hell?
 
     So SATAN spake, and him BEELZEBUB
   Thus answer'd.  Leader of those Armies bright,
   Which but th' Omnipotent none could have foyld,
   If once they hear that voyce, their liveliest pledge
   Of hope in fears and dangers, heard so oft
   In worst extreams, and on the perilous edge
   Of battel when it rag'd, in all assaults
   Their surest signal, they will soon resume
   New courage and revive, though now they lye
   Groveling and prostrate on yon Lake of Fire,
   As we erewhile, astounded and amaz'd,
   No wonder, fall'n such a pernicious highth.
 
     He scarce had ceas't when the superiour Fiend
   Was moving toward the shore; his ponderous shield
   Ethereal temper, massy, large and round,
   Behind him cast; the broad circumference
   Hung on his shoulders like the Moon, whose Orb
   Through Optic Glass the TUSCAN Artist views
   At Ev'ning from the top of FESOLE,
   Or in VALDARNO, to descry new Lands,
   Rivers or Mountains in her spotty Globe.
   His Spear, to equal which the tallest Pine
   Hewn on NORWEGIAN hills, to be the Mast
   Of some great Ammiral, were but a wand,
   He walkt with to support uneasie steps
   Over the burning Marle, not like those steps
   On Heavens Azure, and the torrid Clime
   Smote on him sore besides, vaulted with Fire;
   Nathless he so endur'd, till on the Beach
   Of that inflamed Sea, he stood and call'd
   His Legions, Angel Forms, who lay intrans't
   Thick as Autumnal Leaves that strow the Brooks
   In VALLOMBROSA, where th' ETRURIAN shades
   High overarch't imbowr; or scatterd sedge
   Afloat, when with fierce Winds ORION arm'd
   Hath vext the Red-Sea Coast, whose waves orethrew
   BUSIRIS and his MEMPHIAN Chivalrie,
   VVhile with perfidious hatred they pursu'd
   The Sojourners of GOSHEN, who beheld
   From the safe shore their floating Carkases
   And broken Chariot Wheels, so thick bestrown
   Abject and lost lay these, covering the Flood,
   Under amazement of their hideous change.
   He call'd so loud, that all the hollow Deep
   Of Hell resounded.  Princes, Potentates,
   Warriers, the Flowr of Heav'n, once yours, now lost,
   If such astonishment as this can sieze
   Eternal spirits; or have ye chos'n this place
   After the toyl of Battel to repose
   Your wearied vertue, for the ease you find
   To slumber here, as in the Vales of Heav'n?
   Or in this abject posture have ye sworn
   To adore the Conquerour? who now beholds
   Cherube and Seraph rowling in the Flood
   With scatter'd Arms and Ensigns, till anon
   His swift pursuers from Heav'n Gates discern
   Th' advantage, and descending tread us down
   Thus drooping, or with linked Thunderbolts
   Transfix us to the bottom of this Gulfe.
   Awake, arise, or be for ever fall'n.
 
     They heard, and were abasht, and up they sprung
   Upon the wing, as when men wont to watch
   On duty, sleeping found by whom they dread,
   Rouse and bestir themselves ere well awake.
   Nor did they not perceave the evil plight
   In which they were, or the fierce pains not feel;
   Yet to their Generals Voyce they soon obeyd
   Innumerable.  As when the potent Rod
   Of AMRAMS Son in EGYPTS evill day
   Wav'd round the Coast, up call'd a pitchy cloud
   Of LOCUSTS, warping on the Eastern Wind,
   That ore the Realm of impious PHAROAH hung
   Like Night, and darken'd all the Land of NILE:
   So numberless were those bad Angels seen
   Hovering on wing under the Cope of Hell
   'Twixt upper, nether, and surrounding Fires;
   Till, as a signal giv'n, th' uplifted Spear
   Of their great Sultan waving to direct
   Thir course, in even ballance down they light
   On the firm brimstone, and fill all the Plain;
   A multitude, like which the populous North
   Pour'd never from her frozen loyns, to pass
   RHENE or the DANAW, when her barbarous Sons
   Came like a Deluge on the South, and spread
   Beneath GIBRALTAR to the LYBIAN sands.
   Forthwith from every Squadron and each Band
   The Heads and Leaders thither hast where stood
   Their great Commander; Godlike shapes and forms
   Excelling human, Princely Dignities,
   And Powers that earst in Heaven sat on Thrones;
   Though of their Names in heav'nly Records now
   Be no memorial, blotted out and ras'd
   By thir Rebellion, from the Books of Life.
   Nor had they yet among the Sons of EVE
   Got them new Names, till wandring ore the Earth,
   Through Gods high sufferance for the tryal of man,
   By falsities and lyes the greatest part
   Of Mankind they corrupted to forsake
   God their Creator, and th' invisible
   Glory of him, that made them, to transform
   Oft to the Image of a Brute, adorn'd
   With gay Religions full of Pomp and Gold,
   And Devils to adore for Deities:
   Then were they known to men by various Names,
   And various Idols through the Heathen World.
   Say, Muse, their Names then known, who first, who last,
   Rous'd from the slumber, on that fiery Couch,
   At thir great Emperors call, as next in worth
   Came singly where he stood on the bare strand,
   While the promiscuous croud stood yet aloof?
   The chief were those who from the Pit of Hell
   Roaming to seek their prey on earth, durst fix
   Their Seats long after next the Seat of God,
   Their Altars by his Altar, Gods ador'd
   Among the Nations round, and durst abide
   JEHOVAH thundring out of SION, thron'd
   Between the Cherubim; yea, often plac'd
   Within his Sanctuary it self their Shrines,
   Abominations; and with cursed things
   His holy Rites, and solemn Feasts profan'd,
   And with their darkness durst affront his light.
   First MOLOCH, horrid King besmear'd with blood
   Of human sacrifice, and parents tears,
   Though for the noyse of Drums and Timbrels loud
   Their childrens cries unheard, that past through fire
   To his grim Idol.  Him the AMMONITE
   Worshipt in RABBA and her watry Plain,
   In ARGOB and in BASAN, to the stream
   Of utmost ARNON.  Nor content with such
   Audacious neighbourhood, the wisest heart
   Of SOLOMON he led by fraud to build
   His Temple right against the Temple of God
   On that opprobrious Hill, and made his Grove
   The pleasant Vally of HINNOM, TOPHET thence
   And black GEHENNA call'd, the Type of Hell.
   Next CHEMOS, th' obscene dread of MOABS Sons,
   From AROER to NEBO, and the wild
   Of Southmost ABARIM; in HESEBON
   And HERONAIM, SEONS Realm, beyond
   The flowry Dale of SIBMA clad with Vines,
   And ELEALE to th' ASPHALTICK Pool.
   PEOR his other Name, when he entic'd
   ISRAEL in SITTIM on their march from NILE
   To do him wanton rites, which cost them woe.
   Yet thence his lustful Orgies he enlarg'd
   Even to that Hill of scandal, by the Grove
   Of MOLOCH homicide, lust hard by hate;
   Till good JOSIAH drove them thence to Hell.
   With these came they, who from the bordring flood
   Of old EUPHRATES to the Brook that parts
   EGYPT from SYRIAN ground, had general Names
   Of BAALIM and ASHTAROTH, those male,
   These Feminine.  For Spirits when they please
   Can either Sex assume, or both; so soft
   And uncompounded is their Essence pure,
   Not ti'd or manacl'd with joynt or limb,
   Nor founded on the brittle strength of bones,
   Like cumbrous flesh; but in what shape they choose
   Dilated or condens't, bright or obscure,
   Can execute their aerie purposes,
   And works of love or enmity fulfill.
   For those the Race of ISRAEL oft forsook
   Their living strength, and unfrequented left
   His righteous Altar, bowing lowly down
   To bestial Gods; for which their heads as low
   Bow'd down in Battel, sunk before the Spear
   Of despicable foes.  With these in troop
   Came ASTORETH, whom the PHOENICIANS call'd
   ASTARTE, Queen of Heav'n, with crescent Horns;
   To whose bright Image nightly by the Moon
   SIDONIAN Virgins paid their Vows and Songs,
   In SION also not unsung, where stood
   Her Temple on th' offensive Mountain, built
   By that uxorious King, whose heart though large,
   Beguil'd by fair Idolatresses, fell
   To Idols foul.  THAMMUZ came next behind,
   Whose annual wound in LEBANON allur'd
   The SYRIAN Damsels to lament his fate
   In amorous dittyes all a Summers day,
   While smooth ADONIS from his native Rock
   Ran purple to the Sea, suppos'd with blood
   Of THAMMUZ yearly wounded: the Love-tale
   Infected SIONS daughters with like heat,
   Whose wanton passions in the sacred Porch
   EZEKIEL saw, when by the Vision led
   His eye survay'd the dark Idolatries
   Of alienated JUDAH.  Next came one
   Who mourn'd in earnest, when the Captive Ark
   Maim'd his brute Image, head and hands lopt off
   In his own Temple, on the grunsel edge,
   Where he fell flat, and sham'd his Worshipers:
   DAGON his Name, Sea Monster, upward Man
   And downward Fish: yet had his Temple high
   Rear'd in AZOTUS, dreaded through the Coast
   Of PALESTINE, in GATH and ASCALON,
   And ACCARON and GAZA's frontier bounds.
   Him follow'd RIMMON, whose delightful Seat
   Was fair DAMASCUS, on the fertil Banks
   Of ABBANA and PHARPHAR, lucid streams.
   He also against the house of God was bold:
   A Leper once he lost and gain'd a King,
   AHAZ his sottish Conquerour, whom he drew
   Gods Altar to disparage and displace
   For one of SYRIAN mode, whereon to burn
   His odious offrings, and adore the Gods
   Whom he had vanquisht.  After these appear'd
   A crew who under Names of old Renown,
   OSIRIS, ISIS, ORUS and their Train
   With monstrous shapes and sorceries abus'd
   Fanatic EGYPT and her Priests, to seek
   Thir wandring Gods disguis'd in brutish forms
   Rather then human.  Nor did ISRAEL scape
   Th' infection when their borrow'd Gold compos'd
   The Calf in OREB: and the Rebel King
   Doubl'd that sin in BETHEL and in DAN,
   Lik'ning his Maker to the Grazed Ox,
   JEHOVAH, who in one Night when he pass'd
   From EGYPT marching, equal'd with one stroke
   Both her first born and all her bleating Gods.
   BELIAL came last, then whom a Spirit more lewd
   Fell not from Heaven, or more gross to love
   Vice for it self: To him no Temple stood
   Or Altar smoak'd; yet who more oft then hee
   In Temples and at Altars, when the Priest
   Turns Atheist, as did ELY'S Sons, who fill'd
   With lust and violence the house of God.
   In Courts and Palaces he also Reigns
   And in luxurious Cities, where the noyse
   Of riot ascends above thir loftiest Towrs,
   And injury and outrage: And when Night
   Darkens the Streets, then wander forth the Sons
   Of BELIAL, flown with insolence and wine.
   Witness the Streets of SODOM, and that night
   In GIBEAH, when hospitable Dores
   Yielded thir Matrons to prevent worse rape.
   These were the prime in order and in might;
   The rest were long to tell, though far renown'd,
   Th' IONIAN Gods, of JAVANS Issue held
   Gods, yet confest later then Heav'n and Earth
   Thir boasted Parents; TITAN Heav'ns first born
   With his enormous brood, and birthright seis'd
   By younger SATURN, he from mightier JOVE
   His own and RHEA'S Son like measure found;
   So JOVE usurping reign'd: these first in CREET
   And IDA known, thence on the Snowy top
   Of cold OLYMPUS rul'd the middle Air
   Thir highest Heav'n; or on the DELPHIAN Cliff,
   Or in DODONA, and through all the bounds
   Of DORIC Land; or who with SATURN old
   Fled over ADRIA to th' HESPERIAN Fields,
   And ore the CELTIC roam'd the utmost Isles.
   All these and more came flocking; but with looks
   Down cast and damp, yet such wherein appear'd
   Obscure som glimps of joy, to have found thir chief
   Not in despair, to have found themselves not lost
   In loss it self; which on his count'nance cast
   Like doubtful hue: but he his wonted pride
   Soon recollecting, with high words, that bore
   Semblance of worth not substance, gently rais'd
   Their fainted courage, and dispel'd their fears.
   Then strait commands that at the warlike sound
   Of Trumpets loud and Clarions be upreard
   His mighty Standard; that proud honour claim'd
   AZAZEL as his right, a Cherube tall:
   Who forthwith from the glittering Staff unfurld
   Th' Imperial Ensign, which full high advanc't
   Shon like a Meteor streaming to the Wind
   With Gemms and Golden lustre rich imblaz'd,
   Seraphic arms and Trophies: all the while
   Sonorous mettal blowing Martial sounds:
   At which the universal Host upsent
   A shout that tore Hells Concave, and beyond
   Frighted the Reign of CHAOS and old Night.
   All in a moment through the gloom were seen
   Ten thousand Banners rise into the Air
   With Orient Colours waving: with them rose
   A Forrest huge of Spears: and thronging Helms
   Appear'd, and serried Shields in thick array
   Of depth immeasurable: Anon they move
   In perfect PHALANX to the Dorian mood
   Of Flutes and soft Recorders; such as rais'd
   To highth of noblest temper Hero's old
   Arming to Battel, and in stead of rage
   Deliberate valour breath'd, firm and unmov'd
   With dread of death to flight or foul retreat,
   Nor wanting power to mitigate and swage
   With solemn touches, troubl'd thoughts, and chase
   Anguish and doubt and fear and sorrow and pain
   From mortal or immortal minds.  Thus they
   Breathing united force with fixed thought
   Mov'd on in silence to soft Pipes that charm'd
   Thir painful steps o're the burnt soyle; and now
   Advanc't in view they stand, a horrid Front
   Of dreadful length and dazling Arms, in guise
   Of Warriers old with order'd Spear and Shield,
   Awaiting what command thir mighty Chief
   Had to impose: He through the armed Files
   Darts his experienc't eye, and soon traverse
   The whole Battalion views, thir order due,
   Thir visages and stature as of Gods,
   Thir number last he summs.  And now his heart
   Distends with pride, and hardning in his strength
   Glories: For never since created man,
   Met such imbodied force, as nam'd with these
   Could merit more then that small infantry
   Warr'd on by Cranes: though all the Giant brood
   Of PHLEGRA with th' Heroic Race were joyn'd
   That fought at THEB'S and ILIUM, on each side
   Mixt with auxiliar Gods; and what resounds
   In Fable or ROMANCE of UTHERS Son
   Begirt with BRITISH and ARMORIC Knights;
   And all who since, Baptiz'd or Infidel
   Jousted in ASPRAMONT or MONTALBAN,
   DAMASCO, or MAROCCO, or TREBISOND,
   Or whom BISERTA sent from AFRIC shore
   When CHARLEMAIN with all his Peerage fell
   By FONTARABBIA.  Thus far these beyond
   Compare of mortal prowess, yet observ'd
   Thir dread Commander: he above the rest
   In shape and gesture proudly eminent
   Stood like a Towr; his form had yet not lost
   All her Original brightness, nor appear'd
   Less then Arch Angel ruind, and th' excess
   Of Glory obscur'd: As when the Sun new ris'n
   Looks through the Horizontal misty Air
   Shorn of his Beams, or from behind the Moon
   In dim Eclips disastrous twilight sheds
   On half the Nations, and with fear of change
   Perplexes Monarchs.  Dark'n'd so, yet shon
   Above them all th' Arch Angel: but his face
   Deep scars of Thunder had intrencht, and care
   Sat on his faded cheek, but under Browes
   Of dauntless courage, and considerate Pride
   Waiting revenge: cruel his eye, but cast
   Signs of remorse and passion to behold
   The fellows of his crime, the followers rather
   (Far other once beheld in bliss) condemn'd
   For ever now to have their lot in pain,
   Millions of Spirits for his fault amerc't
   Of Heav'n, and from Eternal Splendors flung
   For his revolt, yet faithfull how they stood,
   Thir Glory witherd.  As when Heavens Fire
   Hath scath'd the Forrest Oaks, or Mountain Pines,
   With singed top their stately growth though bare
   Stands on the blasted Heath.  He now prepar'd
   To speak; whereat their doubl'd Ranks they bend
   From Wing to Wing, and half enclose him round
   With all his Peers: attention held them mute.
   Thrice he assayd, and thrice in spite of scorn,
   Tears such as Angels weep, burst forth: at last
   Words interwove with sighs found out their way.
 
     O Myriads of immortal Spirits, O Powers
   Matchless, but with th' Almighty, and that strife
   Was not inglorious, though th' event was dire,
   As this place testifies, and this dire change
   Hateful to utter: but what power of mind
   Foreseeing or presaging, from the Depth
   Of knowledge past or present, could have fear'd,
   How such united force of Gods, how such
   As stood like these, could ever know repulse?
   For who can yet beleeve, though after loss,
   That all these puissant Legions, whose exile
   Hath emptied Heav'n, shall faile to re-ascend
   Self-rais'd, and repossess their native seat.
   For me, be witness all the Host of Heav'n,
   If counsels different, or danger shun'd
   By me, have lost our hopes.  But he who reigns
   Monarch in Heav'n, till then as one secure
   Sat on his Throne, upheld by old repute,
   Consent or custome, and his Regal State
   Put forth at full, but still his strength conceal'd,
   Which tempted our attempt, and wrought our fall.
   Henceforth his might we know, and know our own
   So as not either to provoke, or dread
   New warr, provok't; our better part remains
   To work in close design, by fraud or guile
   What force effected not: that he no less
   At length from us may find, who overcomes
   By force, hath overcome but half his foe.
   Space may produce new Worlds; whereof so rife
   There went a fame in Heav'n that he ere long
   Intended to create, and therein plant
   A generation, whom his choice regard
   Should favour equal to the Sons of Heaven:
   Thither, if but to prie, shall be perhaps
   Our first eruption, thither or elsewhere:
   For this Infernal Pit shall never hold
   Caelestial Spirits in Bondage, nor th' Abysse
   Long under darkness cover.  But these thoughts
   Full Counsel must mature: Peace is despaird,
   For who can think Submission?  Warr then, Warr
   Open or understood must be resolv'd.
 
     He spake: and to confirm his words, out-flew
   Millions of flaming swords, drawn from the thighs
   Of mighty Cherubim; the sudden blaze
   Far round illumin'd hell: highly they rag'd
   Against the Highest, and fierce with grasped arm's
   Clash'd on their sounding shields the din of war,
   Hurling defiance toward the vault of Heav'n.
 
     There stood a Hill not far whose griesly top
   Belch'd fire and rowling smoak; the rest entire
   Shon with a glossie scurff, undoubted sign
   That in his womb was hid metallic Ore,
   The work of Sulphur.  Thither wing'd with speed
   A numerous Brigad hasten'd.  As when bands
   Of Pioners with Spade and Pickaxe arm'd
   Forerun the Royal Camp, to trench a Field,
   Or cast a Rampart.  MAMMON led them on,
   MAMMON, the least erected Spirit that fell
   From heav'n, for ev'n in heav'n his looks & thoughts
   Were always downward bent, admiring more
   The riches of Heav'ns pavement, trod'n Gold,
   Then aught divine or holy else enjoy'd
   In vision beatific: by him first
   Men also, and by his suggestion taught,
   Ransack'd the Center, and with impious hands
   Rifl'd the bowels of thir mother Earth
   For Treasures better hid.  Soon had his crew
   Op'nd into the Hill a spacious wound
   And dig'd out ribs of Gold.  Let none admire
   That riches grow in Hell; that soyle may best
   Deserve the pretious bane.  And here let those
   Who boast in mortal things, and wondring tell
   Of BABEL, and the works of MEMPHIAN Kings,
   Learn how thir greatest Monuments of Fame,
   And Strength and Art are easily outdone
   By Spirits reprobate, and in an hour
   What in an age they with incessant toyle
   And hands innumerable scarce perform
   Nigh on the Plain in many cells prepar'd,
   That underneath had veins of liquid fire
   Sluc'd from the Lake, a second multitude
   With wondrous Art founded the massie Ore,
   Severing each kinde, and scum'd the Bullion dross:
   A third as soon had form'd within the ground
   A various mould, and from the boyling cells
   By strange conveyance fill'd each hollow nook,
   As in an Organ from one blast of wind
   To many a row of Pipes the sound-board breaths.
   Anon out of the earth a Fabrick huge
   Rose like an Exhalation, with the sound
   Of Dulcet Symphonies and voices sweet,
   Built like a Temple, where PILASTERS round
   Were set, and Doric pillars overlaid
   With Golden Architrave; nor did there want
   Cornice or Freeze, with bossy Sculptures grav'n,
   The Roof was fretted Gold.  Not BABILON,
   Nor great ALCAIRO such magnificence
   Equal'd in all thir glories, to inshrine
   BELUS or SERAPIS thir Gods, or seat
   Thir Kings, when AEGYPT with ASSYRIA strove
   In wealth and luxurie.  Th' ascending pile
   Stood fixt her stately highth, and strait the dores
   Op'ning thir brazen foulds discover wide
   Within, her ample spaces, o're the smooth
   And level pavement: from the arched roof
   Pendant by suttle Magic many a row
   Of Starry Lamps and blazing Cressets fed
   With Naphtha and ASPHALTUS yeilded light
   As from a sky.  The hasty multitude
   Admiring enter'd, and the work some praise
   And some the Architect: his hand was known
   In Heav'n by many a Towred structure high,
   Where Scepter'd Angels held thir residence,
   And sat as Princes, whom the supreme King
   Exalted to such power, and gave to rule,
   Each in his Herarchie, the Orders bright.
   Nor was his name unheard or unador'd
   In ancient Greece; and in AUSONIAN land
   Men call'd him MULCIBER; and how he fell
   From Heav'n, they fabl'd, thrown by angry JOVE
   Sheer o're the Chrystal Battlements: from Morn
   To Noon he fell, from Noon to dewy Eve,
   A Summers day; and with the setting Sun
   Dropt from the Zenith like a falling Star,
   On LEMNOS th' AEGAEAN Ile: thus they relate,
   Erring; for he with this rebellious rout
   Fell long before; nor aught avail'd him now
   To have built in Heav'n high Towrs; nor did he scape
   By all his Engins, but was headlong sent
   With his industrious crew to build in hell.
   Mean while the winged Haralds by command
   Of Sovran power, with awful Ceremony
   And Trumpets sound throughout the Host proclaim
   A solemn Councel forthwith to be held
   At PANDAEMONIUM, the high Capital
   Of Satan and his Peers: thir summons call'd
   From every and Band squared Regiment
   By place or choice the worthiest; they anon
   With hundreds and with thousands trooping came
   Attended: all access was throng'd, the Gates
   And Porches wide, but chief the spacious Hall
   (Though like a cover'd field, where Champions bold
   Wont ride in arm'd, and at the Soldans chair
   Defi'd the best of Panim chivalry
   To mortal combat or carreer with Lance)
   Thick swarm'd, both on the ground and in the air,
   Brusht with the hiss of russling wings.  As Bees
   In spring time, when the Sun with Taurus rides,
   Poure forth thir populous youth about the Hive
   In clusters; they among fresh dews and flowers
   Flie to and fro, or on the smoothed Plank,
   The suburb of thir Straw-built Cittadel,
   New rub'd with Baume, expatiate and confer
   Thir State affairs.  So thick the aerie crowd
   Swarm'd and were straitn'd; till the Signal giv'n,
   Behold a wonder! they but now who seemd
   In bigness to surpass Earths Giant Sons
   Now less then smallest Dwarfs, in narrow room
   Throng numberless, like that Pigmean Race
   Beyond the INDIAN Mount, or Faerie Elves,
   Whose midnight Revels, by a Forrest side
   Or Fountain fome belated Peasant sees,
   Or dreams he sees, while over head the Moon
   Sits Arbitress, and neerer to the Earth
   Wheels her pale course, they on thir mirth & dance
   Intent, with jocond Music charm his ear;
   At once with joy and fear his heart rebounds.
   Thus incorporeal Spirits to smallest forms
   Reduc'd thir shapes immense, and were at large,
   Though without number still amidst the Hall
   Of that infernal Court.  But far within
   And in thir own dimensions like themselves
   The great Seraphic Lords and Cherubim
   In close recess and secret conclave sat
   A thousand Demy-Gods on golden seat's,
   Frequent and full.  After short silence then
   And summons read, the great consult began.
 
       THE END OF THE FIRST BOOK.
 
 
   PARADISE LOST
 
   BOOK II.
 
   High on a Throne of Royal State, which far
   Outshon the wealth of ORMUS and of IND,
   Or where the gorgeous East with richest hand
   Showrs on her Kings BARBARIC Pearl & Gold,
   Satan exalted sat, by merit rais'd
   To that bad eminence; and from despair
   Thus high uplifted beyond hope, aspires
   Beyond thus high, insatiate to pursue
   Vain Warr with Heav'n, and by success untaught
   His proud imaginations thus displaid.
 
     Powers and Dominions, Deities of Heav'n,
   For since no deep within her gulf can hold
   Immortal vigor, though opprest and fall'n,
   I give not Heav'n for lost.  From this descent
   Celestial vertues rising, will appear
   More glorious and more dread then from no fall,
   And trust themselves to fear no second fate:
   Mee though just right, and the fixt Laws of Heav'n
   Did first create your Leader, next, free choice,
   With what besides, in Counsel or in Fight,
   Hath bin achievd of merit, yet this loss
   Thus farr at least recover'd, hath much more
   Establisht in a safe unenvied Throne
   Yeilded with full consent.  The happier state
   In Heav'n, which follows dignity, might draw
   Envy from each inferior; but who here
   Will envy whom the highest place exposes
   Formost to stand against the Thunderers aime
   Your bulwark, and condemns to greatest share
   Of endless pain? where there is then no good
   For which to strive, no strife can grow up there
   From Faction; for none sure will claim in hell
   Precedence, none, whose portion is so small
   Of present pain, that with ambitious mind
   Will covet more.  With this advantage then
   To union, and firm Faith, and firm accord,
   More then can be in Heav'n, we now return
   To claim our just inheritance of old,
   Surer to prosper then prosperity
   Could have assur'd us; and by what best way,
   Whether of open Warr or covert guile,
   We now debate; who can advise, may speak.
 
     He ceas'd, and next him MOLOC, Scepter'd King
   Stood up, the strongest and the fiercest Spirit
   That fought in Heav'n; now fiercer by despair:
   His trust was with th' Eternal to be deem'd
   Equal in strength, and rather then be less
   Car'd not to be at all; with that care lost
   Went all his fear: of God, or Hell, or worse
   He reckd not, and these words thereafter spake.
 
     My sentence is for open Warr: Of Wiles,
   More unexpert, I boast not: them let those
   Contrive who need, or when they need, not now.
   For while they sit contriving, shall the rest,
   Millions that stand in Arms, and longing wait
   The Signal to ascend, sit lingring here
   Heav'ns fugitives, and for thir dwelling place
   Accept this dark opprobrious Den of shame,
   The Prison of his Tyranny who Reigns
   By our delay? no, let us rather choose
   Arm'd with Hell flames and fury all at once
   O're Heav'ns high Towrs to force resistless way,
   Turning our Tortures into horrid Arms
   Against the Torturer; when to meet the noise
   Of his Almighty Engin he shall hear
   Infernal Thunder, and for Lightning see
   Black fire and horror shot with equal rage
   Among his Angels; and his Throne it self
   Mixt with TARTAREAN Sulphur, and strange fire,
   His own invented Torments.  But perhaps
   The way seems difficult and steep to scale
   With upright wing against a higher foe.
   Let such bethink them, if the sleepy drench
   Of that forgetful Lake benumme not still,
   That in our proper motion we ascend
   Up to our native seat: descent and fall
   To us is adverse.  Who but felt of late
   When the fierce Foe hung on our brok'n Rear
   Insulting, and pursu'd us through the Deep,
   With what compulsion and laborious flight
   We sunk thus low?  Th' ascent is easie then;
   Th' event is fear'd; should we again provoke
   Our stronger, some worse way his wrath may find
   To our destruction: if there be in Hell
   Fear to be worse destroy'd: what can be worse
   Then to dwell here, driv'n out from bliss, condemn'd
   In this abhorred deep to utter woe;
   Where pain of unextinguishable fire
   Must exercise us without hope of end
   The Vassals of his anger, when the Scourge
   Inexorably, and the torturing houre
   Calls us to Penance?  More destroy'd then thus
   We should be quite abolisht and expire.
   What fear we then? what doubt we to incense
   His utmost ire? which to the highth enrag'd,
   Will either quite consume us, and reduce
   To nothing this essential, happier farr
   Then miserable to have eternal being:
   Or if our substance be indeed Divine,
   And cannot cease to be, we are at worst
   On this side nothing; and by proof we feel
   Our power sufficient to disturb his Heav'n,
   And with perpetual inrodes to Allarme,
   Though inaccessible, his fatal Throne:
   Which if not Victory is yet Revenge.
 
     He ended frowning, and his look denounc'd
   Desperate revenge, and Battel dangerous
   To less then Gods.  On th' other side up rose
   BELIAL, in act more graceful and humane;
   A fairer person lost not Heav'n; he seemd
   For dignity compos'd and high exploit:
   But all was false and hollow; though his Tongue
   Dropt Manna, and could make the worse appear
   The better reason, to perplex and dash
   Maturest Counsels: for his thoughts were low;
   To vice industrious, but to Nobler deeds
   Timorous and slothful: yet he pleas'd the eare,
   And with perswasive accent thus began.
 
     I should be much for open Warr, O Peers,
   As not behind in hate; if what was urg'd
   Main reason to perswade immediate Warr,
   Did not disswade me most, and seem to cast
   Ominous conjecture on the whole success:
   When he who most excels in fact of Arms,
   In what he counsels and in what excels
   Mistrustful, grounds his courage on despair
   And utter dissolution, as the scope
   Of all his aim, after some dire revenge.
   First, what Revenge? the Towrs of Heav'n are fill'd
   With Armed watch, that render all access
   Impregnable; oft on the bordering Deep
   Encamp thir Legions, or with obscure wing
   Scout farr and wide into the Realm of night,
   Scorning surprize.  Or could we break our way
   By force, and at our heels all Hell should rise
   With blackest Insurrection, to confound
   Heav'ns purest Light, yet our great Enemie
   All incorruptible would on his Throne
   Sit unpolluted, and th' Ethereal mould
   Incapable of stain would soon expel
   Her mischief, and purge off the baser fire
   Victorious.  Thus repuls'd, our final hope
   Is flat despair: we must exasperate
   Th' Almighty Victor to spend all his rage,
   And that must end us, that must be our cure,
   To be no more; sad cure; for who would loose,
   Though full of pain, this intellectual being,
   Those thoughts that wander through Eternity,
   To perish rather, swallowd up and lost
   In the wide womb of uncreated night,
   Devoid of sense and motion? and who knows,
   Let this be good, whether our angry Foe
   Can give it, or will ever? how he can
   Is doubtful; that he never will is sure.
   Will he, so wise, let loose at once his ire,
   Belike through impotence, or unaware,
   To give his Enemies thir wish, and end
   Them in his anger, whom his anger saves
   To punish endless? wherefore cease we then?
   Say they who counsel Warr, we are decreed,
   Reserv'd and destin'd to Eternal woe;
   Whatever doing, what can we suffer more,
   What can we suffer worse? is this then worst,
   Thus sitting, thus consulting, thus in Arms?
   What when we fled amain, pursu'd and strook
   With Heav'ns afflicting Thunder, and besought
   The Deep to shelter us? this Hell then seem'd
   A refuge from those wounds: or when we lay
   Chain'd on the burning Lake? that sure was worse.
   What if the breath that kindl'd those grim fires
   Awak'd should blow them into sevenfold rage
   And plunge us in the Flames? or from above
   Should intermitted vengeance Arme again
   His red right hand to plague us? what if all
   Her stores were op'n'd, and this Firmament
   Of Hell should spout her Cataracts of Fire,
   Impendent horrors, threatning hideous fall
   One day upon our heads; while we perhaps
   Designing or exhorting glorious Warr,
   Caught in a fierie Tempest shall be hurl'd
   Each on his rock transfixt, the sport and prey
   Of racking whirlwinds, or for ever sunk
   Under yon boyling Ocean, wrapt in Chains;
   There to converse with everlasting groans,
   Unrespited, unpitied, unrepreevd,
   Ages of hopeless end; this would be worse.
   Warr therefore, open or conceal'd, alike
   My voice disswades; for what can force or guile
   With him, or who deceive his mind, whose eye
   Views all things at one view? he from heav'ns highth
   All these our motions vain, sees and derides;
   Not more Almighty to resist our might
   Then wise to frustrate all our plots and wiles.
   Shall we then live thus vile, the race of Heav'n
   Thus trampl'd, thus expell'd to suffer here
   Chains & these Torments? better these then worse
   By my advice; since fate inevitable
   Subdues us, and Omnipotent Decree,
   The Victors will.  To suffer, as to doe,
   Our strength is equal, nor the Law unjust
   That so ordains: this was at first resolv'd,
   If we were wise, against so great a foe
   Contending, and so doubtful what might fall.
   I laugh, when those who at the Spear are bold
   And vent'rous, if that fail them, shrink and fear
   What yet they know must follow, to endure
   Exile, or ignominy, or bonds, or pain,
   The sentence of thir Conquerour: This is now
   Our doom; which if we can sustain and bear,
   Our Supream Foe in time may much remit
   His anger, and perhaps thus farr remov'd
   Not mind us not offending, satisfi'd
   With what is punish't; whence these raging fires
   Will slack'n, if his breath stir not thir flames.
   Our purer essence then will overcome
   Thir noxious vapour, or enur'd not feel,
   Or chang'd at length, and to the place conformd
   In temper and in nature, will receive
   Familiar the fierce heat, and void of pain;
   This horror will grow milde, this darkness light,
   Besides what hope the never-ending flight
   Of future days may bring, what chance, what change
   Worth waiting, since our present lot appeers
   For happy though but ill, for ill not worst,
   If we procure not to our selves more woe.
 
     Thus BELIAL with words cloath'd in reasons garb
   Counsel'd ignoble ease, and peaceful sloath,
   Not peace: and after him thus MAMMON spake.
 
     Either to disinthrone the King of Heav'n
   We warr, if warr be best, or to regain
   Our own right lost: him to unthrone we then
   May hope, when everlasting Fate shall yeild
   To fickle Chance, and CHAOS judge the strife:
   The former vain to hope argues as vain
   The latter: for what place can be for us
   Within Heav'ns bound, unless Heav'ns Lord supream
   We overpower?  Suppose he should relent
   And publish Grace to all, on promise made
   Of new Subjection; with what eyes could we
   Stand in his presence humble, and receive
   Strict Laws impos'd, to celebrate his Throne
   With warbl'd Hymns, and to his Godhead sing
   Forc't Halleluiah's; while he Lordly sits
   Our envied Sovran, and his Altar breathes
   Ambrosial Odours and Ambrosial Flowers,
   Our servile offerings.  This must be our task
   In Heav'n, this our delight; how wearisom
   Eternity so spent in worship paid
   To whom we hate.  Let us not then pursue
   By force impossible, by leave obtain'd
   Unacceptable, though in Heav'n, our state
   Of splendid vassalage, but rather seek
   Our own good from our selves, and from our own
   Live to our selves, though in this vast recess,
   Free, and to none accountable, preferring
   Hard liberty before the easie yoke
   Of servile Pomp.  Our greatness will appear
   Then most conspicuous, when great things of small,
   Useful of hurtful, prosperous of adverse
   We can create, and in what place so e're
   Thrive under evil, and work ease out of pain
   Through labour and endurance.  This deep world
   Of darkness do we dread?  How oft amidst
   Thick clouds and dark doth Heav'ns all-ruling Sire
   Choose to reside, his Glory unobscur'd,
   And with the Majesty of darkness round
   Covers his Throne; from whence deep thunders roar
   Must'ring thir rage, and Heav'n resembles Hell?
   As he our Darkness, cannot we his Light
   Imitate when we please?  This Desart soile
   Wants not her hidden lustre, Gemms and Gold;
   Nor want we skill or art, from whence to raise
   Magnificence; and what can Heav'n shew more?
   Our torments also may in length of time
   Become our Elements, these piercing Fires
   As soft as now severe, our temper chang'd
   Into their temper; which must needs remove
   The sensible of pain.  All things invite
   To peaceful Counsels, and the settl'd State
   Of order, how in safety best we may
   Compose our present evils, with regard
   Of what we are and where, dismissing quite
   All thoughts of Warr: ye have what I advise.
 
     He scarce had finisht, when such murmur filld
   Th' Assembly, as when hollow Rocks retain
   The sound of blustring winds, which all night long
   Had rous'd the Sea, now with hoarse cadence lull
   Sea-faring men orewatcht, whose Bark by chance
   Or Pinnace anchors in a craggy Bay
   After the Tempest: Such applause was heard
   As MAMMON ended, and his Sentence pleas'd,
   Advising peace: for such another Field
   They dreaded worse then Hell: so much the fear
   Of Thunder and the Sword of MICHAEL
   Wrought still within them; and no less desire
   To found this nether Empire, which might rise
   By pollicy, and long process of time,
   In emulation opposite to Heav'n.
   Which when BEELZEBUB perceiv'd, then whom,
   SATAN except, none higher sat, with grave
   Aspect he rose, and in his rising seem'd
   A Pillar of State; deep on his Front engraven
   Deliberation sat and publick care;
   And Princely counsel in his face yet shon,
   Majestick though in ruin: sage he stood
   With ATLANTEAN shoulders fit to bear
   The weight of mightiest Monarchies; his look
   Drew audience and attention still as Night
   Or Summers Noon-tide air, while thus he spake.
 
     Thrones and imperial Powers, off-spring of heav'n,
   Ethereal Vertues; or these Titles now
   Must we renounce, and changing stile be call'd
   Princes of Hell? for so the popular vote
   Inclines, here to continue, and build up here
   A growing Empire; doubtless; while we dream,
   And know not that the King of Heav'n hath doom'd
   This place our dungeon, not our safe retreat
   Beyond his Potent arm, to live exempt
   From Heav'ns high jurisdiction, in new League
   Banded against his Throne, but to remaine
   In strictest bondage, though thus far remov'd,
   Under th' inevitable curb, reserv'd
   His captive multitude: For he, be sure,
   In highth or depth, still first and last will Reign
   Sole King, and of his Kingdom loose no part
   By our revolt, but over Hell extend
   His Empire, and with Iron Scepter rule
   Us here, as with his Golden those in Heav'n.
   What sit we then projecting Peace and Warr?
   Warr hath determin'd us, and foild with loss
   Irreparable; tearms of peace yet none
   Voutsaf't or sought; for what peace will be giv'n
   To us enslav'd, but custody severe,
   And stripes, and arbitrary punishment
   Inflicted? and what peace can we return,
   But to our power hostility and hate,
   Untam'd reluctance, and revenge though slow,
   Yet ever plotting how the Conquerour least
   May reap his conquest, and may least rejoyce
   In doing what we most in suffering feel?
   Nor will occasion want, nor shall we need
   With dangerous expedition to invade
   Heav'n, whose high walls fear no assault or Siege,
   Or ambush from the Deep.  What if we find
   Some easier enterprize?  There is a place
   (If ancient and prophetic fame in Heav'n
   Err not) another World, the happy seat
   Of som new Race call'd MAN, about this time
   To be created like to us, though less
   In power and excellence, but favour'd more
   Of him who rules above; so was his will
   Pronounc'd among the Gods, and by an Oath,
   That shook Heav'ns whol circumference, confirm'd.
   Thither let us bend all our thoughts, to learn
   What creatures there inhabit, of what mould,
   Or substance, how endu'd, and what thir Power,
   And where thir weakness, how attempted best,
   By force or suttlety: Though Heav'n be shut,
   And Heav'ns high Arbitrator sit secure
   In his own strength, this place may lye expos'd
   The utmost border of his Kingdom, left
   To their defence who hold it: here perhaps
   Som advantagious act may be achiev'd
   By sudden onset, either with Hell fire
   To waste his whole Creation, or possess
   All as our own, and drive as we were driven,
   The punie habitants, or if not drive,
   Seduce them to our Party, that thir God
   May prove thir foe, and with repenting hand
   Abolish his own works.  This would surpass
   Common revenge, and interrupt his joy
   In our Confusion, and our Joy upraise
   In his disturbance; when his darling Sons
   Hurl'd headlong to partake with us, shall curse
   Thir frail Originals, and faded bliss,
   Faded so soon.  Advise if this be worth
   Attempting, or to sit in darkness here
   Hatching vain Empires.  Thus BEELZEBUB
   Pleaded his devilish Counsel, first devis'd
   By SATAN, and in part propos'd: for whence,
   But from the Author of all ill could Spring
   So deep a malice, to confound the race
   Of mankind in one root, and Earth with Hell
   To mingle and involve, done all to spite
   The great Creatour?  But thir spite still serves
   His glory to augment.  The bold design
   Pleas'd highly those infernal States, and joy
   Sparkl'd in all thir eyes; with full assent
   They vote: whereat his speech he thus renews.
 
     Well have ye judg'd, well ended long debate,
   Synod of Gods, and like to what ye are,
   Great things resolv'd; which from the lowest deep
   Will once more lift us up, in spight of Fate,
   Neerer our ancient Seat; perhaps in view
   Of those bright confines, whence with neighbouring Arms
   And opportune excursion we may chance
   Re-enter Heav'n; or else in some milde Zone
   Dwell not unvisited of Heav'ns fair Light
   Secure, and at the brightning Orient beam
   Purge off this gloom; the soft delicious Air,
   To heal the scarr of these corrosive Fires
   Shall breath her balme.  But first whom shall we send
   In search of this new world, whom shall we find
   Sufficient? who shall tempt with wandring feet
   The dark unbottom'd infinite Abyss
   And through the palpable obscure find out
   His uncouth way, or spread his aerie flight
   Upborn with indefatigable wings
   Over the vast abrupt, ere he arrive
   The happy Ile; what strength, what art can then
   Suffice, or what evasion bear him safe
   Through the strict Senteries and Stations thick
   Of Angels watching round?  Here he had need
   All circumspection, and we now no less
   Choice in our suffrage; for on whom we send,
   The weight of all and our last hope relies.
 
     This said, he sat; and expectation held
   His look suspence, awaiting who appeer'd
   To second, or oppose, or undertake
   The perilous attempt: but all sat mute,
   Pondering the danger with deep thoughts; & each
   In others count'nance red his own dismay
   Astonisht: none among the choice and prime
   Of those Heav'n-warring Champions could be found
   So hardie as to proffer or accept
   Alone the dreadful voyage; till at last
   SATAN, whom now transcendent glory rais'd
   Above his fellows, with Monarchal pride
   Conscious of highest worth, unmov'd thus spake.
 
     O Progeny of Heav'n, Empyreal Thrones,
   With reason hath deep silence and demurr
   Seis'd us, though undismaid: long is the way
   And hard, that out of Hell leads up to Light;
   Our prison strong, this huge convex of Fire,
   Outrageous to devour, immures us round
   Ninefold, and gates of burning Adamant
   Barr'd over us prohibit all egress.
   These past, if any pass, the void profound
   Of unessential Night receives him next
   Wide gaping, and with utter loss of being
   Threatens him, plung'd in that abortive gulf.
   If thence he scape into what ever world,
   Or unknown Region, what remains him less
   Then unknown dangers and as hard escape.
   But I should ill become this Throne, O Peers,
   And this Imperial Sov'ranty, adorn'd
   With splendor, arm'd with power, if aught propos'd
   And judg'd of public moment, in the shape
   Of difficulty or danger could deterre
   Me from attempting.  Wherefore do I assume
   These Royalties, and not refuse to Reign,
   Refusing to accept as great a share
   Of hazard as of honour, due alike
   To him who Reigns, and so much to him due
   Of hazard more, as he above the rest
   High honourd sits?  Go therfore mighty powers,
   Terror of Heav'n, though fall'n; intend at home,
   While here shall be our home, what best may ease
   The present misery, and render Hell
   More tollerable; if there be cure or charm
   To respite or deceive, or slack the pain
   Of this ill Mansion: intermit no watch
   Against a wakeful Foe, while I abroad
   Through all the coasts of dark destruction seek
   Deliverance for us all: this enterprize
   None shall partake with me.  Thus saying rose
   The Monarch, and prevented all reply,
   Prudent, least from his resolution rais'd
   Others among the chief might offer now
   (Certain to be refus'd) what erst they feard;
   And so refus'd might in opinion stand
   His rivals, winning cheap the high repute
   Which he through hazard huge must earn.  But they
   Dreaded not more th' adventure then his voice
   Forbidding; and at once with him they rose;
   Thir rising all at once was as the sound
   Of Thunder heard remote.  Towards him they bend
   With awful reverence prone; and as a God
   Extoll him equal to the highest in Heav'n:
   Nor fail'd they to express how much they prais'd,
   That for the general safety he despis'd
   His own: for neither do the Spirits damn'd
   Loose all thir vertue; least bad men should boast
   Thir specious deeds on earth, which glory excites,
   Or close ambition varnisht o're with zeal.
   Thus they thir doubtful consultations dark
   Ended rejoycing in thir matchless Chief:
   As when from mountain tops the dusky clouds
   Ascending, while the North wind sleeps, o'respread
   Heav'ns chearful face, the lowring Element
   Scowls ore the dark'nd lantskip Snow, or showre;
   If chance the radiant Sun with farewell sweet
   Extend his ev'ning beam, the fields revive,
   The birds thir notes renew, and bleating herds
   Attest thir joy, that hill and valley rings.
   O shame to men!  Devil with Devil damn'd
   Firm concord holds, men onely disagree
   Of Creatures rational, though under hope
   Of heavenly Grace: and God proclaiming peace,
   Yet live in hatred, enmitie, and strife
   Among themselves, and levie cruel warres,
   Wasting the Earth, each other to destroy:
   As if (which might induce us to accord)
   Man had not hellish foes anow besides,
   That day and night for his destruction waite.
 
     The STYGIAN Councel thus dissolv'd; and forth
   In order came the grand infernal Peers,
   Midst came thir mighty Paramount, and seemd
   Alone th' Antagonist of Heav'n, nor less
   Then Hells dread Emperour with pomp Supream,
   And God-like imitated State; him round
   A Globe of fierie Seraphim inclos'd
   With bright imblazonrie, and horrent Arms.
   Then of thir Session ended they bid cry
   With Trumpets regal sound the great result:
   Toward the four winds four speedy Cherubim
   Put to thir mouths the sounding Alchymie
   By Haralds voice explain'd: the hollow Abyss
   Heard farr and wide, and all the host of Hell
   With deafning shout, return'd them loud acclaim.
   Thence more at ease thir minds and somwhat rais'd
   By false presumptuous hope, the ranged powers
   Disband, and wandring, each his several way
   Pursues, as inclination or sad choice
   Leads him perplext, where he may likeliest find
   Truce to his restless thoughts, and entertain
   The irksome hours, till his great Chief return.
   Part on the Plain, or in the Air sublime
   Upon the wing, or in swift race contend,
   As at th' Olympian Games or PYTHIAN fields;
   Part curb thir fierie Steeds, or shun the Goal
   With rapid wheels, or fronted Brigads form.
   As when to warn proud Cities warr appears
   Wag'd in the troubl'd Skie, and Armies rush
   To Battel in the Clouds, before each Van
   Pric forth the Aerie Knights, and couch thir spears
   Till thickest Legions close; with feats of Arms
   From either end of Heav'n the welkin burns.
   Others with vast TYPHOEAN rage more fell
   Rend up both Rocks and Hills, and ride the Air
   In whirlwind; Hell scarce holds the wilde uproar.
   As when ALCIDES from OEALIA Crown'd
   With conquest, felt th' envenom'd robe, and tore
   Through pain up by the roots THESSALIAN Pines,
   And LICHAS from the top of OETA threw
   Into th' EUBOIC Sea.  Others more milde,
   Retreated in a silent valley, sing
   With notes Angelical to many a Harp
   Thir own Heroic deeds and hapless fall
   By doom of Battel; and complain that Fate
   Free Vertue should enthrall to Force or Chance.
   Thir song was partial, but the harmony
   (What could it less when Spirits immortal sing?)
   Suspended Hell, and took with ravishment
   The thronging audience.  In discourse more sweet
   (For Eloquence the Soul, Song charms the Sense,)
   Others apart sat on a Hill retir'd,
   In thoughts more elevate, and reason'd high
   Of Providence, Foreknowledge, Will, and Fate,
   Fixt Fate, free will, foreknowledge absolute,
   And found no end, in wandring mazes lost.
   Of good and evil much they argu'd then,
   Of happiness and final misery,
   Passion and Apathie, and glory and shame,
   Vain wisdom all, and false Philosophie:
   Yet with a pleasing sorcerie could charm
   Pain for a while or anguish, and excite
   Fallacious hope, or arm th' obdured brest
   With stubborn patience as with triple steel.
   Another part in Squadrons and gross Bands,
   On bold adventure to discover wide
   That dismal world, if any Clime perhaps
   Might yeild them easier habitation, bend
   Four ways thir flying March, along the Banks
   Of four infernal Rivers that disgorge
   Into the burning Lake thir baleful streams;
   Abhorred STYX the flood of deadly hate,
   Sad ACHERON of sorrow, black and deep;
   COCYTUS, nam'd of lamentation loud
   Heard on the ruful stream; fierce PHLEGETON
   Whose waves of torrent fire inflame with rage.
   Farr off from these a slow and silent stream,
   LETHE the River of Oblivion roules
   Her watrie Labyrinth, whereof who drinks,
   Forthwith his former state and being forgets,
   Forgets both joy and grief, pleasure and pain.
   Beyond this flood a frozen Continent
   Lies dark and wilde, beat with perpetual storms
   Of Whirlwind and dire Hail, which on firm land
   Thaws not, but gathers heap, and ruin seems
   Of ancient pile; all else deep snow and ice,
   A gulf profound as that SERBONIAN Bog
   Betwixt DAMIATA and mount CASIUS old,
   Where Armies whole have sunk: the parching Air
   Burns frore, and cold performs th' effect of Fire.
   Thither by harpy-footed Furies hail'd,
   At certain revolutions all the damn'd
   Are brought: and feel by turns the bitter change
   Of fierce extreams, extreams by change more fierce,
   From Beds of raging Fire to starve in Ice
   Thir soft Ethereal warmth, and there to pine
   Immovable, infixt, and frozen round,
   Periods of time, thence hurried back to fire.
   They ferry over this LETHEAN Sound
   Both to and fro, thir sorrow to augment,
   And wish and struggle, as they pass, to reach
   The tempting stream, with one small drop to loose
   In sweet forgetfulness all pain and woe,
   All in one moment, and so neer the brink;
   But fate withstands, and to oppose th' attempt
   MEDUSA with GORGONIAN terror guards
   The Ford, and of it self the water flies
   All taste of living wight, as once it fled
   The lip of TANTALUS.  Thus roving on
   In confus'd march forlorn, th' adventrous Bands
   With shuddring horror pale, and eyes agast
   View'd first thir lamentable lot, and found
   No rest: through many a dark and drearie Vaile
   They pass'd, and many a Region dolorous,
   O're many a Frozen, many a Fierie Alpe,
   Rocks, Caves, Lakes, Fens, Bogs, Dens, and shades of death,
   A Universe of death, which God by curse
   Created evil, for evil only good,
   Where all life dies, death lives, and nature breeds,
   Perverse, all monstrous, all prodigious things,
   Abominable, inutterable, and worse
   Then Fables yet have feign'd, or fear conceiv'd,
   GORGONS and HYDRA'S, and CHIMERA'S dire.
 
     Mean while the Adversary of God and Man,
   SATAN with thoughts inflam'd of highest design,
   Puts on swift wings, and toward the Gates of Hell
   Explores his solitary flight; som times
   He scours the right hand coast, som times the left,
   Now shaves with level wing the Deep, then soares
   Up to the fiery concave touring high.
   As when farr off at Sea a Fleet descri'd
   Hangs in the Clouds, by AEQUINOCTIAL Winds
   Close sailing from BENGALA, or the Iles
   Of TERNATE and TIDORE, whence Merchants bring
   Thir spicie Drugs: they on the trading Flood
   Through the wide ETHIOPIAN to the Cape
   Ply stemming nightly toward the Pole.  So seem'd
   Farr off the flying Fiend: at last appeer
   Hell bounds high reaching to the horrid Roof,
   And thrice threefold the Gates; three folds were Brass
   Three Iron, three of Adamantine Rock,
   Impenitrable, impal'd with circling fire,
   Yet unconsum'd.  Before the Gates there sat
   On either side a formidable shape;
   The one seem'd Woman to the waste, and fair,
   But ended foul in many a scaly fould
   Voluminous and vast, a Serpent arm'd
   With mortal sting: about her middle round
   A cry of Hell Hounds never ceasing bark'd
   With wide CERBEREAN mouths full loud, and rung
   A hideous Peal: yet, when they list, would creep,
   If aught disturb'd thir noyse, into her woomb,
   And kennel there, yet there still bark'd and howl'd
   Within unseen.  Farr less abhorrd then these
   Vex'd SCYLLA bathing in the Sea that parts
   CALABRIA from the hoarce TRINACRIAN shore:
   Nor uglier follow the Night-Hag, when call'd
   In secret, riding through the Air she comes
   Lur'd with the smell of infant blood, to dance
   With LAPLAND Witches, while the labouring Moon
   Eclipses at thir charms.  The other shape,
   If shape it might be call'd that shape had none
   Distinguishable in member, joynt, or limb,
   Or substance might be call'd that shadow seem'd,
   For each seem'd either; black it stood as Night,
   Fierce as ten Furies, terrible as Hell,
   And shook a dreadful Dart; what seem'd his head
   The likeness of a Kingly Crown had on.
   SATAN was now at hand, and from his seat
   The Monster moving onward came as fast,
   With horrid strides, Hell trembled as he strode.
   Th' undaunted Fiend what this might be admir'd,
   Admir'd, not fear'd; God and his Son except,
   Created thing naught vallu'd he nor shun'd;
   And with disdainful look thus first began.
 
     Whence and what art thou, execrable shape,
   That dar'st, though grim and terrible, advance
   Thy miscreated Front athwart my way
   To yonder Gates? through them I mean to pass,
   That be assur'd, without leave askt of thee:
   Retire, or taste thy folly, and learn by proof,
   Hell-born, not to contend with Spirits of Heav'n.
 
     To whom the Goblin full of wrauth reply'd,
   Art thou that Traitor Angel, art thou hee,
   Who first broke peace in Heav'n and Faith, till then
   Unbrok'n, and in proud rebellious Arms
   Drew after him the third part of Heav'ns Sons
   Conjur'd against the highest, for which both Thou
   And they outcast from God, are here condemn'd
   To waste Eternal daies in woe and pain?
   And reck'n'st thou thy self with Spirits of Heav'n,
   Hell-doomd, and breath'st defiance here and scorn,
   Where I reign King, and to enrage thee more,
   Thy King and Lord?  Back to thy punishment,
   False fugitive, and to thy speed add wings,
   Least with a whip of Scorpions I pursue
   Thy lingring, or with one stroke of this Dart
   Strange horror seise thee, and pangs unfelt before.
 
     So spake the grieslie terrour, and in shape,
   So speaking and so threatning, grew ten fold
   More dreadful and deform: on th' other side
   Incenc't with indignation SATAN stood
   Unterrifi'd, and like a Comet burn'd,
   That fires the length of OPHIUCUS huge
   In th' Artick Sky, and from his horrid hair
   Shakes Pestilence and Warr.  Each at the Head
   Level'd his deadly aime; thir fatall hands
   No second stroke intend, and such a frown
   Each cast at th' other, as when two black Clouds
   With Heav'ns Artillery fraught, come rattling on
   Over the CASPIAN, then stand front to front
   Hov'ring a space, till Winds the signal blow
   To joyn thir dark Encounter in mid air:
   So frownd the mighty Combatants, that Hell
   Grew darker at thir frown, so matcht they stood;
   For never but once more was either like
   To meet so great a foe: and now great deeds
   Had been achiev'd, whereof all Hell had rung,
   Had not the Snakie Sorceress that sat
   Fast by Hell Gate, and kept the fatal Key,
   Ris'n, and with hideous outcry rush'd between.
 
     O Father, what intends thy hand, she cry'd,
   Against thy only Son?  What fury O Son,
   Possesses thee to bend that mortal Dart
   Against thy Fathers head? and know'st for whom;
   For him who sits above and laughs the while
   At thee ordain'd his drudge, to execute
   What e're his wrath, which he calls Justice, bids,
   His wrath which one day will destroy ye both.
 
     She spake, and at her words the hellish Pest
   Forbore, then these to her SATAN return'd:
 
     So strange thy outcry, and thy words so strange
   Thou interposest, that my sudden hand
   Prevented spares to tell thee yet by deeds
   What it intends; till first I know of thee,
   What thing thou art, thus double-form'd, and why
   In this infernal Vaile first met thou call'st
   Me Father, and that Fantasm call'st my Son?
   I know thee not, nor ever saw till now
   Sight more detestable then him and thee.
 
     T' whom thus the Portress of Hell Gate reply'd;
   Hast thou forgot me then, and do I seem
   Now in thine eye so foul, once deemd so fair
   In Heav'n, when at th' Assembly, and in sight
   Of all the Seraphim with thee combin'd
   In bold conspiracy against Heav'ns King,
   All on a sudden miserable pain
   Surpris'd thee, dim thine eyes, and dizzie swumm
   In darkness, while thy head flames thick and fast
   Threw forth, till on the left side op'ning wide,
   Likest to thee in shape and count'nance bright,
   Then shining heav'nly fair, a Goddess arm'd
   Out of thy head I sprung: amazement seis'd
   All th' Host of Heav'n; back they recoild affraid
   At first, and call'd me SIN, and for a Sign
   Portentous held me; but familiar grown,
   I pleas'd, and with attractive graces won
   The most averse, thee chiefly, who full oft
   Thy self in me thy perfect image viewing
   Becam'st enamour'd, and such joy thou took'st
   With me in secret, that my womb conceiv'd
   A growing burden.  Mean while Warr arose,
   And fields were fought in Heav'n; wherein remaind
   (For what could else) to our Almighty Foe
   Cleer Victory, to our part loss and rout
   Through all the Empyrean: down they fell
   Driv'n headlong from the Pitch of Heaven, down
   Into this Deep, and in the general fall
   I also; at which time this powerful Key
   Into my hand was giv'n, with charge to keep
   These Gates for ever shut, which none can pass
   Without my op'ning.  Pensive here I sat
   Alone, but long I sat not, till my womb
   Pregnant by thee, and now excessive grown
   Prodigious motion felt and rueful throes.
   At last this odious offspring whom thou seest
   Thine own begotten, breaking violent way
   Tore through my entrails, that with fear and pain
   Distorted, all my nether shape thus grew
   Transform'd: but he my inbred enemie
   Forth issu'd, brandishing his fatal Dart
   Made to destroy: I fled, and cry'd out DEATH;
   Hell trembl'd at the hideous Name, and sigh'd
   From all her Caves, and back resounded DEATH.
   I fled, but he pursu'd (though more, it seems,
   Inflam'd with lust then rage) and swifter far,
   Me overtook his mother all dismaid,
   And in embraces forcible and foule
   Ingendring with me, of that rape begot
   These yelling Monsters that with ceasless cry
   Surround me, as thou sawst, hourly conceiv'd
   And hourly born, with sorrow infinite
   To me, for when they list into the womb
   That bred them they return, and howle and gnaw
   My Bowels, their repast; then bursting forth
   Afresh with conscious terrours vex me round,
   That rest or intermission none I find.
   Before mine eyes in opposition sits
   Grim DEATH my Son and foe, who sets them on,
   And me his Parent would full soon devour
   For want of other prey, but that he knows
   His end with mine involvd; and knows that I
   Should prove a bitter Morsel, and his bane,
   When ever that shall be; so Fate pronounc'd.
   But thou O Father, I forewarn thee, shun
   His deadly arrow; neither vainly hope
   To be invulnerable in those bright Arms,
   Though temper'd heav'nly, for that mortal dint,
   Save he who reigns above, none can resist.
 
     She finish'd, and the suttle Fiend his lore
   Soon learnd, now milder, and thus answerd smooth.
   Dear Daughter, since thou claim'st me for thy Sire,
   And my fair Son here showst me, the dear pledge
   Of dalliance had with thee in Heav'n, and joys
   Then sweet, now sad to mention, through dire change
   Befalln us unforeseen, unthought of, know
   I come no enemie, but to set free
   From out this dark and dismal house of pain,
   Both him and thee, and all the heav'nly Host
   Of Spirits that in our just pretenses arm'd
   Fell with us from on high: from them I go
   This uncouth errand sole, and one for all
   My self expose, with lonely steps to tread
   Th' unfounded deep, & through the void immense
   To search with wandring quest a place foretold
   Should be, and, by concurring signs, ere now
   Created vast and round, a place of bliss
   In the Pourlieues of Heav'n, and therein plac't
   A race of upstart Creatures, to supply
   Perhaps our vacant room, though more remov'd,
   Least Heav'n surcharg'd with potent multitude
   Might hap to move new broiles: Be this or aught
   Then this more secret now design'd, I haste
   To know, and this once known, shall soon return,
   And bring ye to the place where Thou and Death
   Shall dwell at ease, and up and down unseen
   Wing silently the buxom Air, imbalm'd
   With odours; there ye shall be fed and fill'd
   Immeasurably, all things shall be your prey.
   He ceas'd, for both seemd highly pleasd, and Death
   Grinnd horrible a gastly smile, to hear
   His famine should be fill'd, and blest his mawe
   Destin'd to that good hour: no less rejoyc'd
   His mother bad, and thus bespake her Sire.
 
     The key of this infernal Pit by due,
   And by command of Heav'ns all-powerful King
   I keep, by him forbidden to unlock
   These Adamantine Gates; against all force
   Death ready stands to interpose his dart,
   Fearless to be o'rematcht by living might.
   But what ow I to his commands above
   Who hates me, and hath hither thrust me down
   Into this gloom of TARTARUS profound,
   To sit in hateful Office here confin'd,
   Inhabitant of Heav'n, and heav'nlie-born,
   Here in perpetual agonie and pain,
   With terrors and with clamors compasst round
   Of mine own brood, that on my bowels feed:
   Thou art my Father, thou my Author, thou
   My being gav'st me; whom should I obey
   But thee, whom follow? thou wilt bring me soon
   To that new world of light and bliss, among
   The Gods who live at ease, where I shall Reign
   At thy right hand voluptuous, as beseems
   Thy daughter and thy darling, without end.
 
     Thus saying, from her side the fatal Key,
   Sad instrument of all our woe, she took;
   And towards the Gate rouling her bestial train,
   Forthwith the huge Porcullis high up drew,
   Which but her self not all the STYGIAN powers
   Could once have mov'd; then in the key-hole turns
   Th' intricate wards, and every Bolt and Bar
   Of massie Iron or sollid Rock with ease
   Unfast'ns: on a sudden op'n flie
   With impetuous recoile and jarring sound
   Th' infernal dores, and on thir hinges great
   Harsh Thunder, that the lowest bottom shook
   Of EREBUS.  She op'nd, but to shut
   Excel'd her power; the Gates wide op'n stood,
   That with extended wings a Bannerd Host
   Under spread Ensigns marching might pass through
   With Horse and Chariots rankt in loose array;
   So wide they stood, and like a Furnace mouth
   Cast forth redounding smoak and ruddy flame.
   Before thir eyes in sudden view appear
   The secrets of the hoarie deep, a dark
   Illimitable Ocean without bound,
   Without dimension, where length, breadth, and highth,
   And time and place are lost; where eldest Night
   And CHAOS, Ancestors of Nature, hold
   Eternal ANARCHIE, amidst the noise
   Of endless warrs and by confusion stand.
   For hot, cold, moist, and dry, four Champions fierce
   Strive here for Maistrie, and to Battel bring
   Thir embryon Atoms; they around the flag
   Of each his faction, in thir several Clanns,
   Light-arm'd or heavy, sharp, smooth, swift or slow,
   Swarm populous, unnumber'd as the Sands
   Of BARCA or CYRENE'S torrid soil,
   Levied to side with warring Winds, and poise
   Thir lighter wings.  To whom these most adhere,
   Hee rules a moment; CHAOS Umpire sits,
   And by decision more imbroiles the fray
   By which he Reigns: next him high Arbiter
   CHANCE governs all.  Into this wilde Abyss,
   The Womb of nature and perhaps her Grave,
   Of neither Sea, nor Shore, nor Air, nor Fire,
   But all these in thir pregnant causes mixt
   Confus'dly, and which thus must ever fight,
   Unless th' Almighty Maker them ordain
   His dark materials to create more Worlds,
   Into this wilde Abyss the warie fiend
   Stood on the brink of Hell and look'd a while,
   Pondering his Voyage; for no narrow frith
   He had to cross.  Nor was his eare less peal'd
   With noises loud and ruinous (to compare
   Great things with small) then when BELLONA storms,
   With all her battering Engines bent to rase
   Som Capital City, or less then if this frame
   Of Heav'n were falling, and these Elements
   In mutinie had from her Axle torn
   The stedfast Earth.  At last his Sail-broad Vannes
   He spreads for flight, and in the surging smoak
   Uplifted spurns the ground, thence many a League
   As in a cloudy Chair ascending rides
   Audacious, but that seat soon failing, meets
   A vast vacuitie: all unawares
   Fluttring his pennons vain plumb down he drops
   Ten thousand fadom deep, and to this hour
   Down had been falling, had not by ill chance
   The strong rebuff of som tumultuous cloud
   Instinct with Fire and Nitre hurried him
   As many miles aloft: that furie stay'd,
   Quencht in a Boggie SYRTIS, neither Sea,
   Nor good dry Land: nigh founderd on he fares,
   Treading the crude consistence, half on foot,
   Half flying; behoves him now both Oare and Saile.
   As when a Gryfon through the Wilderness
   With winged course ore Hill or moarie Dale,
   Pursues the ARIMASPIAN, who by stelth
   Had from his wakeful custody purloind
   The guarded Gold: So eagerly the fiend
   Ore bog or steep, through strait, rough, dense, or rare,
   With head, hands, wings, or feet pursues his way,
   And swims or sinks, or wades, or creeps, or flyes:
   At length a universal hubbub wilde
   Of stunning sounds and voices all confus'd
   Born through the hollow dark assaults his eare
   With loudest vehemence: thither he plyes,
   Undaunted to meet there what ever power
   Or Spirit of the nethermost Abyss
   Might in that noise reside, of whom to ask
   Which way the neerest coast of darkness lyes
   Bordering on light; when strait behold the Throne
   Of CHAOS, and his dark Pavilion spread
   Wide on the wasteful Deep; with him Enthron'd
   Sat Sable-vested Night, eldest of things,
   The consort of his Reign; and by them stood
   ORCUS and ADES, and the dreaded name
   Of DEMOGORGON; Rumor next and Chance,
   And Tumult and Confusion all imbroild,
   And Discord with a thousand various mouths.
 
     T' whom SATAN turning boldly, thus.  Ye Powers
   And Spirits of this nethermost Abyss,
   CHAOS and ANCIENT NIGHT, I come no Spie,
   With purpose to explore or to disturb
   The secrets of your Realm, but by constraint
   Wandring this darksome desart, as my way
   Lies through your spacious Empire up to light,
   Alone, and without guide, half lost, I seek
   What readiest path leads where your gloomie bounds
   Confine with Heav'n; or if som other place
   From your Dominion won, th' Ethereal King
   Possesses lately, thither to arrive
   I travel this profound, direct my course;
   Directed, no mean recompence it brings
   To your behoof, if I that Region lost,
   All usurpation thence expell'd, reduce
   To her original darkness and your sway
   (Which is my present journey) and once more
   Erect the Standerd there of ANCIENT NIGHT;
   Yours be th' advantage all, mine the revenge.
 
     Thus SATAN; and him thus the Anarch old
   With faultring speech and visage incompos'd
   Answer'd.  I know thee, stranger, who thou art,
   That mighty leading Angel, who of late
   Made head against Heav'ns King, though overthrown.
   I saw and heard, for such a numerous host
   Fled not in silence through the frighted deep
   With ruin upon ruin, rout on rout,
   Confusion worse confounded; and Heav'n Gates
   Pourd out by millions her victorious Bands
   Pursuing.  I upon my Frontieres here
   Keep residence; if all I can will serve,
   That little which is left so to defend
   Encroacht on still through our intestine broiles
   Weakning the Scepter of old Night: first Hell
   Your dungeon stretching far and wide beneath;
   Now lately Heaven and Earth, another World
   Hung ore my Realm, link'd in a golden Chain
   To that side Heav'n from whence your Legions fell:
   If that way be your walk, you have not farr;
   So much the neerer danger; goe and speed;
   Havock and spoil and ruin are my gain.
 
     He ceas'd; and SATAN staid not to reply,
   But glad that now his Sea should find a shore,
   With fresh alacritie and force renew'd
   Springs upward like a Pyramid of fire
   Into the wilde expanse, and through the shock
   Of fighting Elements, on all sides round
   Environ'd wins his way; harder beset
   And more endanger'd, then when ARGO pass'd
   Through BOSPORUS betwixt the justling Rocks:
   Or when ULYSSES on the Larbord shunnd
   CHARYBDIS, and by th' other whirlpool steard.
   So he with difficulty and labour hard
   Mov'd on, with difficulty and labour hee;
   But hee once past, soon after when man fell,
   Strange alteration!  Sin and Death amain
   Following his track, such was the will of Heav'n,
   Pav'd after him a broad and beat'n way
   Over the dark Abyss, whose boiling Gulf
   Tamely endur'd a Bridge of wondrous length
   From Hell continu'd reaching th' utmost Orbe
   Of this frail World; by which the Spirits perverse
   With easie intercourse pass to and fro
   To tempt or punish mortals, except whom
   God and good Angels guard by special grace.
   But now at last the sacred influence
   Of light appears, and from the walls of Heav'n
   Shoots farr into the bosom of dim Night
   A glimmering dawn; here Nature first begins
   Her fardest verge, and CHAOS to retire
   As from her outmost works a brok'n foe
   With tumult less and with less hostile din,
   That SATAN with less toil, and now with ease
   Wafts on the calmer wave by dubious light
   And like a weather-beaten Vessel holds
   Gladly the Port, though Shrouds and Tackle torn;
   Or in the emptier waste, resembling Air,
   Weighs his spread wings, at leasure to behold
   Farr off th' Empyreal Heav'n, extended wide
   In circuit, undetermind square or round,
   With Opal Towrs and Battlements adorn'd
   Of living Saphire, once his native Seat;
   And fast by hanging in a golden Chain
   This pendant world, in bigness as a Starr
   Of smallest Magnitude close by the Moon.
   Thither full fraught with mischievous revenge,
   Accurst, and in a cursed hour he hies.
 
       THE END OF THE SECOND BOOK.
 
 
   PARADISE LOST
 
   BOOK III
 
 
     Hail holy light, ofspring of Heav'n first-born,
   Or of th' Eternal Coeternal beam
   May I express thee unblam'd? since God is light,
   And never but in unapproached light
   Dwelt from Eternitie, dwelt then in thee,
   Bright effluence of bright essence increate.
   Or hear'st thou rather pure Ethereal stream,
   Whose Fountain who shall tell? before the Sun,
   Before the Heavens thou wert, and at the voice
   Of God, as with a Mantle didst invest
   The rising world of waters dark and deep,
   Won from the void and formless infinite.
   Thee I re-visit now with bolder wing,
   Escap't the STYGIAN Pool, though long detain'd
   In that obscure sojourn, while in my flight
   Through utter and through middle darkness borne
   With other notes then to th' ORPHEAN Lyre
   I sung of CHAOS and ETERNAL NIGHT,
   Taught by the heav'nly Muse to venture down
   The dark descent, and up to reascend,
   Though hard and rare: thee I revisit safe,
   And feel thy sovran vital Lamp; but thou
   Revisit'st not these eyes, that rowle in vain
   To find thy piercing ray, and find no dawn;
   So thick a drop serene hath quencht thir Orbs,
   Or dim suffusion veild.  Yet not the more
   Cease I to wander where the Muses haunt
   Cleer Spring, or shadie Grove, or Sunnie Hill,
   Smit with the love of sacred song; but chief
   Thee SION and the flowrie Brooks beneath
   That wash thy hallowd feet, and warbling flow,
   Nightly I visit: nor somtimes forget
   Those other two equal'd with me in Fate,
   So were I equal'd with them in renown,
   Blind THAMYRIS and blind MAEONIDES,
   And TIRESIAS and PHINEUS Prophets old.
   Then feed on thoughts, that voluntarie move
   Harmonious numbers; as the wakeful Bird
   Sings darkling, and in shadiest Covert hid
   Tunes her nocturnal Note.  Thus with the Year
   Seasons return, but not to me returns
   Day, or the sweet approach of Ev'n or Morn,
   Or sight of vernal bloom, or Summers Rose,
   Or flocks, or herds, or human face divine;
   But cloud in stead, and ever-during dark
   Surrounds me, from the chearful waies of men
   Cut off, and for the book of knowledg fair
   Presented with a Universal blanc
   Of Natures works to mee expung'd and ras'd,
   And wisdome at one entrance quite shut out.
   So much the rather thou Celestial light
   Shine inward, and the mind through all her powers
   Irradiate, there plant eyes, all mist from thence
   Purge and disperse, that I may see and tell
   Of things invisible to mortal sight.
 
     Now had the Almighty Father from above,
   From the pure Empyrean where he sits
   High Thron'd above all highth, bent down his eye,
   His own works and their works at once to view:
   About him all the Sanctities of Heaven
   Stood thick as Starrs, and from his sight receiv'd
   Beatitude past utterance; on his right
   The radiant image of his Glory sat,
   His onely Son; On Earth he first beheld
   Our two first Parents, yet the onely two
   Of mankind, in the happie Garden plac't,
   Reaping immortal fruits of joy and love,
   Uninterrupted joy, unrivald love
   In blissful solitude; he then survey'd
   Hell and the Gulf between, and SATAN there
   Coasting the wall of Heav'n on this side Night
   In the dun Air sublime, and ready now
   To stoop with wearied wings, and willing feet
   On the bare outside of this World, that seem'd
   Firm land imbosom'd without Firmament,
   Uncertain which, in Ocean or in Air.
   Him God beholding from his prospect high,
   Wherein past, present, future he beholds,
   Thus to his onely Son foreseeing spake.
 
     Onely begotten Son, seest thou what rage
   Transports our adversarie, whom no bounds
   Prescrib'd, no barrs of Hell, nor all the chains
   Heapt on him there, nor yet the main Abyss
   Wide interrupt can hold; so bent he seems
   On desperat revenge, that shall redound
   Upon his own rebellious head.  And now
   Through all restraint broke loose he wings his way
   Not farr off Heav'n, in the Precincts of light,
   Directly towards the new created World,
   And Man there plac't, with purpose to assay
   If him by force he can destroy, or worse,
   By som false guile pervert; and shall pervert;
   For man will heark'n to his glozing lyes,
   And easily transgress the sole Command,
   Sole pledge of his obedience: So will fall
   Hee and his faithless Progenie: whose fault?
   Whose but his own? ingrate, he had of mee
   All he could have; I made him just and right,
   Sufficient to have stood, though free to fall.
   Such I created all th' Ethereal Powers
   And Spirits, both them who stood & them who faild;
   Freely they stood who stood, and fell who fell.
   Not free, what proof could they have givn sincere
   Of true allegiance, constant Faith or Love,
   Where onely what they needs must do, appeard,
   Not what they would? what praise could they receive?
   What pleasure I from such obedience paid,
   When Will and Reason (Reason also is choice)
   Useless and vain, of freedom both despoild,
   Made passive both, had servd necessitie,
   Not mee.  They therefore as to right belongd,
   So were created, nor can justly accuse
   Thir maker, or thir making, or thir Fate;
   As if Predestination over-rul'd
   Thir will, dispos'd by absolute Decree
   Or high foreknowledge; they themselves decreed
   Thir own revolt, not I: if I foreknew,
   Foreknowledge had no influence on their fault,
   Which had no less prov'd certain unforeknown.
   So without least impulse or shadow of Fate,
   Or aught by me immutablie foreseen,
   They trespass, Authors to themselves in all
   Both what they judge and what they choose; for so
   I formd them free, and free they must remain,
   Till they enthrall themselves: I else must change
   Thir nature, and revoke the high Decree
   Unchangeable, Eternal, which ordain'd
   Thir freedom, they themselves ordain'd thir fall.
   The first sort by thir own suggestion fell,
   Self-tempted, self-deprav'd: Man falls deceiv'd
   By the other first: Man therefore shall find grace,
   The other none: in Mercy and Justice both,
   Through Heav'n and Earth, so shall my glorie excel,
   But Mercy first and last shall brightest shine.
 
     Thus while God spake, ambrosial fragrance fill'd
   All Heav'n, and in the blessed Spirits elect
   Sense of new joy ineffable diffus'd:
   Beyond compare the Son of God was seen
   Most glorious, in him all his Father shon
   Substantially express'd, and in his face
   Divine compassion visibly appeerd,
   Love without end, and without measure Grace,
   Which uttering thus he to his Father spake.
 
     O Father, gracious was that word which clos'd
   Thy sovran sentence, that Man should find grace;
   For which both Heav'n and Earth shall high extoll
   Thy praises, with th' innumerable sound
   Of Hymns and sacred Songs, wherewith thy Throne
   Encompass'd shall resound thee ever blest.
   For should Man finally be lost, should Man
   Thy creature late so lov'd, thy youngest Son
   Fall circumvented thus by fraud, though joynd
   With his own folly? that be from thee farr,
   That farr be from thee, Father, who art Judge
   Of all things made, and judgest onely right.
   Or shall the Adversarie thus obtain
   His end, and frustrate thine, shall he fulfill
   His malice, and thy goodness bring to naught,
   Or proud return though to his heavier doom,
   Yet with revenge accomplish't and to Hell
   Draw after him the whole Race of mankind,
   By him corrupted? or wilt thou thy self
   Abolish thy Creation, and unmake,
   For him, what for thy glorie thou hast made?
   So should thy goodness and thy greatness both
   Be questiond and blaspheam'd without defence.
 
     To whom the great Creatour thus reply'd.
   O Son, in whom my Soul hath chief delight,
   Son of my bosom, Son who art alone
   My word, my wisdom, and effectual might,
   All hast thou spok'n as my thoughts are, all
   As my Eternal purpose hath decreed:
   Man shall not quite be lost, but sav'd who will,
   Yet not of will in him, but grace in me
   Freely voutsaft; once more I will renew
   His lapsed powers, though forfeit and enthrall'd
   By sin to foul exorbitant desires;
   Upheld by me, yet once more he shall stand
   On even ground against his mortal foe,
   By me upheld, that he may know how frail
   His fall'n condition is, and to me ow
   All his deliv'rance, and to none but me.
   Some I have chosen of peculiar grace
   Elect above the rest; so is my will:
   The rest shall hear me call, and oft be warnd
   Thir sinful state, and to appease betimes
   Th' incensed Deitie, while offerd grace
   Invites; for I will cleer thir senses dark,
   What may suffice, and soft'n stonie hearts
   To pray, repent, and bring obedience due.
   To prayer, repentance, and obedience due,
   Though but endevord with sincere intent,
   Mine eare shall not be slow, mine eye not shut.
   And I will place within them as a guide
   My Umpire CONSCIENCE, whom if they will hear,
   Light after light well us'd they shall attain,
   And to the end persisting, safe arrive.
   This my long sufferance and my day of grace
   They who neglect and scorn, shall never taste;
   But hard be hard'nd, blind be blinded more,
   That they may stumble on, and deeper fall;
   And none but such from mercy I exclude.
   But yet all is not don; Man disobeying,
   Disloyal breaks his fealtie, and sinns
   Against the high Supremacie of Heav'n,
   Affecting God-head, and so loosing all,
   To expiate his Treason hath naught left,
   But to destruction sacred and devote,
   He with his whole posteritie must die,
   Die hee or Justice must; unless for him
   Som other able, and as willing, pay
   The rigid satisfaction, death for death.
   Say Heav'nly Powers, where shall we find such love,
   Which of ye will be mortal to redeem
   Mans mortal crime, and just th' unjust to save,
   Dwels in all Heaven charitie so deare?
 
     He ask'd, but all the Heav'nly Quire stood mute,
   And silence was in Heav'n: on mans behalf
   Patron or Intercessor none appeerd,
   Much less that durst upon his own head draw
   The deadly forfeiture, and ransom set.
   And now without redemption all mankind
   Must have bin lost, adjudg'd to Death and Hell
   By doom severe, had not the Son of God,
   In whom the fulness dwels of love divine,
   His dearest mediation thus renewd.
 
     Father, thy word is past, man shall find grace;
   And shall grace not find means, that finds her way,
   The speediest of thy winged messengers,
   To visit all thy creatures, and to all
   Comes unprevented, unimplor'd, unsought,
   Happie for man, so coming; he her aide
   Can never seek, once dead in sins and lost;
   Attonement for himself or offering meet,
   Indebted and undon, hath none to bring:
   Behold mee then, mee for him, life for life
   I offer, on mee let thine anger fall;
   Account mee man; I for his sake will leave
   Thy bosom, and this glorie next to thee
   Freely put off, and for him lastly die
   Well pleas'd, on me let Death wreck all his rage;
   Under his gloomie power I shall not long
   Lie vanquisht; thou hast givn me to possess
   Life in my self for ever, by thee I live,
   Though now to Death I yeild, and am his due
   All that of me can die, yet that debt paid,
   Thou wilt not leave me in the loathsom grave
   His prey, nor suffer my unspotted Soule
   For ever with corruption there to dwell;
   But I shall rise Victorious, and subdue
   My Vanquisher, spoild of his vanted spoile;
   Death his deaths wound shall then receive, & stoop
   Inglorious, of his mortall sting disarm'd.
   I through the ample Air in Triumph high
   Shall lead Hell Captive maugre Hell, and show
   The powers of darkness bound.  Thou at the sight
   Pleas'd, out of Heaven shalt look down and smile,
   While by thee rais'd I ruin all my Foes,
   Death last, and with his Carcass glut the Grave:
   Then with the multitude of my redeemd
   Shall enter Heaven long absent, and returne,
   Father, to see thy face, wherein no cloud
   Of anger shall remain, but peace assur'd,
   And reconcilement; wrauth shall be no more
   Thenceforth, but in thy presence Joy entire.
 
     His words here ended, but his meek aspect
   Silent yet spake, and breath'd immortal love
   To mortal men, above which only shon
   Filial obedience: as a sacrifice
   Glad to be offer'd, he attends the will
   Of his great Father.  Admiration seis'd
   All Heav'n, what this might mean, & whither tend
   Wondring; but soon th' Almighty thus reply'd:
 
     O thou in Heav'n and Earth the only peace
   Found out for mankind under wrauth, O thou
   My sole complacence! well thou know'st how dear,
   To me are all my works, nor Man the least
   Though last created, that for him I spare
   Thee from my bosom and right hand, to save,
   By loosing thee a while, the whole Race lost.
   Thou therefore whom thou only canst redeeme,
   Thir Nature also to thy Nature joyne;
   And be thy self Man among men on Earth,
   Made flesh, when time shall be, of Virgin seed,
   By wondrous birth: Be thou in ADAMS room
   The Head of all mankind, though ADAMS Son.
   As in him perish all men, so in thee
   As from a second root shall be restor'd,
   As many as are restor'd, without thee none.
   His crime makes guiltie all his Sons, thy merit
   Imputed shall absolve them who renounce
   Thir own both righteous and unrighteous deeds,
   And live in thee transplanted, and from thee
   Receive new life.  So Man, as is most just,
   Shall satisfie for Man, be judg'd and die,
   And dying rise, and rising with him raise
   His Brethren, ransomd with his own dear life.
   So Heav'nly love shal outdoo Hellish hate,
   Giving to death, and dying to redeeme,
   So dearly to redeem what Hellish hate
   So easily destroy'd, and still destroyes
   In those who, when they may, accept not grace.
   Nor shalt thou by descending to assume
   Mans Nature, less'n or degrade thine owne.
   Because thou hast, though Thron'd in highest bliss
   Equal to God, and equally enjoying
   God-like fruition, quitted all to save
   A World from utter loss, and hast been found
   By Merit more then Birthright Son of God,
   Found worthiest to be so by being Good,
   Farr more then Great or High; because in thee
   Love hath abounded more then Glory abounds,
   Therefore thy Humiliation shall exalt
   With thee thy Manhood also to this Throne;
   Here shalt thou sit incarnate, here shalt Reigne
   Both God and Man, Son both of God and Man,
   Anointed universal King; all Power
   I give thee, reign for ever, and assume
   Thy Merits; under thee as Head Supream
   Thrones, Princedoms, Powers, Dominions I reduce:
   All knees to thee shall bow, of them that bide
   In Heaven, or Earth, or under Earth in Hell;
   When thou attended gloriously from Heav'n
   Shalt in the Skie appeer, and from thee send
   The summoning Arch-Angels to proclaime
   Thy dread Tribunal: forthwith from all Windes
   The living, and forthwith the cited dead
   Of all past Ages to the general Doom
   Shall hast'n, such a peal shall rouse thir sleep.
   Then all thy Saints assembl'd, thou shalt judge
   Bad men and Angels, they arraignd shall sink
   Beneath thy Sentence; Hell, her numbers full,
   Thenceforth shall be for ever shut.  Mean while
   The World shall burn, and from her ashes spring
   New Heav'n and Earth, wherein the just shall dwell
   And after all thir tribulations long
   See golden days, fruitful of golden deeds,
   With Joy and Love triumphing, and fair Truth.
   Then thou thy regal Scepter shalt lay by,
   For regal Scepter then no more shall need,
   God shall be All in All.  But all ye Gods,
   Adore him, who to compass all this dies,
   Adore the Son, and honour him as mee.
 
     No sooner had th' Almighty ceas't, but all
   The multitude of Angels with a shout
   Loud as from numbers without number, sweet
   As from blest voices, uttering joy, Heav'n rung
   With Jubilee, and loud Hosanna's fill'd
   Th' eternal Regions: lowly reverent
   Towards either Throne they bow, & to the ground
   With solemn adoration down they cast
   Thir Crowns inwove with Amarant and Gold,
   Immortal Amarant, a Flour which once
   In Paradise, fast by the Tree of Life
   Began to bloom, but soon for mans offence
   To Heav'n remov'd where first it grew, there grows,
   And flours aloft shading the Fount of Life,
   And where the river of Bliss through midst of Heavn
   Rowls o're ELISIAN Flours her Amber stream;
   With these that never fade the Spirits Elect
   Bind thir resplendent locks inwreath'd with beams,
   Now in loose Garlands thick thrown off, the bright
   Pavement that like a Sea of Jasper shon
   Impurpl'd with Celestial Roses smil'd.
   Then Crown'd again thir gold'n Harps they took,
   Harps ever tun'd, that glittering by their side
   Like Quivers hung, and with Praeamble sweet
   Of charming symphonie they introduce
   Thir sacred Song, and waken raptures high;
   No voice exempt, no voice but well could joine
   Melodious part, such concord is in Heav'n.
 
     Thee Father first they sung Omnipotent,
   Immutable, Immortal, Infinite,
   Eternal King; thee Author of all being,
   Fountain of Light, thy self invisible
   Amidst the glorious brightness where thou sit'st
   Thron'd inaccessible, but when thou shad'st
   The full blaze of thy beams, and through a cloud
   Drawn round about thee like a radiant Shrine,
   Dark with excessive bright thy skirts appeer,
   Yet dazle Heav'n, that brightest Seraphim
   Approach not, but with both wings veil thir eyes.
   Thee next they sang of all Creation first,
   Begotten Son, Divine Similitude,
   In whose conspicuous count'nance, without cloud
   Made visible, th' Almighty Father shines,
   Whom else no Creature can behold; on thee
   Impresst the effulgence of his Glorie abides,
   Transfus'd on thee his ample Spirit rests.
   Hee Heav'n of Heavens and all the Powers therein
   By thee created, and by thee threw down
   Th' aspiring Dominations: thou that day
   Thy Fathers dreadful Thunder didst not spare,
   Nor stop thy flaming Chariot wheels, that shook
   Heav'ns everlasting Frame, while o're the necks
   Thou drov'st of warring Angels disarraid.
   Back from pursuit thy Powers with loud acclaime
   Thee only extold, Son of thy Fathers might,
   To execute fierce vengeance on his foes,
   Not so on Man; him through their malice fall'n,
   Father of Mercie and Grace, thou didst not doome
   So strictly, but much more to pitie encline:
   No sooner did thy dear and onely Son
   Perceive thee purpos'd not to doom frail Man
   So strictly, but much more to pitie enclin'd,
   He to appease thy wrauth, and end the strife
   Of Mercy and Justice in thy face discern'd,
   Regardless of the Bliss wherein hee sat
   Second to thee, offerd himself to die
   For mans offence.  O unexampl'd love,
   Love no where to be found less then Divine!
   Hail Son of God, Saviour of Men, thy Name
   Shall be the copious matter of my Song
   Henceforth, and never shall my Harp thy praise
   Forget, nor from thy Fathers praise disjoine.
 
     Thus they in Heav'n, above the starry Sphear,
   Thir happie hours in joy and hymning spent.
   Mean while upon the firm opacous Globe
   Of this round World, whose first convex divides
   The luminous inferior Orbs, enclos'd
   From CHAOS and th' inroad of Darkness old,
   SATAN alighted walks: a Globe farr off
   It seem'd, now seems a boundless Continent
   Dark, waste, and wild, under the frown of Night
   Starless expos'd, and ever-threatning storms
   Of CHAOS blustring round, inclement skie;
   Save on that side which from the wall of Heav'n
   Though distant farr som small reflection gaines
   Of glimmering air less vext with tempest loud:
   Here walk'd the Fiend at large in spacious field.
   As when a Vultur on IMAUS bred,
   Whose snowie ridge the roving TARTAR bounds,
   Dislodging from a Region scarce of prey
   To gorge the flesh of Lambs or yeanling Kids
   On Hills where Flocks are fed, flies toward the Springs
   Of GANGES or HYDASPES, INDIAN streams;
   But in his way lights on the barren plaines
   Of SERICANA, where CHINESES drive
   With Sails and Wind thir canie Waggons light:
   So on this windie Sea of Land, the Fiend
   Walk'd up and down alone bent on his prey,
   Alone, for other Creature in this place
   Living or liveless to be found was none,
   None yet, but store hereafter from the earth
   Up hither like Aereal vapours flew
   Of all things transitorie and vain, when Sin
   With vanity had filld the works of men:
   Both all things vain, and all who in vain things
   Built thir fond hopes of Glorie or lasting fame,
   Or happiness in this or th' other life;
   All who have thir reward on Earth, the fruits
   Of painful Superstition and blind Zeal,
   Naught seeking but the praise of men, here find
   Fit retribution, emptie as thir deeds;
   All th' unaccomplisht works of Natures hand,
   Abortive, monstrous, or unkindly mixt,
   Dissolvd on earth, fleet hither, and in vain,
   Till final dissolution, wander here,
   Not in the neighbouring Moon, as some have dreamd;
   Those argent Fields more likely habitants,
   Translated Saints, or middle Spirits hold
   Betwixt th' Angelical and Human kinde:
   Hither of ill-joynd Sons and Daughters born
   First from the ancient World those Giants came
   With many a vain exploit, though then renownd:
   The builders next of BABEL on the Plain
   Of SENNAAR, and still with vain designe
   New BABELS, had they wherewithall, would build:
   Others came single; hee who to be deemd
   A God, leap'd fondly into AETNA flames,
   EMPEDOCLES, and hee who to enjoy
   PLATO'S ELYSIUM, leap'd into the Sea,
   CLEOMBROTUS, and many more too long,
   Embryo's and Idiots, Eremits and Friers
   White, Black and Grey, with all thir trumperie.
   Here Pilgrims roam, that stray'd so farr to seek
   In GOLGOTHA him dead, who lives in Heav'n;
   And they who to be sure of Paradise
   Dying put on the weeds of DOMINIC,
   Or in FRANCISCAN think to pass disguis'd;
   They pass the Planets seven, and pass the fixt,
   And that Crystalline Sphear whose ballance weighs
   The Trepidation talkt, and that first mov'd;
   And now Saint PETER at Heav'ns Wicket seems
   To wait them with his Keys, and now at foot
   Of Heav'ns ascent they lift thir Feet, when loe
   A violent cross wind from either Coast
   Blows them transverse ten thousand Leagues awry
   Into the devious Air; then might ye see
   Cowles, Hoods and Habits with thir wearers tost
   And flutterd into Raggs, then Reliques, Beads,
   Indulgences, Dispenses, Pardons, Bulls,
   The sport of Winds: all these upwhirld aloft
   Fly o're the backside of the World farr off
   Into a LIMBO large and broad, since calld
   The Paradise of Fools, to few unknown
   Long after, now unpeopl'd, and untrod;
   All this dark Globe the Fiend found as he pass'd,
   And long he wanderd, till at last a gleame
   Of dawning light turnd thither-ward in haste
   His travell'd steps; farr distant hee descries
   Ascending by degrees magnificent
   Up to the wall of Heaven a Structure high,
   At top whereof, but farr more rich appeerd
   The work as of a Kingly Palace Gate
   With Frontispice of Diamond and Gold
   Imbellisht, thick with sparkling orient Gemmes
   The Portal shon, inimitable on Earth
   By Model, or by shading Pencil drawn.
   The Stairs were such as whereon JACOB saw
   Angels ascending and descending, bands
   Of Guardians bright, when he from ESAU fled
   To PADAN-ARAM in the field of LUZ,
   Dreaming by night under the open Skie,
   And waking cri'd, This is the Gate of Heav'n.
   Each Stair mysteriously was meant, nor stood
   There alwaies, but drawn up to Heav'n somtimes
   Viewless, and underneath a bright Sea flow'd
   Of Jasper, or of liquid Pearle, whereon
   Who after came from Earth, sayling arriv'd,
   Wafted by Angels, or flew o're the Lake
   Rapt in a Chariot drawn by fiery Steeds.
   The Stairs were then let down, whether to dare
   The Fiend by easie ascent, or aggravate
   His sad exclusion from the dores of Bliss.
   Direct against which op'nd from beneath,
   Just o're the blissful seat of Paradise,
   A passage down to th' Earth, a passage wide,
   Wider by farr then that of after-times
   Over Mount SION, and, though that were large,
   Over the PROMIS'D LAND to God so dear,
   By which, to visit oft those happy Tribes,
   On high behests his Angels to and fro
   Pass'd frequent, and his eye with choice regard
   From PANEAS the fount of JORDANS flood
   To BEERSABA, where the HOLY LAND
   Borders on AEGYPT and the ARABIAN shoare;
   So wide the op'ning seemd, where bounds were set
   To darkness, such as bound the Ocean wave.
   SATAN from hence now on the lower stair
   That scal'd by steps of Gold to Heav'n Gate
   Looks down with wonder at the sudden view
   Of all this World at once.  As when a Scout
   Through dark and desart wayes with peril gone
   All night; at last by break of chearful dawne
   Obtains the brow of some high-climbing Hill,
   Which to his eye discovers unaware
   The goodly prospect of some forein land
   First-seen, or some renownd Metropolis
   With glistering Spires and Pinnacles adornd,
   Which now the Rising Sun guilds with his beams.
   Such wonder seis'd, though after Heaven seen,
   The Spirit maligne, but much more envy seis'd
   At sight of all this World beheld so faire.
   Round he surveys, and well might, where he stood
   So high above the circling Canopie
   Of Nights extended shade; from Eastern Point
   Of LIBRA to the fleecie Starr that bears
   ANDROMEDA farr off ATLANTICK Seas
   Beyond th' HORIZON; then from Pole to Pole
   He views in bredth, and without longer pause
   Down right into the Worlds first Region throws
   His flight precipitant, and windes with ease
   Through the pure marble Air his oblique way
   Amongst innumerable Starrs, that shon
   Stars distant, but nigh hand seemd other Worlds,
   Or other Worlds they seemd, or happy Iles,
   Like those HESPERIAN Gardens fam'd of old,
   Fortunate Fields, and Groves and flourie Vales,
   Thrice happy Iles, but who dwelt happy there
   He stayd not to enquire: above them all
   The golden Sun in splendor likest Heaven
   Allur'd his eye: Thither his course he bends
   Through the calm Firmament; but up or downe
   By center, or eccentric, hard to tell,
   Or Longitude, where the great Luminarie
   Alooff the vulgar Constellations thick,
   That from his Lordly eye keep distance due,
   Dispenses Light from farr; they as they move
   Thir Starry dance in numbers that compute
   Days, months, and years, towards his all-chearing Lamp
   Turn swift their various motions, or are turnd
   By his Magnetic beam, that gently warms
   The Univers, and to each inward part
   With gentle penetration, though unseen,
   Shoots invisible vertue even to the deep:
   So wondrously was set his Station bright.
   There lands the Fiend, a spot like which perhaps
   Astronomer in the Sun's lucent Orbe
   Through his glaz'd Optic Tube yet never saw.
   The place he found beyond expression bright,
   Compar'd with aught on Earth, Medal or Stone;
   Not all parts like, but all alike informd
   With radiant light, as glowing Iron with fire;
   If mettal, part seemd Gold, part Silver cleer;
   If stone, Carbuncle most or Chrysolite,
   Rubie or Topaz, to the Twelve that shon
   In AARONS Brest-plate, and a stone besides
   Imagind rather oft then elsewhere seen,
   That stone, or like to that which here below
   Philosophers in vain so long have sought,
   In vain, though by thir powerful Art they binde
   Volatil HERMES, and call up unbound
   In various shapes old PROTEUS from the Sea,
   Draind through a Limbec to his Native forme.
   What wonder then if fields and regions here
   Breathe forth ELIXIR pure, and Rivers run
   Potable Gold, when with one vertuous touch
   Th' Arch-chimic Sun so farr from us remote
   Produces with Terrestrial Humor mixt
   Here in the dark so many precious things
   Of colour glorious and effect so rare?
   Here matter new to gaze the Devil met
   Undazl'd, farr and wide his eye commands,
   For sight no obstacle found here, nor shade,
   But all Sun-shine, as when his Beams at Noon
   Culminate from th' AEQUATOR, as they now
   Shot upward still direct, whence no way round
   Shadow from body opaque can fall, and the Aire,
   No where so cleer, sharp'nd his visual ray
   To objects distant farr, whereby he soon
   Saw within kenn a glorious Angel stand,
   The same whom JOHN saw also in the Sun:
   His back was turnd, but not his brightness hid;
   Of beaming sunnie Raies, a golden tiar
   Circl'd his Head, nor less his Locks behind
   Illustrious on his Shoulders fledge with wings
   Lay waving round; on som great charge imploy'd
   Hee seemd, or fixt in cogitation deep.
   Glad was the Spirit impure as now in hope
   To find who might direct his wandring flight
   To Paradise the happie seat of Man,
   His journies end and our beginning woe.
   But first he casts to change his proper shape,
   Which else might work him danger or delay:
   And now a stripling Cherube he appeers,
   Not of the prime, yet such as in his face
   Youth smil'd Celestial, and to every Limb
   Sutable grace diffus'd, so well he feignd;
   Under a Coronet his flowing haire
   In curles on either cheek plaid, wings he wore
   Of many a colourd plume sprinkl'd with Gold,
   His habit fit for speed succinct, and held
   Before his decent steps a Silver wand.
   He drew not nigh unheard, the Angel bright,
   Ere he drew nigh, his radiant visage turnd,
   Admonisht by his eare, and strait was known
   Th' Arch-Angel URIEL, one of the seav'n
   Who in Gods presence, neerest to his Throne
   Stand ready at command, and are his Eyes
   That run through all the Heav'ns, or down to th' Earth
   Bear his swift errands over moist and dry,
   O're Sea and Land: him SATAN thus accostes;
 
     URIEL, for thou of those seav'n Spirits that stand
   In sight of God's high Throne, gloriously bright,
   The first art wont his great authentic will
   Interpreter through highest Heav'n to bring,
   Where all his Sons thy Embassie attend;
   And here art likeliest by supream decree
   Like honour to obtain, and as his Eye
   To visit oft this new Creation round;
   Unspeakable desire to see, and know
   All these his wondrous works, but chiefly Man,
   His chief delight and favour, him for whom
   All these his works so wondrous he ordaind,
   Hath brought me from the Quires of Cherubim
   Alone thus wandring.  Brightest Seraph tell
   In which of all these shining Orbes hath Man
   His fixed seat, or fixed seat hath none,
   But all these shining Orbes his choice to dwell;
   That I may find him, and with secret gaze,
   Or open admiration him behold
   On whom the great Creator hath bestowd
   Worlds, and on whom hath all these graces powrd;
   That both in him and all things, as is meet,
   The Universal Maker we may praise;
   Who justly hath drivn out his Rebell Foes
   To deepest Hell, and to repair that loss
   Created this new happie Race of Men
   To serve him better: wise are all his wayes.
 
     So spake the false dissembler unperceivd;
   For neither Man nor Angel can discern
   Hypocrisie, the only evil that walks
   Invisible, except to God alone,
   By his permissive will, through Heav'n and Earth:
   And oft though wisdom wake, suspicion sleeps
   At wisdoms Gate, and to simplicitie
   Resigns her charge, while goodness thinks no ill
   Where no ill seems: Which now for once beguil'd
   URIEL, though Regent of the Sun, and held
   The sharpest sighted Spirit of all in Heav'n;
   Who to the fraudulent Impostor foule
   In his uprightness answer thus returnd.
   Faire Angel, thy desire which tends to know
   The works of God, thereby to glorifie
   The great Work-Maister, leads to no excess
   That reaches blame, but rather merits praise
   The more it seems excess, that led thee hither
   From thy Empyreal Mansion thus alone,
   To witness with thine eyes what some perhaps
   Contented with report heare onely in heav'n:
   For wonderful indeed are all his works,
   Pleasant to know, and worthiest to be all
   Had in remembrance alwayes with delight;
   But what created mind can comprehend
   Thir number, or the wisdom infinite
   That brought them forth, but hid thir causes deep.
   I saw when at his Word the formless Mass,
   This worlds material mould, came to a heap:
   Confusion heard his voice, and wilde uproar
   Stood rul'd, stood vast infinitude confin'd;
   Till at his second bidding darkness fled,
   Light shon, and order from disorder sprung:
   Swift to thir several Quarters hasted then
   The cumbrous Elements, Earth, Flood, Aire, Fire,
   And this Ethereal quintessence of Heav'n
   Flew upward, spirited with various forms,
   That rowld orbicular, and turnd to Starrs
   Numberless, as thou seest, and how they move;
   Each had his place appointed, each his course,
   The rest in circuit walles this Universe.
   Look downward on that Globe whose hither side
   With light from hence, though but reflected, shines;
   That place is Earth the seat of Man, that light
   His day, which else as th' other Hemisphere
   Night would invade, but there the neighbouring Moon
   (So call that opposite fair Starr) her aide
   Timely interposes, and her monthly round
   Still ending, still renewing, through mid Heav'n;
   With borrowd light her countenance triform
   Hence fills and empties to enlighten th' Earth,
   And in her pale dominion checks the night.
   That spot to which I point is PARADISE,
   ADAMS abode, those loftie shades his Bowre.
   Thy way thou canst not miss, me mine requires.
 
     Thus said, he turnd, and SATAN bowing low,
   As to superior Spirits is wont in Heaven,
   Where honour due and reverence none neglects,
   Took leave, and toward the coast of Earth beneath,
   Down from th' Ecliptic, sped with hop'd success,
   Throws his steep flight with many an Aerie wheele,
   Nor staid, till on NIPHATES top he lights.
 
        THE END OF THE THIRD BOOK.
 
 
   PARADISE LOST
 
   BOOK IV.
 
   O For that warning voice, which he who saw
   Th' APOCALYPS, heard cry in Heaven aloud,
   Then when the Dragon, put to second rout,
   Came furious down to be reveng'd on men,
   WO TO THE INHABITANTS ON EARTH! that now,
   While time was, our first Parents had bin warnd
   The coming of thir secret foe, and scap'd
   Haply so scap'd his mortal snare; for now
   SATAN, now first inflam'd with rage, came down,
   The Tempter ere th' Accuser of man-kind,
   To wreck on innocent frail man his loss
   Of that first Battel, and his flight to Hell:
   Yet not rejoycing in his speed, though bold,
   Far off and fearless, nor with cause to boast,
   Begins his dire attempt, which nigh the birth
   Now rowling, boiles in his tumultuous brest,
   And like a devillish Engine back recoiles
   Upon himself; horror and doubt distract
   His troubl'd thoughts, and from the bottom stirr
   The Hell within him, for within him Hell
   He brings, and round about him, nor from Hell
   One step no more then from himself can fly
   By change of place: Now conscience wakes despair
   That slumberd, wakes the bitter memorie
   Of what he was, what is, and what must be
   Worse; of worse deeds worse sufferings must ensue.
   Sometimes towards EDEN which now in his view
   Lay pleasant, his grievd look he fixes sad,
   Sometimes towards Heav'n and the full-blazing Sun,
   Which now sat high in his Meridian Towre:
   Then much revolving, thus in sighs began.
 
     O thou that with surpassing Glory crownd,
   Look'st from thy sole Dominion like the God
   Of this new World; at whose sight all the Starrs
   Hide thir diminisht heads; to thee I call,
   But with no friendly voice, and add thy name
   O Sun, to tell thee how I hate thy beams
   That bring to my remembrance from what state
   I fell, how glorious once above thy Spheare;
   Till Pride and worse Ambition threw me down
   Warring in Heav'n against Heav'ns matchless King:
   Ah wherefore! he deservd no such return
   From me, whom he created what I was
   In that bright eminence, and with his good
   Upbraided none; nor was his service hard.
   What could be less then to afford him praise,
   The easiest recompence, and pay him thanks,
   How due! yet all his good prov'd ill in me,
   And wrought but malice; lifted up so high
   I sdeind subjection, and thought one step higher
   Would set me highest, and in a moment quit
   The debt immense of endless gratitude,
   So burthensome, still paying, still to ow;
   Forgetful what from him I still receivd,
   And understood not that a grateful mind
   By owing owes not, but still pays, at once
   Indebted and dischargd; what burden then?
   O had his powerful Destiny ordaind
   Me some inferiour Angel, I had stood
   Then happie; no unbounded hope had rais'd
   Ambition.  Yet why not? som other Power
   As great might have aspir'd, and me though mean
   Drawn to his part; but other Powers as great
   Fell not, but stand unshak'n, from within
   Or from without, to all temptations arm'd.
   Hadst thou the same free Will and Power to stand?
   Thou hadst: whom hast thou then or what to accuse,
   But Heav'ns free Love dealt equally to all?
   Be then his Love accurst, since love or hate,
   To me alike, it deals eternal woe.
   Nay curs'd be thou; since against his thy will
   Chose freely what it now so justly rues.
   Me miserable! which way shall I flie
   Infinite wrauth, and infinite despaire?
   Which way I flie is Hell; my self am Hell;
   And in the lowest deep a lower deep
   Still threatning to devour me opens wide,
   To which the Hell I suffer seems a Heav'n.
   O then at last relent: is there no place
   Left for Repentance, none for Pardon left?
   None left but by submission; and that word
   DISDAIN forbids me, and my dread of shame
   Among the spirits beneath, whom I seduc'd
   With other promises and other vaunts
   Then to submit, boasting I could subdue
   Th' Omnipotent.  Ay me, they little know
   How dearly I abide that boast so vaine,
   Under what torments inwardly I groane;
   While they adore me on the Throne of Hell,
   With Diadem and Scepter high advanc'd
   The lower still I fall, onely Supream
   In miserie; such joy Ambition findes.
   But say I could repent and could obtaine
   By Act of Grace my former state; how soon
   Would highth recal high thoughts, how soon unsay
   What feign'd submission swore: ease would recant
   Vows made in pain, as violent and void.
   For never can true reconcilement grow
   Where wounds of deadly hate have peirc'd so deep:
   Which would but lead me to a worse relapse
   And heavier fall: so should I purchase deare
   Short intermission bought with double smart.
   This knows my punisher; therefore as farr
   From granting hee, as I from begging peace:
   All hope excluded thus, behold in stead
   Of us out-cast, exil'd, his new delight,
   Mankind created, and for him this World.
   So farwel Hope, and with Hope farwel Fear,
   Farwel Remorse: all Good to me is lost;
   Evil be thou my Good; by thee at least
   Divided Empire with Heav'ns King I hold
   By thee, and more then half perhaps will reigne;
   As Man ere long, and this new World shall know.
 
     Thus while he spake, each passion dimm'd his face
   Thrice chang'd with pale, ire, envie and despair,
   Which marrd his borrow'd visage, and betraid
   Him counterfet, if any eye beheld.
   For heav'nly mindes from such distempers foule
   Are ever cleer.  Whereof hee soon aware,
   Each perturbation smooth'd with outward calme,
   Artificer of fraud; and was the first
   That practisd falshood under saintly shew,
   Deep malice to conceale, couch't with revenge:
   Yet not anough had practisd to deceive
   URIEL once warnd; whose eye pursu'd him down
   The way he went, and on th' ASSYRIAN mount
   Saw him disfigur'd, more then could befall
   Spirit of happie sort: his gestures fierce
   He markd and mad demeanour, then alone,
   As he suppos'd, all unobserv'd, unseen.
   So on he fares, and to the border comes
   Of EDEN, where delicious Paradise,
   Now nearer, Crowns with her enclosure green,
   As with a rural mound the champain head
   Of a steep wilderness, whose hairie sides
   With thicket overgrown, grottesque and wilde,
   Access deni'd; and over head up grew
   Insuperable highth of loftiest shade,
   Cedar, and Pine, and Firr, and branching Palm,
   A Silvan Scene, and as the ranks ascend
   Shade above shade, a woodie Theatre
   Of stateliest view.  Yet higher then thir tops
   The verdurous wall of Paradise up sprung:
   Which to our general Sire gave prospect large
   Into his neather Empire neighbouring round.
   And higher then that Wall a circling row
   Of goodliest Trees loaden with fairest Fruit,
   Blossoms and Fruits at once of golden hue
   Appeerd, with gay enameld colours mixt:
   On which the Sun more glad impress'd his beams
   Then in fair Evening Cloud, or humid Bow,
   When God hath showrd the earth; so lovely seemd
   That Lantskip: And of pure now purer aire
   Meets his approach, and to the heart inspires
   Vernal delight and joy, able to drive
   All sadness but despair: now gentle gales
   Fanning thir odoriferous wings dispense
   Native perfumes, and whisper whence they stole
   Those balmie spoiles.  As when to them who saile
   Beyond the CAPE OF HOPE, and now are past
   MOZAMBIC, off at Sea North-East windes blow
   SABEAN Odours from the spicie shoare
   Of ARABIE the blest, with such delay
   Well pleas'd they slack thir course, and many a League
   Cheard with the grateful smell old Ocean smiles.
   So entertaind those odorous sweets the Fiend
   Who came thir bane, though with them better pleas'd
   Then ASMODEUS with the fishie fume,
   That drove him, though enamourd, from the Spouse
   Of TOBITS Son, and with a vengeance sent
   From MEDIA post to AEGYPT, there fast bound.
 
     Now to th' ascent of that steep savage Hill
   SATAN had journied on, pensive and slow;
   But further way found none, so thick entwin'd,
   As one continu'd brake, the undergrowth
   Of shrubs and tangling bushes had perplext
   All path of Man or Beast that past that way:
   One Gate there onely was, and that look'd East
   On th' other side: which when th' arch-fellon saw
   Due entrance he disdaind, and in contempt,
   At one slight bound high overleap'd all bound
   Of Hill or highest Wall, and sheer within
   Lights on his feet.  As when a prowling Wolfe,
   Whom hunger drives to seek new haunt for prey,
   Watching where Shepherds pen thir Flocks at eeve
   In hurdl'd Cotes amid the field secure,
   Leaps o're the fence with ease into the Fould:
   Or as a Thief bent to unhoord the cash
   Of some rich Burgher, whose substantial dores,
   Cross-barrd and bolted fast, fear no assault,
   In at the window climbes, or o're the tiles;
   So clomb this first grand Thief into Gods Fould:
   So since into his Church lewd Hirelings climbe.
   Thence up he flew, and on the Tree of Life,
   The middle Tree and highest there that grew,
   Sat like a Cormorant; yet not true Life
   Thereby regaind, but sat devising Death
   To them who liv'd; nor on the vertue thought
   Of that life-giving Plant, but only us'd
   For prospect, what well us'd had bin the pledge
   Of immortalitie.  So little knows
   Any, but God alone, to value right
   The good before him, but perverts best things
   To worst abuse, or to thir meanest use.
   Beneath him with new wonder now he views
   To all delight of human sense expos'd
   In narrow room Natures whole wealth, yea more,
   A Heaven on Earth, for blissful Paradise
   Of God the Garden was, by him in the East
   Of EDEN planted; EDEN stretchd her Line
   From AURAN Eastward to the Royal Towrs
   Of great SELEUCIA, built by GRECIAN Kings,
   Or where the Sons of EDEN long before
   Dwelt in TELASSAR: in this pleasant soile
   His farr more pleasant Garden God ordaind;
   Out of the fertil ground he caus'd to grow
   All Trees of noblest kind for sight, smell, taste;
   And all amid them stood the Tree of Life,
   High eminent, blooming Ambrosial Fruit
   Of vegetable Gold; and next to Life
   Our Death the Tree of Knowledge grew fast by,
   Knowledge of Good bought dear by knowing ill.
   Southward through EDEN went a River large,
   Nor chang'd his course, but through the shaggie hill
   Pass'd underneath ingulft, for God had thrown
   That Mountain as his Garden mould high rais'd
   Upon the rapid current, which through veins
   Of porous Earth with kindly thirst up drawn,
   Rose a fresh Fountain, and with many a rill
   Waterd the Garden; thence united fell
   Down the steep glade, and met the neather Flood,
   Which from his darksom passage now appeers,
   And now divided into four main Streams,
   Runs divers, wandring many a famous Realme
   And Country whereof here needs no account,
   But rather to tell how, if Art could tell,
   How from that Saphire Fount the crisped Brooks,
   Rowling on Orient Pearl and sands of Gold,
   With mazie error under pendant shades
   Ran Nectar, visiting each plant, and fed
   Flours worthy of Paradise which not nice Art
   In Beds and curious Knots, but Nature boon
   Powrd forth profuse on Hill and Dale and Plaine,
   Both where the morning Sun first warmly smote
   The open field, and where the unpierc't shade
   Imbround the noontide Bowrs: Thus was this place,
   A happy rural seat of various view;
   Groves whose rich Trees wept odorous Gumms and Balme,
   Others whose fruit burnisht with Golden Rinde
   Hung amiable, HESPERIAN Fables true,
   If true, here onely, and of delicious taste:
   Betwixt them Lawns, or level Downs, and Flocks
   Grasing the tender herb, were interpos'd,
   Or palmie hilloc, or the flourie lap
   Of som irriguous Valley spread her store,
   Flours of all hue, and without Thorn the Rose:
   Another side, umbrageous Grots and Caves
   Of coole recess, o're which the mantling Vine
   Layes forth her purple Grape, and gently creeps
   Luxuriant; mean while murmuring waters fall
   Down the slope hills, disperst, or in a Lake,
   That to the fringed Bank with Myrtle crownd,
   Her chrystall mirror holds, unite thir streams.
   The Birds thir quire apply; aires, vernal aires,
   Breathing the smell of field and grove, attune
   The trembling leaves, while Universal PAN
   Knit with the GRACES and the HOURS in dance
   Led on th' Eternal Spring.  Not that faire field
   Of ENNA, where PROSERPIN gathring flours
   Her self a fairer Floure by gloomie DIS
   Was gatherd, which cost CERES all that pain
   To seek her through the world; nor that sweet Grove
   Of DAPHNE by ORONTES, and th' inspir'd
   CASTALIAN Spring might with this Paradise
   Of EDEN strive; nor that NYSEIAN Ile
   Girt with the River TRITON, where old CHAM,
   Whom Gentiles AMMON call and LIBYAN JOVE,
   Hid AMALTHEA and her Florid Son
   Young BACCHUS from his Stepdame RHEA'S eye;
   Nor where ABASSIN Kings thir issue Guard,
   Mount AMARA, though this by som suppos'd
   True Paradise under the ETHIOP Line
   By NILUS head, enclos'd with shining Rock,
   A whole dayes journey high, but wide remote
   From this ASSYRIAN Garden, where the Fiend
   Saw undelighted all delight, all kind
   Of living Creatures new to sight and strange:
   Two of far nobler shape erect and tall,
   Godlike erect, with native Honour clad
   In naked Majestie seemd Lords of all,
   And worthie seemd, for in thir looks Divine
   The image of thir glorious Maker shon,
   Truth, Wisdome, Sanctitude severe and pure,
   Severe, but in true filial freedom plac't;
   Whence true autoritie in men; though both
   Not equal, as thir sex not equal seemd;
   For contemplation hee and valour formd,
   For softness shee and sweet attractive Grace,
   Hee for God only, shee for God in him:
   His fair large Front and Eye sublime declar'd
   Absolute rule; and Hyacinthin Locks
   Round from his parted forelock manly hung
   Clustring, but not beneath his shoulders broad:
   Shee as a vail down to the slender waste
   Her unadorned golden tresses wore
   Dissheveld, but in wanton ringlets wav'd
   As the Vine curles her tendrils, which impli'd
   Subjection, but requir'd with gentle sway,
   And by her yeilded, by him best receivd,
   Yeilded with coy submission, modest pride,
   And sweet reluctant amorous delay.
   Nor those mysterious parts were then conceald,
   Then was not guiltie shame, dishonest shame
   Of natures works, honor dishonorable,
   Sin-bred, how have ye troubl'd all mankind
   With shews instead, meer shews of seeming pure,
   And banisht from mans life his happiest life,
   Simplicitie and spotless innocence.
   So passd they naked on, nor shund the sight
   Of God or Angel, for they thought no ill:
   So hand in hand they passd, the lovliest pair
   That ever since in loves imbraces met,
   ADAM the goodliest man of men since borne
   His Sons, the fairest of her Daughters EVE.
   Under a tuft of shade that on a green
   Stood whispering soft, by a fresh Fountain side
   They sat them down, and after no more toil
   Of thir sweet Gardning labour then suffic'd
   To recommend coole ZEPHYR, and made ease
   More easie, wholsom thirst and appetite
   More grateful, to thir Supper Fruits they fell,
   Nectarine Fruits which the compliant boughes
   Yeilded them, side-long as they sat recline
   On the soft downie Bank damaskt with flours:
   The savourie pulp they chew, and in the rinde
   Still as they thirsted scoop the brimming stream;
   Nor gentle purpose, nor endearing smiles
   Wanted, nor youthful dalliance as beseems
   Fair couple, linkt in happie nuptial League,
   Alone as they.  About them frisking playd
   All Beasts of th' Earth, since wilde, and of all chase
   In Wood or Wilderness, Forrest or Den;
   Sporting the Lion rampd, and in his paw
   Dandl'd the Kid; Bears, Tygers, Ounces, Pards
   Gambold before them, th' unwieldy Elephant
   To make them mirth us'd all his might, & wreathd
   His Lithe Proboscis; close the Serpent sly
   Insinuating, wove with Gordian twine
   His breaded train, and of his fatal guile
   Gave proof unheeded; others on the grass
   Coucht, and now fild with pasture gazing sat,
   Or Bedward ruminating: for the Sun
   Declin'd was hasting now with prone carreer
   To th' Ocean Iles, and in th' ascending Scale
   Of Heav'n the Starrs that usher Evening rose:
   When SATAN still in gaze, as first he stood,
   Scarce thus at length faild speech recoverd sad.
 
     O Hell! what doe mine eyes with grief behold,
   Into our room of bliss thus high advanc't
   Creatures of other mould, earth-born perhaps,
   Not Spirits, yet to heav'nly Spirits bright
   Little inferior; whom my thoughts pursue
   With wonder, and could love, so lively shines
   In them Divine resemblance, and such grace
   The hand that formd them on thir shape hath pourd.
   Ah gentle pair, yee little think how nigh
   Your change approaches, when all these delights
   Will vanish and deliver ye to woe,
   More woe, the more your taste is now of joy;
   Happie, but for so happie ill secur'd
   Long to continue, and this high seat your Heav'n
   Ill fenc't for Heav'n to keep out such a foe
   As now is enterd; yet no purpos'd foe
   To you whom I could pittie thus forlorne
   Though I unpittied: League with you I seek,
   And mutual amitie so streight, so close,
   That I with you must dwell, or you with me
   Henceforth; my dwelling haply may not please
   Like this fair Paradise, your sense, yet such
   Accept your Makers work; he gave it me,
   Which I as freely give; Hell shall unfould,
   To entertain you two, her widest Gates,
   And send forth all her Kings; there will be room,
   Not like these narrow limits, to receive
   Your numerous ofspring; if no better place,
   Thank him who puts me loath to this revenge
   On you who wrong me not for him who wrongd.
   And should I at your harmless innocence
   Melt, as I doe, yet public reason just,
   Honour and Empire with revenge enlarg'd,
   By conquering this new World, compels me now
   To do what else though damnd I should abhorre.
 
     So spake the Fiend, and with necessitie,
   The Tyrants plea, excus'd his devilish deeds.
   Then from his loftie stand on that high Tree
   Down he alights among the sportful Herd
   Of those fourfooted kindes, himself now one,
   Now other, as thir shape servd best his end
   Neerer to view his prey, and unespi'd
   To mark what of thir state he more might learn
   By word or action markt: about them round
   A Lion now he stalkes with fierie glare,
   Then as a Tiger, who by chance hath spi'd
   In some Purlieu two gentle Fawnes at play,
   Strait couches close, then rising changes oft
   His couchant watch, as one who chose his ground
   Whence rushing he might surest seise them both
   Grip't in each paw: when ADAM first of men
   To first of women EVE thus moving speech,
   Turnd him all eare to heare new utterance flow.
 
     Sole partner and sole part of all these joyes,
   Dearer thy self then all; needs must the Power
   That made us, and for us this ample World
   Be infinitly good, and of his good
   As liberal and free as infinite,
   That rais'd us from the dust and plac't us here
   In all this happiness, who at his hand
   Have nothing merited, nor can performe
   Aught whereof hee hath need, hee who requires
   From us no other service then to keep
   This one, this easie charge, of all the Trees
   In Paradise that beare delicious fruit
   So various, not to taste that onely Tree
   Of knowledge, planted by the Tree of Life,
   So neer grows Death to Life, what ere Death is,
   Som dreadful thing no doubt; for well thou knowst
   God hath pronounc't it death to taste that Tree,
   The only sign of our obedience left
   Among so many signes of power and rule
   Conferrd upon us, and Dominion giv'n
   Over all other Creatures that possesse
   Earth, Aire, and Sea.  Then let us not think hard
   One easie prohibition, who enjoy
   Free leave so large to all things else, and choice
   Unlimited of manifold delights:
   But let us ever praise him, and extoll
   His bountie, following our delightful task
   To prune these growing Plants, & tend these Flours,
   Which were it toilsom, yet with thee were sweet.
 
     To whom thus Eve repli'd.  O thou for whom
   And from whom I was formd flesh of thy flesh,
   And without whom am to no end, my Guide
   And Head, what thou hast said is just and right.
   For wee to him indeed all praises owe,
   And daily thanks, I chiefly who enjoy
   So farr the happier Lot, enjoying thee
   Preeminent by so much odds, while thou
   Like consort to thy self canst no where find.
   That day I oft remember, when from sleep
   I first awak't, and found my self repos'd
   Under a shade on flours, much wondring where
   And what I was, whence thither brought, and how.
   Not distant far from thence a murmuring sound
   Of waters issu'd from a Cave and spread
   Into a liquid Plain, then stood unmov'd
   Pure as th' expanse of Heav'n; I thither went
   With unexperienc't thought, and laid me downe
   On the green bank, to look into the cleer
   Smooth Lake, that to me seemd another Skie.
   As I bent down to look, just opposite,
   A Shape within the watry gleam appeerd
   Bending to look on me, I started back,
   It started back, but pleasd I soon returnd,
   Pleas'd it returnd as soon with answering looks
   Of sympathie and love, there I had fixt
   Mine eyes till now, and pin'd with vain desire,
   Had not a voice thus warnd me, What thou seest,
   What there thou seest fair Creature is thy self,
   With thee it came and goes: but follow me,
   And I will bring thee where no shadow staies
   Thy coming, and thy soft imbraces, hee
   Whose image thou art, him thou shall enjoy
   Inseparablie thine, to him shalt beare
   Multitudes like thy self, and thence be call'd
   Mother of human Race: what could I doe,
   But follow strait, invisibly thus led?
   Till I espi'd thee, fair indeed and tall,
   Under a Platan, yet methought less faire,
   Less winning soft, less amiablie milde,
   Then that smooth watry image; back I turnd,
   Thou following cryd'st aloud, Return fair EVE,
   Whom fli'st thou? whom thou fli'st, of him thou art,
   His flesh, his bone; to give thee being I lent
   Out of my side to thee, neerest my heart
   Substantial Life, to have thee by my side
   Henceforth an individual solace dear;
   Part of my Soul I seek thee, and thee claim
   My other half: with that thy gentle hand
   Seisd mine, I yeilded, and from that time see
   How beauty is excelld by manly grace
   And wisdom, which alone is truly fair.
 
     So spake our general Mother, and with eyes
   Of conjugal attraction unreprov'd,
   And meek surrender, half imbracing leand
   On our first Father, half her swelling Breast
   Naked met his under the flowing Gold
   Of her loose tresses hid: he in delight
   Both of her Beauty and submissive Charms
   Smil'd with superior Love, as JUPITER
   On JUNO smiles, when he impregns the Clouds
   That shed MAY Flowers; and press'd her Matron lip
   With kisses pure: aside the Devil turnd
   For envie, yet with jealous leer maligne
   Ey'd them askance, and to himself thus plaind.
 
     Sight hateful, sight tormenting! thus these two
   Imparadis't in one anothers arms
   The happier EDEN, shall enjoy thir fill
   Of bliss on bliss, while I to Hell am thrust,
   Where neither joy nor love, but fierce desire,
   Among our other torments not the least,
   Still unfulfill'd with pain of longing pines;
   Yet let me not forget what I have gain'd
   From thir own mouths; all is not theirs it seems:
   One fatal Tree there stands of Knowledge call'd,
   Forbidden them to taste: Knowledge forbidd'n?
   Suspicious, reasonless.  Why should thir Lord
   Envie them that? can it be sin to know,
   Can it be death? and do they onely stand
   By Ignorance, is that thir happie state,
   The proof of thir obedience and thir faith?
   O fair foundation laid whereon to build
   Thir ruine!  Hence I will excite thir minds
   With more desire to know, and to reject
   Envious commands, invented with designe
   To keep them low whom knowledge might exalt
   Equal with Gods; aspiring to be such,
   They taste and die: what likelier can ensue?
   But first with narrow search I must walk round
   This Garden, and no corner leave unspi'd;
   A chance but chance may lead where I may meet
   Some wandring Spirit of Heav'n, by Fountain side,
   Or in thick shade retir'd, from him to draw
   What further would be learnt.  Live while ye may,
   Yet happie pair; enjoy, till I return,
   Short pleasures, for long woes are to succeed.
 
     So saying, his proud step he scornful turn'd,
   But with sly circumspection, and began
   Through wood, through waste, o're hil, o're dale his roam.
   Mean while in utmost Longitude, where Heav'n
   With Earth and Ocean meets, the setting Sun
   Slowly descended, and with right aspect
   Against the eastern Gate of Paradise
   Leveld his eevning Rayes: it was a Rock
   Of Alablaster, pil'd up to the Clouds,
   Conspicuous farr, winding with one ascent
   Accessible from Earth, one entrance high;
   The rest was craggie cliff, that overhung
   Still as it rose, impossible to climbe.
   Betwixt these rockie Pillars GABRIEL sat
   Chief of th' Angelic Guards, awaiting night;
   About him exercis'd Heroic Games
   Th' unarmed Youth of Heav'n, but nigh at hand
   Celestial Armourie, Shields, Helmes, and Speares
   Hung high with Diamond flaming, and with Gold.
   Thither came URIEL, gliding through the Eeven
   On a Sun beam, swift as a shooting Starr
   In AUTUMN thwarts the night, when vapors fir'd
   Impress the Air, and shews the Mariner
   From what point of his Compass to beware
   Impetuous winds: he thus began in haste.
 
     GABRIEL, to thee thy cours by Lot hath giv'n
   Charge and strict watch that to this happie place
   No evil thing approach or enter in;
   This day at highth of Noon came to my Spheare
   A Spirit, zealous, as he seem'd, to know
   More of th' Almighties works, and chiefly Man
   Gods latest Image: I describ'd his way
   Bent all on speed, and markt his Aerie Gate;
   But in the Mount that lies from EDEN North,
   Where he first lighted, soon discernd his looks
   Alien from Heav'n, with passions foul obscur'd:
   Mine eye pursu'd him still, but under shade
   Lost sight of him; one of the banisht crew
   I fear, hath ventur'd from the deep, to raise
   New troubles; him thy care must be to find.
 
     To whom the winged Warriour thus returnd:
   URIEL, no wonder if thy perfet sight,
   Amid the Suns bright circle where thou sitst,
   See farr and wide: in at this Gate none pass
   The vigilance here plac't, but such as come
   Well known from Heav'n; and since Meridian hour
   No Creature thence: if Spirit of other sort,
   So minded, have oreleapt these earthie bounds
   On purpose, hard thou knowst it to exclude
   Spiritual substance with corporeal barr.
   But if within the circuit of these walks
   In whatsoever shape he lurk, of whom
   Thou telst, by morrow dawning I shall know.
 
     So promis'd hee, and URIEL to his charge
   Returnd on that bright beam, whose point now raisd
   Bore him slope downward to the Sun now fall'n
   Beneath th' AZORES; whither the prime Orb,
   Incredible how swift, had thither rowl'd
   Diurnal, or this less volubil Earth
   By shorter flight to th' East, had left him there
   Arraying with reflected Purple and Gold
   The Clouds that on his Western Throne attend:
   Now came still Eevning on, and Twilight gray
   Had in her sober Liverie all things clad;
   Silence accompanied, for Beast and Bird,
   They to thir grassie Couch, these to thir Nests
   Were slunk, all but the wakeful Nightingale;
   She all night long her amorous descant sung;
   Silence was pleas'd: now glow'd the Firmament
   With living Saphirs: HESPERUS that led
   The starrie Host, rode brightest, till the Moon
   Rising in clouded Majestie, at length
   Apparent Queen unvaild her peerless light,
   And o're the dark her Silver Mantle threw.
 
     When ADAM thus to EVE: Fair Consort, th' hour
   Of night, and all things now retir'd to rest
   Mind us of like repose, since God hath set
   Labour and rest, as day and night to men
   Successive, and the timely dew of sleep
   Now falling with soft slumbrous weight inclines
   Our eye-lids; other Creatures all day long
   Rove idle unimploid, and less need rest;
   Man hath his daily work of body or mind
   Appointed, which declares his Dignitie,
   And the regard of Heav'n on all his waies;
   While other Animals unactive range,
   And of thir doings God takes no account.
   Tomorrow ere fresh Morning streak the East
   With first approach of light, we must be ris'n,
   And at our pleasant labour, to reform
   Yon flourie Arbors, yonder Allies green,
   Our walks at noon, with branches overgrown,
   That mock our scant manuring, and require
   More hands then ours to lop thir wanton growth:
   Those Blossoms also, and those dropping Gumms,
   That lie bestrowne unsightly and unsmooth,
   Ask riddance, if we mean to tread with ease;
   Mean while, as Nature wills, Night bids us rest.
 
     To whom thus EVE with perfet beauty adornd.
   My Author and Disposer, what thou bidst
   Unargu'd I obey; so God ordains,
   God is thy Law, thou mine: to know no more
   Is womans happiest knowledge and her praise.
   With thee conversing I forget all time,
   All seasons and thir change, all please alike.
   Sweet is the breath of morn, her rising sweet,
   With charm of earliest Birds; pleasant the Sun
   When first on this delightful Land he spreads
   His orient Beams, on herb, tree, fruit, and flour,
   Glistring with dew; fragrant the fertil earth
   After soft showers; and sweet the coming on
   Of grateful Eevning milde, then silent Night
   With this her solemn Bird and this fair Moon,
   And these the Gemms of Heav'n, her starrie train:
   But neither breath of Morn when she ascends
   With charm of earliest Birds, nor rising Sun
   On this delightful land, nor herb, fruit, floure,
   Glistring with dew, nor fragrance after showers,
   Nor grateful Evening mild, nor silent Night
   With this her solemn Bird, nor walk by Moon,
   Or glittering Starr-light without thee is sweet.
   But wherfore all night long shine these, for whom
   This glorious sight, when sleep hath shut all eyes?
 
     To whom our general Ancestor repli'd.
   Daughter of God and Man, accomplisht EVE,
   Those have thir course to finish, round the Earth,
   By morrow Eevning, and from Land to Land
   In order, though to Nations yet unborn,
   Ministring light prepar'd, they set and rise;
   Least total darkness should by Night regaine
   Her old possession, and extinguish life
   In Nature and all things, which these soft fires
   Not only enlighten, but with kindly heate
   Of various influence foment and warme,
   Temper or nourish, or in part shed down
   Thir stellar vertue on all kinds that grow
   On Earth, made hereby apter to receive
   Perfection from the Suns more potent Ray.
   These then, though unbeheld in deep of night,
   Shine not in vain, nor think, though men were none,
   That heav'n would want spectators, God want praise;
   Millions of spiritual Creatures walk the Earth
   Unseen, both when we wake, and when we sleep:
   All these with ceasless praise his works behold
   Both day and night: how often from the steep
   Of echoing Hill or Thicket have we heard
   Celestial voices to the midnight air,
   Sole, or responsive each to others note
   Singing thir great Creator: oft in bands
   While they keep watch, or nightly rounding walk
   With Heav'nly touch of instrumental sounds
   In full harmonic number joind, thir songs
   Divide the night, and lift our thoughts to Heaven.
 
     Thus talking hand in hand alone they pass'd
   On to thir blissful Bower; it was a place
   Chos'n by the sovran Planter, when he fram'd
   All things to mans delightful use; the roofe
   Of thickest covert was inwoven shade
   Laurel and Mirtle, and what higher grew
   Of firm and fragrant leaf; on either side
   ACANTHUS, and each odorous bushie shrub
   Fenc'd up the verdant wall; each beauteous flour,
   IRIS all hues, Roses, and Gessamin
   Rear'd high thir flourisht heads between, and wrought
   Mosaic; underfoot the Violet,
   Crocus, and Hyacinth with rich inlay
   Broiderd the ground, more colour'd then with stone
   Of costliest Emblem: other Creature here
   Beast, Bird, Insect, or Worm durst enter none;
   Such was thir awe of man.  In shadier Bower
   More sacred and sequesterd, though but feignd,
   PAN or SILVANUS never slept, nor Nymph,
   Nor FAUNUS haunted.  Here in close recess
   With Flowers, Garlands, and sweet-smelling Herbs
   Espoused EVE deckt first her Nuptial Bed,
   And heav'nly Quires the Hymenaean sung,
   What day the genial Angel to our Sire
   Brought her in naked beauty more adorn'd,
   More lovely then PANDORA, whom the Gods
   Endowd with all thir gifts, and O too like
   In sad event, when to the unwiser Son
   Of JAPHET brought by HERMES, she ensnar'd
   Mankind with her faire looks, to be aveng'd
   On him who had stole JOVES authentic fire.
 
     Thus at thir shadie Lodge arriv'd, both stood,
   Both turnd, and under op'n Skie ador'd
   The God that made both Skie, Air, Earth & Heav'n
   Which they beheld, the Moons resplendent Globe
   And starrie Pole: Thou also mad'st the Night,
   Maker Omnipotent, and thou the Day,
   Which we in our appointed work imployd
   Have finisht happie in our mutual help
   And mutual love, the Crown of all our bliss
   Ordain'd by thee, and this delicious place
   For us too large, where thy abundance wants
   Partakers, and uncropt falls to the ground.
   But thou hast promis'd from us two a Race
   To fill the Earth, who shall with us extoll
   Thy goodness infinite, both when we wake,
   And when we seek, as now, thy gift of sleep.
 
     This said unanimous, and other Rites
   Observing none, but adoration pure
   Which God likes best, into thir inmost bower
   Handed they went; and eas'd the putting off
   These troublesom disguises which wee wear,
   Strait side by side were laid, nor turnd I weene
   ADAM from his fair Spouse, nor EVE the Rites
   Mysterious of connubial Love refus'd:
   Whatever Hypocrites austerely talk
   Of puritie and place and innocence,
   Defaming as impure what God declares
   Pure, and commands to som, leaves free to all.
   Our Maker bids increase, who bids abstain
   But our Destroyer, foe to God and Man?
   Haile wedded Love, mysterious Law, true source
   Of human ofspring, sole proprietie,
   In Paradise of all things common else.
   By thee adulterous lust was driv'n from men
   Among the bestial herds to raunge, by thee
   Founded in Reason, Loyal, Just, and Pure,
   Relations dear, and all the Charities
   Of Father, Son, and Brother first were known.
   Farr be it, that I should write thee sin or blame,
   Or think thee unbefitting holiest place,
   Perpetual Fountain of Domestic sweets,
   Whose Bed is undefil'd and chast pronounc't,
   Present, or past, as Saints and Patriarchs us'd.
   Here Love his golden shafts imploies, here lights
   His constant Lamp, and waves his purple wings,
   Reigns here and revels; not in the bought smile
   Of Harlots, loveless, joyless, unindeard,
   Casual fruition, nor in Court Amours
   Mixt Dance, or wanton Mask, or Midnight Bal,
   Or Serenate, which the starv'd Lover sings
   To his proud fair, best quitted with disdain.
   These lulld by Nightingales imbraceing slept,
   And on thir naked limbs the flourie roof
   Showrd Roses, which the Morn repair'd.  Sleep on,
   Blest pair; and O yet happiest if ye seek
   No happier state, and know to know no more.
 
     Now had night measur'd with her shaddowie Cone
   Half way up Hill this vast Sublunar Vault,
   And from thir Ivorie Port the Cherubim
   Forth issuing at th' accustomd hour stood armd
   To thir night watches in warlike Parade,
   When GABRIEL to his next in power thus spake.
 
     UZZIEL, half these draw off, and coast the South
   With strictest watch; these other wheel the North,
   Our circuit meets full West.  As flame they part
   Half wheeling to the Shield, half to the Spear.
   From these, two strong and suttle Spirits he calld
   That neer him stood, and gave them thus in charge.
 
     ITHURIEL and ZEPHON, with wingd speed
   Search through this Garden, leav unsearcht no nook,
   But chiefly where those two fair Creatures Lodge,
   Now laid perhaps asleep secure of harme.
   This Eevning from the Sun's decline arriv'd
   Who tells of som infernal Spirit seen
   Hitherward bent (who could have thought?) escap'd
   The barrs of Hell, on errand bad no doubt:
   Such where ye find, seise fast, and hither bring.
 
     So saying, on he led his radiant Files,
   Daz'ling the Moon; these to the Bower direct
   In search of whom they sought: him there they found
   Squat like a Toad, close at the eare of EVE;
   Assaying by his Devilish art to reach
   The Organs of her Fancie, and with them forge
   Illusions as he list, Phantasms and Dreams,
   Or if, inspiring venom, he might taint
   Th' animal Spirits that from pure blood arise
   Like gentle breaths from Rivers pure, thence raise
   At least distemperd, discontented thoughts,
   Vain hopes, vain aimes, inordinate desires
   Blown up with high conceits ingendring pride.
   Him thus intent ITHURIEL with his Spear
   Touch'd lightly; for no falshood can endure
   Touch of Celestial temper, but returns
   Of force to its own likeness: up he starts
   Discoverd and surpriz'd.  As when a spark
   Lights on a heap of nitrous Powder, laid
   Fit for the Tun som Magazin to store
   Against a rumord Warr, the Smuttie graine
   With sudden blaze diffus'd, inflames the Aire:
   So started up in his own shape the Fiend.
   Back stept those two fair Angels half amaz'd
   So sudden to behold the grieslie King;
   Yet thus, unmovd with fear, accost him soon.
 
     Which of those rebell Spirits adjudg'd to Hell
   Com'st thou, escap'd thy prison, and transform'd,
   Why satst thou like an enemie in waite
   Here watching at the head of these that sleep?
 
     Know ye not then said SATAN, filld with scorn,
   Know ye not me? ye knew me once no mate
   For you, there sitting where ye durst not soare;
   Not to know mee argues your selves unknown,
   The lowest of your throng; or if ye know,
   Why ask ye, and superfluous begin
   Your message, like to end as much in vain?
   To whom thus ZEPHON, answering scorn with scorn.
   Think not, revolted Spirit, thy shape the same,
   Or undiminisht brightness, to be known
   As when thou stoodst in Heav'n upright and pure;
   That Glorie then, when thou no more wast good,
   Departed from thee, and thou resembl'st now
   Thy sin and place of doom obscure and foule.
   But come, for thou, be sure, shalt give account
   To him who sent us, whose charge is to keep
   This place inviolable, and these from harm.
 
     So spake the Cherube, and his grave rebuke
   Severe in youthful beautie, added grace
   Invincible: abasht the Devil stood,
   And felt how awful goodness is, and saw
   Vertue in her shape how lovly, saw, and pin'd
   His loss; but chiefly to find here observd
   His lustre visibly impar'd; yet seemd
   Undaunted.  If I must contend, said he,
   Best with the best, the Sender not the sent,
   Or all at once; more glorie will be wonn,
   Or less be lost.  Thy fear, said ZEPHON bold,
   Will save us trial what the least can doe
   Single against thee wicked, and thence weak.
 
     The Fiend repli'd not, overcome with rage;
   But like a proud Steed reind, went hautie on,
   Chaumping his iron curb: to strive or flie
   He held it vain; awe from above had quelld
   His heart, not else dismai'd.  Now drew they nigh
   The western point, where those half-rounding guards
   Just met, & closing stood in squadron joind
   Awaiting next command.  To whom thir Chief
   GABRIEL from the Front thus calld aloud.
 
     O friends, I hear the tread of nimble feet
   Hasting this way, and now by glimps discerne
   ITHURIEL and ZEPHON through the shade,
   And with them comes a third of Regal port,
   But faded splendor wan; who by his gate
   And fierce demeanour seems the Prince of Hell,
   Not likely to part hence without contest;
   Stand firm, for in his look defiance lours.
 
     He scarce had ended, when those two approachd
   And brief related whom they brought, wher found,
   How busied, in what form and posture coucht.
 
     To whom with stern regard thus GABRIEL spake.
   Why hast thou, SATAN, broke the bounds prescrib'd
   To thy transgressions, and disturbd the charge
   Of others, who approve not to transgress
   By thy example, but have power and right
   To question thy bold entrance on this place;
   Imploi'd it seems to violate sleep, and those
   Whose dwelling God hath planted here in bliss?
 
     To whom thus SATAN with contemptuous brow.
   GABRIEL, thou hadst in Heav'n th' esteem of wise,
   And such I held thee; but this question askt
   Puts me in doubt.  Lives ther who loves his pain?
   Who would not, finding way, break loose from Hell,
   Though thither doomd?  Thou wouldst thy self, no doubt,
   And boldly venture to whatever place
   Farthest from pain, where thou mightst hope to change
   Torment with ease, & soonest recompence
   Dole with delight, which in this place I sought;
   To thee no reason; who knowst only good,
   But evil hast not tri'd: and wilt object
   His will who bound us? let him surer barr
   His Iron Gates, if he intends our stay
   In that dark durance: thus much what was askt.
   The rest is true, they found me where they say;
   But that implies not violence or harme.
 
     Thus hee in scorn.  The warlike Angel mov'd,
   Disdainfully half smiling thus repli'd.
   O loss of one in Heav'n to judge of wise,
   Since SATAN fell, whom follie overthrew,
   And now returns him from his prison scap't,
   Gravely in doubt whether to hold them wise
   Or not, who ask what boldness brought him hither
   Unlicenc't from his bounds in Hell prescrib'd;
   So wise he judges it to fly from pain
   However, and to scape his punishment.
   So judge thou still, presumptuous, till the wrauth,
   Which thou incurr'st by flying, meet thy flight
   Seavenfold, and scourge that wisdom back to Hell,
   Which taught thee yet no better, that no pain
   Can equal anger infinite provok't.
   But wherefore thou alone? wherefore with thee
   Came not all Hell broke loose? is pain to them
   Less pain, less to be fled, or thou then they
   Less hardie to endure? courageous Chief,
   The first in flight from pain, had'st thou alleg'd
   To thy deserted host this cause of flight,
   Thou surely hadst not come sole fugitive.
 
     To which the Fiend thus answerd frowning stern.
   Not that I less endure, or shrink from pain,
   Insulting Angel, well thou knowst I stood
   Thy fiercest, when in Battel to thy aide
   The blasting volied Thunder made all speed
   And seconded thy else not dreaded Spear.
   But still thy words at random, as before,
   Argue thy inexperience what behooves
   From hard assaies and ill successes past
   A faithful Leader, not to hazard all
   Through wayes of danger by himself untri'd.
   I therefore, I alone first undertook
   To wing the desolate Abyss, and spie
   This new created World, whereof in Hell
   Fame is not silent, here in hope to find
   Better abode, and my afflicted Powers
   To settle here on Earth, or in mid Aire;
   Though for possession put to try once more
   What thou and thy gay Legions dare against;
   Whose easier business were to serve thir Lord
   High up in Heav'n, with songs to hymne his Throne,
   And practis'd distances to cringe, not fight.
 
     To whom the warriour Angel soon repli'd.
   To say and strait unsay, pretending first
   Wise to flie pain, professing next the Spie,
   Argues no Leader, but a lyar trac't,
   SATAN, and couldst thou faithful add?  O name,
   O sacred name of faithfulness profan'd!
   Faithful to whom? to thy rebellious crew?
   Armie of Fiends, fit body to fit head;
   Was this your discipline and faith ingag'd,
   Your military obedience, to dissolve
   Allegeance to th' acknowledg'd Power supream?
   And thou sly hypocrite, who now wouldst seem
   Patron of liberty, who more then thou
   Once fawn'd, and cring'd, and servilly ador'd
   Heav'ns awful Monarch? wherefore but in hope
   To dispossess him, and thy self to reigne?
   But mark what I arreede thee now, avant;
   Flie thither whence thou fledst: if from this houre
   Within these hallowd limits thou appeer,
   Back to th' infernal pit I drag thee chaind,
   And Seale thee so, as henceforth not to scorne
   The facil gates of hell too slightly barrd.
 
     So threatn'd hee, but SATAN to no threats
   Gave heed, but waxing more in rage repli'd.
 
     Then when I am thy captive talk of chaines,
   Proud limitarie Cherube, but ere then
   Farr heavier load thy self expect to feel
   From my prevailing arme, though Heavens King
   Ride on thy wings, and thou with thy Compeers,
   Us'd to the yoak, draw'st his triumphant wheels
   In progress through the rode of Heav'n Star-pav'd.
 
     While thus he spake, th' Angelic Squadron bright
   Turnd fierie red, sharpning in mooned hornes
   Thir Phalanx, and began to hemm him round
   With ported Spears, as thick as when a field
   Of CERES ripe for harvest waving bends
   Her bearded Grove of ears, which way the wind
   Swayes them; the careful Plowman doubting stands
   Least on the threshing floore his hopeful sheaves
   Prove chaff.  On th' other side SATAN allarm'd
   Collecting all his might dilated stood,
   Like TENERIFF or ATLAS unremov'd:
   His stature reacht the Skie, and on his Crest
   Sat horror Plum'd; nor wanted in his graspe
   What seemd both Spear and Shield: now dreadful deeds
   Might have ensu'd, nor onely Paradise
   In this commotion, but the Starrie Cope
   Of Heav'n perhaps, or all the Elements
   At least had gon to rack, disturbd and torne
   With violence of this conflict, had not soon
   Th' Eternal to prevent such horrid fray
   Hung forth in Heav'n his golden Scales, yet seen
   Betwixt ASTREA and the SCORPION signe,
   Wherein all things created first he weighd,
   The pendulous round Earth with ballanc't Aire
   In counterpoise, now ponders all events,
   Battels and Realms: in these he put two weights
   The sequel each of parting and of fight;
   The latter quick up flew, and kickt the beam;
   Which GABRIEL spying, thus bespake the Fiend.
 
     SATAN, I know thy strength, and thou knowst mine,
   Neither our own but giv'n; what follie then
   To boast what Arms can doe, since thine no more
   Then Heav'n permits, nor mine, though doubld now
   To trample thee as mire: for proof look up,
   And read thy Lot in yon celestial Sign
   Where thou art weigh'd, & shown how light, how weak,
   If thou resist.  The Fiend lookt up and knew
   His mounted scale aloft: nor more; but fled
   Murmuring, and with him fled the shades of night.
 
        THE END OF THE FOURTH BOOK.
 
 
   PARADISE LOST
 
   BOOK V.
 
   Now Morn her rosie steps in th' Eastern Clime
   Advancing, sow'd the Earth with Orient Pearle,
   When ADAM wak't, so customd, for his sleep
   Was Aerie light, from pure digestion bred,
   And temperat vapors bland, which th' only sound
   Of leaves and fuming rills, AURORA's fan,
   Lightly dispers'd, and the shrill Matin Song
   Of Birds on every bough; so much the more
   His wonder was to find unwak'nd EVE
   With Tresses discompos'd, and glowing Cheek,
   As through unquiet rest: he on his side
   Leaning half-rais'd, with looks of cordial Love
   Hung over her enamour'd, and beheld
   Beautie, which whether waking or asleep,
   Shot forth peculiar Graces; then with voice
   Milde, as when ZEPHYRUS on FLORA breathes,
   Her hand soft touching, whisperd thus.  Awake
   My fairest, my espous'd, my latest found,
   Heav'ns last best gift, my ever new delight,
   Awake, the morning shines, and the fresh field
   Calls us, we lose the prime, to mark how spring
   Our tended Plants, how blows the Citron Grove,
   What drops the Myrrhe, & what the balmie Reed,
   How Nature paints her colours, how the Bee
   Sits on the Bloom extracting liquid sweet.
 
     Such whispering wak'd her, but with startl'd eye
   On ADAM, whom imbracing, thus she spake.
 
     O Sole in whom my thoughts find all repose,
   My Glorie, my Perfection, glad I see
   Thy face, and Morn return'd, for I this Night,
   Such night till this I never pass'd, have dream'd,
   If dream'd, not as I oft am wont, of thee,
   Works of day pass't, or morrows next designe,
   But of offence and trouble, which my mind
   Knew never till this irksom night; methought
   Close at mine ear one call'd me forth to walk
   With gentle voice, I thought it thine; it said,
   Why sleepst thou EVE? now is the pleasant time,
   The cool, the silent, save where silence yields
   To the night-warbling Bird, that now awake
   Tunes sweetest his love-labor'd song; now reignes
   Full Orb'd the Moon, and with more pleasing light
   Shadowie sets off the face of things; in vain,
   If none regard; Heav'n wakes with all his eyes,
   Whom to behold but thee, Natures desire,
   In whose sight all things joy, with ravishment
   Attracted by thy beauty still to gaze.
   I rose as at thy call, but found thee not;
   To find thee I directed then my walk;
   And on, methought, alone I pass'd through ways
   That brought me on a sudden to the Tree
   Of interdicted Knowledge: fair it seem'd,
   Much fairer to my Fancie then by day:
   And as I wondring lookt, beside it stood
   One shap'd & wing'd like one of those from Heav'n
   By us oft seen; his dewie locks distill'd
   Ambrosia; on that Tree he also gaz'd;
   And O fair Plant, said he, with fruit surcharg'd,
   Deigns none to ease thy load and taste thy sweet,
   Nor God, nor Man; is Knowledge so despis'd?
   Or envie, or what reserve forbids to taste?
   Forbid who will, none shall from me withhold
   Longer thy offerd good, why else set here?
   This said he paus'd not, but with ventrous Arme
   He pluckt, he tasted; mee damp horror chil'd
   At such bold words voucht with a deed so bold:
   But he thus overjoy'd, O Fruit Divine,
   Sweet of thy self, but much more sweet thus cropt,
   Forbidd'n here, it seems, as onely fit
   For Gods, yet able to make Gods of Men:
   And why not Gods of Men, since good, the more
   Communicated, more abundant growes,
   The Author not impair'd, but honourd more?
   Here, happie Creature, fair Angelic EVE,
   Partake thou also; happie though thou art,
   Happier thou mayst be, worthier canst not be:
   Taste this, and be henceforth among the Gods
   Thy self a Goddess, not to Earth confind,
   But somtimes in the Air, as wee, somtimes
   Ascend to Heav'n, by merit thine, and see
   What life the Gods live there, and such live thou.
   So saying, he drew nigh, and to me held,
   Even to my mouth of that same fruit held part
   Which he had pluckt; the pleasant savourie smell
   So quick'nd appetite, that I, methought,
   Could not but taste.  Forthwith up to the Clouds
   With him I flew, and underneath beheld
   The Earth outstretcht immense, a prospect wide
   And various: wondring at my flight and change
   To this high exaltation; suddenly
   My Guide was gon, and I, me thought, sunk down,
   And fell asleep; but O how glad I wak'd
   To find this but a dream!  Thus EVE her Night
   Related, and thus ADAM answerd sad.
 
     Best Image of my self and dearer half,
   The trouble of thy thoughts this night in sleep
   Affects me equally; nor can I like
   This uncouth dream, of evil sprung I fear;
   Yet evil whence? in thee can harbour none,
   Created pure.  But know that in the Soule
   Are many lesser Faculties that serve
   Reason as chief; among these Fansie next
   Her office holds; of all external things,
   Which the five watchful Senses represent,
   She forms Imaginations, Aerie shapes,
   Which Reason joyning or disjoyning, frames
   All what we affirm or what deny, and call
   Our knowledge or opinion; then retires
   Into her private Cell when Nature rests.
   Oft in her absence mimic Fansie wakes
   To imitate her; but misjoyning shapes,
   Wilde work produces oft, and most in dreams,
   Ill matching words and deeds long past or late.
   Som such resemblances methinks I find
   Of our last Eevnings talk, in this thy dream,
   But with addition strange; yet be not sad.
   Evil into the mind of God or Man
   May come and go, so unapprov'd, and leave
   No spot or blame behind: Which gives me hope
   That what in sleep thou didst abhorr to dream,
   Waking thou never wilt consent to do.
   Be not disheart'nd then, nor cloud those looks
   That wont to be more chearful and serene
   Then when fair Morning first smiles on the World,
   And let us to our fresh imployments rise
   Among the Groves, the Fountains, and the Flours
   That open now thir choicest bosom'd smells
   Reservd from night, and kept for thee in store.
 
     So cheard he his fair Spouse, and she was cheard,
   But silently a gentle tear let fall
   From either eye, and wip'd them with her haire;
   Two other precious drops that ready stood,
   Each in thir chrystal sluce, hee ere they fell
   Kiss'd as the gracious signs of sweet remorse
   And pious awe, that feard to have offended.
 
     So all was cleard, and to the Field they haste.
   But first from under shadie arborous roof,
   Soon as they forth were come to open sight
   Of day-spring, and the Sun, who scarce up risen
   With wheels yet hov'ring o're the Ocean brim,
   Shot paralel to the earth his dewie ray,
   Discovering in wide Lantskip all the East
   Of Paradise and EDENS happie Plains,
   Lowly they bow'd adoring, and began
   Thir Orisons, each Morning duly paid
   In various style, for neither various style
   Nor holy rapture wanted they to praise
   Thir Maker, in fit strains pronounc't or sung
   Unmeditated, such prompt eloquence
   Flowd from thir lips, in Prose or numerous Verse,
   More tuneable then needed Lute or Harp
   To add more sweetness, and they thus began.
 
     These are thy glorious works, Parent of good,
   Almightie, thine this universal Frame,
   Thus wondrous fair; thy self how wondrous then!
   Unspeakable, who sitst above these Heavens
   To us invisible or dimly seen
   In these thy lowest works, yet these declare
   Thy goodness beyond thought, and Power Divine:
   Speak yee who best can tell, ye Sons of light,
   Angels, for yee behold him, and with songs
   And choral symphonies, Day without Night,
   Circle his Throne rejoycing, yee in Heav'n,
   On Earth joyn all yee Creatures to extoll
   Him first, him last, him midst, and without end.
   Fairest of Starrs, last in the train of Night,
   If better thou belong not to the dawn,
   Sure pledge of day, that crownst the smiling Morn
   With thy bright Circlet, praise him in thy Spheare
   While day arises, that sweet hour of Prime.
   Thou Sun, of this great World both Eye and Soule,
   Acknowledge him thy Greater, sound his praise
   In thy eternal course, both when thou climb'st,
   And when high Noon hast gaind, & when thou fallst.
   Moon, that now meetst the orient Sun, now fli'st
   With the fixt Starrs, fixt in thir Orb that flies,
   And yee five other wandring Fires that move
   In mystic Dance not without Song, resound
   His praise, who out of Darkness call'd up Light.
   Aire, and ye Elements the eldest birth
   Of Natures Womb, that in quaternion run
   Perpetual Circle, multiform; and mix
   And nourish all things, let your ceasless change
   Varie to our great Maker still new praise.
   Ye Mists and Exhalations that now rise
   From Hill or steaming Lake, duskie or grey,
   Till the Sun paint your fleecie skirts with Gold,
   In honour to the Worlds great Author rise,
   Whether to deck with Clouds the uncolourd skie,
   Or wet the thirstie Earth with falling showers,
   Rising or falling still advance his praise.
   His praise ye Winds, that from four Quarters blow,
   Breath soft or loud; and wave your tops, ye Pines,
   With every Plant, in sign of Worship wave.
   Fountains and yee, that warble, as ye flow,
   Melodious murmurs, warbling tune his praise.
   Joyn voices all ye living Souls, ye Birds,
   That singing up to Heaven Gate ascend,
   Bear on your wings and in your notes his praise;
   Yee that in Waters glide, and yee that walk
   The Earth, and stately tread, or lowly creep;
   Witness if I be silent, Morn or Eeven,
   To Hill, or Valley, Fountain, or fresh shade
   Made vocal by my Song, and taught his praise.
   Hail universal Lord, be bounteous still
   To give us onely good; and if the night
   Have gathered aught of evil or conceald,
   Disperse it, as now light dispels the dark.
 
     So pray'd they innocent, and to thir thoughts
   Firm peace recoverd soon and wonted calm.
   On to thir mornings rural work they haste
   Among sweet dewes and flours; where any row
   Of Fruit-trees overwoodie reachd too farr
   Thir pamperd boughes, and needed hands to check
   Fruitless imbraces: or they led the Vine
   To wed her Elm; she spous'd about him twines
   Her mariageable arms, and with her brings
   Her dowr th' adopted Clusters, to adorn
   His barren leaves.  Them thus imploid beheld
   With pittie Heav'ns high King, and to him call'd
   RAPHAEL, the sociable Spirit, that deign'd
   To travel with TOBIAS, and secur'd
   His marriage with the seaventimes-wedded Maid.
 
     RAPHAEL, said hee, thou hear'st what stir on Earth
   SATAN from Hell scap't through the darksom Gulf
   Hath raisd in Paradise, and how disturbd
   This night the human pair, how he designes
   In them at once to ruin all mankind.
   Go therefore, half this day as friend with friend
   Converse with ADAM, in what Bowre or shade
   Thou find'st him from the heat of Noon retir'd,
   To respit his day-labour with repast,
   Or with repose; and such discourse bring on,
   As may advise him of his happie state,
   Happiness in his power left free to will,
   Left to his own free Will, his Will though free,
   Yet mutable; whence warne him to beware
   He swerve not too secure: tell him withall
   His danger, and from whom, what enemie
   Late falln himself from Heav'n, is plotting now
   The fall of others from like state of bliss;
   By violence, no, for that shall be withstood,
   But by deceit and lies; this let him know,
   Least wilfully transgressing he pretend
   Surprisal, unadmonisht, unforewarnd.
 
     So spake th' Eternal Father, and fulfilld
   All Justice: nor delaid the winged Saint
   After his charge receivd, but from among
   Thousand Celestial Ardors, where he stood
   Vaild with his gorgeous wings, up springing light
   Flew through the midst of Heav'n; th' angelic Quires
   On each hand parting, to his speed gave way
   Through all th' Empyreal road; till at the Gate
   Of Heav'n arriv'd, the gate self-opend wide
   On golden Hinges turning, as by work
   Divine the sov'ran Architect had fram'd.
   From hence, no cloud, or, to obstruct his sight,
   Starr interpos'd, however small he sees,
   Not unconform to other shining Globes,
   Earth and the Gard'n of God, with Cedars crownd
   Above all Hills.  As when by night the Glass
   Of GALILEO, less assur'd, observes
   Imagind Lands and Regions in the Moon:
   Or Pilot from amidst the CYCLADES
   DELOS or SAMOS first appeering kenns
   A cloudy spot.  Down thither prone in flight
   He speeds, and through the vast Ethereal Skie
   Sailes between worlds & worlds, with steddie wing
   Now on the polar windes, then with quick Fann
   Winnows the buxom Air; till within soare
   Of Towring Eagles, to all the Fowles he seems
   A PHOENIX, gaz'd by all, as that sole Bird
   When to enshrine his reliques in the Sun's
   Bright Temple, to AEGYPTIAN THEB'S he flies.
   At once on th' Eastern cliff of Paradise
   He lights, and to his proper shape returns
   A Seraph wingd; six wings he wore, to shade
   His lineaments Divine; the pair that clad
   Each shoulder broad, came mantling o're his brest
   With regal Ornament; the middle pair
   Girt like a Starrie Zone his waste, and round
   Skirted his loines and thighes with downie Gold
   And colours dipt in Heav'n; the third his feet
   Shaddowd from either heele with featherd maile
   Skie-tinctur'd grain.  Like MAIA'S son he stood,
   And shook his Plumes, that Heav'nly fragrance filld
   The circuit wide.  Strait knew him all the bands
   Of Angels under watch; and to his state,
   And to his message high in honour rise;
   For on som message high they guessd him bound.
   Thir glittering Tents he passd, and now is come
   Into the blissful field, through Groves of Myrrhe,
   And flouring Odours, Cassia, Nard, and Balme;
   A Wilderness of sweets; for Nature here
   Wantond as in her prime, and plaid at will
   Her Virgin Fancies, pouring forth more sweet,
   Wilde above rule or art; enormous bliss.
   Him through the spicie Forrest onward com
   ADAM discernd, as in the dore he sat
   Of his coole Bowre, while now the mounted Sun
   Shot down direct his fervid Raies, to warme
   Earths inmost womb, more warmth then ADAM need;
   And EVE within, due at her hour prepar'd
   For dinner savourie fruits, of taste to please
   True appetite, and not disrelish thirst
   Of nectarous draughts between, from milkie stream,
   Berrie or Grape: to whom thus ADAM call'd.
 
     Haste hither EVE, and worth thy sight behold
   Eastward among those Trees, what glorious shape
   Comes this way moving; seems another Morn
   Ris'n on mid-noon; som great behest from Heav'n
   To us perhaps he brings, and will voutsafe
   This day to be our Guest.  But goe with speed,
   And what thy stores contain, bring forth and poure
   Abundance, fit to honour and receive
   Our Heav'nly stranger; well we may afford
   Our givers thir own gifts, and large bestow
   From large bestowd, where Nature multiplies
   Her fertil growth, and by disburd'ning grows
   More fruitful, which instructs us not to spare.
 
     To whom thus EVE. ADAM, earths hallowd mould,
   Of God inspir'd, small store will serve, where store,
   All seasons, ripe for use hangs on the stalk;
   Save what by frugal storing firmness gains
   To nourish, and superfluous moist consumes:
   But I will haste and from each bough and break,
   Each Plant & juciest Gourd will pluck such choice
   To entertain our Angel guest, as hee
   Beholding shall confess that here on Earth
   God hath dispenst his bounties as in Heav'n.
 
     So saying, with dispatchful looks in haste
   She turns, on hospitable thoughts intent
   What choice to chuse for delicacie best,
   What order, so contriv'd as not to mix
   Tastes, not well joynd, inelegant, but bring
   Taste after taste upheld with kindliest change,
   Bestirs her then, and from each tender stalk
   Whatever Earth all-bearing Mother yeilds
   In INDIA East or West, or middle shoare
   In PONTUS or the PUNIC Coast, or where
   ALCINOUS reign'd, fruit of all kindes, in coate,
   Rough, or smooth rin'd, or bearded husk, or shell
   She gathers, Tribute large, and on the board
   Heaps with unsparing hand; for drink the Grape
   She crushes, inoffensive moust, and meathes
   From many a berrie, and from sweet kernels prest
   She tempers dulcet creams, nor these to hold
   Wants her fit vessels pure, then strews the ground
   With Rose and Odours from the shrub unfum'd.
   Mean while our Primitive great Sire, to meet
   His god-like Guest, walks forth, without more train
   Accompani'd then with his own compleat
   Perfections, in himself was all his state,
   More solemn then the tedious pomp that waits
   On Princes, when thir rich Retinue long
   Of Horses led, and Grooms besmeard with Gold
   Dazles the croud, and sets them all agape.
   Neerer his presence ADAM though not awd,
   Yet with submiss approach and reverence meek,
   As to a superior Nature, bowing low,
 
     Thus said.  Native of Heav'n, for other place
   None can then Heav'n such glorious shape contain;
   Since by descending from the Thrones above,
   Those happie places thou hast deignd a while
   To want, and honour these, voutsafe with us
   Two onely, who yet by sov'ran gift possess
   This spacious ground, in yonder shadie Bowre
   To rest, and what the Garden choicest bears
   To sit and taste, till this meridian heat
   Be over, and the Sun more coole decline.
 
     Whom thus the Angelic Vertue answerd milde.
   ADAM, I therefore came, nor art thou such
   Created, or such place hast here to dwell,
   As may not oft invite, though Spirits of Heav'n
   To visit thee; lead on then where thy Bowre
   Oreshades; for these mid-hours, till Eevning rise
   I have at will.  So to the Silvan Lodge
   They came, that like POMONA'S Arbour smil'd
   With flourets deck't and fragrant smells; but EVE
   Undeckt, save with her self more lovely fair
   Then Wood-Nymph, or the fairest Goddess feign'd
   Of three that in Mount IDA naked strove,
   Stood to entertain her guest from Heav'n; no vaile
   Shee needed, Vertue-proof, no thought infirme
   Alterd her cheek.  On whom the Angel HAILE
   Bestowd, the holy salutation us'd
   Long after to blest MARIE, second EVE.
 
     Haile Mother of Mankind, whose fruitful Womb
   Shall fill the World more numerous with thy Sons
   Then with these various fruits the Trees of God
   Have heap'd this Table.  Rais'd of grassie terf
   Thir Table was, and mossie seats had round,
   And on her ample Square from side to side
   All AUTUMN pil'd, though SPRING and AUTUMN here
   Danc'd hand in hand.  A while discourse they hold;
   No fear lest Dinner coole; when thus began
   Our Authour.  Heav'nly stranger, please to taste
   These bounties which our Nourisher, from whom
   All perfet good unmeasur'd out, descends,
   To us for food and for delight hath caus'd
   The Earth to yeild; unsavourie food perhaps
   To spiritual Natures; only this I know,
   That one Celestial Father gives to all.
 
     To whom the Angel.  Therefore what he gives
   (Whose praise be ever sung) to man in part
   Spiritual, may of purest Spirits be found
   No ingrateful food: and food alike those pure
   Intelligential substances require
   As doth your Rational; and both contain
   Within them every lower facultie
   Of sense, whereby they hear, see, smell, touch, taste,
   Tasting concoct, digest, assimilate,
   And corporeal to incorporeal turn.
   For know, whatever was created, needs
   To be sustaind and fed; of Elements
   The grosser feeds the purer, earth the sea,
   Earth and the Sea feed Air, the Air those Fires
   Ethereal, and as lowest first the Moon;
   Whence in her visage round those spots, unpurg'd
   Vapours not yet into her substance turnd.
   Nor doth the Moon no nourishment exhale
   From her moist Continent to higher Orbes.
   The Sun that light imparts to all, receives
   From all his alimental recompence
   In humid exhalations, and at Even
   Sups with the Ocean: though in Heav'n the Trees
   Of life ambrosial frutage bear, and vines
   Yeild Nectar, though from off the boughs each Morn
   We brush mellifluous Dewes, and find the ground
   Cover'd with pearly grain: yet God hath here
   Varied his bounty so with new delights,
   As may compare with Heaven; and to taste
   Think not I shall be nice.  So down they sat,
   And to thir viands fell, nor seemingly
   The Angel, nor in mist, the common gloss
   Of Theologians, but with keen dispatch
   Of real hunger, and concoctive heate
   To transubstantiate; what redounds, transpires
   Through Spirits with ease; nor wonder; if by fire
   Of sooty coal the Empiric Alchimist
   Can turn, or holds it possible to turn
   Metals of drossiest Ore to perfet Gold
   As from the Mine.  Mean while at Table EVE
   Ministerd naked, and thir flowing cups
   With pleasant liquors crown'd: O innocence
   Deserving Paradise! if ever, then,
   Then had the Sons of God excuse to have bin
   Enamour'd at that sight; but in those hearts
   Love unlibidinous reign'd, nor jealousie
   Was understood, the injur'd Lovers Hell.
 
     Thus when with meats & drinks they had suffic'd,
   Not burd'nd Nature, sudden mind arose
   In ADAM, not to let th' occasion pass
   Given him by this great Conference to know
   Of things above his World, and of thir being
   Who dwell in Heav'n, whose excellence he saw
   Transcend his own so farr, whose radiant forms
   Divine effulgence, whose high Power so far
   Exceeded human, and his wary speech
   Thus to th' Empyreal Minister he fram'd.
 
     Inhabitant with God, now know I well
   Thy favour, in this honour done to man,
   Under whose lowly roof thou hast voutsaf't
   To enter, and these earthly fruits to taste,
   Food not of Angels, yet accepted so,
   As that more willingly thou couldst not seem
   At Heav'ns high feasts to have fed: yet what compare?
 
      To whom the winged Hierarch repli'd.
   O ADAM, one Almightie is, from whom
   All things proceed, and up to him return,
   If not deprav'd from good, created all
   Such to perfection, one first matter all,
   Indu'd with various forms, various degrees
   Of substance, and in things that live, of life;
   But more refin'd, more spiritous, and pure,
   As neerer to him plac't or neerer tending
   Each in thir several active Sphears assignd,
   Till body up to spirit work, in bounds
   Proportiond to each kind.  So from the root
   Springs lighter the green stalk, from thence the leaves
   More aerie, last the bright consummate floure
   Spirits odorous breathes: flours and thir fruit
   Mans nourishment, by gradual scale sublim'd
   To vital Spirits aspire, to animal,
   To intellectual, give both life and sense,
   Fansie and understanding, whence the soule
   Reason receives, and reason is her being,
   Discursive, or Intuitive; discourse
   Is oftest yours, the latter most is ours,
   Differing but in degree, of kind the same.
   Wonder not then, what God for you saw good
   If I refuse not, but convert, as you,
   To proper substance; time may come when men
   With Angels may participate, and find
   No inconvenient Diet, nor too light Fare:
   And from these corporal nutriments perhaps
   Your bodies may at last turn all to Spirit
   Improv'd by tract of time, and wingd ascend
   Ethereal, as wee, or may at choice
   Here or in Heav'nly Paradises dwell;
   If ye be found obedient, and retain
   Unalterably firm his love entire
   Whose progenie you are.  Mean while enjoy
   Your fill what happiness this happie state
   Can comprehend, incapable of more.
 
     To whom the Patriarch of mankind repli'd.
   O favourable spirit, propitious guest,
   Well hast thou taught the way that might direct
   Our knowledge, and the scale of Nature set
   From center to circumference, whereon
   In contemplation of created things
   By steps we may ascend to God.  But say,
   What meant that caution joind, IF YE BE FOUND
   OBEDIENT? can wee want obedience then
   To him, or possibly his love desert
   Who formd us from the dust, and plac'd us here
   Full to the utmost measure of what bliss
   Human desires can seek or apprehend?
 
     To whom the Angel.  Son of Heav'n and Earth,
   Attend: That thou art happie, owe to God;
   That thou continu'st such, owe to thy self,
   That is, to thy obedience; therein stand.
   This was that caution giv'n thee; be advis'd.
   God made thee perfet, not immutable;
   And good he made thee, but to persevere
   He left it in thy power, ordaind thy will
   By nature free, not over-rul'd by Fate
   Inextricable, or strict necessity;
   Our voluntarie service he requires,
   Not our necessitated, such with him
   Findes no acceptance, nor can find, for how
   Can hearts, not free, be tri'd whether they serve
   Willing or no, who will but what they must
   By Destinie, and can no other choose?
   My self and all th' Angelic Host that stand
   In sight of God enthron'd, our happie state
   Hold, as you yours, while our obedience holds;
   On other surety none; freely we serve.
   Because wee freely love, as in our will
   To love or not; in this we stand or fall:
   And som are fall'n, to disobedience fall'n,
   And so from Heav'n to deepest Hell; O fall
   From what high state of bliss into what woe!
 
     To whom our great Progenitor.  Thy words
   Attentive, and with more delighted eare
   Divine instructer, I have heard, then when
   Cherubic Songs by night from neighbouring Hills
   Aereal Music send: nor knew I not
   To be both will and deed created free;
   Yet that we never shall forget to love
   Our maker, and obey him whose command
   Single, is yet so just, my constant thoughts
   Assur'd me and still assure: though what thou tellst
   Hath past in Heav'n, som doubt within me move,
   But more desire to hear, if thou consent,
   The full relation, which must needs be strange,
   Worthy of Sacred silence to be heard;
   And we have yet large day, for scarce the Sun
   Hath finisht half his journey, and scarce begins
   His other half in the great Zone of Heav'n.
 
     Thus ADAM made request, and RAPHAEL
   After short pause assenting, thus began.
 
     High matter thou injoinst me, O prime of men,
   Sad task and hard, for how shall I relate
   To human sense th' invisible exploits
   Of warring Spirits; how without remorse
   The ruin of so many glorious once
   And perfet while they stood; how last unfould
   The secrets of another world, perhaps
   Not lawful to reveal? yet for thy good
   This is dispenc't, and what surmounts the reach
   Of human sense, I shall delineate so,
   By lik'ning spiritual to corporal forms,
   As may express them best, though what if Earth
   Be but the shaddow of Heav'n, and things therein
   Each to other like, more then on earth is thought?
 
     As yet this world was not, and CHAOS wilde
   Reignd where these Heav'ns now rowl, where Earth now rests
   Upon her Center pois'd, when on a day
   (For Time, though in Eternitie, appli'd
   To motion, measures all things durable
   By present, past, and future) on such day
   As Heav'ns great Year brings forth, th' Empyreal Host
   Of Angels by Imperial summons call'd,
   Innumerable before th' Almighties Throne
   Forthwith from all the ends of Heav'n appeerd
   Under thir Hierarchs in orders bright
   Ten thousand thousand Ensignes high advanc'd,
   Standards, and Gonfalons twixt Van and Reare
   Streame in the Aire, and for distinction serve
   Of Hierarchies, of Orders, and Degrees;
   Or in thir glittering Tissues bear imblaz'd
   Holy Memorials, acts of Zeale and Love
   Recorded eminent.  Thus when in Orbes
   Of circuit inexpressible they stood,
   Orb within Orb, the Father infinite,
   By whom in bliss imbosom'd sat the Son,
   Amidst as from a flaming Mount, whoseop
   Brightness had made invisible, thus spake.
 
     Hear all ye Angels, Progenie of Light,
   Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Vertues, Powers,
   Hear my Decree, which unrevok't shall stand.
   This day I have begot whom I declare
   My onely Son, and on this holy Hill
   Him have anointed, whom ye now behold
   At my right hand; your Head I him appoint;
   And by my Self have sworn to him shall bow
   All knees in Heav'n, and shall confess him Lord:
   Under his great Vice-gerent Reign abide
   United as one individual Soule
   For ever happie: him who disobeyes
   Mee disobeyes, breaks union, and that day
   Cast out from God and blessed vision, falls
   Into utter darkness, deep ingulft, his place
   Ordaind without redemption, without end.
 
     So spake th' Omnipotent, and with his words
   All seemd well pleas'd, all seem'd, but were not all.
   That day, as other solem dayes, they spent
   In song and dance about the sacred Hill,
   Mystical dance, which yonder starrie Spheare
   Of Planets and of fixt in all her Wheeles
   Resembles nearest, mazes intricate,
   Eccentric, intervolv'd, yet regular
   Then most, when most irregular they seem:
   And in thir motions harmonie Divine
   So smooths her charming tones, that Gods own ear
   Listens delighted.  Eevning approachd
   (For we have also our Eevning and our Morn,
   We ours for change delectable, not need)
   Forthwith from dance to sweet repast they turn
   Desirous, all in Circles as they stood,
   Tables are set, and on a sudden pil'd
   With Angels Food, and rubied Nectar flows:
   In Pearl, in Diamond, and massie Gold,
   Fruit of delicious Vines, the growth of Heav'n.
   They eat, they drink, and with refection sweet
   Are fill'd, before th' all bounteous King, who showrd
   With copious hand, rejoycing in thir joy.
   Now when ambrosial Night with Clouds exhal'd
   From that high mount of God, whence light & shade
   Spring both, the face of brightest Heav'n had changd
   To grateful Twilight (for Night comes not there
   In darker veile) and roseat Dews dispos'd
   All but the unsleeping eyes of God to rest,
   Wide over all the Plain, and wider farr
   Then all this globous Earth in Plain outspred,
   (Such are the Courts of God) Th' Angelic throng
   Disperst in Bands and Files thir Camp extend
   By living Streams among the Trees of Life,
   Pavilions numberless, and sudden reard,
   Celestial Tabernacles, where they slept
   Fannd with coole Winds, save those who in thir course
   Melodious Hymns about the sovran Throne
   Alternate all night long: but not so wak'd
   SATAN, so call him now, his former name
   Is heard no more Heav'n; he of the first,
   If not the first Arch-Angel, great in Power,
   In favour and praeeminence, yet fraught
   With envie against the Son of God, that day
   Honourd by his great Father, and proclaimd
   MESSIAH King anointed, could not beare
   Through pride that sight, and thought himself impaird.
   Deep malice thence conceiving & disdain,
   Soon as midnight brought on the duskie houre
   Friendliest to sleep and silence, he resolv'd
   With all his Legions to dislodge, and leave
   Unworshipt, unobey'd the Throne supream
   Contemptuous, and his next subordinate
   Awak'ning, thus to him in secret spake.
 
     Sleepst thou Companion dear, what sleep can close
   Thy eye-lids? and remembrest what Decree
   Of yesterday, so late hath past the lips
   Of Heav'ns Almightie.  Thou to me thy thoughts
   Wast wont, I mine to thee was wont to impart;
   Both waking we were one; how then can now
   Thy sleep dissent? new Laws thou seest impos'd;
   New Laws from him who reigns, new minds may raise
   In us who serve, new Counsels, to debate
   What doubtful may ensue, more in this place
   To utter is not safe.  Assemble thou
   Of all those Myriads which we lead the chief;
   Tell them that by command, ere yet dim Night
   Her shadowie Cloud withdraws, I am to haste,
   And all who under me thir Banners wave,
   Homeward with flying march where we possess
   The Quarters of the North, there to prepare
   Fit entertainment to receive our King
   The great MESSIAH, and his new commands,
   Who speedily through all the Hierarchies
   Intends to pass triumphant, and give Laws.
 
     So spake the false Arch-Angel, and infus'd
   Bad influence into th' unwarie brest
   Of his Associate; hee together calls,
   Or several one by one, the Regent Powers,
   Under him Regent, tells, as he was taught,
   That the most High commanding, now ere Night,
   Now ere dim Night had disincumberd Heav'n,
   The great Hierarchal Standard was to move;
   Tells the suggested cause, and casts between
   Ambiguous words and jealousies, to sound
   Or taint integritie; but all obey'd
   The wonted signal, and superior voice
   Of thir great Potentate; for great indeed
   His name, and high was his degree in Heav'n;
   His count'nance, as the Morning Starr that guides
   The starrie flock, allur'd them, and with lyes
   Drew after him the third part of Heav'ns Host:
   Mean while th' Eternal eye, whose sight discernes
   Abstrusest thoughts, from forth his holy Mount
   And from within the golden Lamps that burne
   Nightly before him, saw without thir light
   Rebellion rising, saw in whom, how spred
   Among the sons of Morn, what multitudes
   Were banded to oppose his high Decree;
   And smiling to his onely Son thus said.
 
     Son, thou in whom my glory I behold
   In full resplendence, Heir of all my might,
   Neerly it now concernes us to be sure
   Of our Omnipotence, and with what Arms
   We mean to hold what anciently we claim
   Of Deitie or Empire, such a foe
   Is rising, who intends to erect his Throne
   Equal to ours, throughout the spacious North;
   Nor so content, hath in his thought to trie
   In battel, what our Power is, or our right.
   Let us advise, and to this hazard draw
   With speed what force is left, and all imploy
   In our defence, lest unawares we lose
   This our high place, our Sanctuarie, our Hill.
 
     To whom the Son with calm aspect and cleer
   Light'ning Divine, ineffable, serene,
   Made answer.  Mightie Father, thou thy foes
   Justly hast in derision, and secure
   Laugh'st at thir vain designes and tumults vain,
   Matter to mee of Glory, whom thir hate
   Illustrates, when they see all Regal Power
   Giv'n me to quell thir pride, and in event
   Know whether I be dextrous to subdue
   Thy Rebels, or be found the worst in Heav'n.
 
     So spake the Son, but SATAN with his Powers
   Farr was advanc't on winged speed, an Host
   Innumerable as the Starrs of Night,
   Or Starrs of Morning, Dew-drops, which the Sun
   Impearls on every leaf and every flouer.
   Regions they pass'd, the mightie Regencies
   Of Seraphim and Potentates and Thrones
   In thir triple Degrees, Regions to which
   All thy Dominion, ADAM, is no more
   Then what this Garden is to all the Earth,
   And all the Sea, from one entire globose
   Stretcht into Longitude; which having pass'd
   At length into the limits of the North
   They came, and SATAN to his Royal seat
   High on a Hill, far blazing, as a Mount
   Rais'd on a Mount, with Pyramids and Towrs
   From Diamond Quarries hew'n, & Rocks of Gold,
   The Palace of great LUCIFER, (so call
   That Structure in the Dialect of men
   Interpreted) which not long after, hee
   Affecting all equality with God,
   In imitation of that Mount whereon
   MESSIAH was declar'd in sight of Heav'n,
   The Mountain of the Congregation call'd;
   For thither he assembl'd all his Train,
   Pretending so commanded to consult
   About the great reception of thir King,
   Thither to come, and with calumnious Art
   Of counterfeted truth thus held thir ears.
 
     Thrones, Dominations, Princedomes, Vertues, Powers,
   If these magnific Titles yet remain
   Not meerly titular, since by Decree
   Another now hath to himself ingross't
   All Power, and us eclipst under the name
   Of King anointed, for whom all this haste
   Of midnight march, and hurried meeting here,
   This onely to consult how we may best
   With what may be devis'd of honours new
   Receive him coming to receive from us
   Knee-tribute yet unpaid, prostration vile,
   Too much to one, but double how endur'd,
   To one and to his image now proclaim'd?
   But what if better counsels might erect
   Our minds and teach us to cast off this Yoke?
   Will ye submit your necks, and chuse to bend
   The supple knee? ye will not, if I trust
   To know ye right, or if ye know your selves
   Natives and Sons of Heav'n possest before
   By none, and if not equal all, yet free,
   Equally free; for Orders and Degrees
   Jarr not with liberty, but well consist.
   Who can in reason then or right assume
   Monarchie over such as live by right
   His equals, if in power and splendor less,
   In freedome equal? or can introduce
   Law and Edict on us, who without law
   Erre not, much less for this to be our Lord,
   And look for adoration to th' abuse
   Of those Imperial Titles which assert
   Our being ordain'd to govern, not to serve?
 
     Thus farr his bold discourse without controule
   Had audience, when among the Seraphim
   ABDIEL, then whom none with more zeale ador'd
   The Deitie, and divine commands obei'd,
   Stood up, and in a flame of zeale severe
   The current of his fury thus oppos'd.
 
     O argument blasphemous, false and proud!
   Words which no eare ever to hear in Heav'n
   Expected, least of all from thee, ingrate
   In place thy self so high above thy Peeres.
   Canst thou with impious obloquie condemne
   The just Decree of God, pronounc't and sworn,
   That to his only Son by right endu'd
   With Regal Scepter, every Soule in Heav'n
   Shall bend the knee, and in that honour due
   Confess him rightful King? unjust thou saist
   Flatly unjust, to binde with Laws the free,
   And equal over equals to let Reigne,
   One over all with unsucceeded power.
   Shalt thou give Law to God, shalt thou dispute
   With him the points of libertie, who made
   Thee what thou art, & formd the Pow'rs of Heav'n
   Such as he pleasd, and circumscrib'd thir being?
   Yet by experience taught we know how good,
   And of our good, and of our dignitie
   How provident he is, how farr from thought
   To make us less, bent rather to exalt
   Our happie state under one Head more neer
   United.  But to grant it thee unjust,
   That equal over equals Monarch Reigne:
   Thy self though great & glorious dost thou count,
   Or all Angelic Nature joind in one,
   Equal to him begotten Son, by whom
   As by his Word the mighty Father made
   All things, ev'n thee, and all the Spirits of Heav'n
   By him created in thir bright degrees,
   Crownd them with Glory, & to thir Glory nam'd
   Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Vertues, Powers
   Essential Powers, nor by his Reign obscur'd,
   But more illustrious made, since he the Head
   One of our number thus reduc't becomes,
   His Laws our Laws, all honour to him done
   Returns our own.  Cease then this impious rage,
   And tempt not these; but hast'n to appease
   Th' incensed Father, and th' incensed Son,
   While Pardon may be found in time besought.
 
     So spake the fervent Angel, but his zeale
   None seconded, as out of season judg'd,
   Or singular and rash, whereat rejoic'd
   Th' Apostat, and more haughty thus repli'd.
   That we were formd then saist thou? & the work
   Of secondarie hands, by task transferd
   From Father to his Son? strange point and new!
   Doctrin which we would know whence learnt: who saw
   When this creation was? rememberst thou
   Thy making, while the Maker gave thee being?
   We know no time when we were not as now;
   Know none before us, self-begot, self-rais'd
   By our own quick'ning power, when fatal course
   Had circl'd his full Orbe, the birth mature
   Of this our native Heav'n, Ethereal Sons.
   Our puissance is our own, our own right hand
   Shall teach us highest deeds, by proof to try
   Who is our equal: then thou shalt behold
   Whether by supplication we intend
   Address, and to begirt th' Almighty Throne
   Beseeching or besieging.  This report,
   These tidings carrie to th' anointed King;
   And fly, ere evil intercept thy flight.
 
     He said, and as the sound of waters deep
   Hoarce murmur echo'd to his words applause
   Through the infinite Host, nor less for that
   The flaming Seraph fearless, though alone
   Encompass'd round with foes, thus answerd bold.
 
     O alienate from God, O spirit accurst,
   Forsak'n of all good; I see thy fall
   Determind, and thy hapless crew involv'd
   In this perfidious fraud, contagion spred
   Both of thy crime and punishment: henceforth
   No more be troubl'd how to quit the yoke
   Of Gods MESSIAH; those indulgent Laws
   Will not be now voutsaf't, other Decrees
   Against thee are gon forth without recall;
   That Golden Scepter which thou didst reject
   Is now an Iron Rod to bruise and breake
   Thy disobedience.  Well thou didst advise,
   Yet not for thy advise or threats I fly
   These wicked Tents devoted, least the wrauth
   Impendent, raging into sudden flame
   Distinguish not: for soon expect to feel
   His Thunder on thy head, devouring fire.
   Then who created thee lamenting learne,
   When who can uncreate thee thou shalt know.
 
     So spake the Seraph ABDIEL faithful found,
   Among the faithless, faithful only hee;
   Among innumerable false, unmov'd,
   Unshak'n, unseduc'd, unterrifi'd
   His Loyaltie he kept, his Love, his Zeale;
   Nor number, nor example with him wrought
   To swerve from truth, or change his constant mind
   Though single.  From amidst them forth he passd,
   Long way through hostile scorn, which he susteind
   Superior, nor of violence fear'd aught;
   And with retorted scorn his back he turn'd
   On those proud Towrs to swift destruction doom'd.
 
        THE END OF THE FIFTH BOOK.
 
 
   PARADISE LOST
 
   BOOK VI.
 
   All night the dreadless Angel unpursu'd
   Through Heav'ns wide Champain held his way, till Morn,
   Wak't by the circling Hours, with rosie hand
   Unbarr'd the gates of Light.  There is a Cave
   Within the Mount of God, fast by his Throne,
   Where light and darkness in perpetual round
   Lodge and dislodge by turns, which makes through Heav'n
   Grateful vicissitude, like Day and Night;
   Light issues forth, and at the other dore
   Obsequious darkness enters, till her houre
   To veile the Heav'n, though darkness there might well
   Seem twilight here; and now went forth the Morn
   Such as in highest Heav'n, arrayd in Gold
   Empyreal, from before her vanisht Night,
   Shot through with orient Beams: when all the Plain
   Coverd with thick embatteld Squadrons bright,
   Chariots and flaming Armes, and fierie Steeds
   Reflecting blaze on blaze, first met his view:
   Warr he perceav'd, warr in procinct, and found
   Already known what he for news had thought
   To have reported: gladly then he mixt
   Among those friendly Powers who him receav'd
   With joy and acclamations loud, that one
   That of so many Myriads fall'n, yet one
   Returnd not lost: On to the sacred hill
   They led him high applauded, and present
   Before the seat supream; from whence a voice
   From midst a Golden Cloud thus milde was heard.
 
     Servant of God, well done, well hast thou fought
   The better fight, who single hast maintaind
   Against revolted multitudes the Cause
   Of Truth, in word mightier then they in Armes;
   And for the testimonie of Truth hast born
   Universal reproach, far worse to beare
   Then violence: for this was all thy care
   To stand approv'd in sight of God, though Worlds
   Judg'd thee perverse: the easier conquest now
   Remains thee, aided by this host of friends,
   Back on thy foes more glorious to return
   Then scornd thou didst depart, and to subdue
   By force, who reason for thir Law refuse,
   Right reason for thir Law, and for thir King
   MESSIAH, who by right of merit Reigns.
   Goe MICHAEL of Celestial Armies Prince,
   And thou in Military prowess next
   GABRIEL, lead forth to Battel these my Sons
   Invincible, lead forth my armed Saints
   By Thousands and by Millions rang'd for fight;
   Equal in number to that Godless crew
   Rebellious, them with Fire and hostile Arms
   Fearless assault, and to the brow of Heav'n
   Pursuing drive them out from God and bliss,
   Into thir place of punishment, the Gulf
   Of TARTARUS, which ready opens wide
   His fiery CHAOS to receave thir fall.
 
     So spake the Sovran voice, and Clouds began
   To darken all the Hill, and smoak to rowl
   In duskie wreathes, reluctant flames, the signe
   Of wrauth awak't: nor with less dread the loud
   Ethereal Trumpet from on high gan blow:
   At which command the Powers Militant,
   That stood for Heav'n, in mighty Quadrate joyn'd
   Of Union irresistible, mov'd on
   In silence thir bright Legions, to the sound
   Of instrumental Harmonie that breath'd
   Heroic Ardor to advent'rous deeds
   Under thir God-like Leaders, in the Cause
   Of God and his MESSIAH.  On they move
   Indissolubly firm; nor obvious Hill,
   Nor streit'ning Vale, nor Wood, nor Stream divides
   Thir perfet ranks; for high above the ground
   Thir march was, and the passive Air upbore
   Thir nimble tread; as when the total kind
   Of Birds in orderly array on wing
   Came summond over EDEN to receive
   Thir names of thee; so over many a tract
   Of Heav'n they march'd, and many a Province wide
   Tenfold the length of this terrene: at last
   Farr in th' Horizon to the North appeer'd
   From skirt to skirt a fierie Region, stretcht
   In battailous aspect, and neerer view
   Bristl'd with upright beams innumerable
   Of rigid Spears, and Helmets throng'd, and Shields
   Various, with boastful Argument portraid,
   The banded Powers of SATAN hasting on
   With furious expedition; for they weend
   That self same day by fight, or by surprize
   To win the Mount of God, and on his Throne
   To set the envier of his State, the proud
   Aspirer, but thir thoughts prov'd fond and vain
   In the mid way: though strange to us it seemd
   At first, that Angel should with Angel warr,
   And in fierce hosting meet, who wont to meet
   So oft in Festivals of joy and love
   Unanimous, as sons of one great Sire
   Hymning th' Eternal Father: but the shout
   Of Battel now began, and rushing sound
   Of onset ended soon each milder thought.
   High in the midst exalted as a God
   Th' Apostat in his Sun-bright Chariot sate
   Idol of Majestie Divine, enclos'd
   With Flaming Cherubim, and golden Shields;
   Then lighted from his gorgeous Throne, for now
   'Twixt Host and Host but narrow space was left,
   A dreadful interval, and Front to Front
   Presented stood in terrible array
   Of hideous length: before the cloudie Van,
   On the rough edge of battel ere it joyn'd,
   SATAN with vast and haughtie strides advanc't,
   Came towring, armd in Adamant and Gold;
   ABDIEL that sight endur'd not, where he stood
   Among the mightiest, bent on highest deeds,
   And thus his own undaunted heart explores.
 
     O Heav'n! that such resemblance of the Highest
   Should yet remain, where faith and realtie
   Remain not; wherfore should not strength & might
   There fail where Vertue fails, or weakest prove
   Where boldest; though to sight unconquerable?
   His puissance, trusting in th' Almightie's aide,
   I mean to try, whose Reason I have tri'd
   Unsound and false; nor is it aught but just,
   That he who in debate of Truth hath won,
   Should win in Arms, in both disputes alike
   Victor; though brutish that contest and foule,
   When Reason hath to deal with force, yet so
   Most reason is that Reason overcome.
 
     So pondering, and from his armed Peers
   Forth stepping opposite, half way he met
   His daring foe, at this prevention more
   Incens't, and thus securely him defi'd.
 
     Proud, art thou met? thy hope was to have reacht
   The highth of thy aspiring unoppos'd,
   The Throne of God unguarded, and his side
   Abandond at the terror of thy Power
   Or potent tongue; fool, not to think how vain
   Against th' Omnipotent to rise in Arms;
   Who out of smallest things could without end
   Have rais'd incessant Armies to defeat
   Thy folly; or with solitarie hand
   Reaching beyond all limit, at one blow
   Unaided could have finisht thee, and whelmd
   Thy Legions under darkness; but thou seest
   All are not of thy Train; there be who Faith
   Prefer, and Pietie to God, though then
   To thee not visible, when I alone
   Seemd in thy World erroneous to dissent
   From all: my Sect thou seest, now learn too late
   How few somtimes may know, when thousands err.
 
       Whom the grand foe with scornful eye askance
   Thus answerd.  Ill for thee, but in wisht houre
   Of my revenge, first sought for thou returnst
   From flight, seditious Angel, to receave
   Thy merited reward, the first assay
   Of this right hand provok't, since first that tongue
   Inspir'd with contradiction durst oppose
   A third part of the Gods, in Synod met
   Thir Deities to assert, who while they feel
   Vigour Divine within them, can allow
   Omnipotence to none.  But well thou comst
   Before thy fellows, ambitious to win
   From me som Plume, that thy success may show
   Destruction to the rest: this pause between
   (Unanswerd least thou boast) to let thee know;
   At first I thought that Libertie and Heav'n
   To heav'nly Soules had bin all one; but now
   I see that most through sloth had rather serve,
   Ministring Spirits, traind up in Feast and Song;
   Such hast thou arm'd, the Minstrelsie of Heav'n,
   Servilitie with freedom to contend,
   As both thir deeds compar'd this day shall prove.
 
     To whom in brief thus ABDIEL stern repli'd.
   Apostat, still thou errst, nor end wilt find
   Of erring, from the path of truth remote:
   Unjustly thou deprav'st it with the name
   Of SERVITUDE to serve whom God ordains,
   Or Nature; God and Nature bid the same,
   When he who rules is worthiest, and excells
   Them whom he governs.  This is servitude,
   To serve th' unwise, or him who hath rebelld
   Against his worthier, as thine now serve thee,
   Thy self not free, but to thy self enthrall'd;
   Yet leudly dar'st our ministring upbraid.
   Reign thou in Hell thy Kingdom, let mee serve
   In Heav'n God ever blessed, and his Divine
   Behests obey, worthiest to be obey'd,
   Yet Chains in Hell, not Realms expect: mean while
   From mee returnd, as erst thou saidst, from flight,
   This greeting on thy impious Crest receive.
 
     So saying, a noble stroke he lifted high,
   Which hung not, but so swift with tempest fell
   On the proud Crest of SATAN, that no sight,
   Nor motion of swift thought, less could his Shield
   Such ruin intercept: ten paces huge
   He back recoild; the tenth on bended knee
   His massie Spear upstaid; as if on Earth
   Winds under ground or waters forcing way
   Sidelong, had push't a Mountain from his seat
   Half sunk with all his Pines.  Amazement seis'd
   The Rebel Thrones, but greater rage to see
   Thus foil'd thir mightiest, ours joy filld, and shout,
   Presage of Victorie and fierce desire
   Of Battel: whereat MICHAEL bid sound
   Th' Arch-Angel trumpet; through the vast of Heav'n
   It sounded, and the faithful Armies rung
   HOSANNA to the Highest: nor stood at gaze
   The adverse Legions, nor less hideous joyn'd
   The horrid shock: now storming furie rose,
   And clamour such as heard in Heav'n till now
   Was never, Arms on Armour clashing bray'd
   Horrible discord, and the madding Wheeles
   Of brazen Chariots rag'd; dire was the noise
   Of conflict; over head the dismal hiss
   Of fiery Darts in flaming volies flew,
   And flying vaulted either Host with fire.
   Sounder fierie Cope together rush'd
   Both Battels maine, with ruinous assault
   And inextinguishable rage; all Heav'n
   Resounded, and had Earth bin then, all Earth
   Had to her Center shook.  What wonder? when
   Millions of fierce encountring Angels fought
   On either side, the least of whom could weild
   These Elements, and arm him with the force
   Of all thir Regions: how much more of Power
   Armie against Armie numberless to raise
   Dreadful combustion warring, and disturb,
   Though not destroy, thir happie Native seat;
   Had not th' Eternal King Omnipotent
   From his strong hold of Heav'n high over-rul'd
   And limited thir might; though numberd such
   As each divided Legion might have seemd
   A numerous Host, in strength each armed hand
   A Legion; led in fight, yet Leader seemd
   Each Warriour single as in Chief, expert
   When to advance, or stand, or turn the sway
   Of Battel, open when, and when to close
   The ridges of grim Warr; no thought of flight,
   None of retreat, no unbecoming deed
   That argu'd fear; each on himself reli'd,
   As onely in his arm the moment lay
   Of victorie; deeds of eternal fame
   Were don, but infinite: for wide was spred
   That Warr and various; somtimes on firm ground
   A standing fight, then soaring on main wing
   Tormented all the Air; all Air seemd then
   Conflicting Fire: long time in eeven scale
   The Battel hung; till SATAN, who that day
   Prodigious power had shewn, and met in Armes
   No equal, raunging through the dire attack
   Of fighting Seraphim confus'd, at length
   Saw where the Sword of MICHAEL smote, and fell'd
   Squadrons at once, with huge two-handed sway
   Brandisht aloft the horrid edge came down
   Wide wasting; such destruction to withstand
   He hasted, and oppos'd the rockie Orb
   Of tenfold Adamant, his ample Shield
   A vast circumference: At his approach
   The great Arch-Angel from his warlike toile
   Surceas'd, and glad as hoping here to end
   Intestine War in Heav'n, the arch foe subdu'd
   Or Captive drag'd in Chains, with hostile frown
   And visage all enflam'd first thus began.
 
     Author of evil, unknown till thy revolt,
   Unnam'd in Heav'n, now plenteous, as thou seest
   These Acts of hateful strife, hateful to all,
   Though heaviest by just measure on thy self
   And thy adherents: how hast thou disturb'd
   Heav'ns blessed peace, and into Nature brought
   Miserie, uncreated till the crime
   Of thy Rebellion? how hast thou instill'd
   Thy malice into thousands, once upright
   And faithful, now prov'd false.  But think not here
   To trouble Holy Rest; Heav'n casts thee out
   From all her Confines.  Heav'n the seat of bliss
   Brooks not the works of violence and Warr.
   Hence then, and evil go with thee along
   Thy ofspring, to the place of evil, Hell,
   Thou and thy wicked crew; there mingle broiles,
   Ere this avenging Sword begin thy doome,
   Or som more sudden vengeance wing'd from God
   Precipitate thee with augmented paine.
 
     So spake the Prince of Angels; to whom thus
   The Adversarie.  Nor think thou with wind
   Of airie threats to aw whom yet with deeds
   Thou canst not.  Hast thou turnd the least of these
   To flight, or if to fall, but that they rise
   Unvanquisht, easier to transact with mee
   That thou shouldst hope, imperious, & with threats
   To chase me hence? erre not that so shall end
   The strife which thou call'st evil, but wee style
   The strife of Glorie: which we mean to win,
   Or turn this Heav'n it self into the Hell
   Thou fablest, here however to dwell free,
   If not to reign: mean while thy utmost force,
   And join him nam'd ALMIGHTIE to thy aid,
   I flie not, but have sought thee farr and nigh.
 
     They ended parle, and both addrest for fight
   Unspeakable; for who, though with the tongue
   Of Angels, can relate, or to what things
   Liken on Earth conspicuous, that may lift
   Human imagination to such highth
   Of Godlike Power: for likest Gods they seemd,
   Stood they or mov'd, in stature, motion, arms
   Fit to decide the Empire of great Heav'n.
   Now wav'd thir fierie Swords, and in the Aire
   Made horrid Circles; two broad Suns thir Shields
   Blaz'd opposite, while expectation stood
   In horror; from each hand with speed retir'd
   Where erst was thickest fight, th' Angelic throng,
   And left large field, unsafe within the wind
   Of such commotion, such as to set forth
   Great things by small, If Natures concord broke,
   Among the Constellations warr were sprung,
   Two Planets rushing from aspect maligne
   Of fiercest opposition in mid Skie,
   Should combat, and thir jarring Sphears confound.
   Together both with next to Almightie Arme,
   Uplifted imminent one stroke they aim'd
   That might determine, and not need repeate,
   As not of power, at once; nor odds appeerd
   In might or swift prevention; but the sword
   Of MICHAEL from the Armorie of God
   Was giv'n him temperd so, that neither keen
   Nor solid might resist that edge: it met
   The sword of SATAN with steep force to smite
   Descending, and in half cut sheere, nor staid,
   But with swift wheele reverse, deep entring shar'd
   All his right side; then SATAN first knew pain,
   And writh'd him to and fro convolv'd; so sore
   The griding sword with discontinuous wound
   Pass'd through him, but th' Ethereal substance clos'd
   Not long divisible, and from the gash
   A stream of Nectarous humor issuing flow'd
   Sanguin, such as Celestial Spirits may bleed,
   And all his Armour staind ere while so bright.
   Forthwith on all sides to his aide was run
   By Angels many and strong, who interpos'd
   Defence, while others bore him on thir Shields
   Back to his Chariot; where it stood retir'd
   From off the files of warr; there they him laid
   Gnashing for anguish and despite and shame
   To find himself not matchless, and his pride
   Humbl'd by such rebuke, so farr beneath
   His confidence to equal God in power.
   Yet soon he heal'd; for Spirits that live throughout
   Vital in every part, not as frail man
   In Entrailes, Heart or Head, Liver or Reines,
   Cannot but by annihilating die;
   Nor in thir liquid texture mortal wound
   Receive, no more then can the fluid Aire:
   All Heart they live, all Head, all Eye, all Eare,
   All Intellect, all Sense, and as they please,
   They Limb themselves, and colour, shape or size
   Assume, as likes them best, condense or rare.
 
     Mean while in other parts like deeds deservd
   Memorial, where the might of GABRIEL fought,
   And with fierce Ensignes pierc'd the deep array
   Of MOLOC furious King, who him defi'd,
   And at his Chariot wheeles to drag him bound
   Threatn'd, nor from the Holie One of Heav'n
   Refrein'd his tongue blasphemous; but anon
   Down clov'n to the waste, with shatterd Armes
   And uncouth paine fled bellowing.  On each wing
   URIEL and RAPHAEL his vaunting foe,
   Though huge, and in a Rock of Diamond Armd,
   Vanquish'd ADRAMELEC, and ASMADAI,
   Two potent Thrones, that to be less then Gods
   Disdain'd, but meaner thoughts learnd in thir flight,
   Mangl'd with gastly wounds through Plate and Maile.
   Nor stood unmindful ABDIEL to annoy
   The Atheist crew, but with redoubl'd blow
   ARIEL and ARIOC, and the violence
   Of RAMIEL scorcht and blasted overthrew.
   I might relate of thousands, and thir names
   Eternize here on Earth; but those elect
   Angels contented with thir fame in Heav'n
   Seek not the praise of men: the other sort
   In might though wondrous and in Acts of Warr,
   Nor of Renown less eager, yet by doome
   Canceld from Heav'n and sacred memorie,
   Nameless in dark oblivion let them dwell.
   For strength from Truth divided and from Just,
   Illaudable, naught merits but dispraise
   And ignominie, yet to glorie aspires
   Vain glorious, and through infamie seeks fame:
   Therfore Eternal silence be thir doome.
 
     And now thir mightiest quelld, the battel swerv'd,
   With many an inrode gor'd; deformed rout
   Enter'd, and foul disorder; all the ground
   With shiverd armour strow'n, and on a heap
   Chariot and Charioter lay overturnd
   And fierie foaming Steeds; what stood, recoyld
   Orewearied, through the faint Satanic Host
   Defensive scarse, or with pale fear surpris'd,
   Then first with fear surpris'd and sense of paine
   Fled ignominious, to such evil brought
   By sinne of disobedience, till that hour
   Not liable to fear or flight or paine.
   Far otherwise th' inviolable Saints
   In Cubic Phalanx firm advanc't entire,
   Invulnerable, impenitrably arm'd:
   Such high advantages thir innocence
   Gave them above thir foes, not to have sinnd,
   Not to have disobei'd; in fight they stood
   Unwearied, unobnoxious to be pain'd
   By wound, though from thir place by violence mov'd.
 
     Now Night her course began, and over Heav'n
   Inducing darkness, grateful truce impos'd,
   And silence on the odious dinn of Warr:
   Under her Cloudie covert both retir'd,
   Victor and Vanquisht: on the foughten field
   MICHAEL and his Angels prevalent
   Encamping, plac'd in Guard thir Watches round,
   Cherubic waving fires: on th' other part
   SATAN with his rebellious disappeerd,
   Far in the dark dislodg'd, and void of rest,
   His Potentates to Councel call'd by night;
   And in the midst thus undismai'd began.
 
     O now in danger tri'd, now known in Armes
   Not to be overpowerd, Companions deare,
   Found worthy not of Libertie alone,
   Too mean pretense, but what we more affect,
   Honour, Dominion, Glorie, and renowne,
   Who have sustaind one day in doubtful fight,
   (And if one day, why not Eternal dayes?)
   What Heavens Lord had powerfullest to send
   Against us from about his Throne, and judg'd
   Sufficient to subdue us to his will,
   But proves not so: then fallible, it seems,
   Of future we may deem him, though till now
   Omniscient thought.  True is, less firmly arm'd,
   Some disadvantage we endur'd and paine,
   Till now not known, but known as soon contemnd,
   Since now we find this our Empyreal forme
   Incapable of mortal injurie
   Imperishable, and though peirc'd with wound,
   Soon closing, and by native vigour heal'd.
   Of evil then so small as easie think
   The remedie; perhaps more valid Armes,
   Weapons more violent, when next we meet,
   May serve to better us, and worse our foes,
   Or equal what between us made the odds,
   In Nature none: if other hidden cause
   Left them Superiour, while we can preserve
   Unhurt our mindes, and understanding sound,
   Due search and consultation will disclose.
 
     He sat; and in th' assembly next upstood
   NISROC, of Principalities the prime;
   As one he stood escap't from cruel fight,
   Sore toild, his riv'n Armes to havoc hewn,
   And cloudie in aspect thus answering spake.
   Deliverer from new Lords, leader to free
   Enjoyment of our right as Gods; yet hard
   For Gods, and too unequal work we find
   Against unequal armes to fight in paine,
   Against unpaind, impassive; from which evil
   Ruin must needs ensue; for what availes
   Valour or strength, though matchless, quelld with pain
   Which all subdues, and makes remiss the hands
   Of Mightiest.  Sense of pleasure we may well
   Spare out of life perhaps, and not repine,
   But live content, which is the calmest life:
   But pain is perfet miserie, the worst
   Of evils, and excessive, overturnes
   All patience.  He who therefore can invent
   With what more forcible we may offend
   Our yet unwounded Enemies, or arme
   Our selves with like defence, to mee deserves
   No less then for deliverance what we owe.
 
     Whereto with look compos'd SATAN repli'd.
   Not uninvented that, which thou aright
   Beleivst so main to our success, I bring;
   Which of us who beholds the bright surface
   Of this Ethereous mould whereon we stand,
   This continent of spacious Heav'n, adornd
   With Plant, Fruit, Flour Ambrosial, Gemms & Gold,
   Whose Eye so superficially surveyes
   These things, as not to mind from whence they grow
   Deep under ground, materials dark and crude,
   Of spiritous and fierie spume, till toucht
   With Heav'ns ray, and temperd they shoot forth
   So beauteous, op'ning to the ambient light.
   These in thir dark Nativitie the Deep
   Shall yeild us, pregnant with infernal flame,
   Which into hallow Engins long and round
   Thick-rammd, at th' other bore with touch of fire
   Dilated and infuriate shall send forth
   From far with thundring noise among our foes
   Such implements of mischief as shall dash
   To pieces, and orewhelm whatever stands
   Adverse, that they shall fear we have disarmd
   The Thunderer of his only dreaded bolt.
   Nor long shall be our labour, yet ere dawne,
   Effect shall end our wish.  Mean while revive;
   Abandon fear; to strength and counsel joind
   Think nothing hard, much less to be despaird.
   He ended, and his words thir drooping chere
   Enlightn'd, and thir languisht hope reviv'd.
   Th' invention all admir'd, and each, how hee
   To be th' inventer miss'd, so easie it seemd
   Once found, which yet unfound most would have thought
   Impossible: yet haply of thy Race
   In future dayes, if Malice should abound,
   Some one intent on mischief, or inspir'd
   With dev'lish machination might devise
   Like instrument to plague the Sons of men
   For sin, on warr and mutual slaughter bent.
   Forthwith from Councel to the work they flew,
   None arguing stood, innumerable hands
   Were ready, in a moment up they turnd
   Wide the Celestial soile, and saw beneath
   Th' originals of Nature in thir crude
   Conception; Sulphurous and Nitrous Foame
   They found, they mingl'd, and with suttle Art,
   Concocted and adusted they reduc'd
   To blackest grain, and into store conveyd:
   Part hidd'n veins diggd up (nor hath this Earth
   Entrails unlike) of Mineral and Stone,
   Whereof to found thir Engins and thir Balls
   Of missive ruin; part incentive reed
   Provide, pernicious with one touch to fire.
   So all ere day spring, under conscious Night
   Secret they finish'd, and in order set,
   With silent circumspection unespi'd.
   Now when fair Morn Orient in Heav'n appeerd
   Up rose the Victor Angels, and to Arms
   The matin Trumpet Sung: in Arms they stood
   Of Golden Panoplie, refulgent Host,
   Soon banded; others from the dawning Hills
   Lookd round, and Scouts each Coast light-armed scoure,
   Each quarter, to descrie the distant foe,
   Where lodg'd, or whither fled, or if for fight,
   In motion or in alt: him soon they met
   Under spred Ensignes moving nigh, in slow
   But firm Battalion; back with speediest Sail
   ZEPHIEL, of Cherubim the swiftest wing,
   Came flying, and in mid Aire aloud thus cri'd.
 
     Arme, Warriours, Arme for fight, the foe at hand,
   Whom fled we thought, will save us long pursuit
   This day, fear not his flight; so thick a Cloud
   He comes, and settl'd in his face I see
   Sad resolution and secure: let each
   His Adamantine coat gird well, and each
   Fit well his Helme, gripe fast his orbed Shield,
   Born eevn or high, for this day will pour down,
   If I conjecture aught, no drizling showr,
   But ratling storm of Arrows barbd with fire.
   So warnd he them aware themselves, and soon
   In order, quit of all impediment;
   Instant without disturb they took Allarm,
   And onward move Embattelld; when behold
   Not distant far with heavie pace the Foe
   Approaching gross and huge; in hollow Cube
   Training his devilish Enginrie, impal'd
   On every side with shaddowing Squadrons Deep,
   To hide the fraud.  At interview both stood
   A while, but suddenly at head appeerd
   SATAN: And thus was heard Commanding loud.
 
     Vangard, to Right and Left the Front unfould;
   That all may see who hate us, how we seek
   Peace and composure, and with open brest
   Stand readie to receive them, if they like
   Our overture, and turn not back perverse;
   But that I doubt, however witness Heaven,
   Heav'n witness thou anon, while we discharge
   Freely our part: yee who appointed stand
   Do as you have in charge, and briefly touch
   What we propound, and loud that all may hear.
 
     So scoffing in ambiguous words, he scarce
   Had ended; when to Right and Left the Front
   Divided, and to either Flank retir'd.
   Which to our eyes discoverd new and strange,
   A triple-mounted row of Pillars laid
   On Wheels (for like to Pillars most they seem'd
   Or hollow'd bodies made of Oak or Firr
   With branches lopt, in Wood or Mountain fell'd)
   Brass, Iron, Stonie mould, had not thir mouthes
   With hideous orifice gap't on us wide,
   Portending hollow truce; at each behind
   A Seraph stood, and in his hand a Reed
   Stood waving tipt with fire; while we suspense,
   Collected stood within our thoughts amus'd,
   Not long, for sudden all at once thir Reeds
   Put forth, and to a narrow vent appli'd
   With nicest touch.  Immediate in a flame,
   But soon obscur'd with smoak, all Heav'n appeerd,
   From those deep-throated Engins belcht, whose roar
   Emboweld with outragious noise the Air,
   And all her entrails tore, disgorging foule
   Thir devillish glut, chaind Thunderbolts and Hail
   Of Iron Globes, which on the Victor Host
   Level'd, with such impetuous furie smote,
   That whom they hit, none on thir feet might stand,
   Though standing else as Rocks, but down they fell
   By thousands, Angel on Arch-Angel rowl'd;
   The sooner for thir Arms, unarm'd they might
   Have easily as Spirits evaded swift
   By quick contraction or remove; but now
   Foule dissipation follow'd and forc't rout;
   Nor serv'd it to relax thir serried files.
   What should they do? if on they rusht, repulse
   Repeated, and indecent overthrow
   Doubl'd, would render them yet more despis'd,
   And to thir foes a laughter; for in view
   Stood rankt of Seraphim another row
   In posture to displode thir second tire
   Of Thunder: back defeated to return
   They worse abhorr'd.  SATAN beheld thir plight,
   And to his Mates thus in derision call'd.
 
     O Friends, why come not on these Victors proud?
   Ere while they fierce were coming, and when wee,
   To entertain them fair with open Front
   And Brest, (what could we more?) propounded terms
   Of composition, strait they chang'd thir minds,
   Flew off, and into strange vagaries fell,
   As they would dance, yet for a dance they seemd
   Somwhat extravagant and wilde, perhaps
   For joy of offerd peace: but I suppose
   If our proposals once again were heard
   We should compel them to a quick result.
 
     To whom thus BELIAL in like gamesom mood.
   Leader, the terms we sent were terms of weight,
   Of hard contents, and full of force urg'd home,
   Such as we might perceive amus'd them all,
   And stumbl'd many, who receives them right,
   Had need from head to foot well understand;
   Not understood, this gift they have besides,
   They shew us when our foes walk not upright.
 
     So they among themselves in pleasant veine
   Stood scoffing, highthn'd in thir thoughts beyond
   All doubt of Victorie, eternal might
   To match with thir inventions they presum'd
   So easie, and of his Thunder made a scorn,
   And all his Host derided, while they stood
   A while in trouble; but they stood not long,
   Rage prompted them at length, & found them arms
   Against such hellish mischief fit to oppose.
   Forthwith (behold the excellence, the power
   Which God hath in his mighty Angels plac'd)
   Thir Arms away they threw, and to the Hills
   (For Earth hath this variety from Heav'n
   Of pleasure situate in Hill and Dale)
   Light as the Lightning glimps they ran, they flew,
   From thir foundations loosning to and fro
   They pluckt the seated Hills with all thir load,
   Rocks, Waters, Woods, and by the shaggie tops
   Up lifting bore them in thir hands: Amaze,
   Be sure, and terrour seis'd the rebel Host,
   When coming towards them so dread they saw
   The bottom of the Mountains upward turn'd,
   Till on those cursed Engins triple-row
   They saw them whelmd, and all thir confidence
   Under the weight of Mountains buried deep,
   Themselves invaded next, and on thir heads
   Main Promontories flung, which in the Air
   Came shadowing, and opprest whole Legions arm'd,
   Thir armor help'd thir harm, crush't in and brus'd
   Into thir substance pent, which wrought them pain
   Implacable, and many a dolorous groan,
   Long strugling underneath, ere they could wind
   Out of such prison, though Spirits of purest light,
   Purest at first, now gross by sinning grown.
   The rest in imitation to like Armes
   Betook them, and the neighbouring Hills uptore;
   So Hills amid the Air encounterd Hills
   Hurl'd to and fro with jaculation dire,
   That under ground they fought in dismal shade;
   Infernal noise; Warr seem'd a civil Game
   To this uproar; horrid confusion heapt
   Upon confusion rose: and now all Heav'n
   Had gone to wrack, with ruin overspred,
   Had not th' Almightie Father where he sits
   Shrin'd in his Sanctuarie of Heav'n secure,
   Consulting on the sum of things, foreseen
   This tumult, and permitted all, advis'd:
   That his great purpose he might so fulfill,
   To honour his Anointed Son aveng'd
   Upon his enemies, and to declare
   All power on him transferr'd: whence to his Son
   Th' Assessor of his Throne he thus began.
 
     Effulgence of my Glorie, Son belov'd,
   Son in whose face invisible is beheld
   Visibly, what by Deitie I am,
   And in whose hand what by Decree I doe,
   Second Omnipotence, two dayes are past,
   Two dayes, as we compute the dayes of Heav'n,
   Since MICHAEL and his Powers went forth to tame
   These disobedient; sore hath been thir fight,
   As likeliest was, when two such Foes met arm'd;
   For to themselves I left them, and thou knowst,
   Equal in their Creation they were form'd,
   Save what sin hath impaird, which yet hath wrought
   Insensibly, for I suspend thir doom;
   Whence in perpetual fight they needs must last
   Endless, and no solution will be found:
   Warr wearied hath perform'd what Warr can do,
   And to disorder'd rage let loose the reines,
   With Mountains as with Weapons arm'd, which makes
   Wild work in Heav'n, and dangerous to the maine.
   Two dayes are therefore past, the third is thine;
   For thee I have ordain'd it, and thus farr
   Have sufferd, that the Glorie may be thine
   Of ending this great Warr, since none but Thou
   Can end it.  Into thee such Vertue and Grace
   Immense I have transfus'd, that all may know
   In Heav'n and Hell thy Power above compare,
   And this perverse Commotion governd thus,
   To manifest thee worthiest to be Heir
   Of all things, to be Heir and to be King
   By Sacred Unction, thy deserved right.
   Go then thou Mightiest in thy Fathers might,
   Ascend my Chariot, guide the rapid Wheeles
   That shake Heav'ns basis, bring forth all my Warr,
   My Bow and Thunder, my Almightie Arms
   Gird on, and Sword upon thy puissant Thigh;
   Pursue these sons of Darkness, drive them out
   From all Heav'ns bounds into the utter Deep:
   There let them learn, as likes them, to despise
   God and MESSIAH his anointed King.
 
     He said, and on his Son with Rayes direct
   Shon full, he all his Father full exprest
   Ineffably into his face receiv'd,
   And thus the filial Godhead answering spake.
 
     O Father, O Supream of heav'nly Thrones,
   First, Highest, Holiest, Best, thou alwayes seekst
   To glorifie thy Son, I alwayes thee,
   As is most just; this I my Glorie account,
   My exaltation, and my whole delight,
   That thou in me well pleas'd, declarst thy will
   Fulfill'd, which to fulfil is all my bliss.
   Scepter and Power, thy giving, I assume,
   And gladlier shall resign, when in the end
   Thou shalt be All in All, and I in thee
   For ever, and in mee all whom thou lov'st:
   But whom thou hat'st, I hate, and can put on
   Thy terrors, as I put thy mildness on,
   Image of thee in all things; and shall soon,
   Armd with thy might, rid heav'n of these rebell'd,
   To thir prepar'd ill Mansion driven down
   To chains of Darkness, and th' undying Worm,
   That from thy just obedience could revolt,
   Whom to obey is happiness entire.
   Then shall thy Saints unmixt, and from th' impure
   Farr separate, circling thy holy Mount
   Unfained HALLELUIAHS to thee sing,
   Hymns of high praise, and I among them chief.
   So said, he o're his Scepter bowing, rose
   From the right hand of Glorie where he sate,
   And the third sacred Morn began to shine
   Dawning through Heav'n: forth rush'd with whirlwind sound
   The Chariot of Paternal Deitie,
   Flashing thick flames, Wheele within Wheele undrawn,
   It self instinct with Spirit, but convoyd
   By four Cherubic shapes, four Faces each
   Had wondrous, as with Starrs thir bodies all
   And Wings were set with Eyes, with Eyes the Wheels
   Of Beril, and careering Fires between;
   Over thir heads a chrystal Firmament,
   Whereon a Saphir Throne, inlaid with pure
   Amber, and colours of the showrie Arch.
   Hee in Celestial Panoplie all armd
   Of radiant URIM, work divinely wrought,
   Ascended, at his right hand Victorie
   Sate Eagle-wing'd, beside him hung his Bow
   And Quiver with three-bolted Thunder stor'd,
   And from about him fierce Effusion rowld
   Of smoak and bickering flame, and sparkles dire;
   Attended with ten thousand thousand Saints,
   He onward came, farr off his coming shon,
   And twentie thousand (I thir number heard)
   Chariots of God, half on each hand were seen:
   Hee on the wings of Cherub rode sublime
   On the Crystallin Skie, in Saphir Thron'd.
   Illustrious farr and wide, but by his own
   First seen, them unexpected joy surpriz'd,
   When the great Ensign of MESSIAH blaz'd
   Aloft by Angels born, his Sign in Heav'n:
   Under whose Conduct MICHAEL soon reduc'd
   His Armie, circumfus'd on either Wing,
   Under thir Head imbodied all in one.
   Before him Power Divine his way prepar'd;
   At his command the uprooted Hills retir'd
   Each to his place, they heard his voice and went
   Obsequious, Heav'n his wonted face renewd,
   And with fresh Flourets Hill and Valley smil'd.
   This saw his hapless Foes, but stood obdur'd,
   And to rebellious fight rallied thir Powers
   Insensate, hope conceiving from despair.
   In heav'nly Spirits could such perverseness dwell?
   But to convince the proud what Signs availe,
   Or Wonders move th' obdurate to relent?
   They hard'nd more by what might most reclame,
   Grieving to see his Glorie, at the sight
   Took envie, and aspiring to his highth,
   Stood reimbattell'd fierce, by force or fraud
   Weening to prosper, and at length prevaile
   Against God and MESSIAH, or to fall
   In universal ruin last, and now
   To final Battel drew, disdaining flight,
   Or faint retreat; when the great Son of God
   To all his Host on either hand thus spake.
 
     Stand still in bright array ye Saints, here stand
   Ye Angels arm'd, this day from Battel rest;
   Faithful hath been your Warfare, and of God
   Accepted, fearless in his righteous Cause,
   And as ye have receivd, so have ye don
   Invincibly; but of this cursed crew
   The punishment to other hand belongs,
   Vengeance is his, or whose he sole appoints;
   Number to this dayes work is not ordain'd
   Nor multitude, stand onely and behold
   Gods indignation on these Godless pourd
   By mee; not you but mee they have despis'd,
   Yet envied; against mee is all thir rage,
   Because the Father, t' whom in Heav'n supream
   Kingdom and Power and Glorie appertains,
   Hath honourd me according to his will.
   Therefore to mee thir doom he hath assig'n'd;
   That they may have thir wish, to trie with mee
   In Battel which the stronger proves, they all,
   Or I alone against them, since by strength
   They measure all, of other excellence
   Not emulous, nor care who them excells;
   Nor other strife with them do I voutsafe.
 
     So spake the Son, and into terrour chang'd
   His count'nance too severe to be beheld
   And full of wrauth bent on his Enemies.
   At once the Four spred out thir Starrie wings
   With dreadful shade contiguous, and the Orbes
   Of his fierce Chariot rowld, as with the sound
   Of torrent Floods, or of a numerous Host.
   Hee on his impious Foes right onward drove,
   Gloomie as Night; under his burning Wheeles
   The stedfast Empyrean shook throughout,
   All but the Throne it self of God.  Full soon
   Among them he arriv'd; in his right hand
   Grasping ten thousand Thunders, which he sent
   Before him, such as in thir Soules infix'd
   Plagues; they astonisht all resistance lost,
   All courage; down thir idle weapons drop'd;
   O're Shields and Helmes, and helmed heads he rode
   Of Thrones and mighty Seraphim prostrate,
   That wish'd the Mountains now might be again
   Thrown on them as a shelter from his ire.
   Nor less on either side tempestuous fell
   His arrows, from the fourfold-visag'd Foure,
   Distinct with eyes, and from the living Wheels,
   Distinct alike with multitude of eyes,
   One Spirit in them rul'd, and every eye
   Glar'd lightning, and shot forth pernicious fire
   Among th' accurst, that witherd all thir strength,
   And of thir wonted vigour left them draind,
   Exhausted, spiritless, afflicted, fall'n.
   Yet half his strength he put not forth, but check'd
   His Thunder in mid Volie, for he meant
   Not to destroy, but root them out of Heav'n:
   The overthrown he rais'd, and as a Heard
   Of Goats or timerous flock together throngd
   Drove them before him Thunder-struck, pursu'd
   With terrors and with furies to the bounds
   And Chrystall wall of Heav'n, which op'ning wide,
   Rowld inward, and a spacious Gap disclos'd
   Into the wastful Deep; the monstrous sight
   Strook them with horror backward, but far worse
   Urg'd them behind; headlong themselvs they threw
   Down from the verge of Heav'n, Eternal wrauth
   Burnt after them to the bottomless pit.
 
     Hell heard th' unsufferable noise, Hell saw
   Heav'n ruining from Heav'n and would have fled
   Affrighted; but strict Fate had cast too deep
   Her dark foundations, and too fast had bound.
   Nine dayes they fell; confounded CHAOS roard,
   And felt tenfold confusion in thir fall
   Through his wilde Anarchie, so huge a rout
   Incumberd him with ruin: Hell at last
   Yawning receavd them whole, and on them clos'd,
   Hell thir fit habitation fraught with fire
   Unquenchable, the house of woe and paine.
   Disburd'nd Heav'n rejoic'd, and soon repaird
   Her mural breach, returning whence it rowld.
   Sole Victor from th' expulsion of his Foes
   MESSIAH his triumphal Chariot turnd:
   To meet him all his Saints, who silent stood
   Eye witnesses of his Almightie Acts,
   With Jubilie advanc'd; and as they went,
   Shaded with branching Palme, each order bright,
   Sung Triumph, and him sung Victorious King,
   Son, Heire, and Lord, to him Dominion giv'n,
   Worthiest to Reign: he celebrated rode
   Triumphant through mid Heav'n, into the Courts
   And Temple of his mightie Father Thron'd
   On high; who into Glorie him receav'd,
   Where now he sits at the right hand of bliss.
 
     Thus measuring things in Heav'n by things on Earth
   At thy request, and that thou maist beware
   By what is past, to thee I have reveal'd
   What might have else to human Race bin hid;
   The discord which befel, and Warr in Heav'n
   Among th' Angelic Powers, and the deep fall
   Of those too high aspiring, who rebelld
   With SATAN, hee who envies now thy state,
   Who now is plotting how he may seduce
   Thee also from obedience, that with him
   Bereavd of happiness thou maist partake
   His punishment, Eternal miserie;
   Which would be all his solace and revenge,
   As a despite don against the most High,
   Thee once to gaine Companion of his woe.
   But list'n not to his Temptations, warne
   Thy weaker; let it profit thee to have heard
   By terrible Example the reward
   Of disobedience; firm they might have stood,
   Yet fell; remember, and fear to transgress.
 
        THE END OF THE SIXTH BOOK.
 
 
   PARADISE LOST.
 
   BOOK VII.
 
   Descend from Heav'n URANIA, by that name
   If rightly thou art call'd, whose Voice divine
   Following, above th' OLYMPIAN Hill I soare,
   Above the flight of PEGASEAN wing.
   The meaning, not the Name I call: for thou
   Nor of the Muses nine, nor on the top
   Of old OLYMPUS dwell'st, but Heav'nlie borne,
   Before the Hills appeerd, or Fountain flow'd,
   Thou with Eternal wisdom didst converse,
   Wisdom thy Sister, and with her didst play
   In presence of th' Almightie Father, pleas'd
   With thy Celestial Song.  Up led by thee
   Into the Heav'n of Heav'ns I have presum'd,
   An Earthlie Guest, and drawn Empyreal Aire,
   Thy tempring; with like safetie guided down
   Return me to my Native Element:
   Least from this flying Steed unrein'd, (as once
   BELLEROPHON, though from a lower Clime)
   Dismounted, on th' ALEIAN Field I fall
   Erroneous, there to wander and forlorne.
   Half yet remaines unsung, but narrower bound
   Within the visible Diurnal Spheare;
   Standing on Earth, not rapt above the Pole,
   More safe I Sing with mortal voice, unchang'd
   To hoarce or mute, though fall'n on evil dayes,
   On evil dayes though fall'n, and evil tongues;
   In darkness, and with dangers compast rouud,
   And solitude; yet not alone, while thou
   Visit'st my slumbers Nightly, or when Morn
   Purples the East: still govern thou my Song,
   URANIA, and fit audience find, though few.
   But drive farr off the barbarous dissonance
   Of BACCHUS and his Revellers, the Race
   Of that wilde Rout that tore the THRACIAN Bard
   In RHODOPE, where Woods and Rocks had Eares
   To rapture, till the savage clamor dround
   Both Harp and Voice; nor could the Muse defend
   Her Son.  So fail not thou, who thee implores:
   For thou art Heav'nlie, shee an empty dreame.
 
     Say Goddess, what ensu'd when RAPHAEL,
   The affable Arch-angel, had forewarn'd
   ADAM by dire example to beware
   Apostasie, by what befell in Heaven
   To those Apostates, least the like befall
   In Paradise to ADAM or his Race,
   Charg'd not to touch the interdicted Tree,
   If they transgress, and slight that sole command,
   So easily obeyd amid the choice
   Of all tasts else to please thir appetite,
   Though wandring.  He with his consorted EVE
   The storie heard attentive, and was fill'd
   With admiration, and deep Muse to heare
   Of things so high and strange, things to thir thought
   So unimaginable as hate in Heav'n,
   And Warr so neer the Peace of God in bliss
   With such confusion: but the evil soon
   Driv'n back redounded as a flood on those
   From whom it sprung, impossible to mix
   With Blessedness.  Whence ADAM soon repeal'd
   The doubts that in his heart arose: and now
   Led on, yet sinless, with desire to know
   What neerer might concern him, how this World
   Of Heav'n and Earth conspicuous first began,
   When, and whereof created, for what cause,
   What within EDEN or without was done
   Before his memorie, as one whose drouth
   Yet scarce allay'd still eyes the current streame,
   Whose liquid murmur heard new thirst excites,
   Proceeded thus to ask his Heav'nly Guest.
 
     Great things, and full of wonder in our eares,
   Farr differing from this World, thou hast reveal'd
   Divine Interpreter, by favour sent
   Down from the Empyrean to forewarne
   Us timely of what might else have bin our loss,
   Unknown, which human knowledg could not reach:
   For which to the infinitly Good we owe
   Immortal thanks, and his admonishment
   Receave with solemne purpose to observe
   Immutably his sovran will, the end
   Of what we are.  But since thou hast voutsaf't
   Gently for our instruction to impart
   Things above Earthly thought, which yet concernd
   Our knowing, as to highest wisdom seemd,
   Deign to descend now lower, and relate
   What may no less perhaps availe us known,
   How first began this Heav'n which we behold
   Distant so high, with moving Fires adornd
   Innumerable, and this which yeelds or fills
   All space, the ambient Aire wide interfus'd
   Imbracing round this florid Earth, what cause
   Mov'd the Creator in his holy Rest
   Through all Eternitie so late to build
   In CHAOS, and the work begun, how soon
   Absolv'd, if unforbid thou maist unfould
   What wee, not to explore the secrets aske
   Of his Eternal Empire, but the more
   To magnifie his works, the more we know.
   And the great Light of Day yet wants to run
   Much of his Race though steep, suspens in Heav'n
   Held by thy voice, thy potent voice he heares,
   And longer will delay to heare thee tell
   His Generation, and the rising Birth
   Of Nature from the unapparent Deep:
   Or if the Starr of Eevning and the Moon
   Haste to thy audience, Night with her will bring
   Silence, and Sleep listning to thee will watch,
   Or we can bid his absence, till thy Song
   End, and dismiss thee ere the Morning shine.
 
     Thus ADAM his illustrous Guest besought:
 
     And thus the Godlike Angel answerd milde.
   This also thy request with caution askt
   Obtaine: though to recount Almightie works
   What words or tongue of Seraph can suffice,
   Or heart of man suffice to comprehend?
   Yet what thou canst attain, which best may serve
   To glorifie the Maker, and inferr
   Thee also happier, shall not be withheld
   Thy hearing, such Commission from above
   I have receav'd, to answer thy desire
   Of knowledge within bounds; beyond abstain
   To ask, nor let thine own inventions hope
   Things not reveal'd, which th' invisible King,
   Onely Omniscient, hath supprest in Night,
   To none communicable in Earth or Heaven:
   Anough is left besides to search and know.
   But Knowledge is as food, and needs no less
   Her Temperance over Appetite, to know
   In measure what the mind may well contain,
   Oppresses else with Surfet, and soon turns
   Wisdom to Folly, as Nourishment to Winde.
 
     Know then, that after LUCIFER from Heav'n
   (So call him, brighter once amidst the Host
   Of Angels, then that Starr the Starrs among)
   Fell with his flaming Legions through the Deep
   Into his place, and the great Son returnd
   Victorious with his Saints, th' Omnipotent
   Eternal Father from his Throne beheld
   Thir multitude, and to his Son thus spake.
 
     At least our envious Foe hath fail'd, who thought
   All like himself rebellious, by whose aid
   This inaccessible high strength, the seat
   Of Deitie supream, us dispossest,
   He trusted to have seis'd, and into fraud
   Drew many, whom thir place knows here no more;
   Yet farr the greater part have kept, I see,
   Thir station, Heav'n yet populous retaines
   Number sufficient to possess her Realmes
   Though wide, and this high Temple to frequent
   With Ministeries due and solemn Rites:
   But least his heart exalt him in the harme
   Already done, to have dispeopl'd Heav'n,
   My damage fondly deem'd, I can repaire
   That detriment, if such it be to lose
   Self-lost, and in a moment will create
   Another World, out of one man a Race
   Of men innumerable, there to dwell,
   Not here, till by degrees of merit rais'd
   They open to themselves at length the way
   Up hither, under long obedience tri'd,
   And Earth be chang'd to Heavn, & Heav'n to Earth,
   One Kingdom, Joy and Union without end.
   Mean while inhabit laxe, ye Powers of Heav'n,
   And thou my Word, begotten Son, by thee
   This I perform, speak thou, and be it don:
   My overshadowing Spirit and might with thee
   I send along, ride forth, and bid the Deep
   Within appointed bounds be Heav'n and Earth,
   Boundless the Deep, because I am who fill
   Infinitude, nor vacuous the space.
   Though I uncircumscrib'd my self retire,
   And put not forth my goodness, which is free
   To act or not, Necessitie and Chance
   Approach not mee, and what I will is Fate.
 
     So spake th' Almightie, and to what he spake
   His Word, the Filial Godhead, gave effect.
   Immediate are the Acts of God, more swift
   Then time or motion, but to human ears
   Cannot without process of speech be told,
   So told as earthly notion can receave.
   Great triumph and rejoycing was in Heav'n
   When such was heard declar'd the Almightie's will;
   Glorie they sung to the most High, good will
   To future men, and in thir dwellings peace:
   Glorie to him whose just avenging ire
   Had driven out th' ungodly from his sight
   And th' habitations of the just; to him
   Glorie and praise, whose wisdom had ordain'd
   Good out of evil to create, in stead
   Of Spirits maligne a better Race to bring
   Into thir vacant room, and thence diffuse
   His good to Worlds and Ages infinite.
   So sang the Hierarchies: Mean while the Son
   On his great Expedition now appeer'd,
   Girt with Omnipotence, with Radiance crown'd
   Of Majestie Divine, Sapience and Love
   Immense, and all his Father in him shon.
   About his Chariot numberless were pour'd
   Cherub and Seraph, Potentates and Thrones,
   And Vertues, winged Spirits, and Chariots wing'd,
   From the Armoury of God, where stand of old
   Myriads between two brazen Mountains lodg'd
   Against a solemn day, harnest at hand,
   Celestial Equipage; and now came forth
   Spontaneous, for within them Spirit livd,
   Attendant on thir Lord: Heav'n op'nd wide
   Her ever during Gates, Harmonious sound
   On golden Hinges moving, to let forth
   The King of Glorie in his powerful Word
   And Spirit coming to create new Worlds.
   On heav'nly ground they stood, and from the shore
   They view'd the vast immeasurable Abyss
   Outrageous as a Sea, dark, wasteful, wilde,
   Up from the bottom turn'd by furious windes
   And surging waves, as Mountains to assault
   Heav'ns highth, and with the Center mix the Pole.
 
     Silence, ye troubl'd waves, and thou Deep, peace,
   Said then th' Omnific Word, your discord end:
 
     Nor staid, but on the Wings of Cherubim
   Uplifted, in Paternal Glorie rode
   Farr into CHAOS, and the World unborn;
   For CHAOS heard his voice: him all his Traine
   Follow'd in bright procession to behold
   Creation, and the wonders of his might.
   Then staid the fervid Wheeles, and in his hand
   He took the golden Compasses, prepar'd
   In Gods Eternal store, to circumscribe
   This Universe, and all created things:
   One foot he center'd, and the other turn'd
   Round through the vast profunditie obscure,
   And said, thus farr extend, thus farr thy bounds,
   This be thy just Circumference, O World.
   Thus God the Heav'n created, thus the Earth,
   Matter unform'd and void: Darkness profound
   Cover'd th' Abyss: but on the watrie calme
   His brooding wings the Spirit of God outspred,
   And vital vertue infus'd, and vital warmth
   Throughout the fluid Mass, but downward purg'd
   The black tartareous cold infernal dregs
   Adverse to life: then founded, then conglob'd
   Like things to like, the rest to several place
   Disparted, and between spun out the Air,
   And Earth self-ballanc't on her Center hung.
 
     Let ther be Light, said God, and forthwith Light
   Ethereal, first of things, quintessence pure
   Sprung from the Deep, and from her Native East
   To journie through the airie gloom began,
   Sphear'd in a radiant Cloud, for yet the Sun
   Was not; shee in a cloudie Tabernacle
   Sojourn'd the while.  God saw the Light was good;
   And light from darkness by the Hemisphere
   Divided: Light the Day, and Darkness Night
   He nam'd.  Thus was the first Day Eev'n and Morn:
   Nor past uncelebrated, nor unsung
   By the Celestial Quires, when Orient Light
   Exhaling first from Darkness they beheld;
   Birth-day of Heav'n and Earth; with joy and shout
   The hollow Universal Orb they fill'd,
   And touch't thir Golden Harps, & hymning prais'd
   God and his works, Creatour him they sung,
   Both when first Eevning was, and when first Morn.
 
     Again, God said, let ther be Firmament
   Amid the Waters, and let it divide
   The Waters from the Waters: and God made
   The Firmament, expanse of liquid, pure,
   Transparent, Elemental Air, diffus'd
   In circuit to the uttermost convex
   Of this great Round: partition firm and sure,
   The Waters underneath from those above
   Dividing: for as Earth, so hee the World
   Built on circumfluous Waters calme, in wide
   Crystallin Ocean, and the loud misrule
   Of CHAOS farr remov'd, least fierce extreames
   Contiguous might distemper the whole frame:
   And Heav'n he nam'd the Firmament: So Eev'n
   And Morning CHORUS sung the second Day.
 
     The Earth was form'd, but in the Womb as yet
   Of Waters, Embryon immature involv'd,
   Appeer'd not: over all the face of Earth
   Main Ocean flow'd, not idle, but with warme
   Prolific humour soft'ning all her Globe,
   Fermented the great Mother to conceave,
   Satiate with genial moisture, when God said
   Be gather'd now ye Waters under Heav'n
   Into one place, and let dry Land appeer.
   Immediately the Mountains huge appeer
   Emergent, and thir broad bare backs upheave
   Into the Clouds, thir tops ascend the Skie:
   So high as heav'd the tumid Hills, so low
   Down sunk a hollow bottom broad and deep,
   Capacious bed of Waters: thither they
   Hasted with glad precipitance, uprowld
   As drops on dust conglobing from the drie;
   Part rise in crystal Wall, or ridge direct,
   For haste; such flight the great command impress'd
   On the swift flouds: as Armies at the call
   Of Trumpet (for of Armies thou hast heard)
   Troop to thir Standard, so the watrie throng,
   Wave rowling after Wave, where way they found,
   If steep, with torrent rapture, if through Plaine,
   Soft-ebbing; nor withstood them Rock or Hill,
   But they, or under ground, or circuit wide
   With Serpent errour wandring, found thir way,
   And on the washie Oose deep Channels wore;
   Easie, e're God had bid the ground be drie,
   All but within those banks, where Rivers now
   Stream, and perpetual draw thir humid traine.
   The dry Land, Earth, and the great receptacle
   Of congregated Waters he call'd Seas:
   And saw that it was good, and said, Let th' Earth
   Put forth the verdant Grass, Herb yeilding Seed,
   And Fruit Tree yeilding Fruit after her kind;
   Whose Seed is in her self upon the Earth.
   He scarce had said, when the bare Earth, till then
   Desert and bare, unsightly, unadorn'd,
   Brought forth the tender Grass, whose verdure clad
   Her Universal Face with pleasant green,
   Then Herbs of every leaf, that sudden flour'd
   Op'ning thir various colours, and made gay
   Her bosom smelling sweet: and these scarce blown,
   Forth flourish't thick the clustring Vine, forth crept
   The smelling Gourd, up stood the cornie Reed
   Embattell'd in her field: add the humble Shrub,
   And Bush with frizl'd hair implicit: last
   Rose as in Dance the stately Trees, and spred
   Thir branches hung with copious Fruit; or gemm'd
   Thir Blossoms: with high Woods the Hills were crownd,
   With tufts the vallies & each fountain side,
   With borders long the Rivers.  That Earth now
   Seemd like to Heav'n, a seat where Gods might dwell,
   Or wander with delight, and love to haunt
   Her sacred shades: though God had yet not rain'd
   Upon the Earth, and man to till the ground
   None was, but from the Earth a dewie Mist
   Went up and waterd all the ground, and each
   Plant of the field, which e're it was in the Earth
   God made, and every Herb, before it grew
   On the green stemm; God saw that it was good:
   So Eev'n and Morn recorded the Third Day.
 
     Again th' Almightie spake: Let there be Lights
   High in th' expanse of Heaven to divide
   The Day from Night; and let them be for Signes,
   For Seasons, and for Dayes, and circling Years,
   And let them be for Lights as I ordaine
   Thir Office in the Firmament of Heav'n
   To give Light on the Earth; and it was so.
   And God made two great Lights, great for thir use
   To Man, the greater to have rule by Day,
   The less by Night alterne: and made the Starrs,
   And set them in the Firmament of Heav'n
   To illuminate the Earth, and rule the Day
   In thir vicissitude, and rule the Night,
   And Light from Darkness to divide.  God saw,
   Surveying his great Work, that it was good:
   For of Celestial Bodies first the Sun
   A mightie Spheare he fram'd, unlightsom first,
   Though of Ethereal Mould: then form'd the Moon
   Globose, and everie magnitude of Starrs,
   And sowd with Starrs the Heav'n thick as a field:
   Of Light by farr the greater part he took,
   Transplanted from her cloudie Shrine, and plac'd
   In the Suns Orb, made porous to receive
   And drink the liquid Light, firm to retaine
   Her gather'd beams, great Palace now of Light.
   Hither as to thir Fountain other Starrs
   Repairing, in thir gold'n Urns draw Light,
   And hence the Morning Planet guilds his horns;
   By tincture or reflection they augment
   Thir small peculiar, though from human sight
   So farr remote, with diminution seen.
   First in his East the glorious Lamp was seen,
   Regent of Day, and all th' Horizon round
   Invested with bright Rayes, jocond to run
   His Longitude through Heav'ns high rode: the gray
   Dawn, and the PLEIADES before him danc'd
   Shedding sweet influence: less bright the Moon,
   But opposite in leveld West was set
   His mirror, with full face borrowing her Light
   From him, for other light she needed none
   In that aspect, and still that distance keepes
   Till night, then in the East her turn she shines,
   Revolvd on Heav'ns great Axle, and her Reign
   With thousand lesser Lights dividual holds,
   With thousand thousand Starres, that then appeer'd
   Spangling the Hemisphere: then first adornd
   With thir bright Luminaries that Set and Rose,
   Glad Eevning & glad Morn crownd the fourth day.
 
     And God said, let the Waters generate
   Reptil with Spawn abundant, living Soule:
   And let Fowle flie above the Earth, with wings
   Displayd on the op'n Firmament of Heav'n.
   And God created the great Whales, and each
   Soul living, each that crept, which plenteously
   The waters generated by thir kindes,
   And every Bird of wing after his kinde;
   And saw that it was good, and bless'd them, saying,
   Be fruitful, multiply, and in the Seas
   And Lakes and running Streams the waters fill;
   And let the Fowle be multiply'd on the Earth.
   Forthwith the Sounds and Seas, each Creek & Bay
   With Frie innumerable swarme, and Shoales
   Of Fish that with thir Finns and shining Scales
   Glide under the green Wave, in Sculles that oft
   Bank the mid Sea: part single or with mate
   Graze the Sea weed thir pasture, & through Groves
   Of Coral stray, or sporting with quick glance
   Show to the Sun thir wav'd coats dropt with Gold,
   Or in thir Pearlie shells at ease, attend
   Moist nutriment, or under Rocks thir food
   In jointed Armour watch: on smooth the Seale,
   And bended Dolphins play: part huge of bulk
   Wallowing unweildie, enormous in thir Gate
   Tempest the Ocean: there Leviathan
   Hugest of living Creatures, on the Deep
   Stretcht like a Promontorie sleeps or swimmes,
   And seems a moving Land, and at his Gilles
   Draws in, and at his Trunck spouts out a Sea.
   Mean while the tepid Caves, and Fens and shoares
   Thir Brood as numerous hatch, from the Egg that soon
   Bursting with kindly rupture forth disclos'd
   Thir callow young, but featherd soon and fledge
   They summ'd thir Penns, and soaring th' air sublime
   With clang despis'd the ground, under a cloud
   In prospect; there the Eagle and the Stork
   On Cliffs and Cedar tops thir Eyries build:
   Part loosly wing the Region, part more wise
   In common, rang'd in figure wedge thir way,
   Intelligent of seasons, and set forth
   Thir Aierie Caravan high over Sea's
   Flying, and over Lands with mutual wing
   Easing thir flight; so stears the prudent Crane
   Her annual Voiage, born on Windes; the Aire
   Floats, as they pass, fann'd with unnumber'd plumes:
   From Branch to Branch the smaller Birds with song
   Solac'd the Woods, and spred thir painted wings
   Till Ev'n, nor then the solemn Nightingal
   Ceas'd warbling, but all night tun'd her soft layes:
   Others on Silver Lakes and Rivers Bath'd
   Thir downie Brest; the Swan with Arched neck
   Between her white wings mantling proudly, Rowes
   Her state with Oarie feet: yet oft they quit
   The Dank, and rising on stiff Pennons, towre
   The mid Aereal Skie: Others on ground
   Walk'd firm; the crested Cock whose clarion sounds
   The silent hours, and th' other whose gay Traine
   Adorns him, colour'd with the Florid hue
   Of Rainbows and Starrie Eyes.  The Waters thus
   With Fish replenisht, and the Aire with Fowle,
   Ev'ning and Morn solemniz'd the Fift day.
 
     The Sixt, and of Creation last arose
   With Eevning Harps and Mattin, when God said,
   Let th' Earth bring forth Fowle living in her kinde,
   Cattel and Creeping things, and Beast of the Earth,
   Each in their kinde.  The Earth obey'd, and strait
   Op'ning her fertil Woomb teem'd at a Birth
   Innumerous living Creatures, perfet formes,
   Limb'd and full grown: out of the ground up-rose
   As from his Laire the wilde Beast where he wonns
   In Forrest wilde, in Thicket, Brake, or Den;
   Among the Trees in Pairs they rose, they walk'd:
   The Cattel in the Fields and Meddowes green:
   Those rare and solitarie, these in flocks
   Pasturing at once, and in broad Herds upsprung:
   The grassie Clods now Calv'd, now half appeer'd
   The Tawnie Lion, pawing to get free
   His hinder parts, then springs as broke from Bonds,
   And Rampant shakes his Brinded main; the Ounce,
   The Libbard, and the Tyger, as the Moale
   Rising, the crumbl'd Earth above them threw
   In Hillocks; the swift Stag from under ground
   Bore up his branching head: scarse from his mould
   BEHEMOTH biggest born of Earth upheav'd
   His vastness: Fleec't the Flocks and bleating rose,
   As Plants: ambiguous between Sea and Land
   The River Horse and scalie Crocodile.
   At once came forth whatever creeps the ground,
   Insect or Worme; those wav'd thir limber fans
   For wings, and smallest Lineaments exact
   In all the Liveries dect of Summers pride
   With spots of Gold and Purple, azure and green:
   These as a line thir long dimension drew,
   Streaking the ground with sinuous trace; not all
   Minims of Nature; some of Serpent kinde
   Wondrous in length and corpulence involv'd
   Thir Snakie foulds, and added wings.  First crept
   The Parsimonious Emmet, provident
   Of future, in small room large heart enclos'd,
   Pattern of just equalitie perhaps
   Hereafter, join'd in her popular Tribes
   Of Commonaltie: swarming next appeer'd
   The Femal Bee that feeds her Husband Drone
   Deliciously, and builds her waxen Cells
   With Honey stor'd: the rest are numberless,
   And thou thir Natures know'st, and gav'st them Names,
   Needlest to thee repeaed; nor unknown
   The Serpent suttl'st Beast of all the field,
   Of huge extent somtimes, with brazen Eyes
   And hairie Main terrific, though to thee
   Not noxious, but obedient at thy call.
   Now Heav'n in all her Glorie shon, and rowld
   Her motions, as the great first-Movers hand
   First wheeld thir course; Earth in her rich attire
   Consummate lovly smil'd; Aire, Water, Earth,
   By Fowl, Fish, Beast, was flown, was swum, was walkt
   Frequent; and of the Sixt day yet remain'd;
   There wanted yet the Master work, the end
   Of all yet don; a Creature who not prone
   And Brute as other Creatures, but endu'd
   With Sanctitie of Reason, might erect
   His Stature, and upright with Front serene
   Govern the rest, self-knowing, and from thence
   Magnanimous to correspond with Heav'n,
   But grateful to acknowledge whence his good
   Descends, thither with heart and voice and eyes
   Directed in Devotion, to adore
   And worship God Supream, who made him chief
   Of all his works: therefore the Omnipotent
   Eternal Father (For where is not hee
   Present) thus to his Son audibly spake.
 
     Let us make now Man in our image, Man
   In our similitude, and let them rule
   Over the Fish and Fowle of Sea and Aire,
   Beast of the Field, and over all the Earth,
   And every creeping thing that creeps the ground.
   This said, he formd thee, ADAM, thee O Man
   Dust of the ground, and in thy nostrils breath'd
   The breath of Life; in his own Image hee
   Created thee, in the Image of God
   Express, and thou becam'st a living Soul.
   Male he created thee, but thy consort
   Femal for Race; then bless'd Mankinde, and said,
   Be fruitful, multiplie, and fill the Earth,
   Subdue it, and throughout Dominion hold
   Over Fish of the Sea, and Fowle of the Aire,
   And every living thing that moves on the Earth.
   Wherever thus created, for no place
   Is yet distinct by name, thence, as thou know'st
   He brought thee into this delicious Grove,
   This Garden, planted with the Trees of God,
   Delectable both to behold and taste;
   And freely all thir pleasant fruit for food
   Gave thee, all sorts are here that all th' Earth yeelds,
   Varietie without end; but of the Tree
   Which tasted works knowledge of Good and Evil,
   Thou mai'st not; in the day thou eat'st, thou di'st;
   Death is the penaltie impos'd, beware,
   And govern well thy appetite, least sin
   Surprise thee, and her black attendant Death.
   Here finish'd hee, and all that he had made
   View'd, and behold all was entirely good;
   So Ev'n and Morn accomplish'd the Sixt day:
   Yet not till the Creator from his work
   Desisting, though unwearied, up returnd
   Up to the Heav'n of Heav'ns his high abode,
   Thence to behold this new created World
   Th' addition of his Empire, how it shew'd
   In prospect from his Throne, how good, how faire,
   Answering his great Idea.  Up he rode
   Followd with acclamation and the sound
   Symphonious of ten thousand Harpes that tun'd
   Angelic harmonies: the Earth, the Aire
   Resounded, (thou remember'st, for thou heardst)
   The Heav'ns and all the Constellations rung,
   The Planets in thir stations list'ning stood,
   While the bright Pomp ascended jubilant.
   Open, ye everlasting Gates, they sung,
   Open, ye Heav'ns, your living dores; let in
   The great Creator from his work returnd
   Magnificent, his Six days work, a World;
   Open, and henceforth oft; for God will deigne
   To visit oft the dwellings of just Men
   Delighted, and with frequent intercourse
   Thither will send his winged Messengers
   On errands of supernal Grace.  So sung
   The glorious Train ascending: He through Heav'n,
   That open'd wide her blazing Portals, led
   To Gods Eternal house direct the way,
   A broad and ample rode, whose dust is Gold
   And pavement Starrs, as Starrs to thee appeer,
   Seen in the Galaxie, that Milkie way
   Which nightly as a circling Zone thou seest
   Pouderd with Starrs.  And now on Earth the Seaventh
   Eev'ning arose in EDEN, for the Sun
   Was set, and twilight from the East came on,
   Forerunning Night; when at the holy mount
   Of Heav'ns high-seated top, th' Impereal Throne
   Of Godhead, fixt for ever firm and sure,
   The Filial Power arriv'd, and sate him down
   With his great Father (for he also went
   Invisible, yet staid (such priviledge
   Hath Omnipresence) and the work ordain'd,
   Author and end of all things, and from work
   Now resting, bless'd and hallowd the Seav'nth day,
   As resting on that day from all his work,
   But not in silence holy kept; the Harp
   Had work and rested not, the solemn Pipe,
   And Dulcimer, all Organs of sweet stop,
   All sounds on Fret by String or Golden Wire
   Temper'd soft Tunings, intermixt with Voice
   Choral or Unison: of incense Clouds
   Fuming from Golden Censers hid the Mount.
   Creation and the Six dayes acts they sung,
   Great are thy works, JEHOVAH, infinite
   Thy power; what thought can measure thee or tongue
   Relate thee; greater now in thy return
   Then from the Giant Angels; thee that day
   Thy Thunders magnifi'd; but to create
   Is greater then created to destroy.
   Who can impair thee, mighty King, or bound
   Thy Empire? easily the proud attempt
   Of Spirits apostat and thir Counsels vaine
   Thou hast repeld, while impiously they thought
   Thee to diminish, and from thee withdraw
   The number of thy worshippers.  Who seekes
   To lessen thee, against his purpose serves
   To manifest the more thy might: his evil
   Thou usest, and from thence creat'st more good.
   Witness this new-made World, another Heav'n
   From Heaven Gate not farr, founded in view
   On the cleer HYALINE, the Glassie Sea;
   Of amplitude almost immense, with Starr's
   Numerous, and every Starr perhaps a World
   Of destind habitation; but thou know'st
   Thir seasons: among these the seat of men,
   Earth with her nether Ocean circumfus'd,
   Thir pleasant dwelling place.  Thrice happie men,
   And sons of men, whom God hath thus advanc't,
   Created in his Image, there to dwell
   And worship him, and in reward to rule
   Over his Works, on Earth, in Sea, or Air,
   And multiply a Race of Worshippers
   Holy and just: thrice happie if they know
   Thir happiness, and persevere upright.
 
     So sung they, and the Empyrean rung,
   With HALLELUIAHS: Thus was Sabbath kept.
   And thy request think now fulfill'd, that ask'd
   How first this World and face of things began,
   And what before thy memorie was don
   From the beginning, that posteritie
   Informd by thee might know; if else thou seekst
   Aught, not surpassing human measure, say.
 
     To whom thus ADAM gratefully repli'd.
   What thanks sufficient, or what recompence
   Equal have I to render thee, Divine
   Hystorian, who thus largely hast allayd
   The thirst I had of knowledge, and voutsaf't
   This friendly condescention to relate
   Things else by me unsearchable, now heard
   VVith wonder, but delight, and, as is due,
   With glorie attributed to the high
   Creator; some thing yet of doubt remaines,
   VVhich onely thy solution can resolve.
   VVhen I behold this goodly Frame, this VVorld
   Of Heav'n and Earth consisting, and compute,
   Thir magnitudes, this Earth a spot, a graine,
   An Atom, with the Firmament compar'd
   And all her numberd Starrs, that seem to rowle
   Spaces incomprehensible (for such
   Thir distance argues and thir swift return
   Diurnal) meerly to officiate light
   Round this opacous Earth, this punctual spot,
   One day and night; in all thir vast survey
   Useless besides, reasoning I oft admire,
   How Nature wise and frugal could commit
   Such disproportions, with superfluous hand
   So many nobler Bodies to create,
   Greater so manifold to this one use,
   For aught appeers, and on thir Orbs impose
   Such restless revolution day by day
   Repeated, while the sedentarie Earth,
   That better might with farr less compass move,
   Serv'd by more noble then her self, attaines
   Her end without least motion, and receaves,
   As Tribute such a sumless journey brought
   Of incorporeal speed, her warmth and light;
   Speed, to describe whose swiftness Number failes.
 
     So spake our Sire, and by his count'nance seemd
   Entring on studious thoughts abstruse, which EVE
   Perceaving where she sat retir'd in sight,
   With lowliness Majestic from her seat,
   And Grace that won who saw to wish her stay,
   Rose, and went forth among her Fruits and Flours,
   To visit how they prosper'd, bud and bloom,
   Her Nurserie; they at her coming sprung
   And toucht by her fair tendance gladlier grew.
   Yet went she not, as not with such discourse
   Delighted, or not capable her eare
   Of what was high: such pleasure she reserv'd,
   ADAM relating, she sole Auditress;
   Her Husband the Relater she preferr'd
   Before the Angel, and of him to ask
   Chose rather; hee, she knew would intermix
   Grateful digressions, and solve high dispute
   With conjugal Caresses, from his Lip
   Not Words alone pleas'd her.  O when meet now
   Such pairs, in Love and mutual Honour joyn'd?
   With Goddess-like demeanour forth she went;
   Not unattended, for on her as Queen
   A pomp of winning Graces waited still,
   And from about her shot Darts of desire
   Into all Eyes to wish her still in sight.
   And RAPHAEL now to ADAM's doubt propos'd
   Benevolent and facil thus repli'd.
 
     To ask or search I blame thee not, for Heav'n
   Is as the Book of God before thee set,
   Wherein to read his wondrous Works, and learne
   His Seasons, Hours, or Days, or Months, or Yeares:
   This to attain, whether Heav'n move or Earth,
   Imports not, if thou reck'n right, the rest
   From Man or Angel the great Architect
   Did wisely to conceal, and not divulge
   His secrets to be scann'd by them who ought
   Rather admire; or if they list to try
   Conjecture, he his Fabric of the Heav'ns
   Hath left to thir disputes, perhaps to move
   His laughter at thir quaint Opinions wide
   Hereafter, when they come to model Heav'n
   And calculate the Starrs, how they will weild
   The mightie frame, how build, unbuild, contrive
   To save appeerances, how gird the Sphear
   With Centric and Eccentric scribl'd o're,
   Cycle and Epicycle, Orb in Orb:
   Alreadie by thy reasoning this I guess,
   Who art to lead thy ofspring, and supposest
   That Bodies bright and greater should not serve
   The less not bright, nor Heav'n such journies run,
   Earth sitting still, when she alone receaves
   The benefit: consider first, that Great
   Or Bright inferrs not Excellence: the Earth
   Though, in comparison of Heav'n, so small,
   Nor glistering, may of solid good containe
   More plenty then the Sun that barren shines,
   Whose vertue on it self workes no effect,
   But in the fruitful Earth; there first receavd
   His beams, unactive else, thir vigor find.
   Yet not to Earth are those bright Luminaries
   Officious, but to thee Earths habitant.
   And for the Heav'ns wide Circuit, let it speak
   The Makers high magnificence, who built
   So spacious, and his Line stretcht out so farr;
   That Man may know he dwells not in his own;
   An Edifice too large for him to fill,
   Lodg'd in a small partition, and the rest
   Ordain'd for uses to his Lord best known.
   The swiftness of those Circles attribute,
   Though numberless, to his Omnipotence,
   That to corporeal substances could adde
   Speed almost Spiritual; mee thou thinkst not slow,
   Who since the Morning hour set out from Heav'n
   Where God resides, and ere mid-day arriv'd
   In EDEN, distance inexpressible
   By Numbers that have name.  But this I urge,
   Admitting Motion in the Heav'ns, to shew
   Invalid that which thee to doubt it mov'd;
   Not that I so affirm, though so it seem
   To thee who hast thy dwelling here on Earth.
   God to remove his wayes from human sense,
   Plac'd Heav'n from Earth so farr, that earthly sight,
   If it presume, might erre in things too high,
   And no advantage gaine.  What if the Sun
   Be Center to the World, and other Starrs
   By his attractive vertue and thir own
   Incited, dance about him various rounds?
   Thir wandring course now high, now low, then hid,
   Progressive, retrograde, or standing still,
   In six thou seest, and what if sev'nth to these
   The Planet Earth, so stedfast though she seem,
   Insensibly three different Motions move?
   Which else to several Sphears thou must ascribe,
   Mov'd contrarie with thwart obliquities,
   Or save the Sun his labour, and that swift
   Nocturnal and Diurnal rhomb suppos'd,
   Invisible else above all Starrs, the Wheele
   Of Day and Night; which needs not thy beleefe,
   If Earth industrious of her self fetch Day
   Travelling East, and with her part averse
   From the Suns beam meet Night, her other part
   Still luminous by his ray.  What if that light
   Sent from her through the wide transpicuous aire,
   To the terrestrial Moon be as a Starr
   Enlightning her by Day, as she by Night
   This Earth? reciprocal, if Land be there,
   Feilds and Inhabitants: Her spots thou seest
   As Clouds, and Clouds may rain, and Rain produce
   Fruits in her soft'nd Soile, for some to eate
   Allotted there; and other Suns perhaps
   With thir attendant Moons thou wilt descrie
   Communicating Male and Femal Light,
   Which two great Sexes animate the World,
   Stor'd in each Orb perhaps with some that live.
   For such vast room in Nature unpossest
   By living Soule, desert and desolate,
   Onely to shine, yet scarce to contribute
   Each Orb a glimps of Light, conveyd so farr
   Down to this habitable, which returnes
   Light back to them, is obvious to dispute.
   But whether thus these things, or whether not,
   Whether the Sun predominant in Heav'n
   Rise on the Earth, or Earth rise on the Sun,
   Hee from the East his flaming rode begin,
   Or Shee from West her silent course advance
   With inoffensive pace that spinning sleeps
   On her soft Axle, while she paces Eev'n,
   And bears thee soft with the smooth Air along,
   Sollicit not thy thoughts with matters hid,
   Leave them to God above, him serve and feare;
   Of other Creatures, as him pleases best,
   Wherever plac't, let him dispose: joy thou
   In what he gives to thee, this Paradise
   And thy faire EVE; Heav'n is for thee too high
   To know what passes there; be lowlie wise:
   Think onely what concernes thee and thy being;
   Dream not of other Worlds, what Creatures there
   Live, in what state, condition or degree,
   Contented that thus farr hath been reveal'd
   Not of Earth onely but of highest Heav'n.
 
     To whom thus ADAM cleerd of doubt, repli'd.
   How fully hast thou satisfi'd mee, pure
   Intelligence of Heav'n, Angel serene,
   And freed from intricacies, taught to live,
   The easiest way, nor with perplexing thoughts
   To interrupt the sweet of Life, from which
   God hath bid dwell farr off all anxious cares,
   And not molest us, unless we our selves
   Seek them with wandring thoughts, and notions vaine.
   But apt the Mind or Fancie is to roave
   Uncheckt, and of her roaving is no end;
   Till warn'd, or by experience taught, she learne,
   That not to know at large of things remote
   From use, obscure and suttle, but to know
   That which before us lies in daily life,
   Is the prime Wisdom, what is more, is fume,
   Or emptiness, or fond impertinence,
   And renders us in things that most concerne
   Unpractis'd, unprepar'd, and still to seek.
   Therefore from this high pitch let us descend
   A lower flight, and speak of things at hand
   Useful, whence haply mention may arise
   Of somthing not unseasonable to ask
   By sufferance, and thy wonted favour deign'd.
   Thee I have heard relating what was don
   Ere my remembrance: now hear mee relate
   My Storie, which perhaps thou hast not heard;
   And Day is yet not spent; till then thou seest
   How suttly to detaine thee I devise,
   Inviting thee to hear while I relate,
   Fond, were it not in hope of thy reply:
   For while I sit with thee, I seem in Heav'n,
   And sweeter thy discourse is to my eare
   Then Fruits of Palm-tree pleasantest to thirst
   And hunger both, from labour, at the houre
   Of sweet repast; they satiate, and soon fill,
   Though pleasant, but thy words with Grace Divine
   Imbu'd, bring to thir sweetness no satietie.
 
     To whom thus RAPHAEL answer'd heav'nly meek.
   Nor are thy lips ungraceful, Sire of men,
   Nor tongue ineloquent; for God on thee
   Abundantly his gifts hath also pour'd,
   Inward and outward both, his image faire:
   Speaking or mute all comliness and grace
   Attends thee, and each word, each motion formes.
   Nor less think wee in Heav'n of thee on Earth
   Then of our fellow servant, and inquire
   Gladly into the wayes of God with Man:
   For God we see hath honour'd thee, and set
   On Man his equal Love: say therefore on;
   For I that Day was absent, as befell,
   Bound on a voyage uncouth and obscure,
   Farr on excursion toward the Gates of Hell;
   Squar'd in full Legion (such command we had)
   To see that none thence issu'd forth a spie,
   Or enemie, while God was in his work,
   Least hee incenst at such eruption bold,
   Destruction with Creation might have mixt.
   Not that they durst without his leave attempt,
   But us he sends upon his high behests
   For state, as Sovran King, and to enure
   Our prompt obedience.  Fast we found, fast shut
   The dismal Gates, and barricado'd strong;
   But long ere our approaching heard within
   Noise, other then the sound of Dance or Song,
   Torment, and lowd lament, and furious rage.
   Glad we return'd up to the coasts of Light
   Ere Sabbath Eev'ning: so we had in charge.
   But thy relation now; for I attend,
   Pleas'd with thy words no less then thou with mine.
 
     So spake the Godlike Power, and thus our Sire.
   For Man to tell how human Life began
   Is hard; for who himself beginning knew?
   Desire with thee still longer to converse
   Induc'd me.  As new wak't from soundest sleep
   Soft on the flourie herb I found me laid
   In Balmie Sweat, which with his Beames the Sun
   Soon dri'd, and on the reaking moisture fed.
   Strait toward Heav'n my wondring Eyes I turnd,
   And gaz'd a while the ample Skie, till rais'd
   By quick instinctive motion up I sprung,
   As thitherward endevoring, and upright
   Stood on my feet; about me round I saw
   Hill, Dale, and shadie Woods, and sunnie Plaines,
   And liquid Lapse of murmuring Streams; by these,
   Creatures that livd, and movd, and walk'd, or flew,
   Birds on the branches warbling; all things smil'd,
   With fragrance and with joy my heart oreflow'd.
   My self I then perus'd, and Limb by Limb
   Survey'd, and sometimes went, and sometimes ran
   With supple joints, as lively vigour led:
   But who I was, or where, or from what cause,
   Knew not; to speak I tri'd, and forthwith spake,
   My Tongue obey'd and readily could name
   What e're I saw.  Thou Sun, said I, faire Light,
   And thou enlight'nd Earth, so fresh and gay,
   Ye Hills and Dales, ye Rivers, Woods, and Plaines,
   And ye that live and move, fair Creatures, tell,
   Tell, if ye saw, how came I thus, how here?
   Not of my self; by some great Maker then,
   In goodness and in power praeeminent;
   Tell me, how may I know him, how adore,
   From whom I have that thus I move and live,
   And feel that I am happier then I know.
   While thus I call'd, and stray'd I knew not whither,
   From where I first drew Aire, and first beheld
   This happie Light, when answer none return'd,
   On a green shadie Bank profuse of Flours
   Pensive I sate me down; there gentle sleep
   First found me, and with soft oppression seis'd
   My droused sense, untroubl'd, though I thought
   I then was passing to my former state
   Insensible, and forthwith to dissolve:
   When suddenly stood at my Head a dream,
   Whose inward apparition gently mov'd
   My Fancy to believe I yet had being,
   And livd: One came, methought, of shape Divine,
   And said, thy Mansion wants thee, ADAM, rise,
   First Man, of Men innumerable ordain'd
   First Father, call'd by thee I come thy Guide
   To the Garden of bliss, thy seat prepar'd.
   So saying, by the hand he took me rais'd,
   And over Fields and Waters, as in Aire
   Smooth sliding without step, last led me up
   A woodie Mountain; whose high top was plaine,
   A Circuit wide, enclos'd, with goodliest Trees
   Planted, with Walks, and Bowers, that what I saw
   Of Earth before scarse pleasant seemd.  Each Tree
   Load'n with fairest Fruit, that hung to the Eye
   Tempting, stirr'd in me sudden appetite
   To pluck and eate; whereat I wak'd, and found
   Before mine Eyes all real, as the dream
   Had lively shadowd: Here had new begun
   My wandring, had not hee who was my Guide
   Up hither, from among the Trees appeer'd,
   Presence Divine.  Rejoycing, but with aw
   In adoration at his feet I fell
   Submiss: he rear'd me, & Whom thou soughtst I am,
   Said mildely, Author of all this thou seest
   Above, or round about thee or beneath.
   This Paradise I give thee, count it thine
   To Till and keep, and of the Fruit to eate:
   Of every Tree that in the Garden growes
   Eate freely with glad heart; fear here no dearth:
   But of the Tree whose operation brings
   Knowledg of good and ill, which I have set
   The Pledge of thy Obedience and thy Faith,
   Amid the Garden by the Tree of Life,
   Remember what I warne thee, shun to taste,
   And shun the bitter consequence: for know,
   The day thou eat'st thereof, my sole command
   Transgrest, inevitably thou shalt dye;
   From that day mortal, and this happie State
   Shalt loose, expell'd from hence into a World
   Of woe and sorrow.  Sternly he pronounc'd
   The rigid interdiction, which resounds
   Yet dreadful in mine eare, though in my choice
   Not to incur; but soon his cleer aspect
   Return'd and gratious purpose thus renew'd.
   Not onely these fair bounds, but all the Earth
   To thee and to thy Race I give; as Lords
   Possess it, and all things that therein live,
   Or live in Sea, or Aire, Beast, Fish, and Fowle.
   In signe whereof each Bird and Beast behold
   After thir kindes; I bring them to receave
   From thee thir Names, and pay thee fealtie
   With low subjection; understand the same
   Of Fish within thir watry residence,
   Not hither summond, since they cannot change
   Thir Element to draw the thinner Aire.
   As thus he spake, each Bird and Beast behold
   Approaching two and two, These cowring low
   With blandishment, each Bird stoop'd on his wing.
   I nam'd them, as they pass'd, and understood
   Thir Nature, with such knowledg God endu'd
   My sudden apprehension: but in these
   I found not what me thought I wanted still;
   And to the Heav'nly vision thus presum'd.
 
     O by what Name, for thou above all these,
   Above mankinde, or aught then mankinde higher,
   Surpassest farr my naming, how may I
   Adore thee, Author of this Universe,
   And all this good to man, for whose well being
   So amply, and with hands so liberal
   Thou hast provided all things: but with mee
   I see not who partakes.  In solitude
   What happiness, who can enjoy alone,
   Or all enjoying, what contentment find?
   Thus I presumptuous; and the vision bright,
   As with a smile more bright'nd, thus repli'd.
 
     What call'st thou solitude, is not the Earth
   With various living creatures, and the Aire
   Replenisht, and all these at thy command
   To come and play before thee, know'st thou not
   Thir language and thir wayes, they also know,
   And reason not contemptibly; with these
   Find pastime, and beare rule; thy Realm is large.
   So spake the Universal Lord, and seem'd
   So ordering.  I with leave of speech implor'd,
   And humble deprecation thus repli'd.
 
     Let not my words offend thee, Heav'nly Power,
   My Maker, be propitious while I speak.
   Hast thou not made me here thy substitute,
   And these inferiour farr beneath me set?
   Among unequals what societie
   Can sort, what harmonie or true delight?
   Which must be mutual, in proportion due
   Giv'n and receiv'd; but in disparitie
   The one intense, the other still remiss
   Cannot well suite with either, but soon prove
   Tedious alike: Of fellowship I speak
   Such as I seek, fit to participate
   All rational delight, wherein the brute
   Cannot be human consort; they rejoyce
   Each with thir kinde, Lion with Lioness;
   So fitly them in pairs thou hast combin'd;
   Much less can Bird with Beast, or Fish with Fowle
   So well converse, nor with the Ox the Ape;
   Wors then can Man with Beast, and least of all.
 
     Whereto th' Almighty answer'd, not displeas'd.
   A nice and suttle happiness I see
   Thou to thy self proposest, in the choice
   Of thy Associates, ADAM, and wilt taste
   No pleasure, though in pleasure, solitarie.
   What thinkst thou then of mee, and this my State,
   Seem I to thee sufficiently possest
   Of happiness, or not? who am alone
   From all Eternitie, for none I know
   Second to mee or like, equal much less.
   How have I then with whom to hold converse
   Save with the Creatures which I made, and those
   To me inferiour, infinite descents
   Beneath what other Creatures are to thee?
 
     He ceas'd, I lowly answer'd.  To attaine
   The highth and depth of thy Eternal wayes
   All human thoughts come short, Supream of things;
   Thou in thy self art perfet, and in thee
   Is no deficience found; not so is Man,
   But in degree, the cause of his desire
   By conversation with his like to help,
   Or solace his defects.  No need that thou
   Shouldst propagat, already infinite;
   And through all numbers absolute, though One;
   But Man by number is to manifest
   His single imperfection, and beget
   Like of his like, his Image multipli'd,
   In unitie defective, which requires
   Collateral love, and deerest amitie.
   Thou in thy secresie although alone,
   Best with thy self accompanied, seek'st not
   Social communication, yet so pleas'd,
   Canst raise thy Creature to what highth thou wilt
   Of Union or Communion, deifi'd;
   I by conversing cannot these erect
   From prone, nor in thir wayes complacence find.
   Thus I embold'nd spake, and freedom us'd
   Permissive, and acceptance found, which gain'd
   This answer from the gratious voice Divine.
 
     Thus farr to try thee, ADAM, I was pleas'd,
   And finde thee knowing not of Beasts alone,
   Which thou hast rightly nam'd, but of thy self,
   Expressing well the spirit within thee free,
   My Image, not imparted to the Brute,
   Whose fellowship therefore unmeet for thee
   Good reason was thou freely shouldst dislike,
   And be so minded still; I, ere thou spak'st,
   Knew it not good for Man to be alone,
   And no such companie as then thou saw'st
   Intended thee, for trial onely brought,
   To see how thou could'st judge of fit and meet:
   What next I bring shall please thee, be assur'd,
   Thy likeness, thy fit help, thy other self,
   Thy wish, exactly to thy hearts desire.
 
     Hee ended, or I heard no more, for now
   My earthly by his Heav'nly overpowerd,
   Which it had long stood under, streind to the highth
   In that celestial Colloquie sublime,
   As with an object that excels the sense,
   Dazl'd and spent, sunk down, and sought repair
   Of sleep, which instantly fell on me, call'd
   By Nature as in aide, and clos'd mine eyes.
   Mine eyes he clos'd, but op'n left the Cell
   Of Fancie my internal sight, by which
   Abstract as in a transe methought I saw,
   Though sleeping, where I lay, and saw the shape
   Still glorious before whom awake I stood;
   Who stooping op'nd my left side, and took
   From thence a Rib, with cordial spirits warme,
   And Life-blood streaming fresh; wide was the wound,
   But suddenly with flesh fill'd up & heal'd:
   The Rib he formd and fashond with his hands;
   Under his forming hands a Creature grew,
   Manlike, but different sex, so lovly faire,
   That what seemd fair in all the World, seemd now
   Mean, or in her summd up, in her containd
   And in her looks, which from that time infus'd
   Sweetness into my heart, unfelt before,
   And into all things from her Aire inspir'd
   The spirit of love and amorous delight.
   She disappeerd, and left me dark, I wak'd
   To find her, or for ever to deplore
   Her loss, and other pleasures all abjure:
   When out of hope, behold her, not farr off,
   Such as I saw her in my dream, adornd
   With what all Earth or Heaven could bestow
   To make her amiable: On she came,
   Led by her Heav'nly Maker, though unseen,
   And guided by his voice, nor uninformd
   Of nuptial Sanctitie and marriage Rites:
   Grace was in all her steps, Heav'n in her Eye,
   In every gesture dignitie and love.
   I overjoyd could not forbear aloud.
 
     This turn hath made amends; thou hast fulfill'd
   Thy words, Creator bounteous and benigne,
   Giver of all things faire, but fairest this
   Of all thy gifts, nor enviest.  I now see
   Bone of my Bone, Flesh of my Flesh, my Self
   Before me; Woman is her Name, of Man
   Extracted; for this cause he shall forgoe
   Father and Mother, and to his Wife adhere;
   And they shall be one Flesh, one Heart, one Soule.
 
     She heard me thus, and though divinely brought,
   Yet Innocence and Virgin Modestie,
   Her vertue and the conscience of her worth,
   That would be woo'd, and not unsought be won,
   Not obvious, not obtrusive, but retir'd,
   The more desirable, or to say all,
   Nature her self, though pure of sinful thought,
   Wrought in her so, that seeing me, she turn'd;
   I follow'd her, she what was Honour knew,
   And with obsequious Majestie approv'd
   My pleaded reason.  To the Nuptial Bowre
   I led her blushing like the Morn: all Heav'n,
   And happie Constellations on that houre
   Shed thir selectest influence; the Earth
   Gave sign of gratulation, and each Hill;
   Joyous the Birds; fresh Gales and gentle Aires
   Whisper'd it to the Woods, and from thir wings
   Flung Rose, flung Odours from the spicie Shrub,
   Disporting, till the amorous Bird of Night
   Sung Spousal, and bid haste the Eevning Starr
   On his Hill top, to light the bridal Lamp.
   Thus I have told thee all my State, and brought
   My Storie to the sum of earthly bliss
   Which I enjoy, and must confess to find
   In all things else delight indeed, but such
   As us'd or not, works in the mind no change,
   Nor vehement desire, these delicacies
   I mean of Taste, Sight, Smell, Herbs, Fruits, & Flours,
   Walks, and the melodie of Birds; but here
   Farr otherwise, transported I behold,
   Transported touch; here passion first I felt,
   Commotion strange, in all enjoyments else
   Superiour and unmov'd, here onely weake
   Against the charm of Beauties powerful glance.
   Or Nature faild in mee, and left some part
   Not proof enough such Object to sustain,
   Or from my side subducting, took perhaps
   More then enough; at least on her bestow'd
   Too much of Ornament, in outward shew
   Elaborate, of inward less exact.
   For well I understand in the prime end
   Of Nature her th' inferiour, in the mind
   And inward Faculties, which most excell,
   In outward also her resembling less
   His Image who made both, and less expressing
   The character of that Dominion giv'n
   O're other Creatures; yet when I approach
   Her loveliness, so absolute she seems
   And in her self compleat, so well to know
   Her own, that what she wills to do or say,
   Seems wisest, vertuousest, discreetest, best;
   All higher knowledge in her presence falls
   Degraded, Wisdom in discourse with her
   Looses discount'nanc't, and like folly shewes;
   Authoritie and Reason on her waite,
   As one intended first, not after made
   Occasionally; and to consummate all,
   Greatness of mind and nobleness thir seat
   Build in her loveliest, and create an awe
   About her, as a guard Angelic plac't.
   To whom the Angel with contracted brow.
 
     Accuse not Nature, she hath don her part;
   Do thou but thine, and be not diffident
   Of Wisdom, she deserts thee not, if thou
   Dismiss not her, when most thou needst her nigh,
   By attributing overmuch to things
   Less excellent, as thou thy self perceav'st.
   For what admir'st thou, what transports thee so,
   An outside? fair no doubt, and worthy well
   Thy cherishing, thy honouring, and thy love,
   Not thy subjection: weigh with her thy self;
   Then value: Oft times nothing profits more
   Then self-esteem, grounded on just and right
   Well manag'd; of that skill the more thou know'st,
   The more she will acknowledge thee her Head,
   And to realities yeild all her shows;
   Made so adorn for thy delight the more,
   So awful, that with honour thou maist love
   Thy mate, who sees when thou art seen least wise.
   But if the sense of touch whereby mankind
   Is propagated seem such dear delight
   Beyond all other, think the same voutsaf't
   To Cattel and each Beast; which would not be
   To them made common & divulg'd, if aught
   Therein enjoy'd were worthy to subdue
   The Soule of Man, or passion in him move.
   What higher in her societie thou findst
   Attractive, human, rational, love still;
   In loving thou dost well, in passion not,
   Wherein true Love consists not; love refines
   The thoughts, and heart enlarges, hath his seat
   In Reason, and is judicious, is the scale
   By which to heav'nly Love thou maist ascend,
   Not sunk in carnal pleasure, for which cause
   Among the Beasts no Mate for thee was found.
 
     To whom thus half abash't ADAM repli'd.
   Neither her out-side formd so fair, nor aught
   In procreation common to all kindes
   (Though higher of the genial Bed by far,
   And with mysterious reverence I deem)
   So much delights me, as those graceful acts,
   Those thousand decencies that daily flow
   From all her words and actions, mixt with Love
   And sweet compliance, which declare unfeign'd
   Union of Mind, or in us both one Soule;
   Harmonie to behold in wedded pair
   More grateful then harmonious sound to the eare.
   Yet these subject not; I to thee disclose
   What inward thence I feel, not therefore foild,
   Who meet with various objects, from the sense
   Variously representing; yet still free
   Approve the best, and follow what I approve.
   To love thou blam'st me not, for love thou saist
   Leads up to Heav'n, is both the way and guide;
   Bear with me then, if lawful what I ask;
   Love not the heav'nly Spirits, and how thir Love
   Express they, by looks onely, or do they mix
   Irradiance, virtual or immediate touch?
 
     To whom the Angel with a smile that glow'd
   Celestial rosie red, Loves proper hue,
   Answer'd.  Let it suffice thee that thou know'st
   Us happie, and without Love no happiness.
   Whatever pure thou in the body enjoy'st
   (And pure thou wert created) we enjoy
   In eminence, and obstacle find none
   Of membrane, joynt, or limb, exclusive barrs:
   Easier then Air with Air, if Spirits embrace,
   Total they mix, Union of Pure with Pure
   Desiring; nor restrain'd conveyance need
   As Flesh to mix with Flesh, or Soul with Soul.
   But I can now no more; the parting Sun
   Beyond the Earths green Cape and verdant Isles
   HESPEREAN sets, my Signal to depart.
   Be strong, live happie, and love, but first of all
   Him whom to love is to obey, and keep
   His great command; take heed least Passion sway
   Thy Judgement to do aught, which else free Will
   Would not admit; thine and of all thy Sons
   The weal or woe in thee is plac't; beware.
   I in thy persevering shall rejoyce,
   And all the Blest: stand fast; to stand or fall
   Free in thine own Arbitrement it lies.
   Perfet within, no outward aid require;
   And all temptation to transgress repel.
 
     So saying, he arose; whom ADAM thus
   Follow'd with benediction.  Since to part,
   Go heavenly Guest, Ethereal Messenger,
   Sent from whose sovran goodness I adore.
   Gentle to me and affable hath been
   Thy condescension, and shall be honour'd ever
   With grateful Memorie: thou to mankind
   Be good and friendly still, and oft return.
 
     So parted they, the Angel up to Heav'n
   From the thick shade, and ADAM to his Bowre.
 
        THE END OF THE SEVENTH BOOK.
 
 
   PARADISE LOST
 
   BOOK VIII.
 
   No more of talk where God or Angel Guest
   With Man, as with his Friend, familiar us'd
   To sit indulgent, and with him partake
   Rural repast, permitting him the while
   Venial discourse unblam'd: I now must change
   Those Notes to Tragic; foul distrust, and breach
   Disloyal on the part of Man, revolt
   And disobedience: On the part of Heav'n
   Now alienated, distance and distaste,
   Anger and just rebuke, and judgement giv'n,
   That brought into this World a world of woe,
   Sinne and her shadow Death, and Miserie
   Deaths Harbinger: Sad task, yet argument
   Not less but more Heroic then the wrauth
   Of stern ACHILLES on his Foe pursu'd
   Thrice Fugitive about TROY Wall; or rage
   Of TURNUS for LAVINIA disespous'd,
   Or NEPTUN'S ire or JUNO'S, that so long
   Perplex'd the GREEK and CYTHEREA'S Son;
   If answerable style I can obtaine
   Of my Celestial Patroness, who deignes
   Her nightly visitation unimplor'd,
   And dictates to me slumbring, or inspires
   Easie my unpremeditated Verse:
   Since first this subject for Heroic Song
   Pleas'd me long choosing, and beginning late;
   Not sedulous by Nature to indite
   Warrs, hitherto the onely Argument
   Heroic deem'd, chief maistrie to dissect
   With long and tedious havoc fabl'd Knights
   In Battels feign'd; the better fortitude
   Of Patience and Heroic Martyrdom
   Unsung; or to describe Races and Games,
   Or tilting Furniture, emblazon'd Shields,
   Impreses quaint, Caparisons and Steeds;
   Bases and tinsel Trappings, gorgious Knights
   At Joust and Torneament; then marshal'd Feast
   Serv'd up in Hall with Sewers, and Seneshals;
   The skill of Artifice or Office mean,
   Not that which justly gives Heroic name
   To Person or to Poem.  Mee of these
   Nor skilld nor studious, higher Argument
   Remaines, sufficient of it self to raise
   That name, unless an age too late, or cold
   Climat, or Years damp my intended wing
   Deprest, and much they may, if all be mine,
   Not Hers who brings it nightly to my Ear.
 
     The Sun was sunk, and after him the Starr
   Of HESPERUS, whose Office is to bring
   Twilight upon the Earth, short Arbiter
   Twixt Day and Night, and now from end to end
   Nights Hemisphere had veild the Horizon round:
   When SATAN who late fled before the threats
   Of GABRIEL out of EDEN, now improv'd
   In meditated fraud and malice, bent
   On mans destruction, maugre what might hap
   Of heavier on himself, fearless return'd.
   By Night he fled, and at Midnight return'd
   From compassing the Earth, cautious of day,
   Since URIEL Regent of the Sun descri'd
   His entrance, and forewarnd the Cherubim
   That kept thir watch; thence full of anguish driv'n,
   The space of seven continu'd Nights he rode
   With darkness, thrice the Equinoctial Line
   He circl'd, four times cross'd the Carr of Night
   From Pole to Pole, traversing each Colure;
   On the eighth return'd, and on the Coast averse
   From entrance or Cherubic Watch, by stealth
   Found unsuspected way.  There was a place,
   Now not, though Sin, not Time, first wraught the change,
   Where TIGRIS at the foot of Paradise
   Into a Gulf shot under ground, till part
   Rose up a Fountain by the Tree of Life;
   In with the River sunk, and with it rose
   Satan involv'd in rising Mist, then sought
   Where to lie hid; Sea he had searcht and Land
   From EDEN over PONTUS, and the Poole
   MAEOTIS, up beyond the River OB;
   Downward as farr Antartic; and in length
   West from ORANTES to the Ocean barr'd
   At DARIEN, thence to the Land where flowes
   GANGES and INDUS: thus the Orb he roam'd
   With narrow search; and with inspection deep
   Consider'd every Creature, which of all
   Most opportune might serve his Wiles, and found
   The Serpent suttlest Beast of all the Field.
   Him after long debate, irresolute
   Of thoughts revolv'd, his final sentence chose
   Fit Vessel, fittest Imp of fraud, in whom
   To enter, and his dark suggestions hide
   From sharpest sight: for in the wilie Snake,
   Whatever sleights none would suspicious mark,
   As from his wit and native suttletie
   Proceeding, which in other Beasts observ'd
   Doubt might beget of Diabolic pow'r
   Active within beyond the sense of brute.
   Thus he resolv'd, but first from inward griefe
   His bursting passion into plaints thus pour'd:
 
     O Earth, how like to Heav'n, if not preferrd
   More justly, Seat worthier of Gods, as built
   With second thoughts, reforming what was old!
   For what God after better worse would build?
   Terrestrial Heav'n, danc't round by other Heav'ns
   That shine, yet bear thir bright officious Lamps,
   Light above Light, for thee alone, as seems,
   In thee concentring all thir precious beams
   Of sacred influence: As God in Heav'n
   Is Center, yet extends to all, so thou
   Centring receav'st from all those Orbs; in thee,
   Not in themselves, all thir known vertue appeers
   Productive in Herb, Plant, and nobler birth
   Of Creatures animate with gradual life
   Of Growth, Sense, Reason, all summ'd up in Man.
   With what delight could I have walkt thee round
   If I could joy in aught, sweet interchange
   Of Hill and Vallie, Rivers, Woods and Plaines,
   Now Land, now Sea, & Shores with Forrest crownd,
   Rocks, Dens, and Caves; but I in none of these
   Find place or refuge; and the more I see
   Pleasures about me, so much more I feel
   Torment within me, as from the hateful siege
   Of contraries; all good to me becomes
   Bane, and in Heav'n much worse would be my state.
   But neither here seek I, no nor in Heav'n
   To dwell, unless by maistring Heav'ns Supreame;
   Nor hope to be my self less miserable
   By what I seek, but others to make such
   As I though thereby worse to me redound:
   For onely in destroying I finde ease
   To my relentless thoughts; and him destroyd,
   Or won to what may work his utter loss,
   For whom all this was made, all this will soon
   Follow, as to him linkt in weal or woe,
   In wo then; that destruction wide may range:
   To mee shall be the glorie sole among
   The infernal Powers, in one day to have marr'd
   What he ALMIGHTIE styl'd, six Nights and Days
   Continu'd making, and who knows how long
   Before had bin contriving, though perhaps
   Not longer then since I in one Night freed
   From servitude inglorious welnigh half
   Th' Angelic Name, and thinner left the throng
   Of his adorers: hee to be aveng'd,
   And to repaire his numbers thus impair'd,
   Whether such vertue spent of old now faild
   More Angels to Create, if they at least
   Are his Created or to spite us more,
   Determin'd to advance into our room
   A Creature form'd of Earth, and him endow,
   Exalted from so base original,
   With Heav'nly spoils, our spoils: What he decreed
   He effected; Man he made, and for him built
   Magnificent this World, and Earth his seat,
   Him Lord pronounc'd, and, O indignitie!
   Subjected to his service Angel wings,
   And flaming Ministers to watch and tend
   Thir earthlie Charge: Of these the vigilance
   I dread, and to elude, thus wrapt in mist
   Of midnight vapor glide obscure, and prie
   In every Bush and Brake, where hap may finde
   The Serpent sleeping, in whose mazie foulds
   To hide me, and the dark intent I bring.
   O foul descent! that I who erst contended
   With Gods to sit the highest, am now constraind
   Into a Beast, and mixt with bestial slime,
   This essence to incarnate and imbrute,
   That to the hight of Deitie aspir'd;
   But what will not Ambition and Revenge
   Descend to? who aspires must down as low
   As high he soard, obnoxious first or last
   To basest things.  Revenge, at first though sweet,
   Bitter ere long back on it self recoiles;
   Let it; I reck not, so it light well aim'd,
   Since higher I fall short, on him who next
   Provokes my envie, this new Favorite
   Of Heav'n, this Man of Clay, Son of despite,
   Whom us the more to spite his Maker rais'd
   From dust: spite then with spite is best repaid.
 
     So saying, through each Thicket Danck or Drie,
   Like a black mist low creeping, he held on
   His midnight search, where soonest he might finde
   The Serpent: him fast sleeping soon he found
   In Labyrinth of many a round self-rowl'd,
   His head the midst, well stor'd with suttle wiles:
   Not yet in horrid Shade or dismal Den,
   Not nocent yet, but on the grassie Herbe
   Fearless unfeard he slept: in at his Mouth
   The Devil enterd, and his brutal sense,
   In heart or head, possessing soon inspir'd
   With act intelligential; but his sleep
   Disturbd not, waiting close th' approach of Morn.
   Now whenas sacred Light began to dawne
   In EDEN on the humid Flours, that breathd
   Thir morning Incense, when all things that breath,
   From th' Earths great Altar send up silent praise
   To the Creator, and his Nostrils fill
   With gratefull Smell, forth came the human pair
   And joynd thir vocal Worship to the Quire
   Of Creatures wanting voice, that done, partake
   The season, prime for sweetest Sents and Aires:
   Then commune how that day they best may ply
   Thir growing work: for much thir work outgrew
   The hands dispatch of two Gardning so wide.
   And EVE first to her Husband thus began.
 
     ADAM, well may we labour still to dress
   This Garden, still to tend Plant, Herb and Flour.
   Our pleasant task enjoyn'd, but till more hands
   Aid us, the work under our labour grows,
   Luxurious by restraint; what we by day
   Lop overgrown, or prune, or prop, or bind,
   One night or two with wanton growth derides
   Tending to wilde.  Thou therefore now advise
   Or hear what to my mind first thoughts present,
   Let us divide our labours, thou where choice
   Leads thee, or where most needs, whether to wind
   The Woodbine round this Arbour, or direct
   The clasping Ivie where to climb, while I
   In yonder Spring of Roses intermixt
   With Myrtle, find what to redress till Noon:
   For while so near each other thus all day
   Our task we choose, what wonder if no near
   Looks intervene and smiles, or object new
   Casual discourse draw on, which intermits
   Our dayes work brought to little, though begun
   Early, and th' hour of Supper comes unearn'd.
 
     To whom mild answer ADAM thus return'd.
   Sole EVE, Associate sole, to me beyond
   Compare above all living Creatures deare,
   Well hast thou motion'd, wel thy thoughts imployd
   How we might best fulfill the work which here
   God hath assign'd us, nor of me shalt pass
   Unprais'd: for nothing lovelier can be found
   In woman, then to studie houshold good,
   And good workes in her Husband to promote.
   Yet not so strictly hath our Lord impos'd
   Labour, as to debarr us when we need
   Refreshment, whether food, or talk between,
   Food of the mind, or this sweet intercourse
   Of looks and smiles, for smiles from Reason flow,
   To brute deni'd, and are of Love the food,
   Love not the lowest end of human life.
   For not to irksom toile, but to delight
   He made us, and delight to Reason joyn'd.
   These paths and Bowers doubt not but our joynt
   Will keep from Wilderness with ease, as wide
   As we need walk, till younger hands ere long
   Assist us: But if much converse perhaps
   Thee satiate, to short absence I could yeild.
   For solitude somtimes is best societie,
   And short retirement urges sweet returne.
   But other doubt possesses me, least harm
   Befall thee sever'd from me; for thou knowst
   What hath bin warn'd us, what malicious Foe
   Envying our happiness, and of his own
   Despairing, seeks to work us woe and shame
   By sly assault; and somwhere nigh at hand
   Watches, no doubt, with greedy hope to find
   His wish and best advantage, us asunder,
   Hopeless to circumvent us joynd, where each
   To other speedie aide might lend at need;
   Whether his first design be to withdraw
   Our fealtie from God, or to disturb
   Conjugal Love, then which perhaps no bliss
   Enjoy'd by us excites his envie more;
   Or this, or worse, leave not the faithful side
   That gave thee being, stil shades thee and protects.
   The Wife, where danger or dishonour lurks,
   Safest and seemliest by her Husband staies,
   Who guards her, or with her the worst endures.
 
     To whom the Virgin Majestie of EVE,
   As one who loves, and some unkindness meets,
   With sweet austeer composure thus reply'd.
 
     Ofspring of Heav'n and Earth, and all Earths Lord,
   That such an enemie we have, who seeks
   Our ruin, both by thee informd I learne,
   And from the parting Angel over-heard
   As in a shadie nook I stood behind,
   Just then returnd at shut of Evening Flours.
   But that thou shouldst my firmness therefore doubt
   To God or thee, because we have a foe
   May tempt it, I expected not to hear.
   His violence thou fearst not, being such,
   As wee, not capable of death or paine,
   Can either not receave, or can repell.
   His fraud is then thy fear, which plain inferrs
   Thy equal fear that my firm Faith and Love
   Can by his fraud be shak'n or seduc't;
   Thoughts, which how found they harbour in thy Brest,
   ADAM, misthought of her to thee so dear?
 
     To whom with healing words ADAM reply'd.
   Daughter of God and Man, immortal EVE,
   For such thou art, from sin and blame entire:
   Not diffident of thee do I dissuade
   Thy absence from my sight, but to avoid
   Th' attempt it self, intended by our Foe.
   For hee who tempts, though in vain, at least asperses
   The tempted with dishonour foul, suppos'd
   Not incorruptible of Faith, not prooff
   Against temptation: thou thy self with scorne
   And anger wouldst resent the offer'd wrong,
   Though ineffectual found: misdeem not then,
   If such affront I labour to avert
   From thee alone, which on us both at once
   The Enemie, though bold, will hardly dare,
   Or daring, first on mee th' assault shall light.
   Nor thou his malice and false guile contemn;
   Suttle he needs must be, who could seduce
   Angels, nor think superfluous others aid.
   I from the influence of thy looks receave
   Access in every Vertue, in thy sight
   More wise, more watchful, stronger, if need were
   Of outward strength; while shame, thou looking on,
   Shame to be overcome or over-reacht
   Would utmost vigor raise, and rais'd unite.
   Why shouldst not thou like sense within thee feel
   When I am present, and thy trial choose
   With me, best witness of thy Vertue tri'd.
 
     So spake domestick ADAM in his care
   And Matrimonial Love, but EVE, who thought
   Less attributed to her Faith sincere,
   Thus her reply with accent sweet renewd.
 
     If this be our condition, thus to dwell
   In narrow circuit strait'nd by a Foe,
   Suttle or violent, we not endu'd
   Single with like defence, wherever met,
   How are we happie, still in fear of harm?
   But harm precedes not sin: onely our Foe
   Tempting affronts us with his foul esteem
   Of our integritie: his foul esteeme
   Sticks no dishonor on our Front, but turns
   Foul on himself; then wherfore shund or feard
   By us? who rather double honour gaine
   From his surmise prov'd false, finde peace within,
   Favour from Heav'n, our witness from th' event.
   And what is Faith, Love, Vertue unassaid
   Alone, without exterior help sustaind?
   Let us not then suspect our happie State
   Left so imperfet by the Maker wise,
   As not secure to single or combin'd.
   Fraile is our happiness, if this be so,
   And EDEN were no EDEN thus expos'd.
 
     To whom thus ADAM fervently repli'd.
   O Woman, best are all things as the will
   Of God ordaind them, his creating hand
   Nothing imperfet or deficient left
   Of all that he Created, much less Man,
   Or ought that might his happie State secure,
   Secure from outward force; within himself
   The danger lies, yet lies within his power:
   Against his will he can receave no harme.
   But God left free the Will, for what obeyes
   Reason, is free, and Reason he made right,
   But bid her well beware, and still erect,
   Least by some faire appeering good surpris'd
   She dictate false, and missinforme the Will
   To do what God expresly hath forbid.
   Not then mistrust, but tender love enjoynes,
   That I should mind thee oft, and mind thou me.
   Firm we subsist, yet possible to swerve,
   Since Reason not impossibly may meet
   Some specious object by the Foe subornd,
   And fall into deception unaware,
   Not keeping strictest watch, as she was warnd.
   Seek not temptation then, which to avoide
   Were better, and most likelie if from mee
   Thou sever not; Trial will come unsought.
   Wouldst thou approve thy constancie, approve
   First thy obedience; th' other who can know,
   Not seeing thee attempted, who attest?
   But if thou think, trial unsought may finde
   Us both securer then thus warnd thou seemst,
   Go; for thy stay, not free, absents thee more;
   Go in thy native innocence, relie
   On what thou hast of vertue, summon all,
   For God towards thee hath done his part, do thine.
 
     So spake the Patriarch of Mankinde, but EVE
   Persisted, yet submiss, though last, repli'd.
 
     With thy permission then, and thus forewarnd
   Chiefly by what thy own last reasoning words
   Touchd onely, that our trial, when least sought,
   May finde us both perhaps farr less prepar'd,
   The willinger I goe, nor much expect
   A Foe so proud will first the weaker seek;
   So bent, the more shall shame him his repulse.
   Thus saying, from her Husbands hand her hand
   Soft she withdrew, and like a Wood-Nymph light
   OREAD or DRYAD, or of DELIA's Traine,
   Betook her to the Groves, but DELIA's self
   In gate surpass'd and Goddess-like deport,
   Though not as shee with Bow and Quiver armd,
   But with such Gardning Tools as Are yet rude,
   Guiltless of fire had formd, or Angels brought,
   To PALES, or POMONA, thus adornd,
   Likest she seemd, POMONA when she fled
   VERTUMNUS, or to CERES in her Prime,
   Yet Virgin of PROSERPINA from JOVE.
   Her long with ardent look his EYE pursu'd
   Delighted, but desiring more her stay.
   Oft he to her his charge of quick returne,
   Repeated, shee to him as oft engag'd
   To be returnd by Noon amid the Bowre,
   And all things in best order to invite
   Noontide repast, or Afternoons repose.
   O much deceav'd, much failing, hapless EVE,
   Of thy presum'd return! event perverse!
   Thou never from that houre in Paradise
   Foundst either sweet repast, or found repose;
   Such ambush hid among sweet Flours and Shades
   Waited with hellish rancor imminent
   To intercept thy way, or send thee back
   Despoild of Innocence, of Faith, of Bliss.
   For now, and since first break of dawne the Fiend,
   Meer Serpent in appearance, forth was come,
   And on his Quest, where likeliest he might finde
   The onely two of Mankinde, but in them
   The whole included Race, his purposd prey.
   In Bowre and Field he sought, where any tuft
   Of Grove or Garden-Plot more pleasant lay,
   Thir tendance or Plantation for delight,
   By Fountain or by shadie Rivulet
   He sought them both, but wish'd his hap might find
   EVE separate, he wish'd, but not with hope
   Of what so seldom chanc'd, when to his wish,
   Beyond his hope, EVE separate he spies,
   Veild in a Cloud of Fragrance, where she stood,
   Half spi'd, so thick the Roses bushing round
   About her glowd, oft stooping to support
   Each Flour of slender stalk, whose head though gay
   Carnation, Purple, Azure, or spect with Gold,
   Hung drooping unsustaind, them she upstaies
   Gently with Mirtle band, mindless the while,
   Her self, though fairest unsupported Flour,
   From her best prop so farr, and storn so nigh.
   Neererhe drew, and many a walk travers'd
   Of stateliest Covert, Cedar, Pine, or Palme,
   Then voluble and bold, now hid, now seen
   Among thick-wov'n Arborets and Flours
   Imborderd on each Bank, the hand of EVE:
   Spot more delicious then those Gardens feign'd
   Or of reviv'd ADONIS, or renownd
   ALCINOUS, host of old LAERTES Son,
   Or that, not Mystic, where the Sapient King
   Held dalliance with his faire EGYPTIAN Spouse.
   Much hee the Place admir'd, the Person more.
   As one who long in populous City pent,
   Where Houses thick and Sewers annoy the Aire,
   Forth issuing on a Summers Morn, to breathe
   Among the pleasant Villages and Farmes
   Adjoynd, from each thing met conceaves delight,
   The smell of Grain, or tedded Grass, or Kine,
   Or Dairie, each rural sight, each rural sound;
   If chance with Nymphlike step fair Virgin pass,
   What pleasing seemd, for her now pleases more,
   She most, and in her look summs all Delight.
   Such Pleasure took the Serpent to behold
   This Flourie Plat, the sweet recess of EVE
   Thus earlie, thus alone; her Heav'nly forme
   Angelic, but more soft, and Feminine,
   Her graceful Innocence, her every Aire
   Of gesture or lest action overawd
   His Malice, and with rapine sweet bereav'd
   His fierceness of the fierce intent it brought:
   That space the Evil one abstracted stood
   From his own evil, and for the time remaind
   Stupidly good, of enmitie disarm'd,
   Of guile, of hate, of envie, of revenge;
   But the hot Hell that alwayes in him burnes,
   Though in mid Heav'n, soon ended his delight,
   And tortures him now more, the more he sees
   Of pleasure not for him ordain'd: then soon
   Fierce hate he recollects, and all his thoughts
   Of mischief, gratulating, thus excites.
 
     Thoughts, whither have he led me, with what sweet
   Compulsion thus transported to forget
   What hither brought us, hate, not love, nor hope
   Of Paradise for Hell, hope here to taste
   Of pleasure, but all pleasure to destroy,
   Save what is in destroying, other joy
   To me is lost.  Then let me not let pass
   Occasion which now smiles, behold alone
   The Woman, opportune to all attempts,
   Her Husband, for I view far round, not nigh,
   Whose higher intellectual more I shun,
   And strength, of courage hautie, and of limb
   Heroic built, though of terrestrial mould,
   Foe not informidable, exempt from wound,
   I not; so much hath Hell debas'd, and paine
   Infeebl'd me, to what I was in Heav'n.
   Shee fair, divinely fair, fit Love for Gods,
   Not terrible, though terrour be in Love
   And beautie, not approacht by stronger hate,
   Hate stronger, under shew of Love well feign'd,
   The way which to her ruin now I tend.
 
     So spake the Enemie of Mankind, enclos'd
   In Serpent, Inmate bad, and toward EVE
   Address'd his way, not with indented wave,
   Prone on the ground, as since, but on his reare,
   Circular base of rising foulds, that tour'd
   Fould above fould a surging Maze, his Head
   Crested aloft, and Carbuncle his Eyes;
   With burnisht Neck of verdant Gold, erect
   Amidst his circling Spires, that on the grass
   Floted redundant: pleasing was his shape,
   And lovely, never since of Serpent kind
   Lovelier, not those that in ILLYRIA chang'd
   HERMIONE and CADMUS, or the God
   In EPIDAURUS; nor to which transformd
   AMMONIAN JOVE, or CAPITOLINE was seen,
   Hee with OLYMPIAS, this with her who bore
   SCIPIO the highth of ROME.  With tract oblique
   At first, as one who sought access, but feard
   To interrupt, side-long he works his way.
   As when a Ship by skilful Stearsman wrought
   Nigh Rivers mouth or Foreland, where the Wind
   Veres oft, as oft so steers, and shifts her Saile;
   So varied hee, and of his tortuous Traine
   Curld many a wanton wreath in sight of EVE,
   To lure her Eye; shee busied heard the sound
   Of rusling Leaves, but minded not, as us'd
   To such disport before her through the Field,
   From every Beast, more duteous at her call,
   Then at CIRCEAN call the Herd disguis'd.
   Hee boulder now, uncall'd before her stood;
   But as in gaze admiring: Oft he bowd
   His turret Crest, and sleek enamel'd Neck,
   Fawning, and lick'd the ground whereon she trod.
   His gentle dumb expression turnd at length
   The Eye of EVE to mark his play; he glad
   Of her attention gaind, with Serpent Tongue
   Organic, or impulse of vocal Air,
   His fraudulent temptation thus began.
 
     Wonder not, sovran Mistress, if perhaps
   Thou canst, who art sole Wonder, much less arm
   Thy looks, the Heav'n of mildness, with disdain,
   Displeas'd that I approach thee thus, and gaze
   Insatiate, I thus single; nor have feard
   Thy awful brow, more awful thus retir'd.
   Fairest resemblance of thy Maker faire,
   Thee all living things gaze on, all things thine
   By gift, and thy Celestial Beautie adore
   With ravishment beheld, there best beheld
   Where universally admir'd; but here
   In this enclosure wild, these Beasts among,
   Beholders rude, and shallow to discerne
   Half what in thee is fair, one man except,
   Who sees thee? (and what is one?) who shouldst be seen
   A Goddess among Gods, ador'd and serv'd
   By Angels numberless, thy daily Train.
 
     So gloz'd the Tempter, and his Proem tun'd;
   Into the Heart of EVE his words made way,
   Though at the voice much marveling; at length
   Not unamaz'd she thus in answer spake.
   What may this mean?  Language of Man pronounc't
   By Tongue of Brute, and human sense exprest?
   The first at lest of these I thought deni'd
   To Beasts, whom God on their Creation-Day
   Created mute to all articulat sound;
   The latter I demurre, for in thir looks
   Much reason, and in thir actions oft appeers.
   Thee, Serpent, suttlest beast of all the field
   I knew, but not with human voice endu'd;
   Redouble then this miracle, and say,
   How cam'st thou speakable of mute, and how
   To me so friendly grown above the rest
   Of brutal kind, that daily are in sight?
   Say, for such wonder claims attention due.
 
     To whom the guileful Tempter thus reply'd.
   Empress of this fair World, resplendent EVE,
   Easie to mee it is to tell thee all
   What thou commandst, and right thou shouldst be obeyd:
   I was at first as other Beasts that graze
   The trodden Herb, of abject thoughts and low,
   As was my food, nor aught but food discern'd
   Or Sex, and apprehended nothing high:
   Till on a day roaving the field, I chanc'd
   A goodly Tree farr distant to behold
   Loaden with fruit of fairest colours mixt,
   Ruddie and Gold: I nearer drew to gaze;
   When from the boughes a savorie odour blow'n,
   Grateful to appetite, more pleas'd my sense
   Then smell of sweetest Fenel, or the Teats
   Of Ewe or Goat dropping with Milk at Eevn,
   Unsuckt of Lamb or Kid, that tend thir play.
   To satisfie the sharp desire I had
   Of tasting those fair Apples, I resolv'd
   Not to deferr; hunger and thirst at once,
   Powerful perswaders, quick'nd at the scent
   Of that alluring fruit, urg'd me so keene.
   About the Mossie Trunk I wound me soon,
   For high from ground the branches would require
   Thy utmost reach or ADAMS: Round the Tree
   All other Beasts that saw, with like desire
   Longing and envying stood, but could not reach.
   Amid the Tree now got, where plentie hung
   Tempting so nigh, to pluck and eat my fill
   I spar'd not, for such pleasure till that hour
   At Feed or Fountain never had I found.
   Sated at length, ere long I might perceave
   Strange alteration in me, to degree
   Of Reason in my inward Powers, and Speech
   Wanted not long, though to this shape retaind.
   Thenceforth to Speculations high or deep
   I turnd my thoughts, and with capacious mind
   Considerd all things visible in Heav'n,
   Or Earth, or Middle, all things fair and good;
   But all that fair and good in thy Divine
   Semblance, and in thy Beauties heav'nly Ray
   United I beheld; no Fair to thine
   Equivalent or second, which compel'd
   Mee thus, though importune perhaps, to come
   And gaze, and worship thee of right declar'd
   Sovran of Creatures, universal Dame.
 
     So talk'd the spirited sly Snake; and EVE
   Yet more amaz'd unwarie thus reply'd.
 
     Serpent, thy overpraising leaves in doubt
   The vertue of that Fruit, in thee first prov'd:
   But say, where grows the Tree, from hence how far?
   For many are the Trees of God that grow
   In Paradise, and various, yet unknown
   To us, in such abundance lies our choice,
   As leaves a greater store of Fruit untoucht,
   Still hanging incorruptible, till men
   Grow up to thir provision, and more hands
   Help to disburden Nature of her Bearth.
 
     To whom the wilie Adder, blithe and glad.
   Empress, the way is readie, and not long,
   Beyond a row of Myrtles, on a Flat,
   Fast by a Fountain, one small Thicket past
   Of blowing Myrrh and Balme; if thou accept
   My conduct, I can bring thee thither soon.
 
     Lead then, said EVE.  Hee leading swiftly rowld
   In tangles, and make intricate seem strait,
   To mischief swift.  Hope elevates, and joy
   Bright'ns his Crest, as when a wandring Fire
   Compact of unctuous vapor, which the Night
   Condenses, and the cold invirons round,
   Kindl'd through agitation to a Flame,
   Which oft, they say, some evil Spirit attends,
   Hovering and blazing with delusive Light,
   Misleads th' amaz'd Night-wanderer from his way
   To Boggs and Mires, & oft through Pond or Poole,
   There swallow'd up and lost, from succour farr.
   So glister'd the dire Snake and into fraud
   Led EVE our credulous Mother, to the Tree
   Of prohibition, root of all our woe;
   Which when she saw, thus to her guide she spake.
 
     Serpent, we might have spar'd our coming hither,
   Fruitless to me, though Fruit be here to excess,
   The credit of whose vertue rest with thee,
   Wondrous indeed, if cause of such effects.
   But of this Tree we may not taste nor touch;
   God so commanded, and left that Command
   Sole Daughter of his voice; the rest, we live
   Law to our selves, our Reason is our Law.
 
     To whom the Tempter guilefully repli'd.
   Indeed? hath God then said that of the Fruit
   Of all these Garden Trees ye shall not eate,
   Yet Lords declar'd of all in Earth or Aire?
 
     To whom thus EVE yet sinless.  Of the Fruit
   Of each Tree in the Garden we may eate,
   But of the Fruit of this fair Tree amidst
   The Garden, God hath said, Ye shall not eate
   Thereof, nor shall ye touch it, least ye die.
 
     She scarse had said, though brief, when now more bold
   The Tempter, but with shew of Zeale and Love
   To Man, and indignation at his wrong,
   New part puts on, and as to passion mov'd,
   Fluctuats disturbd, yet comely, and in act
   Rais'd, as of som great matter to begin.
   As when of old som Orator renound
   In ATHENS or free ROME, where Eloquence
   Flourishd, since mute, to som great cause addrest,
   Stood in himself collected, while each part,
   Motion, each act won audience ere the tongue,
   Somtimes in highth began, as no delay
   Of Preface brooking through his Zeal of Right.
   So standing, moving, or to highth upgrown
   The Tempter all impassiond thus began.
 
     O Sacred, Wise, and Wisdom-giving Plant,
   Mother of Science, Now I feel thy Power
   Within me cleere, not onely to discerne
   Things in thir Causes, but to trace the wayes
   Of highest Agents, deemd however wise.
   Queen of this Universe, doe not believe
   Those rigid threats of Death; ye shall not Die:
   How should ye? by the Fruit? it gives you Life
   To Knowledge?  By the Threatner, look on mee,
   Mee who have touch'd and tasted, yet both live,
   And life more perfet have attaind then Fate
   Meant mee, by ventring higher then my Lot.
   Shall that be shut to Man, which to the Beast
   Is open? or will God incense his ire
   For such a pretty Trespass, and not praise
   Rather your dauntless vertue, whom the pain
   Of Death denounc't, whatever thing Death be,
   Deterrd not from atchieving what might leade
   To happier life, knowledge of Good and Evil;
   Of good, how just? of evil, if what is evil
   Be real, why not known, since easier shunnd?
   God therefore cannot hurt ye, and be just;
   Not just, not God; not feard then, nor obeid:
   Your feare it self of Death removes the feare.
   Why then was this forbid?  Why but to awe,
   Why but to keep ye low and ignorant,
   His worshippers; he knows that in the day
   Ye Eate thereof, your Eyes that seem so cleere,
   Yet are but dim, shall perfetly be then
   Op'nd and cleerd, and ye shall be as Gods,
   Knowing both Good and Evil as they know.
   That ye should be as Gods, since I as Man,
   Internal Man, is but proportion meet,
   I of brute human, yee of human Gods.
   So ye shalt die perhaps, by putting off
   Human, to put on Gods, death to be wisht,
   Though threat'nd, which no worse then this can bring
   And what are Gods that Man may not become
   As they, participating God-like food?
   The Gods are first, and that advantage use
   On our belief, that all from them proceeds,
   I question it, for this fair Earth I see,
   Warm'd by the Sun, producing every kind,
   Them nothing: If they all things, who enclos'd
   Knowledge of Good and Evil in this Tree,
   That whoso eats thereof, forthwith attains
   Wisdom without their leave? and wherein lies
   Th' offence, that Man should thus attain to know?
   What can your knowledge hurt him, or this Tree
   Impart against his will if all be his?
   Or is it envie, and can envie dwell
   In heav'nly brests? these, these and many more
   Causes import your need of this fair Fruit.
   Goddess humane, reach then, and freely taste.
 
     He ended, and his words replete with guile
   Into her heart too easie entrance won:
   Fixt on the Fruit she gaz'd, which to behold
   Might tempt alone, and in her ears the sound
   Yet rung of his perswasive words, impregn'd
   With Reason, to her seeming, and with Truth;
   Meanwhile the hour of Noon drew on, and wak'd
   An eager appetite, rais'd by the smell
   So savorie of that Fruit, which with desire,
   Inclinable now grown to touch or taste,
   Sollicited her longing eye; yet first
   Pausing a while, thus to her self she mus'd.
 
     Great are thy Vertues, doubtless, best of Fruits,
   Though kept from Man, & worthy to be admir'd,
   Whose taste, too long forborn, at first assay
   Gave elocution to the mute, and taught
   The Tongue not made for Speech to speak thy praise:
   Thy praise hee also who forbids thy use,
   Conceales not from us, naming thee the Tree
   Of Knowledge, knowledge both of good and evil;
   Forbids us then to taste, but his forbidding
   Commends thee more, while it inferrs the good
   By thee communicated, and our want:
   For good unknown, sure is not had, or had
   And yet unknown, is as not had at all.
   In plain then, what forbids he but to know,
   Forbids us good, forbids us to be wise?
   Such prohibitions binde not.  But if Death
   Bind us with after-bands, what profits then
   Our inward freedom?  In the day we eate
   Of this fair Fruit, our doom is, we shall die.
   How dies the Serpent? hee hath eat'n and lives,
   And knows, and speaks, and reasons, and discernes,
   Irrational till then.  For us alone
   Was death invented? or to us deni'd
   This intellectual food, for beasts reserv'd?
   For Beasts it seems: yet that one Beast which first
   Hath tasted, envies not, but brings with joy
   The good befall'n him, Author unsuspect,
   Friendly to man, farr from deceit or guile.
   What fear I then, rather what know to feare
   Under this ignorance of Good and Evil,
   Of God or Death, of Law or Penaltie?
   Here grows the Cure of all, this Fruit Divine,
   Fair to the Eye, inviting to the Taste,
   Of vertue to make wise: what hinders then
   To reach, and feed at once both Bodie and Mind?
 
     So saying, her rash hand in evil hour
   Forth reaching to the Fruit, she pluck'd, she eat:
   Earth felt the wound, and Nature from her seat
   Sighing through all her Works gave signs of woe,
   That all was lost.  Back to the Thicket slunk
   The guiltie Serpent, and well might, for EVE
   Intent now wholly on her taste, naught else
   Regarded, such delight till then, as seemd,
   In Fruit she never tasted, whether true
   Or fansied so, through expectation high
   Of knowledg, nor was God-head from her thought.
   Greedily she ingorg'd without restraint,
   And knew not eating Death: Satiate at length,
   And hight'nd as with Wine, jocond and boon,
   Thus to her self she pleasingly began.
 
     O Sovran, vertuous, precious of all Trees
   In Paradise, of operation blest
   To Sapience, hitherto obscur'd, infam'd,
   And thy fair Fruit let hang, as to no end
   Created; but henceforth my early care,
   Not without Song, each Morning, and due praise
   Shall tend thee, and the fertil burden ease
   Of thy full branches offer'd free to all;
   Till dieted by thee I grow mature
   In knowledge, as the Gods who all things know;
   Though others envie what they cannot give;
   For had the gift bin theirs, it had not here
   Thus grown.  Experience, next to thee I owe,
   Best guide; not following thee, I had remaind
   In ignorance, thou op'nst Wisdoms way,
   And giv'st access, though secret she retire.
   And I perhaps am secret; Heav'n is high,
   High and remote to see from thence distinct
   Each thing on Earth; and other care perhaps
   May have diverted from continual watch
   Our great Forbidder, safe with all his Spies
   About him.  But to ADAM in what sort
   Shall I appeer? shall I to him make known
   As yet my change, and give him to partake
   Full happiness with mee, or rather not,
   But keep the odds of Knowledge in my power
   Without Copartner? so to add what wants
   In Femal Sex, the more to draw his Love,
   And render me more equal, and perhaps
   A thing not undesireable, somtime
   Superior; for inferior who is free?
   This may be well: but what if God have seen,
   And Death ensue? then I shall be no more,
   And ADAM wedded to another EVE,
   Shall live with her enjoying, I extinct;
   A death to think.  Confirm'd then I resolve,
   ADAM shall share with me in bliss or woe:
   So dear I love him, that with him all deaths
   I could endure; without him live no life.
 
     So saying, from the Tree her step she turnd,
   But first low Reverence don, as to the power
   That dwelt within, whose presence had infus'd
   Into the plant sciential sap, deriv'd
   From Nectar, drink of Gods.  ADAM the while
   Waiting desirous her return, had wove
   Of choicest Flours a Garland to adorne
   Her Tresses, and her rural labours crown
   As Reapers oft are wont thir Harvest Queen.
   Great joy he promis'd to his thoughts, and new
   Solace in her return, so long delay'd;
   Yet oft his heart, divine of somthing ill,
   Misgave him; hee the faultring measure felt;
   And forth to meet her went, the way she took
   That Morn when first they parted; by the Tree
   Of Knowledge he must pass, there he her met,
   Scarse from the Tree returning; in her hand
   A bough of fairest fruit that downie smil'd,
   New gatherd, and ambrosial smell diffus'd.
   To him she hasted, in her face excuse
   Came Prologue, and Apologie to prompt,
   Which with bland words at will she thus addrest.
 
     Hast thou not wonderd, ADAM, at my stay?
   Thee I have misst, and thought it long, depriv'd
   Thy presence, agonie of love till now
   Not felt, nor shall be twice, for never more
   Mean I to trie, what rash untri'd I sought,
   The paine of absence from thy sight.  But strange
   Hath bin the cause, and wonderful to heare:
   This Tree is not as we are told, a Tree
   Of danger tasted, nor to evil unknown
   Op'ning the way, but of Divine effect
   To open Eyes, and make them Gods who taste;
   And hath bin tasted such; the Serpent wise,
   Or not restraind as wee, or not obeying,
   Hath eat'n of the fruit, and is become,
   Not dead, as we are threatn'd, but thenceforth
   Endu'd with human voice and human sense,
   Reasoning to admiration, and with mee
   Perswasively hath so prevaild, that I
   Have also tasted, and have also found
   Th' effects to correspond, opener mine Eyes,
   Dimm erst, dilated Spirits, ampler Heart,
   And growing up to Godhead; which for thee
   Chiefly I sought, without thee can despise.
   For bliss, as thou hast part, to me is bliss,
   Tedious, unshar'd with thee, and odious soon.
   Thou therefore also taste, that equal Lot
   May joyne us, equal Joy, as equal Love;
   Least thou not tasting, different degree
   Disjoyne us, and I then too late renounce
   Deitie for thee, when Fate will not permit.
 
     Thus EVE with Countnance blithe her storie told;
   But in her Cheek distemper flushing glowd.
   On th' other side, ADAM, soon as he heard
   The fatal Trespass don by EVE, amaz'd,
   Astonied stood and Blank, while horror chill
   Ran through his veins, and all his joynts relax'd;
   From his slack hand the Garland wreath'd for EVE
   Down drop'd, and all the faded Roses shed:
   Speechless he stood and pale, till thus at length
   First to himself he inward silence broke.
 
     O fairest of Creation, last and best
   Of all Gods Works, Creature in whom excell'd
   Whatever can to fight or thought be found,
   Holy, divine, good, amiable, or sweet!
   How art thou lost, how on a sudden lost,
   Defac't, deflourd, and now to Death devote?
   Rather how hast thou yeelded to transgress
   The strict forbiddance, how to violate
   The sacred Fruit forbidd'n! som cursed fraud
   Of Enemie hath beguil'd thee, yet unknown,
   And mee with thee hath ruind, for with thee
   Certain my resolution is to Die;
   How can I live without thee, how forgoe
   Thy sweet Converse and Love so dearly joyn'd,
   To live again in these wilde Woods forlorn?
   Should God create another EVE, and I
   Another Rib afford, yet loss of thee
   Would never from my heart; no no, I feel
   The Link of Nature draw me: Flesh of Flesh,
   Bone of my Bone thou art, and from thy State
   Mine never shall be parted, bliss or woe.
 
     So having said, as one from sad dismay
   Recomforted, and after thoughts disturbd
   Submitting to what seemd remediless,
   Thus in calme mood his Words to EVE he turnd.
 
     Bold deed thou hast presum'd, adventrous EVE,
   And peril great provok't, who thus hast dar'd
   Had it bin onely coveting to Eye
   That sacred Fruit, sacred to abstinence,
   Much more to taste it under banne to touch.
   But past who can recall, or don undoe?
   Not God omnipotent, for Fate, yet so
   Perhaps thou shalt not Die, perhaps the Fact
   Is not so hainous now, foretasted Fruit,
   Profan'd first by the Serpent, by him first
   Made common and unhallowd: ere one tastes;
   Nor yet on him found deadly; he yet lives,
   Lives, as thou saidst, and gaines to live as Man
   Higher degree of Life, inducement strong
   To us, as likely tasting to attaine
   Proportional ascent, which cannot be
   But to be Gods, or Angels Demi-gods.
   Nor can I think that God, Creator wise,
   Though threatning, will in earnest so destroy
   Us his prime Creatures, dignifi'd so high,
   Set over all his Works, which in our Fall,
   For us created, needs with us must faile,
   Dependent made; so God shall uncreate,
   Be frustrate, do, undo, and labour loose,
   Not well conceav'd of God, who though his Power
   Creation could repeate, yet would be loath
   Us to abolish, least the Adversary
   Triumph and say; Fickle their State whom God
   Most Favors, who can please him long?  Mee first
   He ruind, now Mankind; whom will he next?
   Matter of scorne, not to be given the Foe.
   However I with thee have fixt my Lot,
   Certain to undergoe like doom, if Death
   Consort with thee, Death is to mee as Life;
   So forcible within my heart I feel
   The Bond of Nature draw me to my owne,
   My own in thee, for what thou art is mine;
   Our State cannot be severd, we are one,
   One Flesh; to loose thee were to loose my self.
 
     So ADAM, and thus EVE to him repli'd.
   O glorious trial of exceeding Love,
   Illustrious evidence, example high!
   Ingaging me to emulate, but short
   Of thy perfection, how shall I attaine,
   ADAM, from whose deare side I boast me sprung,
   And gladly of our Union heare thee speak,
   One Heart, one Soul in both; whereof good prooff
   This day affords, declaring thee resolvd,
   Rather then Death or aught then Death more dread
   Shall separate us, linkt in Love so deare,
   To undergoe with mee one Guilt, one Crime,
   If any be, of tasting this fair Fruit,
   Whose vertue, for of good still good proceeds,
   Direct, or by occasion hath presented
   This happie trial of thy Love, which else
   So eminently never had bin known.
   Were it I thought Death menac't would ensue
   This my attempt, I would sustain alone
   The worst, and not perswade thee, rather die
   Deserted, then oblige thee with a fact
   Pernicious to thy Peace, chiefly assur'd
   Remarkably so late of thy so true,
   So faithful Love unequald; but I feel
   Farr otherwise th' event, not Death, but Life
   Augmented, op'nd Eyes, new Hopes, new Joyes,
   Taste so Divine, that what of sweet before
   Hath toucht my sense, flat seems to this, and harsh.
   On my experience, ADAM, freely taste,
   And fear of Death deliver to the Windes.
 
     So saying, she embrac'd him, and for joy
   Tenderly wept, much won that he his Love
   Had so enobl'd, as of choice to incurr
   Divine displeasure for her sake, or Death.
   In recompence (for such compliance bad
   Such recompence best merits) from the bough
   She gave him of that fair enticing Fruit
   With liberal hand: he scrupl'd not to eat
   Against his better knowledge, not deceav'd,
   But fondly overcome with Femal charm.
   Earth trembl'd from her entrails, as again
   In pangs, and Nature gave a second groan,
   Skie lowr'd, and muttering Thunder, som sad drops
   Wept at compleating of the mortal Sin
   Original; while ADAM took no thought,
   Eating his fill, nor EVE to iterate
   Her former trespass fear'd, the more to soothe
   Him with her lov'd societie, that now
   As with new Wine intoxicated both
   They swim in mirth, and fansie that they feel
   Divinitie within them breeding wings
   Wherewith to scorn the Earth: but that false Fruit
   Farr other operation first displaid,
   Carnal desire enflaming, hee on EVE
   Began to cast lascivious Eyes, she him
   As wantonly repaid; in Lust they burne:
   Till ADAM thus 'gan EVE to dalliance move.
 
     EVE, now I see thou art exact of taste,
   And elegant, of Sapience no small part,
   Since to each meaning savour we apply,
   And Palate call judicious; I the praise
   Yeild thee, so well this day thou hast purvey'd.
   Much pleasure we have lost, while we abstain'd
   From this delightful Fruit, nor known till now
   True relish, tasting; if such pleasure be
   In things to us forbidden, it might be wish'd,
   For this one Tree had bin forbidden ten.
   But come, so well refresh't, now let us play,
   As meet is, after such delicious Fare;
   For never did thy Beautie since the day
   I saw thee first and wedded thee, adorn'd
   With all perfections, so enflame my sense
   With ardor to enjoy thee, fairer now
   Then ever, bountie of this vertuous Tree.
 
     So said he, and forbore not glance or toy
   Of amorous intent, well understood
   Of EVE, whose Eye darted contagious Fire.
   Her hand he seis'd, and to a shadie bank,
   Thick overhead with verdant roof imbowr'd
   He led her nothing loath; Flours were the Couch,
   Pansies, and Violets, and Asphodel,
   And Hyacinth, Earths freshest softest lap.
   There they thir fill of Love and Loves disport
   Took largely, of thir mutual guilt the Seale,
   The solace of thir sin, till dewie sleep
   Oppress'd them, wearied with thir amorous play.
   Soon as the force of that fallacious Fruit,
   That with exhilerating vapour bland
   About thir spirits had plaid, and inmost powers
   Made erre, was now exhal'd, and grosser sleep
   Bred of unkindly fumes, with conscious dreams
   Encumberd, now had left them, up they rose
   As from unrest, and each the other viewing,
   Soon found thir Eyes how op'nd, and thir minds
   How dark'nd; innocence, that as a veile
   Had shadow'd them from knowing ill, was gon,
   Just confidence, and native righteousness,
   And honour from about them, naked left
   To guiltie shame hee cover'd, but his Robe
   Uncover'd more.  So rose the DANITE strong
   HERCULEAN SAMSON from the Harlot-lap
   Of PHILISTEAN DALILAH, and wak'd
   Shorn of his strength, They destitute and bare
   Of all thir vertue: silent, and in face
   Confounded long they sate, as struck'n mute,
   Till ADAM, though not less then EVE abasht,
   At length gave utterance to these words constraind.
 
     O EVE, in evil hour thou didst give care
   To that false Worm, of whomsoever taught
   To counterfet Mans voice, true in our Fall,
   False in our promis'd Rising; since our Eyes
   Op'nd we find indeed, and find we know
   Both Good and Evil, Good lost and Evil got,
   Bad Fruit of Knowledge, if this be to know,
   Which leaves us naked thus, of Honour void,
   Of Innocence, of Faith, of Puritie,
   Our wonted Ornaments now soild and staind,
   And in our Faces evident the signes
   Of foul concupiscence; whence evil store;
   Even shame, the last of evils; of the first
   Be sure then.  How shall I behold the face
   Henceforth of God or Angel, earst with joy
   And rapture so oft beheld? those heav'nly shapes
   Will dazle now this earthly, with thir blaze
   Insufferably bright.  O might I here
   In solitude live savage, in some glad
   Obscur'd, where highest Woods impenetrable
   To Starr or Sun-light, spread thir umbrage broad,
   And brown as Evening: Cover me ye Pines,
   Ye Cedars, with innumerable boughs
   Hide me, where I may never see them more.
   But let us now, as in bad plight, devise
   What best may for the present serve to hide
   The Parts of each from other, that seem most
   To shame obnoxious, and unseemliest seen,
   Some Tree whose broad smooth Leaves together sowd,
   And girded on our loyns, may cover round
   Those middle parts, that this new commer, Shame,
   There sit not, and reproach us as unclean.
 
     So counsel'd hee, and both together went
   Into the thickest Wood, there soon they chose
   The Figtree, not that kind for Fruit renown'd,
   But such as at this day to INDIANS known
   In MALABAR or DECAN spreds her Armes
   Braunching so broad and long, that in the ground
   The bended Twigs take root, and Daughters grow
   About the Mother Tree, a Pillard shade
   High overarch't, and echoing Walks between;
   There oft the INDIAN Herdsman shunning heate
   Shelters in coole, and tends his pasturing Herds
   At Loopholes cut through thickest shade: Those Leaves
   They gatherd, broad as AMAZONIAN Targe,
   And with what skill they had, together sowd,
   To gird thir waste, vain Covering if to hide
   Thir guilt and dreaded shame; O how unlike
   To that first naked Glorie.  Such of late
   COLUMBUS found th' AMERICAN to girt
   With featherd Cincture, naked else and wilde
   Among the Trees on Iles and woodie Shores.
   Thus fenc't, and as they thought, thir shame in part
   Coverd, but not at rest or ease of Mind,
   They sate them down to weep, nor onely Teares
   Raind at thir Eyes, but high Winds worse within
   Began to rise, high Passions, Anger, Hate,
   Mistrust, Suspicion, Discord, and shook sore
   Thir inward State of Mind, calme Region once
   And full of Peace, now tost and turbulent:
   For Understanding rul'd not, and the Will
   Heard not her lore, both in subjection now
   To sensual Appetite, who from beneathe
   Usurping over sovran Reason claimd
   Superior sway: From thus distemperd brest,
   ADAM, estrang'd in look and alterd stile,
   Speech intermitted thus to EVE renewd.
 
     Would thou hadst heark'nd to my words, & stai'd
   With me, as I besought thee, when that strange
   Desire of wandring this unhappie Morn,
   I know not whence possessd thee; we had then
   Remaind still happie, not as now, despoild
   Of all our good, sham'd, naked, miserable.
   Let none henceforth seek needless cause to approve
   The Faith they owe; when earnestly they seek
   Such proof, conclude, they then begin to faile.
 
     To whom soon mov'd with touch of blame thus EVE.
   What words have past thy Lips, ADAM severe,
   Imput'st thou that to my default, or will
   Of wandering, as thou call'st it, which who knows
   But might as ill have happ'nd thou being by,
   Or to thy self perhaps: hadst thou bin there,
   Or bere th' attempt, thou couldst not have discernd
   Fraud in the Serpent, speaking as he spake;
   No ground of enmitie between us known,
   Why hee should mean me ill, or seek to harme.
   Was I to have never parted from thy side?
   As good have grown there still a liveless Rib.
   Being as I am, why didst not thou the Head
   Command me absolutely not to go,
   Going into such danger as thou saidst?
   Too facil then thou didst not much gainsay,
   Nay, didst permit, approve, and fair dismiss.
   Hadst thou bin firm and fixt in thy dissent,
   Neither had I transgress'd, nor thou with mee.
 
     To whom then first incenst ADAM repli'd.
   Is this the Love, is the recompence
   Of mine to thee, ingrateful EVE, exprest
   Immutable when thou wert lost, not I,
   Who might have liv'd and joyd immortal bliss,
   Yet willingly chose rather Death with thee:
   And am I now upbraided, as the cause
   Of thy transgressing? not enough severe,
   It seems, in thy restraint: what could I more?
   I warn'd thee, I admonish'd thee, foretold
   The danger, and the lurking Enemie
   That lay in wait; beyond this had bin force,
   And force upon free Will hath here no place.
   But confidence then bore thee on, secure
   Either to meet no danger, or to finde
   Matter of glorious trial; and perhaps
   I also err'd in overmuch admiring
   What seemd in thee so perfet, that I thought
   No evil durst attempt thee, but I rue
   That errour now, which is become my crime,
   And thou th' accuser.  Thus it shall befall
   Him who to worth in Women overtrusting
   Lets her Will rule; restraint she will not brook,
   And left to her self, if evil thence ensue,
   Shee first his weak indulgence will accuse.
 
     Thus they in mutual accusation spent
   The fruitless hours, but neither self-condemning
   And of thir vain contest appeer'd no end.
 
        THE END OF THE EIGHTH BOOK.
 
 
   PARADISE LOST
 
   BOOK IX.
 
 
     Meanwhile the hainous and despightfull act
   Of SATAN done in Paradise, and how
   Hee in the Serpent had perverted EVE,
   Her Husband shee, to taste the fatall fruit,
   Was known in Heav'n; for what can scape the Eye
   Of God All-seeing, or deceave his Heart
   Omniscient, who in all things wise and just,
   Hinder'd not SATAN to attempt the minde
   Of Man, with strength entire, and free Will arm'd,
   Complete to have discover'd and repulst
   Whatever wiles of Foe or seeming Friend.
   For still they knew, and ought to have still remember'd
   The high Injunction not to taste that Fruit,
   Whoever tempted; which they not obeying,
   Incurr'd, what could they less, the penaltie,
   And manifold in sin, deserv'd to fall.
   Up into Heav'n from Paradise in hast
   Th' Angelic Guards ascended, mute and sad
   For Man, for of his state by this they knew,
   Much wondring how the suttle Fiend had stoln
   Entrance unseen.  Soon as th' unwelcome news
   From Earth arriv'd at Heaven Gate, displeas'd
   All were who heard, dim sadness did not spare
   That time Celestial visages, yet mixt
   With pitie, violated not thir bliss.
   About the new-arriv'd, in multitudes
   Th' ethereal People ran, to hear and know
   How all befell: they towards the Throne Supream
   Accountable made haste to make appear
   With righteous plea, thir utmost vigilance,
   And easily approv'd; when the most High
   Eternal Father from his secret Cloud,
   Amidst in Thunder utter'd thus his voice.
 
     Assembl'd Angels, and ye Powers return'd
   From unsuccessful charge, be not dismaid,
   Nor troubl'd at these tidings from the Earth,
   Which your sincerest care could not prevent,
   Foretold so lately what would come to pass,
   When first this Tempter cross'd the Gulf from Hell.
   I told ye then he should prevail and speed
   On his bad Errand, Man should be seduc't
   And flatter'd out of all, believing lies
   Against his Maker; no Decree of mine
   Concurring to necessitate his Fall,
   Or touch with lightest moment of impulse
   His free Will, to her own inclining left
   In eevn scale.  But fall'n he is, and now
   What rests, but that the mortal Sentence pass
   On his transgression, Death denounc't that day,
   Which he presumes already vain and void,
   Because not yet inflicted, as he fear'd,
   By some immediate stroak; but soon shall find
   Forbearance no acquittance ere day end.
   Justice shall not return as bountie scorn'd.
   But whom send I to judge them? whom but thee
   Vicegerent Son, to thee I have transferr'd
   All Judgement, whether in Heav'n, or Earth; or Hell.
   Easie it may be seen that I intend
   Mercie collegue with Justice, sending thee
   Mans Friend, his Mediator, his design'd
   Both Ransom and Redeemer voluntarie,
   And destin'd Man himself to judge Man fall'n.
 
     So spake the Father, and unfoulding bright
   Toward the right hand his Glorie, on the Son
   Blaz'd forth unclouded Deitie; he full
   Resplendent all his Father manifest
   Express'd, and thus divinely answer'd milde.
 
     Father Eternal, thine is to decree,
   Mine both in Heav'n and Earth to do thy will
   Supream, that thou in mee thy Son belov'd
   Mayst ever rest well pleas'd.  I go to judge
   On Earth these thy transgressors, but thou knowst,
   Whoever judg'd, the worst on mee must light,
   When time shall be, for so I undertook
   Before thee; and not repenting, this obtaine
   Of right, that I may mitigate thir doom
   On me deriv'd, yet I shall temper so
   Justice with Mercie, as may illustrate most
   Them fully satisfied, and thee appease.
   Attendance none shall need, nor Train, where none
   Are to behold the Judgement, but the judg'd,
   Those two; the third best absent is condemn'd,
   Convict by flight, and Rebel to all Law
   Conviction to the Serpent none belongs.
 
     Thus saying, from his radiant Seat he rose
   Of high collateral glorie: him Thrones and Powers,
   Princedoms, and Dominations ministrant
   Accompanied to Heaven Gate, from whence
   EDEN and all the Coast in prospect lay.
   Down he descended strait; the speed of Gods
   Time counts not, though with swiftest minutes wing'd.
   Now was the Sun in Western cadence low
   From Noon, and gentle Aires due at thir hour
   To fan the Earth now wak'd, and usher in
   The Eevning coole when he from wrauth more coole
   Came the mild Judge and Intercessor both
   To sentence Man: the voice of God they heard
   Now walking in the Garden, by soft windes
   Brought to thir Ears, while day declin'd, they heard
   And from his presence hid themselves among
   The thickest Trees, both Man and Wife, till God
   Approaching, thus to ADAM call'd aloud.
 
     Where art thou ADAM, wont with joy to meet
   My coming seen far off?  I miss thee here,
   Not pleas'd, thus entertaind with solitude,
   Where obvious dutie erewhile appear'd unsaught:
   Or come I less conspicuous, or what change
   Absents thee, or what chance detains?  Come forth.
   He came, and with him EVE, more loth, though first
   To offend, discount'nanc't both, and discompos'd;
   Love was not in thir looks, either to God
   Or to each other, but apparent guilt,
   And shame, and perturbation, and despaire,
   Anger, and obstinacie, and hate, and guile.
   Whence ADAM faultring long, thus answer'd brief.
 
     I heard thee in the Garden, and of thy voice
   Affraid, being naked, hid my self.  To whom
   The gracious Judge without revile repli'd.
 
     My voice thou oft hast heard, and hast not fear'd,
   But still rejoyc't, how is it now become
   So dreadful to thee? that thou art naked, who
   Hath told thee? hast thou eaten of the Tree
   Whereof I gave thee charge thou shouldst not eat?
 
     To whom thus ADAM sore beset repli'd.
   O Heav'n! in evil strait this day I stand
   Before my Judge, either to undergoe
   My self the total Crime, or to accuse
   My other self, the partner of my life;
   Whose failing, while her Faith to me remaines,
   I should conceal, and not expose to blame
   By my complaint; but strict necessitie
   Subdues me, and calamitous constraint,
   Least on my head both sin and punishment,
   However insupportable, be all
   Devolv'd; though should I hold my peace, yet thou
   Wouldst easily detect what I conceale.
   This Woman whom thou mad'st to be my help,
   And gav'st me as thy perfet gift, so good,
   So fit, so acceptable, so Divine,
   That from her hand I could suspect no ill,
   And what she did, whatever in it self,
   Her doing seem'd to justifie the deed;
   Shee gave me of the Tree, and I did eate.
 
     To whom the sovran Presence thus repli'd.
   Was shee thy God, that her thou didst obey
   Before his voice, or was shee made thy guide,
   Superior, or but equal, that to her
   Thou did'st resigne thy Manhood, and the Place
   Wherein God set thee above her made of thee,
   And for thee, whose perfection farr excell'd
   Hers in all real dignitie: Adornd
   She was indeed, and lovely to attract
   Thy Love, not thy Subjection, and her Gifts
   Were such as under Government well seem'd,
   Unseemly to beare rule, which was thy part
   And person, had'st thou known thy self aright.
 
     So having said, he thus to EVE in few:
   Say Woman, what is this which thou hast done?
 
     To whom sad EVE with shame nigh overwhelm'd,
   Confessing soon, yet not before her Judge
   Bold or loquacious, thus abasht repli'd.
 
     The Serpent me beguil'd and I did eate.
 
     Which when the Lord God heard, without delay
   To Judgement he proceeded on th' accus'd
   Serpent though brute, unable to transferre
   The Guilt on him who made him instrument
   Of mischief, and polluted from the end
   Of his Creation; justly then accurst,
   As vitiated in Nature: more to know
   Concern'd not Man (since he no further knew)
   Nor alter'd his offence; yet God at last
   To Satan first in sin his doom apply'd,
   Though in mysterious terms, judg'd as then best:
   And on the Serpent thus his curse let fall.
 
     Because thou hast done this, thou art accurst
   Above all Cattel, each Beast of the Field;
   Upon thy Belly groveling thou shalt goe,
   And dust shalt eat all the days of thy Life.
   Between Thee and the Woman I will put
   Enmitie, and between thine and her Seed;
   Her Seed shall bruise thy head, thou bruise his heel.
 
     So spake this Oracle, then verifi'd
   When JESUS son of MARY second EVE,
   Saw Satan fall like Lightning down from Heav'n,
   Prince of the Aire; then rising from his Grave
   Spoild Principalities and Powers, triumpht
   In open shew, and with ascention bright
   Captivity led captive through the Aire,
   The Realme it self of Satan long usurpt,
   Whom he shall tread at last under our feet;
   Eevn hee who now foretold his fatal bruise,
   And to the Woman thus his Sentence turn'd.
 
     Thy sorrow I will greatly multiplie
   By thy Conception; Children thou shalt bring
   In sorrow forth, and to thy Husbands will
   Thine shall submit, hee over thee shall rule.
 
     On ADAM last thus judgement he pronounc'd.
   Because thou hast heark'nd to the voice of thy Wife,
   And eaten of the Tree concerning which
   I charg'd thee, saying: Thou shalt not eate thereof,
   Curs'd is the ground for thy sake, thou in sorrow
   Shalt eate thereof all the days of thy Life;
   Thornes also and Thistles it shall bring thee forth
   Unbid, and thou shalt eate th' Herb of th' Field,
   In the sweat of thy Face shalt thou eate Bread,
   Till thou return unto the ground, for thou
   Out of the ground wast taken, know thy Birth,
   For dust thou art, and shalt to dust returne.
 
      So judg'd he Man, both Judge and Saviour sent,
   And th' instant stroke of Death denounc't that day
   Remov'd farr off; then pittying how they stood
   Before him naked to the aire, that now
   Must suffer change, disdain'd not to begin
   Thenceforth the forme of servant to assume,
   As when he wash'd his servants feet, so now
   As Father of his Familie he clad
   Thir nakedness with Skins of Beasts, or slain,
   Or as the Snake with youthful Coate repaid;
   And thought not much to cloath his Enemies:
   Nor hee thir outward onely with the Skins
   Of Beasts, but inward nakedness, much more
   Opprobrious, with his Robe of righteousness,
   Araying cover'd from his Fathers sight.
   To him with swift ascent he up returnd,
   Into his blissful bosom reassum'd
   In glory as of old, to him appeas'd
   All, though all-knowing, what had past with Man
   Recounted, mixing intercession sweet.
   Meanwhile ere thus was sin'd and judg'd on Earth,
   Within the Gates of Hell sate Sin and Death,
   In counterview within the Gates, that now
   Stood open wide, belching outrageous flame
   Farr into CHAOS, since the Fiend pass'd through,
   Sin opening, who thus now to Death began.
 
     O Son, why sit we here each other viewing
   Idlely, while Satan our great Author thrives
   In other Worlds, and happier Seat provides
   For us his ofspring deare?  It cannot be
   But that success attends him; if mishap,
   Ere this he had return'd, with fury driv'n
   By his Avenger, since no place like this
   Can fit his punishment, or their revenge.
   Methinks I feel new strength within me rise,
   Wings growing, and Dominion giv'n me large
   Beyond this Deep; whatever drawes me on,
   Or sympathie, or som connatural force
   Powerful at greatest distance to unite
   With secret amity things of like kinde
   By secretest conveyance.  Thou my Shade
   Inseparable must with mee along:
   For Death from Sin no power can separate.
   But least the difficultie of passing back
   Stay his returne perhaps over this Gulfe
   Impassable, impervious, let us try
   Adventrous work, yet to thy power and mine
   Not unagreeable, to found a path
   Over this Maine from Hell to that new World
   Where Satan now prevailes, a Monument
   Of merit high to all th' infernal Host,
   Easing thir passage hence, for intercourse,
   Or transmigration, as thir lot shall lead.
   Nor can I miss the way, so strongly drawn
   By this new felt attraction and instinct.
 
     Whom thus the meager Shadow answerd soon.
   Goe whither Fate and inclination strong
   Leads thee, I shall not lag behinde, nor erre
   The way, thou leading, such a sent I draw
   Of carnage, prey innumerable, and taste
   The savour of Death from all things there that live:
   Nor shall I to the work thou enterprisest
   Be wanting, but afford thee equal aid.
 
     So saying, with delight he snuff'd the smell
   Of mortal change on Earth.  As when a flock
   Of ravenous Fowl, though many a League remote,
   Against the day of Battel, to a Field,
   Where Armies lie encampt, come flying, lur'd
   With sent of living Carcasses design'd
   For death, the following day, in bloodie fight.
   So sented the grim Feature, and upturn'd
   His Nostril wide into the murkie Air,
   Sagacious of his Quarrey from so farr.
   Then Both from out Hell Gates into the waste
   Wide Anarchie of CHAOS damp and dark
   Flew divers, & with Power (thir Power was great)
   Hovering upon the Waters; what they met
   Solid or slimie, as in raging Sea
   Tost up and down, together crowded drove
   From each side shoaling towards the mouth of Hell.
   As when two Polar Winds blowing adverse
   Upon the CRONIAN Sea, together drive
   Mountains of Ice, that stop th' imagin'd way
   Beyond PETSORA Eastward, to the rich
   CATHAIAN Coast.  The aggregated Soyle
   Death with his Mace petrific, cold and dry,
   As with a Trident smote, and fix't as firm
   As DELOS floating once; the rest his look
   Bound with GORGONIAN rigor not to move,
   And with ASPHALTIC slime; broad as the Gate,
   Deep to the Roots of Hell the gather'd beach
   They fasten'd, and the Mole immense wraught on
   Over the foaming deep high Archt, a Bridge
   Of length prodigious joyning to the Wall
   Immoveable of this now fenceless world
   Forfeit to Death; from hence a passage broad,
   Smooth, easie, inoffensive down to Hell.
   So, if great things to small may be compar'd,
   XERXES, the Libertie of GREECE to yoke,
   From SUSA his MEMNONIAN Palace high
   Came to the Sea, and over HELLESPONT
   Bridging his way, EUROPE with ASIA joyn'd,
   And scourg'd with many a stroak th' indignant waves.
   Now had they brought the work by wondrous Art
   Pontifical, a ridge of pendent Rock
   Over the vext Abyss, following the track
   Of SATAN, to the selfsame place where hee
   First lighted from his Wing, and landed safe
   From out of CHAOS to the outside bare
   Of this round World: with Pinns of Adamant
   And Chains they made all fast, too fast they made
   And durable; and now in little space
   The Confines met of Empyrean Heav'n
   And of this World, and on the left hand Hell
   With long reach interpos'd; three sev'ral wayes
   In sight, to each of these three places led.
   And now thir way to Earth they had descri'd,
   To Paradise first tending, when behold
   SATAN in likeness of an Angel bright
   Betwixt the CENTAURE and the SCORPION stearing
   His ZENITH, while the Sun in ARIES rose:
   Disguis'd he came, but those his Children dear
   Thir Parent soon discern'd, though in disguise.
   Hee, after EVE seduc't, unminded slunk
   Into the Wood fast by, and changing shape
   To observe the sequel, saw his guileful act
   By EVE, though all unweeting, seconded
   Upon her Husband, saw thir shame that sought
   Vain covertures; but when he saw descend
   The Son of God to judge them, terrifi'd
   Hee fled, not hoping to escape, but shun
   The present, fearing guiltie what his wrauth
   Might suddenly inflict; that past, return'd
   By Night, and listning where the hapless Paire
   Sate in thir sad discourse, and various plaint,
   Thence gatherd his own doom, which understood
   Not instant, but of future time.  With joy
   And tidings fraught, to Hell he now return'd,
   And at the brink of CHAOS, neer the foot
   Of this new wondrous Pontifice, unhop't
   Met who to meet him came, his Ofspring dear.
   Great joy was at thir meeting, and at sight
   Of that stupendious Bridge his joy encreas'd.
   Long hee admiring stood, till Sin, his faire
   Inchanting Daughter, thus the silence broke.
 
     O Parent, these are thy magnific deeds,
   Thy Trophies, which thou view'st as not thine own,
   Thou art thir Author and prime Architect:
   For I no sooner in my Heart divin'd,
   My Heart, which by a secret harmonie
   Still moves with thine, joyn'd in connexion sweet,
   That thou on Earth hadst prosper'd, which thy looks
   Now also evidence, but straight I felt
   Though distant from thee Worlds between, yet felt
   That I must after thee with this thy Son;
   Such fatal consequence unites us three:
   Hell could no longer hold us in her bounds,
   Nor this unvoyageable Gulf obscure
   Detain from following thy illustrious track.
   Thou hast atchiev'd our libertie, confin'd
   Within Hell Gates till now, thou us impow'rd
   To fortifie thus farr, and overlay
   With this portentous Bridge the dark Abyss.
   Thine now is all this World, thy vertue hath won
   What thy hands builded not, thy Wisdom gain'd
   With odds what Warr hath lost, and fully aveng'd
   Our foile in Heav'n; here thou shalt Monarch reign,
   There didst not; there let him still Victor sway,
   As Battel hath adjudg'd, from this new World
   Retiring, by his own doom alienated,
   And henceforth Monarchie with thee divide
   Of all things, parted by th' Empyreal bounds,
   His Quadrature, from thy Orbicular World,
   Or trie thee now more dang'rous to his Throne.
 
     Whom thus the Prince of Darkness answerd glad.
   Fair Daughter, and thou Son and Grandchild both,
   High proof ye now have giv'n to be the Race
   Of SATAN (for I glorie in the name,
   Antagonist of Heav'ns Almightie King)
   Amply have merited of me, of all
   Th' Infernal Empire, that so neer Heav'ns dore
   Triumphal with triumphal act have met,
   Mine with this glorious Work, & made one Realm
   Hell and this World, one Realm, one Continent
   Of easie thorough-fare.  Therefore while I
   Descend through Darkness, on your Rode with ease
   To my associate Powers, them to acquaint
   With these successes, and with them rejoyce,
   You two this way, among those numerous Orbs
   All yours, right down to Paradise descend;
   There dwell & Reign in bliss, thence on the Earth
   Dominion exercise and in the Aire,
   Chiefly on Man, sole Lord of all declar'd,
   Him first make sure your thrall, and lastly kill.
   My Substitutes I send ye, and Create
   Plenipotent on Earth, of matchless might
   Issuing from mee: on your joynt vigor now
   My hold of this new Kingdom all depends,
   Through Sin to Death expos'd by my exploit.
   If your joynt power prevaile, th' affaires of Hell
   No detriment need feare, goe and be strong.
 
     So saying he dismiss'd them, they with speed
   Thir course through thickest Constellations held
   Spreading thir bane; the blasted Starrs lookt wan,
   And Planets, Planet-strook, real Eclips
   Then sufferd.  Th' other way SATAN went down
   The Causey to Hell Gate; on either side
   Disparted CHAOS over built exclaimd,
   And with rebounding surge the barrs assaild,
   That scorn'd his indignation: through the Gate,
   Wide open and unguarded, SATAN pass'd,
   And all about found desolate; for those
   Appointed to sit there, had left thir charge,
   Flown to the upper World; the rest were all
   Farr to the inland retir'd, about the walls
   Of PANDEMONIUM, Citie and proud seate
   Of LUCIFER, so by allusion calld,
   Of that bright Starr to SATAN paragond.
   There kept thir Watch the Legions, while the Grand
   In Council sate, sollicitous what chance
   Might intercept thir Emperour sent, so hee
   Departing gave command, and they observ'd.
   As when the TARTAR from his RUSSIAN Foe
   By ASTRACAN over the Snowie Plaines
   Retires, or BACTRIAN Sophi from the hornes
   Of TURKISH Crescent, leaves all waste beyond
   The Realme of ALADULE, in his retreate
   To TAURIS or CASBEEN.  So these the late
   Heav'n-banisht Host, left desert utmost Hell
   Many a dark League, reduc't in careful Watch
   Round thir Metropolis, and now expecting
   Each hour their great adventurer from the search
   Of Forrein Worlds: he through the midst unmarkt,
   In shew plebeian Angel militant
   Of lowest order, past; and from the dore
   Of that PLUTONIAN Hall, invisible
   Ascended his high Throne, which under state
   Of richest texture spred, at th' upper end
   Was plac't in regal lustre.  Down a while
   He sate, and round about him saw unseen:
   At last as from a Cloud his fulgent head
   And shape Starr bright appeer'd, or brighter, clad
   With what permissive glory since his fall
   Was left him, or false glitter: All amaz'd
   At that so sudden blaze the STYGIAN throng
   Bent thir aspect, and whom they wish'd beheld,
   Thir mighty Chief returnd: loud was th' acclaime:
   Forth rush'd in haste the great consulting Peers,
   Rais'd from thir dark DIVAN, and with like joy
   Congratulant approach'd him, who with hand
   Silence, and with these words attention won.
 
     Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Vertues, Powers,
   For in possession such, not onely of right,
   I call ye and declare ye now, returnd
   Successful beyond hope, to lead ye forth
   Triumphant out of this infernal Pit
   Abominable, accurst, the house of woe,
   And Dungeon of our Tyrant: Now possess,
   As Lords, a spacious World, to our native Heaven
   Little inferiour, by my adventure hard
   With peril great atchiev'd.  Long were to tell
   What I have don, what sufferd, with what paine
   Voyag'd the unreal, vast, unbounded deep
   Of horrible confusion, over which
   By Sin and Death a broad way now is pav'd
   To expedite your glorious march; but I
   Toild out my uncouth passage, forc't to ride
   Th' untractable Abysse, plung'd in the womb
   Of unoriginal NIGHT and CHAOS wilde,
   That jealous of thir secrets fiercely oppos'd
   My journey strange, with clamorous uproare
   Protesting Fate supreame; thence how I found
   The new created World, which fame in Heav'n
   Long had foretold, a Fabrick wonderful
   Of absolute perfection, therein Man
   Plac't in a Paradise, by our exile
   Made happie: Him by fraud I have seduc'd
   From his Creator, and the more to increase
   Your wonder, with an Apple; he thereat
   Offended, worth your laughter, hath giv'n up
   Both his beloved Man and all his World,
   To Sin and Death a prey, and so to us,
   Without our hazard, labour or allarme,
   To range in, and to dwell, and over Man
   To rule, as over all he should have rul'd.
   True is, mee also he hath judg'd, or rather
   Mee not, but the brute Serpent in whose shape
   Man I deceav'd: that which to mee belongs,
   Is enmity, which he will put between
   Mee and Mankinde; I am to bruise his heel;
   His Seed, when is not set, shall bruise my head:
   A World who would not purchase with a bruise,
   Or much more grievous pain?  Ye have th' account
   Of my performance: What remaines, ye Gods,
   But up and enter now into full bliss.
 
     So having said, a while he stood, expecting
   Thir universal shout and high applause
   To fill his eare, when contrary he hears
   On all sides, from innumerable tongues
   A dismal universal hiss, the sound
   Of public scorn; he wonderd, but not long
   Had leasure, wondring at himself now more;
   His Visage drawn he felt to sharp and spare,
   His Armes clung to his Ribs, his Leggs entwining
   Each other, till supplanted down he fell
   A monstrous Serpent on his Belly prone,
   Reluctant, but in vaine, a greater power
   Now rul'd him, punisht in the shape he sin'd,
   According to his doom: he would have spoke,
   But hiss for hiss returnd with forked tongue
   To forked tongue, for now were all transform'd
   Alike, to Serpents all as accessories
   To his bold Riot: dreadful was the din
   Of hissing through the Hall, thick swarming now
   With complicated monsters, head and taile,
   Scorpion and Asp, and AMPHISBAENA dire,
   CERASTES hornd, HYDRUS, and ELLOPS drear,
   And DIPSAS (Not so thick swarm'd once the Soil
   Bedropt with blood of Gorgon, or the Isle
   OPHIUSA) but still greatest hee the midst,
   Now Dragon grown, larger then whom the Sun
   Ingenderd in the PYTHIAN Vale on slime,
   Huge PYTHON, and his Power no less he seem'd
   Above the rest still to retain; they all
   Him follow'd issuing forth to th' open Field,
   Where all yet left of that revolted Rout
   Heav'n-fall'n, in station stood or just array,
   Sublime with expectation when to see
   In Triumph issuing forth thir glorious Chief;
   They saw, but other sight instead, a crowd
   Of ugly Serpents; horror on them fell,
   And horrid sympathie; for what they saw,
   They felt themselvs now changing; down thir arms,
   Down fell both Spear and Shield, down they as fast,
   And the dire hiss renew'd, and the dire form
   Catcht by Contagion, like in punishment,
   As in thir crime.  Thus was th' applause they meant,
   Turnd to exploding hiss, triumph to shame
   Cast on themselves from thir own mouths.  There stood
   A Grove hard by, sprung up with this thir change,
   His will who reigns above, to aggravate
   Thir penance, laden with fair Fruit, like that
   VVhich grew in Paradise, the bait of EVE
   Us'd by the Tempter: on that prospect strange
   Thir earnest eyes they fix'd, imagining
   For one forbidden Tree a multitude
   Now ris'n, to work them furder woe or shame;
   Yet parcht with scalding thurst and hunger fierce,
   Though to delude them sent, could not abstain,
   But on they rould in heaps, and up the Trees
   Climbing, sat thicker then the snakie locks
   That curld MEGAERA: greedily they pluck'd
   The Frutage fair to sight, like that which grew
   Neer that bituminous Lake where SODOM flam'd;
   This more delusive, not the touch, but taste
   Deceav'd; they fondly thinking to allay
   Thir appetite with gust, instead of Fruit
   Chewd bitter Ashes, which th' offended taste
   VVith spattering noise rejected: oft they assayd,
   Hunger and thirst constraining, drugd as oft,
   VVith hatefullest disrelish writh'd thir jaws
   VVith foot and cinders fill'd; so oft they fell
   Into the same illusion, not as Man
   Whom they triumph'd once lapst.  Thus were they plagu'd
   And worn with Famin, long and ceasless hiss,
   Till thir lost shape, permitted, they resum'd,
   Yearly enjoynd, some say, to undergo
   This annual humbling certain number'd days,
   To dash thir pride, and joy for Man seduc't.
   However some tradition they dispers'd
   Among the Heathen of thir purchase got,
   And Fabl'd how the Serpent, whom they calld
   OPHION with EURYNOME, the wide-
   Encroaching EVE perhaps, had first the rule
   Of high OLYMPUS, thence by SATURN driv'n
   And OPS, ere yet DICTAEAN JOVE was born.
   Mean while in Paradise the hellish pair
   Too soon arriv'd, SIN there in power before,
   Once actual, now in body, and to dwell
   Habitual habitant; behind her DEATH
   Close following pace for pace, not mounted yet
   On his pale Horse: to whom SIN thus began.
 
     Second of SATAN sprung, all conquering Death,
   What thinkst thou of our Empire now, though earnd
   With travail difficult, not better farr
   Then stil at Hels dark threshold to have sate watch,
   Unnam'd, undreaded, and thy self half starv'd?
 
     Whom thus the Sin-born Monster answerd soon.
   To mee, who with eternal Famin pine,
   Alike is Hell, or Paradise, or Heaven,
   There best, where most with ravin I may meet;
   Which here, though plenteous, all too little seems
   To stuff this Maw, this vast unhide-bound Corps.
 
     To whom th' incestuous Mother thus repli'd.
   Thou therefore on these Herbs, and Fruits, & Flours
   Feed first, on each Beast next, and Fish, and Fowle,
   No homely morsels, and whatever thing
   The Sithe of Time mowes down, devour unspar'd,
   Till I in Man residing through the Race,
   His thoughts, his looks, words, actions all infect,
   And season him thy last and sweetest prey.
 
     This said, they both betook them several wayes,
   Both to destroy, or unimmortal make
   All kinds, and for destruction to mature
   Sooner or later; which th' Almightie seeing,
   From his transcendent Seat the Saints among,
   To those bright Orders utterd thus his voice.
 
     See with what heat these Dogs of Hell advance
   To waste and havoc yonder VVorld, which I
   So fair and good created, and had still
   Kept in that state, had not the folly of Man
   Let in these wastful Furies, who impute
   Folly to mee, so doth the Prince of Hell
   And his Adherents, that with so much ease
   I suffer them to enter and possess
   A place so heav'nly, and conniving seem
   To gratifie my scornful Enemies,
   That laugh, as if transported with some fit
   Of Passion, I to them had quitted all,
   At random yeilded up to their misrule;
   And know not that I call'd and drew them thither
   My Hell-hounds, to lick up the draff and filth
   Which mans polluting Sin with taint hath shed
   On what was pure, till cramm'd and gorg'd, nigh burst
   With suckt and glutted offal, at one fling
   Of thy victorious Arm, well-pleasing Son,
   Both SIN, and DEATH, and yawning GRAVE at last
   Through CHAOS hurld, obstruct the mouth of Hell
   For ever, and seal up his ravenous Jawes.
   Then Heav'n and Earth renewd shall be made pure
   To sanctitie that shall receive no staine:
   Till then the Curse pronounc't on both precedes.
 
     Hee ended, and the heav'nly Audience loud
   Sung HALLELUIA, as the sound of Seas,
   Through multitude that sung: Just are thy ways,
   Righteous are thy Decrees on all thy Works;
   Who can extenuate thee?  Next, to the Son,
   Destin'd restorer of Mankind, by whom
   New Heav'n and Earth shall to the Ages rise,
   Or down from Heav'n descend.  Such was thir song,
   While the Creator calling forth by name
   His mightie Angels gave them several charge,
   As sorted best with present things.  The Sun
   Had first his precept so to move, so shine,
   As might affect the Earth with cold and heat
   Scarce tollerable, and from the North to call
   Decrepit Winter, from the South to bring
   Solstitial summers heat.  To the blanc Moone
   Her office they prescrib'd, to th' other five
   Thir planetarie motions and aspects
   In SEXTILE, SQUARE, and TRINE, and OPPOSITE,
   Of noxious efficacie, and when to joyne
   In Synod unbenigne, and taught the fixt
   Thir influence malignant when to showre,
   Which of them rising with the Sun, or falling,
   Should prove tempestuous: To the Winds they set
   Thir corners, when with bluster to confound
   Sea, Aire, and Shoar, the Thunder when to rowle
   With terror through the dark Aereal Hall.
   Some say he bid his Angels turne ascanse
   The Poles of Earth twice ten degrees and more
   From the Suns Axle; they with labour push'd
   Oblique the Centric Globe: Som say the Sun
   Was bid turn Reines from th' Equinoctial Rode
   Like distant breadth to TAURUS with the Seav'n
   ATLANTICK Sisters, and the SPARTAN Twins
   Up to the TROPIC Crab; thence down amaine
   By LEO and the VIRGIN and the SCALES,
   As deep as CAPRICORNE, to bring in change
   Of Seasons to each Clime; else had the Spring
   Perpetual smil'd on Earth with vernant Flours,
   Equal in Days and Nights, except to those
   Beyond the Polar Circles; to them Day
   Had unbenighted shon, while the low Sun
   To recompence his distance, in thir sight
   Had rounded still th' HORIZON, and not known
   Or East or West, which had forbid the Snow
   From cold ESTOTILAND, and South as farr
   Beneath MAGELLAN.  At that tasted Fruit
   The Sun, as from THYESTEAN Banquet, turn'd
   His course intended; else how had the World
   Inhabited, though sinless, more then now,
   Avoided pinching cold and scorching heate?
   These changes in the Heav'ns, though slow, produc'd
   Like change on Sea and Land, sideral blast,
   Vapour, and Mist, and Exhalation hot,
   Corrupt and Pestilent: Now from the North
   Of NORUMBEGA, and the SAMOED shoar
   Bursting thir brazen Dungeon, armd with ice
   And snow and haile and stormie gust and flaw,
   BOREAS and CAECIAS and ARGESTES loud
   And THRASCIAS rend the Woods and Seas upturn;
   With adverse blast up-turns them from the South
   NOTUS and AFER black with thundrous Clouds
   From SERRALIONA; thwart of these as fierce
   Forth rush the LEVANT and the PONENT VVindes
   EURUS and ZEPHIR with thir lateral noise,
   SIROCCO, and LIBECCHIO.  Thus began
   Outrage from liveless things; but Discord first
   Daughter of Sin, among th' irrational,
   Death introduc'd through fierce antipathie:
   Beast now with Beast gan war, & Fowle with Fowle,
   And Fish with Fish; to graze the Herb all leaving,
   Devourd each other; nor stood much in awe
   Of Man, but fled him, or with count'nance grim
   Glar'd on him passing: these were from without
   The growing miseries, which ADAM saw
   Alreadie in part, though hid in gloomiest shade,
   To sorrow abandond, but worse felt within,
   And in a troubl'd Sea of passion tost,
   Thus to disburd'n sought with sad complaint.
 
     O miserable of happie! is this the end
   Of this new glorious World, and mee so late
   The Glory of that Glory, who now becom
   Accurst of blessed, hide me from the face
   Of God, whom to behold was then my highth
   Of happiness: yet well, if here would end
   The miserie, I deserv'd it, and would beare
   My own deservings; but this will not serve;
   All that I eate or drink, or shall beget,
   Is propagated curse.  O voice once heard
   Delightfully, ENCREASE AND MULTIPLY,
   Now death to heare! for what can I encrease
   Or multiplie, but curses on my head?
   Who of all Ages to succeed, but feeling
   The evil on him brought by me, will curse
   My Head, Ill fare our Ancestor impure,
   For this we may thank ADAM; but his thanks
   Shall be the execration; so besides
   Mine own that bide upon me, all from mee
   Shall with a fierce reflux on mee redound,
   On mee as on thir natural center light
   Heavie, though in thir place.  O fleeting joyes
   Of Paradise, deare bought with lasting woes!
   Did I request thee, Maker, from my Clay
   To mould me Man, did I sollicite thee
   From darkness to promote me, or here place
   In this delicious Garden? as my Will
   Concurd not to my being, it were but right
   And equal to reduce me to my dust,
   Desirous to resigne, and render back
   All I receav'd, unable to performe
   Thy terms too hard, by which I was to hold
   The good I sought not.  To the loss of that,
   Sufficient penaltie, why hast thou added
   The sense of endless woes? inexplicable
   Thy Justice seems; yet to say truth, too late,
   I thus contest; then should have been refusd
   Those terms whatever, when they were propos'd:
   Thou didst accept them; wilt thou enjoy the good,
   Then cavil the conditions? and though God
   Made thee without thy leave, what if thy Son
   Prove disobedient, and reprov'd, retort,
   Wherefore didst thou beget me? I sought it not:
   Wouldst thou admit for his contempt of thee
   That proud excuse? yet him not thy election,
   But Natural necessity begot.
   God made thee of choice his own, and of his own
   To serve him, thy reward was of his grace,
   Thy punishment then justly is at his Will.
   Be it so, for I submit, his doom is fair,
   That dust I am, and shall to dust returne:
   O welcom hour whenever! why delayes
   His hand to execute what his Decree
   Fixd on this day? why do I overlive,
   Why am I mockt with death, and length'nd out
   To deathless pain? how gladly would I meet
   Mortalitie my sentence, and be Earth
   Insensible, how glad would lay me down
   As in my Mothers lap? there I should rest
   And sleep secure; his dreadful voice no more
   Would Thunder in my ears, no fear of worse
   To mee and to my ofspring would torment me
   With cruel expectation.  Yet one doubt
   Pursues me still, least all I cannot die,
   Least that pure breath of Life, the Spirit of Man
   Which God inspir'd, cannot together perish
   With this corporeal Clod; then in the Grave,
   Or in some other dismal place, who knows
   But I shall die a living Death?  O thought
   Horrid, if true! yet why? it was but breath
   Of Life that sinn'd; what dies but what had life
   And sin? the Bodie properly hath neither.
   All of me then shall die: let this appease
   The doubt, since humane reach no further knows.
   For though the Lord of all be infinite,
   Is his wrauth also? be it, man is not so,
   But mortal doom'd.  How can he exercise
   Wrath without end on Man whom Death must end?
   Can he make deathless Death? that were to make
   Strange contradiction, which to God himself
   Impossible is held, as Argument
   Of weakness, not of Power.  Will he, draw out,
   For angers sake, finite to infinite
   In punisht man, to satisfie his rigour
   Satisfi'd never; that were to extend
   His Sentence beyond dust and Natures Law,
   By which all Causes else according still
   To the reception of thir matter act,
   Not to th' extent of thir own Spheare.  But say
   That Death be not one stroak, as I suppos'd,
   Bereaving sense, but endless miserie
   From this day onward, which I feel begun
   Both in me, and without me, and so last
   To perpetuitie; Ay me, that fear
   Comes thundring back with dreadful revolution
   On my defensless head; both Death and I
   Am found Eternal, and incorporate both,
   Nor I on my part single, in mee all
   Posteritie stands curst: Fair Patrimonie
   That I must leave ye, Sons; O were I able
   To waste it all my self, and leave ye none!
   So disinherited how would ye bless
   Me now your Curse!  Ah, why should all mankind
   For one mans fault thus guiltless be condemn'd,
   If guiltless?  But from mee what can proceed,
   But all corrupt, both Mind and Will deprav'd,
   Not to do onely, but to will the same
   With me? how can they acquitted stand
   In sight of God?  Him after all Disputes
   Forc't I absolve: all my evasions vain
   And reasonings, though through Mazes, lead me still
   But to my own conviction: first and last
   On mee, mee onely, as the sourse and spring
   Of all corruption, all the blame lights due;
   So might the wrauth, Fond wish! couldst thou support
   That burden heavier then the Earth to bear,
   Then all the world much heavier, though divided
   With that bad Woman?  Thus what thou desir'st,
   And what thou fearst, alike destroyes all hope
   Of refuge, and concludes thee miserable
   Beyond all past example and future,
   To SATAN onely like both crime and doom.
   O Conscience, into what Abyss of fears
   And horrors hast thou driv'n me; out of which
   I find no way, from deep to deeper plung'd!
 
     Thus ADAM to himself lamented loud
   Through the still Night, now now, as ere man fell,
   Wholsom and cool, and mild, but with black Air
   Accompanied, with damps and dreadful gloom,
   Which to his evil Conscience represented
   All things with double terror: On the ground
   Outstretcht he lay, on the cold ground, and oft
   Curs'd his Creation, Death as oft accus'd
   Of tardie execution, since denounc't
   The day of his offence.  Why comes not Death,
   Said hee, with one thrice acceptable stroke
   To end me?  Shall Truth fail to keep her word,
   Justice Divine not hast'n to be just?
   But Death comes not at call, Justice Divine
   Mends not her slowest pace for prayers or cries.
   O Woods, O Fountains, Hillocks, Dales and Bowrs,
   VVith other echo farr I taught your Shades
   To answer, and resound farr other Song.
   VVhom thus afflicted when sad EVE beheld,
   Desolate where she sate, approaching nigh,
   Soft words to his fierce passion she assay'd:
   But her with stern regard he thus repell'd.
 
     Out of my sight, thou Serpent, that name best
   Befits thee with him leagu'd, thy self as false
   And hateful; nothing wants, but that thy shape,
   Like his, and colour Serpentine may shew
   Thy inward fraud, to warn all Creatures from thee
   Henceforth; least that too heav'nly form, pretended
   To hellish falshood, snare them.  But for thee
   I had persisted happie, had not thy pride
   And wandring vanitie, when lest was safe,
   Rejected my forewarning, and disdain'd
   Not to be trusted, longing to be seen
   Though by the Devil himself, him overweening
   To over-reach, but with the Serpent meeting
   Fool'd and beguil'd, by him thou, I by thee,
   To trust thee from my side, imagin'd wise,
   Constant, mature, proof against all assaults,
   And understood not all was but a shew
   Rather then solid vertu, all but a Rib
   Crooked by nature, bent, as now appears,
   More to the part sinister from me drawn,
   Well if thrown out, as supernumerarie
   To my just number found.  O why did God,
   Creator wise, that peopl'd highest Heav'n
   With Spirits Masculine, create at last
   This noveltie on Earth, this fair defect
   Of Nature, and not fill the World at once
   With Men as Angels without Feminine,
   Or find some other way to generate
   Mankind? this mischief had not then befall'n,
   And more that shall befall, innumerable
   Disturbances on Earth through Femal snares,
   And straight conjunction with this Sex: for either
   He never shall find out fit Mate, but such
   As some misfortune brings him, or mistake,
   Or whom he wishes most shall seldom gain
   Through her perverseness, but shall see her gaind
   By a farr worse, or if she love, withheld
   By Parents, or his happiest choice too late
   Shall meet, alreadie linkt and Wedlock-bound
   To a fell Adversarie, his hate or shame:
   Which infinite calamitie shall cause
   To humane life, and houshold peace confound.
 
     He added not, and from her turn'd, but EVE
   Not so repulst, with Tears that ceas'd not flowing,
   And tresses all disorderd, at his feet
   Fell humble, and imbracing them, besaught
   His peace, and thus proceeded in her plaint.
 
     Forsake me not thus, ADAM, witness Heav'n
   What love sincere, and reverence in my heart
   I beare thee, and unweeting have offended,
   Unhappilie deceav'd; thy suppliant
   I beg, and clasp thy knees; bereave me not,
   Whereon I live, thy gentle looks, thy aid,
   Thy counsel in this uttermost distress,
   My onely strength and stay: forlorn of thee,
   Whither shall I betake me, where subsist?
   While yet we live, scarse one short hour perhaps,
   Between us two let there be peace, both joyning,
   As joyn'd in injuries, one enmitie
   Against a Foe by doom express assign'd us,
   That cruel Serpent: On me exercise not
   Thy hatred for this miserie befall'n,
   On me already lost, mee then thy self
   More miserable; both have sin'd, but thou
   Against God onely, I against God and thee,
   And to the place of judgement will return,
   There with my cries importune Heaven, that all
   The sentence from thy head remov'd may light
   On me, sole cause to thee of all this woe,
   Mee mee onely just object of his ire.
 
     She ended weeping, and her lowlie plight,
   Immoveable till peace obtain'd from fault
   Acknowledg'd and deplor'd, in ADAM wraught
   Commiseration; soon his heart relented
   Towards her, his life so late and sole delight,
   Now at his feet submissive in distress,
   Creature so faire his reconcilement seeking,
   His counsel whom she had displeas'd, his aide;
   As one disarm'd, his anger all he lost,
   And thus with peaceful words uprais'd her soon.
 
     Unwarie, and too desirous, as before,
   So now of what thou knowst not, who desir'st
   The punishment all on thy self; alas,
   Beare thine own first, ill able to sustaine
   His full wrauth whose thou feelst as yet lest part,
   And my displeasure bearst so ill.  If Prayers
   Could alter high Decrees, I to that place
   Would speed before thee, and be louder heard,
   That on my head all might be visited,
   Thy frailtie and infirmer Sex forgiv'n,
   To me committed and by me expos'd.
   But rise, let us no more contend, nor blame
   Each other, blam'd enough elsewhere, but strive
   In offices of Love, how we may light'n
   Each others burden in our share of woe;
   Since this days Death denounc't, if ought I see,
   Will prove no sudden, but a slow-pac't evill,
   A long days dying to augment our paine,
   And to our Seed (O hapless Seed!) deriv'd.
 
     To whom thus EVE, recovering heart, repli'd.
   ADAM, by sad experiment I know
   How little weight my words with thee can finde,
   Found so erroneous, thence by just event
   Found so unfortunate; nevertheless,
   Restor'd by thee, vile as I am, to place
   Of new acceptance, hopeful to regaine
   Thy Love, the sole contentment of my heart,
   Living or dying from thee I will not hide
   What thoughts in my unquiet brest are ris'n,
   Tending to som relief of our extremes,
   Or end, though sharp and sad, yet tolerable,
   As in our evils, and of easier choice.
   If care of our descent perplex us most,
   Which must be born to certain woe, devourd
   By Death at last, and miserable it is
   To be to others cause of misery,
   Our own begotten, and of our Loines to bring
   Into this cursed World a woful Race,
   That after wretched Life must be at last
   Food for so foule a Monster, in thy power
   It lies, yet ere Conception to prevent
   The Race unblest, to being yet unbegot.
   Childless thou art, Childless remaine:
   So Death shall be deceav'd his glut, and with us two
   Be forc'd to satisfie his Rav'nous Maw.
   But if thou judge it hard and difficult,
   Conversing, looking, loving, to abstain
   From Loves due Rites, Nuptial embraces sweet,
   And with desire to languish without hope,
   Before the present object languishing
   With like desire, which would be miserie
   And torment less then none of what we dread,
   Then both our selves and Seed at once to free
   From what we fear for both, let us make short,
   Let us seek Death, or hee not found, supply
   With our own hands his Office on our selves;
   Why stand we longer shivering under feares,
   That shew no end but Death, and have the power,
   Of many wayes to die the shortest choosing,
   Destruction with destruction to destroy.
 
     She ended heer, or vehement despaire
   Broke off the rest; so much of Death her thoughts
   Had entertaind, as di'd her Cheeks with pale.
   But ADAM with such counsel nothing sway'd,
   To better hopes his more attentive minde
   Labouring had rais'd, and thus to EVE repli'd.
 
     EVE, thy contempt of life and pleasure seems
   To argue in thee somthing more sublime
   And excellent then what thy minde contemnes;
   But self-destruction therefore saught, refutes
   That excellence thought in thee, and implies,
   Not thy contempt, but anguish and regret
   For loss of life and pleasure overlov'd.
   Or if thou covet death, as utmost end
   Of miserie, so thinking to evade
   The penaltie pronounc't, doubt not but God
   Hath wiselier arm'd his vengeful ire then so
   To be forestall'd; much more I fear least Death
   So snatcht will not exempt us from the paine
   We are by doom to pay; rather such acts
   Of contumacie will provoke the highest
   To make death in us live: Then let us seek
   Som safer resolution, which methinks
   I have in view, calling to minde with heed
   Part of our Sentence, that thy Seed shall bruise
   The Serpents head; piteous amends, unless
   Be meant, whom I conjecture, our grand Foe
   SATAN, who in the Serpent hath contriv'd
   Against us this deceit: to crush his head
   Would be revenge indeed; which will be lost
   By death brought on our selves, or childless days
   Resolv'd, as thou proposest; so our Foe
   Shall scape his punishment ordain'd, and wee
   Instead shall double ours upon our heads.
   No more be mention'd then of violence
   Against our selves, and wilful barrenness,
   That cuts us off from hope, and savours onely
   Rancor and pride, impatience and despite,
   Reluctance against God and his just yoke
   Laid on our Necks.  Remember with what mild
   And gracious temper he both heard and judg'd
   Without wrauth or reviling; wee expected
   Immediate dissolution, which we thought
   Was meant by Death that day, when lo, to thee
   Pains onely in Child-bearing were foretold,
   And bringing forth, soon recompenc't with joy,
   Fruit of thy Womb: On mee the Curse aslope
   Glanc'd on the ground, with labour I must earne
   My bread; what harm?  Idleness had bin worse;
   My labour will sustain me; and least Cold
   Or Heat should injure us, his timely care
   Hath unbesaught provided, and his hands
   Cloath'd us unworthie, pitying while he judg'd;
   How much more, if we pray him, will his ear
   Be open, and his heart to pitie incline,
   And teach us further by what means to shun
   Th' inclement Seasons, Rain, Ice, Hail and Snow,
   Which now the Skie with various Face begins
   To shew us in this Mountain, while the Winds
   Blow moist and keen, shattering the graceful locks
   Of these fair spreading Trees; which bids us seek
   Som better shroud, som better warmth to cherish
   Our Limbs benumm'd, ere this diurnal Starr
   Leave cold the Night, how we his gather'd beams
   Reflected, may with matter sere foment,
   Or by collision of two bodies grinde
   The Air attrite to Fire, as late the Clouds
   Justling or pusht with Winds rude in thir shock
   Tine the slant Lightning, whose thwart flame driv'n down
   Kindles the gummie bark of Firr or Pine,
   And sends a comfortable heat from farr,
   Which might supplie the Sun: such Fire to use,
   And what may else be remedie or cure
   To evils which our own misdeeds have wrought,
   Hee will instruct us praying, and of Grace
   Beseeching him, so as we need not fear
   To pass commodiously this life, sustain'd
   By him with many comforts, till we end
   In dust, our final rest and native home.
   What better can we do, then to the place
   Repairing where he judg'd us, prostrate fall
   Before him reverent, and there confess
   Humbly our faults, and pardon beg, with tears
   VVatering the ground, and with our sighs the Air
   Frequenting, sent from hearts contrite, in sign
   Of sorrow unfeign'd, and humiliation meek.
   Undoubtedly he will relent and turn
   From his displeasure; in whose look serene,
   VVhen angry most he seem'd and most severe,
   VVhat else but favor, grace, and mercie shon?
 
     So spake our Father penitent, nor EVE
   Felt less remorse: they forthwith to the place
   Repairing where he judg'd them prostrate fell
   Before him reverent, and both confess'd
   Humbly thir faults, and pardon beg'd, with tears
   VVatering the ground, and with thir sighs the Air
   Frequenting, sent from hearts contrite, in sign
   Of sorrow unfeign'd, and humiliation meek.
 
        THE END OF THE NINTH BOOK.
 
 
   PARADISE LOST.
 
   BOOK X.
 
   Thus they in lowliest plight repentant stood
   Praying, for from the Mercie-seat above
   Prevenient Grace descending had remov'd
   The stonie from thir hearts, and made new flesh
   Regenerat grow instead, that sighs now breath'd
   Unutterable, which the Spirit of prayer
   Inspir'd, and wing'd for Heav'n with speedier flight
   Then loudest Oratorie: yet thir port
   Not of mean suiters, nor important less
   Seem'd thir Petition, then when th' ancient Pair
   In Fables old, less ancient yet then these,
   DEUCALION and chaste PYRRHA to restore
   The Race of Mankind drownd, before the Shrine
   Of THEMIS stood devout.  To Heav'n thir prayers
   Flew up, nor missed the way, by envious windes
   Blow'n vagabond or frustrate: in they passd
   Dimentionless through Heav'nly dores; then clad
   With incense, where the Golden Altar fum'd,
   By thir great Intercessor, came in sight
   Before the Fathers Throne: Them the glad Son
   Presenting, thus to intercede began.
 
     See Father, what first fruits on Earth are sprung
   From thy implanted Grace in Man, these Sighs
   And Prayers, which in this Golden Censer, mixt
   With Incense, I thy Priest before thee bring,
   Fruits of more pleasing savour from thy seed
   Sow'n with contrition in his heart, then those
   Which his own hand manuring all the Trees
   Of Paradise could have produc't, ere fall'n
   From innocence.  Now therefore bend thine eare
   To supplication, heare his sighs though mute;
   Unskilful with what words to pray, let mee
   Interpret for him, mee his Advocate
   And propitiation, all his works on mee
   Good or not good ingraft, my Merit those
   Shall perfet, and for these my Death shall pay.
   Accept me, and in mee from these receave
   The smell of peace toward Mankinde, let him live
   Before thee reconcil'd, at least his days
   Numberd, though sad, till Death, his doom (which I
   To mitigate thus plead, not to reverse)
   To better life shall yeeld him, where with mee
   All my redeemd may dwell in joy and bliss,
   Made one with me as I with thee am one.
 
     To whom the Father, without Cloud, serene.
   All thy request for Man, accepted Son,
   Obtain, all thy request was my Decree:
   But longer in that Paradise to dwell,
   The Law I gave to Nature him forbids:
   Those pure immortal Elements that know
   No gross, no unharmoneous mixture foule,
   Eject him tainted now, and purge him off
   As a distemper, gross to aire as gross,
   And mortal food, as may dispose him best
   For dissolution wrought by Sin, that first
   Distemperd all things, and of incorrupt
   Corrupted.  I at first with two fair gifts
   Created him endowd, with Happiness
   And Immortalitie: that fondly lost,
   This other serv'd but to eternize woe;
   Till I provided Death; so Death becomes
   His final remedie, and after Life
   Tri'd in sharp tribulation, and refin'd
   By Faith and faithful works, to second Life,
   Wak't in the renovation of the just,
   Resignes him up with Heav'n and Earth renewd.
   But let us call to Synod all the Blest
   Through Heav'ns wide bounds; from them I will not hide
   My judgments, how with Mankind I proceed,
   As how with peccant Angels late they saw;
   And in thir state, though firm, stood more confirmd.
 
     He ended, and the Son gave signal high
   To the bright Minister that watchd, hee blew
   His Trumpet, heard in OREB since perhaps
   When God descended, and perhaps once more
   To sound at general Doom.  Th' Angelic blast
   Filld all the Regions: from thir blissful Bowrs
   Of AMARANTIN Shade, Fountain or Spring,
   By the waters of Life, where ere they sate
   In fellowships of joy: the Sons of Light
   Hasted, resorting to the Summons high,
   And took thir Seats; till from his Throne supream
   Th' Almighty thus pronounced his sovran Will.
 
     O Sons, like one of us Man is become
   To know both Good and Evil, since his taste
   Of that defended Fruit; but let him boast
   His knowledge of Good lost, and Evil got,
   Happier, had it suffic'd him to have known
   Good by it self, and Evil not at all.
   He sorrows now, repents, and prayes contrite,
   My motions in him, longer then they move,
   His heart I know, how variable and vain
   Self-left.  Least therefore his now bolder hand
   Reach also of the Tree of Life, and eat,
   And live for ever, dream at least to live
   Forever, to remove him I decree,
   And send him from the Garden forth to Till
   The Ground whence he was taken, fitter soile.
 
     MICHAEL, this my behest have thou in charge,
   Take to thee from among the Cherubim
   Thy choice of flaming Warriours, least the Fiend
   Or in behalf of Man, or to invade
   Vacant possession som new trouble raise:
   Hast thee, and from the Paradise of God
   Without remorse drive out the sinful Pair,
   From hallowd ground th' unholie, and denounce
   To them and to thir Progenie from thence
   Perpetual banishment.  Yet least they faint
   At the sad Sentence rigorously urg'd,
   For I behold them soft'nd and with tears
   Bewailing thir excess, all terror hide.
   If patiently thy bidding they obey,
   Dismiss them not disconsolate; reveale
   To ADAM what shall come in future dayes,
   As I shall thee enlighten, intermix
   My Cov'nant in the Womans seed renewd;
   So send them forth, though sorrowing, yet in peace:
   And on the East side of the Garden place,
   Where entrance up from EDEN easiest climbes,
   Cherubic watch, and of a Sword the flame
   Wide waving, all approach farr off to fright,
   And guard all passage to the Tree of Life:
   Least Paradise a receptacle prove
   To Spirits foule, and all my Trees thir prey,
   With whose stol'n Fruit Man once more to delude.
 
     He ceas'd; and th' Archangelic Power prepar'd
   For swift descent, with him the Cohort bright
   Of watchful Cherubim; four faces each
   Had, like a double JANUS, all thir shape
   Spangl'd with eyes more numerous then those
   Of ARGUS, and more wakeful then to drouze,
   Charm'd with ARCADIAN Pipe, the Pastoral Reed
   Of HERMES, or his opiate Rod.  Meanwhile
   To resalute the World with sacred Light
   LEUCOTHEA wak'd, and with fresh dews imbalmd
   The Earth, when ADAM and first Matron EVE
   Had ended now thir Orisons, and found,
   Strength added from above, new hope to spring
   Out of despaire, joy, but with fear yet linkt;
   Which thus to EVE his welcome words renewd.
 
     EVE, easily may Faith admit, that all
   The good which we enjoy, from Heav'n descends
   But that from us ought should ascend to Heav'n
   So prevalent as to concerne the mind
   Of God high blest, or to incline his will,
   Hard to belief may seem; yet this will Prayer,
   Or one short sigh of humane breath, up-borne
   Ev'n to the Seat of God.  For since I saught
   By Prayer th' offended Deitie to appease,
   Kneel'd and before him humbl'd all my heart,
   Methought I saw him placable and mild,
   Bending his eare; perswasion in me grew
   That I was heard with favour; peace returnd
   Home to my brest, and to my memorie
   His promise, that thy Seed shall bruise our Foe;
   Which then not minded in dismay, yet now
   Assures me that the bitterness of death
   Is past, and we shall live.  Whence Haile to thee,
   EVE rightly call'd, Mother of all Mankind,
   Mother of all things living, since by thee
   Man is to live, and all things live for Man.
 
     To whom thus EVE with sad demeanour meek.
   Ill worthie I such title should belong
   To me transgressour, who for thee ordaind
   A help, became thy snare; to mee reproach
   Rather belongs, distrust and all dispraise:
   But infinite in pardon was my Judge,
   That I who first brought Death on all, am grac't
   The sourse of life; next favourable thou,
   Who highly thus to entitle me voutsaf't,
   Farr other name deserving.  But the Field
   To labour calls us now with sweat impos'd,
   Though after sleepless Night; for see the Morn,
   All unconcern'd with our unrest, begins
   Her rosie progress smiling; let us forth,
   I never from thy side henceforth to stray,
   Wherere our days work lies, though now enjoind
   Laborious, till day droop; while here we dwell,
   What can be toilsom in these pleasant Walkes?
   Here let us live, though in fall'n state, content.
 
     So spake, so wish'd much-humbl'd EVE, but Fate
   Subscrib'd not; Nature first gave Signs, imprest
   On Bird, Beast, Aire, Aire suddenly eclips'd
   After short blush of Morn; nigh in her sight
   The Bird of JOVE, stoopt from his aerie tour,
   Two Birds of gayest plume before him drove:
   Down from a Hill the Beast that reigns in Woods,
   First Hunter then, pursu'd a gentle brace,
   Goodliest of all the Forrest, Hart and Hinde;
   Direct to th' Eastern Gate was bent thir flight.
   ADAM observ'd, and with his Eye the chase
   Pursuing, not unmov'd to EVE thus spake.
 
     O EVE, some furder change awaits us nigh,
   Which Heav'n by these mute signs in Nature shews
   Forerunners of his purpose, or to warn
   Us haply too secure of our discharge
   From penaltie, because from death releast
   Some days; how long, and what till then our life,
   Who knows, or more then this, that we are dust,
   And thither must return and be no more.
   VVhy else this double object in our sight
   Of flight pursu'd in th' Air and ore the ground
   One way the self-same hour? why in the East
   Darkness ere Dayes mid-course, and Morning light
   More orient in yon VVestern Cloud that draws
   O're the blew Firmament a radiant white,
   And slow descends, with somthing heav'nly fraught.
 
     He err'd not, for by this the heav'nly Bands
   Down from a Skie of Jasper lighted now
   In Paradise, and on a Hill made alt,
   A glorious Apparition, had not doubt
   And carnal fear that day dimm'd ADAMS eye.
   Not that more glorious, when the Angels met
   JACOB in MAHANAIM, where he saw
   The field Pavilion'd with his Guardians bright;
   Nor that which on the flaming Mount appeerd
   In DOTHAN, cover'd with a Camp of Fire,
   Against the SYRIAN King, who to surprize
   One man, Assassin-like had levied Warr,
   Warr unproclam'd.  The Princely Hierarch
   In thir bright stand, there left his Powers to seise
   Possession of the Garden; hee alone,
   To finde where ADAM shelterd, took his way,
   Not unperceav'd of ADAM, who to EVE,
   While the great Visitant approachd, thus spake.
 
     EVE, now expect great tidings, which perhaps
   Of us will soon determin, or impose
   New Laws to be observ'd; for I descrie
   From yonder blazing Cloud that veils the Hill
   One of the heav'nly Host, and by his Gate
   None of the meanest, some great Potentate
   Or of the Thrones above, such Majestie
   Invests him coming; yet not terrible,
   That I should fear, nor sociably mild,
   As RAPHAEL, that I should much confide,
   But solemn and sublime, whom not to offend,
   With reverence I must meet, and thou retire.
   He ended; and th' Arch-Angel soon drew nigh,
   Not in his shape Celestial, but as Man
   Clad to meet Man; over his lucid Armes
   A militarie Vest of purple flowd
   Livelier then MELIBOEAN, or the graine
   Of SARRA, worn by Kings and Hero's old
   In time of Truce; IRIS had dipt the wooff;
   His starrie Helme unbuckl'd shew'd him prime
   In Manhood where Youth ended; by his side
   As in a glistering ZODIAC hung the Sword,
   Satans dire dread, and in his hand the Spear.
   ADAM bowd low, hee Kingly from his State
   Inclin'd not, but his coming thus declar'd.
 
     ADAM, Heav'ns high behest no Preface needs:
   Sufficient that thy Prayers are heard, and Death,
   Then due by sentence when thou didst transgress,
   Defeated of his seisure many dayes
   Giv'n thee of Grace, wherein thou may'st repent,
   And one bad act with many deeds well done
   Mayst cover: well may then thy Lord appeas'd
   Redeem thee quite from Deaths rapacious claimes;
   But longer in this Paradise to dwell
   Permits not; to remove thee I am come,
   And send thee from the Garden forth to till
   The ground whence thou wast tak'n, fitter Soile.
 
     He added not, for ADAM at the newes
   Heart-strook with chilling gripe of sorrow stood,
   That all his senses bound; EVE, who unseen
   Yet all had heard, with audible lament
   Discover'd soon the place of her retire.
 
     O unexpected stroke, worse then of Death!
   Must I thus leave thee Paradise? thus leave
   Thee Native Soile, these happie Walks and Shades,
   Fit haunt of Gods? where I had hope to spend,
   Quiet though sad, the respit of that day
   That must be mortal to us both.  O flours,
   That never will in other Climate grow,
   My early visitation, and my last
   At Eev'n, which I bred up with tender hand
   From the first op'ning bud, and gave ye Names,
   Who now shall reare ye to the Sun, or ranke
   Your Tribes, and water from th' ambrosial Fount?
   Thee lastly nuptial Bowre, by mee adornd
   With what to sight or smell was sweet; from thee
   How shall I part, and whither wander down
   Into a lower World, to this obscure
   And wilde, how shall we breath in other Aire
   Less pure, accustomd to immortal Fruits?
 
     Whom thus the Angel interrupted milde.
   Lament not EVE, but patiently resigne
   What justly thou hast lost; nor set thy heart,
   Thus over fond, on that which is not thine;
   Thy going is not lonely, with thee goes
   Thy Husband, him to follow thou art bound;
   Where he abides, think there thy native soile.
 
     ADAM by this from the cold sudden damp
   Recovering, and his scatterd spirits returnd,
   To MICHAEL thus his humble words addressd.
 
     Celestial, whether among the Thrones, or nam'd
   Of them the Highest, for such of shape may seem
   Prince above Princes, gently hast thou tould
   Thy message, which might else in telling wound,
   And in performing end us; what besides
   Of sorrow and dejection and despair
   Our frailtie can sustain, thy tidings bring,
   Departure from this happy place, our sweet
   Recess, and onely consolation left
   Familiar to our eyes, all places else
   Inhospitable appeer and desolate,
   Nor knowing us nor known: and if by prayer
   Incessant I could hope to change the will
   Of him who all things can, I would not cease
   To wearie him with my assiduous cries:
   But prayer against his absolute Decree
   No more availes then breath against the winde,
   Blown stifling back on him that breaths it forth:
   Therefore to his great bidding I submit.
   This most afflicts me, that departing hence,
   As from his face I shall be hid, deprivd
   His blessed count'nance; here I could frequent,
   With worship, place by place where he voutsaf'd
   Presence Divine, and to my Sons relate;
   On this Mount he appeerd, under this Tree
   Stood visible, among these Pines his voice
   I heard, here with him at this Fountain talk'd:
   So many grateful Altars I would reare
   Of grassie Terfe, and pile up every Stone
   Of lustre from the brook, in memorie,
   Or monument to Ages, and thereon
   Offer sweet smelling Gumms & Fruits and Flours:
   In yonder nether World where shall I seek
   His bright appearances, or footstep trace?
   For though I fled him angrie, yet recall'd
   To life prolongd and promisd Race, I now
   Gladly behold though but his utmost skirts
   Of glory, and farr off his steps adore.
 
     To whom thus MICHAEL with regard benigne.
   ADAM, thou know'st Heav'n his, and all the Earth
   Not this Rock onely; his Omnipresence fills
   Land, Sea, and Aire, and every kinde that lives,
   Fomented by his virtual power and warmd:
   All th' Earth he gave thee to possess and rule,
   No despicable gift; surmise not then
   His presence to these narrow bounds confin'd
   Of Paradise or EDEN: this had been
   Perhaps thy Capital Seate, from whence had spred
   All generations, and had hither come
   From all the ends of th' Earth, to celebrate
   And reverence thee thir great Progenitor.
   But this praeeminence thou hast lost, brought down
   To dwell on eeven ground now with thy Sons:
   Yet doubt not but in Vallie and in Plaine
   God is as here, and will be found alike
   Present, and of his presence many a signe
   Still following thee, still compassing thee round
   With goodness and paternal Love, his Face
   Express, and of his steps the track Divine.
   Which that thou mayst beleeve, and be confirmd,
   Ere thou from hence depart, know I am sent
   To shew thee what shall come in future dayes
   To thee and to thy Ofspring; good with bad
   Expect to hear, supernal Grace contending
   With sinfulness of Men; thereby to learn
   True patience, and to temper joy with fear
   And pious sorrow, equally enur'd
   By moderation either state to beare,
   Prosperous or adverse: so shalt thou lead
   Safest thy life, and best prepar'd endure
   Thy mortal passage when it comes.  Ascend
   This Hill; let EVE (for I have drencht her eyes)
   Here sleep below while thou to foresight wak'st,
   As once thou slepst, while Shee to life was formd.
 
     To whom thus ADAM gratefully repli'd.
   Ascend, I follow thee, safe Guide, the path
   Thou lead'st me, and to the hand of Heav'n submit,
   However chast'ning, to the evil turne
   My obvious breast, arming to overcom
   By suffering, and earne rest from labour won,
   If so I may attain.  So both ascend
   In the Visions of God:  It was a Hill
   Of Paradise the highest, from whose top
   The Hemisphere of Earth in cleerest Ken
   Stretcht out to amplest reach of prospect lay.
   Not higher that Hill nor wider looking round,
   Whereon for different cause the Tempter set
   Our second ADAM in the Wilderness,
   To shew him all Earths Kingdomes and thir Glory.
   His Eye might there command wherever stood
   City of old or modern Fame, the Seat
   Of mightiest Empire, from the destind Walls
   Of CAMBALU, seat of CATHAIAN CAN
   And SAMARCHAND by OXUS, TEMIRS Throne,
   To PAQUIN of SINAEAN Kings, and thence
   To AGRA and LAHOR of great MOGUL
   Down to the golden CHERSONESE, or where
   The PERSIAN in ECBATAN sate, or since
   In HISPAHAN, or where the RUSSIAN KSAR
   In MOSCO, or the Sultan in BIZANCE,
   TURCHESTAN-born; nor could his eye not ken
   Th' Empire of NEGUS to his utmost Port
   ERCOCO and the less Maritine Kings
   MOMBAZA, and QUILOA, and MELIND,
   And SOFALA thought OPHIR, to the Realme
   Of CONGO, and ANGOLA fardest South;
   Or thence from NIGER Flood to ATLAS Mount
   The Kingdoms of ALMANSOR, FEZ, and SUS,
   MAROCCO and ALGIERS, and TREMISEN;
   On EUROPE thence, and where ROME was to sway
   The VVorld: in Spirit perhaps he also saw
   Rich MEXICO the seat of MOTEZUME,
   And CUSCO in PERU, the richer seat
   Of ATABALIPA, and yet unspoil'd
   GUIANA, whose great Citie GERYONS Sons
   Call EL DORADO: but to nobler sights
   MICHAEL from ADAMS eyes the Filme remov'd
   VVhich that false Fruit that promis'd clearer sight
   Had bred; then purg'd with Euphrasie and Rue
   The visual Nerve, for he had much to see;
   And from the VVell of Life three drops instill'd.
   So deep the power of these Ingredients pierc'd,
   Eevn to the inmost seat of mental sight,
   That ADAM now enforc't to close his eyes,
   Sunk down and all his Spirits became intranst:
   But him the gentle Angel by the hand
   Soon rais'd, and his attention thus recall'd.
 
     ADAM, now ope thine eyes, and first behold
   Th' effects which thy original crime hath wrought
   In some to spring from thee, who never touch'd
   Th' excepted Tree, nor with the Snake conspir'd,
   Nor sinn'd thy sin, yet from that sin derive
   Corruption to bring forth more violent deeds.
 
     His eyes he op'nd, and beheld a field,
   Part arable and tilth, whereon were Sheaves
   New reapt, the other part sheep-walks and foulds;
   Ith' midst an Altar as the Land-mark stood
   Rustic, of grassie sord; thither anon
   A sweatie Reaper from his Tillage brought
   First Fruits, the green Eare, and the yellow Sheaf,
   Uncull'd, as came to hand; a Shepherd next
   More meek came with the Firstlings of his Flock
   Choicest and best; then sacrificing, laid
   The Inwards and thir Fat, with Incense strew'd,
   On the cleft Wood, and all due Rites perform'd.
   His Offring soon propitious Fire from Heav'n
   Consum'd with nimble glance, and grateful steame;
   The others not, for his was not sincere;
   Whereat hee inlie rag'd, and as they talk'd,
   Smote him into the Midriff with a stone
   That beat out life; he fell, and deadly pale
   Groand out his Soul with gushing bloud effus'd.
   Much at that sight was ADAM in his heart
   Dismai'd, and thus in haste to th' Angel cri'd.
 
     O Teacher, some great mischief hath befall'n
   To that meek man, who well had sacrific'd;
   Is Pietie thus and pure Devotion paid?
 
     T' whom MICHAEL thus, hee also mov'd, repli'd.
   These two are Brethren, ADAM, and to come
   Out of thy loyns; th' unjust the just hath slain,
   For envie that his Brothers Offering found
   From Heav'n acceptance; but the bloodie Fact
   Will be aveng'd, and th' others Faith approv'd
   Loose no reward, though here thou see him die,
   Rowling in dust and gore.  To which our Sire.
 
     Alas, both for the deed and for the cause!
   But have I now seen Death?  Is this the way
   I must return to native dust?  O sight
   Of terrour, foul and ugly to behold,
   Horrid to think, how horrible to feel!
 
     To whom thus MICHAEL.  Death thou hast seen
   In his first shape on man; but many shapes
   Of Death, and many are the wayes that lead
   To his grim Cave, all dismal; yet to sense
   More terrible at th' entrance then within.
   Some, as thou saw'st, by violent stroke shall die,
   By Fire, Flood, Famin, by Intemperance more
   In Meats and Drinks, which on the Earth shal bring
   Diseases dire, of which a monstrous crew
   Before thee shall appear; that thou mayst know
   What miserie th' inabstinence of EVE
   Shall bring on men.  Immediately a place
   Before his eyes appeard, sad, noysom, dark,
   A Lazar-house it seemd, wherein were laid
   Numbers of all diseas'd, all maladies
   Of gastly Spasm, or racking torture, qualmes
   Of heart-sick Agonie, all feavorous kinds,
   Convulsions, Epilepsies, fierce Catarrhs,
   Intestin Stone and Ulcer, Colic pangs,
   Dropsies, and Asthma's, and Joint-racking Rheums.
   Dire was the tossing, deep the groans, despair
   Tended the sick busiest from Couch to Couch;
   And over them triumphant Death his Dart
   Shook, but delaid to strike, though oft invok't
   With vows, as thir chief good, and final hope.
   Sight so deform what heart of Rock could long
   Drie-ey'd behold?  ADAM could not, but wept,
   Though not of Woman born; compassion quell'd
   His best of Man, and gave him up to tears
   A space, till firmer thoughts restraind excess,
   And scarce recovering words his plaint renew'd.
 
     O miserable Mankind, to what fall
   Degraded, to what wretched state reserv'd?
   Better end heer unborn.  Why is life giv'n
   To be thus wrested from us? rather why
   Obtruded on us thus? who if we knew
   What we receive, would either not accept
   Life offer'd, or soon beg to lay it down,
   Glad to be so dismist in peace.  Can thus
   Th' Image of God in man created once
   So goodly and erect, though faultie since,
   To such unsightly sufferings be debas't
   Under inhuman pains?  Why should not Man,
   Retaining still Divine similitude
   In part, from such deformities be free,
   And for his Makers Image sake exempt?
 
     Thir Makers Image, answerd MICHAEL, then
   Forsook them, when themselves they villifi'd
   To serve ungovern'd appetite, and took
   His Image whom they serv'd, a brutish vice,
   Inductive mainly to the sin of EVE.
   Therefore so abject is thir punishment,
   Disfiguring not Gods likeness, but thir own,
   Or if his likeness, by themselves defac't
   While they pervert pure Natures healthful rules
   To loathsom sickness, worthily, since they
   Gods Image did not reverence in themselves.
 
     I yeild it just, said ADAM, and submit.
   But is there yet no other way, besides
   These painful passages, how we may come
   To Death, and mix with our connatural dust?
 
     There is, said MICHAEL, if thou well observe
   The rule of not too much, by temperance taught
   In what thou eatst and drinkst, seeking from thence
   Due nourishment, not gluttonous delight,
   Till many years over thy head return:
   So maist thou live, till like ripe Fruit thou drop
   Into thy Mothers lap, or be with ease
   Gatherd, not harshly pluckt, for death mature:
   This is old age; but then thou must outlive
   Thy youth, thy strength, thy beauty, which will change
   To witherd weak & gray; thy Senses then
   Obtuse, all taste of pleasure must forgoe,
   To what thou hast, and for the Aire of youth
   Hopeful and cheerful, in thy blood will reigne
   A melancholly damp of cold and dry
   To waigh thy spirits down, and last consume
   The Balme of Life.  To whom our Ancestor.
 
     Henceforth I flie not Death, nor would prolong
   Life much, bent rather how I may be quit
   Fairest and easiest of this combrous charge,
   Which I must keep till my appointed day
   Of rendring up.  MICHAEL to him repli'd.
 
     Nor love thy Life, nor hate; but what thou livst
   Live well, how long or short permit to Heav'n:
   And now prepare thee for another sight.
 
     He lookd and saw a spacious Plaine, whereon
   Were Tents of various hue; by some were herds
   Of Cattel grazing: others, whence the sound
   Of Instruments that made melodious chime
   Was heard, of Harp and Organ; and who moovd
   Thir stops and chords was seen: his volant touch
   Instinct through all proportions low and high
   Fled and pursu'd transverse the resonant fugue.
   In other part stood one who at the Forge
   Labouring, two massie clods of Iron and Brass
   Had melted (whether found where casual fire
   Had wasted woods on Mountain or in Vale,
   Down to the veins of Earth, thence gliding hot
   To som Caves mouth, or whether washt by stream
   From underground) the liquid Ore he dreind
   Into fit moulds prepar'd; from which he formd
   First his own Tooles; then, what might else be wrought
   Fulfil or grav'n in mettle.  After these,
   But on the hether side a different sort
   From the high neighbouring Hills, which was thir Seat,
   Down to the Plain descended: by thir guise
   Just men they seemd, and all thir study bent
   To worship God aright, and know his works
   Not hid, nor those things lost which might preserve
   Freedom and Peace to men: they on the Plain
   Long had not walkt, when from the Tents behold
   A Beavie of fair Women, richly gay
   In Gems and wanton dress; to the Harp they sung
   Soft amorous Ditties, and in dance came on:
   The Men though grave, ey'd them, and let thir eyes
   Rove without rein, till in the amorous Net
   Fast caught, they lik'd, and each his liking chose;
   And now of love they treat till th' Eevning Star
   Loves Harbinger appeerd; then all in heat
   They light the Nuptial Torch, and bid invoke
   Hymen, then first to marriage Rites invok't;
   With Feast and Musick all the Tents resound.
   Such happy interview and fair event
   Of love & youth not lost, Songs, Garlands, Flours,
   And charming Symphonies attach'd the heart
   Of ADAM, soon enclin'd to admit delight,
   The bent of Nature; which he thus express'd.
 
     True opener of mine eyes, prime Angel blest,
   Much better seems this Vision, and more hope
   Of peaceful dayes portends, then those two past;
   Those were of hate and death, or pain much worse,
   Here Nature seems fulfilld in all her ends.
 
     To whom thus MICHAEL.  Judg not what is best
   By pleasure, though to Nature seeming meet,
   Created, as thou art, to nobler end
   Holie and pure, conformitie divine.
   Those Tents thou sawst so pleasant, were the Tents
   Of wickedness, wherein shall dwell his Race
   Who slew his Brother; studious they appere
   Of Arts that polish Life, Inventers rare,
   Unmindful of thir Maker, though his Spirit
   Taught them, but they his gifts acknowledg'd none.
   Yet they a beauteous ofspring shall beget;
   For that fair femal Troop thou sawst, that seemd
   Of Goddesses, so blithe, so smooth, so gay,
   Yet empty of all good wherein consists
   Womans domestic honour and chief praise;
   Bred onely and completed to the taste
   Of lustful apperence, to sing, to dance,
   To dress, and troule the Tongue, and roule the Eye.
   To these that sober Race of Men, whose lives
   Religious titl'd them the Sons of God,
   Shall yeild up all thir vertue, all thir fame
   Ignobly, to the trains and to the smiles
   Of these fair Atheists, and now swim in joy,
   (Erelong to swim at larg) and laugh; for which
   The world erelong a world of tears must weepe.
 
     To whom thus ADAM of short joy bereft.
   O pittie and shame, that they who to live well
   Enterd so faire, should turn aside to tread
   Paths indirect, or in the mid way faint!
   But still I see the tenor of Mans woe
   Holds on the same, from Woman to begin.
 
     From Mans effeminate slackness it begins,
   Said th' Angel, who should better hold his place
   By wisdome, and superiour gifts receavd.
   But now prepare thee for another Scene.
 
     He lookd and saw wide Territorie spred
   Before him, Towns, and rural works between,
   Cities of Men with lofty Gates and Towrs,
   Concours in Arms, fierce Faces threatning Warr,
   Giants of mightie Bone, and bould emprise;
   Part wield thir Arms, part courb the foaming Steed,
   Single or in Array of Battel rang'd
   Both Horse and Foot, nor idely mustring stood;
   One way a Band select from forage drives
   A herd of Beeves, faire Oxen and faire Kine
   From a fat Meddow ground; or fleecy Flock,
   Ewes and thir bleating Lambs over the Plaine,
   Thir Bootie; scarce with Life the Shepherds flye,
   But call in aide, which tacks a bloody Fray;
   With cruel Tournament the Squadrons joine;
   Where Cattel pastur'd late, now scatterd lies
   With Carcasses and Arms th' ensanguind Field
   Deserted: Others to a Citie strong
   Lay Siege, encampt; by Batterie, Scale, and Mine,
   Assaulting; others from the Wall defend
   With Dart and Jav'lin, Stones and sulfurous Fire;
   On each hand slaughter and gigantic deeds.
   In other part the scepter'd Haralds call
   To Council in the Citie Gates: anon
   Grey-headed men and grave, with Warriours mixt,
   Assemble, and Harangues are heard, but soon
   In factious opposition, till at last
   Of middle Age one rising, eminent
   In wise deport, spake much of Right and Wrong,
   Of Justice, of Religion, Truth and Peace,
   And Judgement from above: him old and young
   Exploded, and had seiz'd with violent hands,
   Had not a Cloud descending snatch'd him thence
   Unseen amid the throng: so violence
   Proceeded, and Oppression, and Sword-Law
   Through all the Plain, and refuge none was found.
   ADAM was all in tears, and to his guide
   Lamenting turnd full sad; O what are these,
   Deaths Ministers, not Men, who thus deal Death
   Inhumanly to men, and multiply
   Ten thousand fould the sin of him who slew
   His Brother; for of whom such massacher
   Make they but of thir Brethren, men of men?
   But who was that Just Man, whom had not Heav'n
   Rescu'd, had in his Righteousness bin lost?
 
     To whom thus MICHAEL; These are the product
   Of those ill-mated Marriages thou saw'st;
   Where good with bad were matcht, who of themselves
   Abhor to joyn; and by imprudence mixt,
   Produce prodigious Births of bodie or mind.
   Such were these Giants, men of high renown;
   For in those dayes Might onely shall be admir'd,
   And Valour and Heroic Vertu call'd;
   To overcome in Battel, and subdue
   Nations, and bring home spoils with infinite
   Man-slaughter, shall be held the highest pitch
   Of human Glorie, and for Glorie done
   Of triumph, to be styl'd great Conquerours,
   Patrons of Mankind, Gods, and Sons of Gods,
   Destroyers rightlier call'd and Plagues of men.
   Thus Fame shall be achiev'd, renown on Earth,
   And what most merits fame in silence hid.
   But hee the seventh from thee, whom thou beheldst
   The onely righteous in a World perverse,
   And therefore hated, therefore so beset
   With Foes for daring single to be just,
   And utter odious Truth, that God would come
   To judge them with his Saints: Him the most High
   Rapt in a balmie Cloud with winged Steeds
   Did, as thou sawst, receave, to walk with God
   High in Salvation and the Climes of bliss,
   Exempt from Death; to shew thee what reward
   Awaits the good, the rest what punishment;
   Which now direct thine eyes and soon behold.
 
     He look'd, & saw the face of things quite chang'd;
   The brazen Throat of Warr had ceast to roar,
   All now was turn'd to jollitie and game,
   To luxurie and riot, feast and dance,
   Marrying or prostituting, as befell,
   Rape or Adulterie, where passing faire
   Allurd them; thence from Cups to civil Broiles.
   At length a Reverend Sire among them came,
   And of thir doings great dislike declar'd,
   And testifi'd against thir wayes; hee oft
   Frequented thir Assemblies, whereso met,
   Triumphs or Festivals, and to them preachd
   Conversion and Repentance, as to Souls
   In prison under Judgements imminent:
   But all in vain: which when he saw, he ceas'd
   Contending, and remov'd his Tents farr off;
   Then from the Mountain hewing Timber tall,
   Began to build a Vessel of huge bulk,
   Measur'd by Cubit, length, & breadth, and highth,
   Smeard round with Pitch, and in the side a dore
   Contriv'd, and of provisions laid in large
   For Man and Beast: when loe a wonder strange!
   Of everie Beast, and Bird, and Insect small
   Came seavens, and pairs, and enterd in, as taught
   Thir order; last the Sire, and his three Sons
   With thir four Wives, and God made fast the dore.
   Meanwhile the Southwind rose, & with black wings
   Wide hovering, all the Clouds together drove
   From under Heav'n; the Hills to their supplie
   Vapour, and Exhalation dusk and moist,
   Sent up amain; and now the thick'nd Skie
   Like a dark Ceeling stood; down rush'd the Rain
   Impetuous, and continu'd till the Earth
   No more was seen; the floating Vessel swum
   Uplifted; and secure with beaked prow
   Rode tilting o're the Waves, all dwellings else
   Flood overwhelmd, and them with all thir pomp
   Deep under water rould; Sea cover'd Sea,
   Sea without shoar; and in thir Palaces
   Where luxurie late reign'd, Sea-monsters whelp'd
   And stabl'd; of Mankind, so numerous late,
   All left, in one small bottom swum imbark't.
   How didst thou grieve then, ADAM, to behold
   The end of all thy Ofspring, end so sad,
   Depopulation; thee another Floud,
   Of tears and sorrow a Floud thee also drown'd,
   And sunk thee as thy Sons; till gently reard
   By th' Angel, on thy feet thou stoodst at last,
   Though comfortless, as when a Father mourns
   His Childern, all in view destroyd at once;
   And scarce to th' Angel utterdst thus thy plaint.
 
     O Visions ill foreseen! better had I
   Liv'd ignorant of future, so had borne
   My part of evil onely, each dayes lot
   Anough to bear; those now, that were dispenst
   The burd'n of many Ages, on me light
   At once, by my foreknowledge gaining Birth
   Abortive, to torment me ere thir being,
   With thought that they must be.  Let no man seek
   Henceforth to be foretold what shall befall
   Him or his Childern, evil he may be sure,
   Which neither his foreknowing can prevent,
   And hee the future evil shall no less
   In apprehension then in substance feel
   Grievous to bear: but that care now is past,
   Man is not whom to warne: those few escap't
   Famin and anguish will at last consume
   Wandring that watrie Desert: I had hope
   When violence was ceas't, and Warr on Earth,
   All would have then gon well, peace would have crownd
   With length of happy days the race of man;
   But I was farr deceav'd; for now I see
   Peace to corrupt no less then Warr to waste.
   How comes it thus? unfould, Celestial Guide,
   And whether here the Race of man will end.
   To whom thus MICHAEL.  Those whom last thou sawst
   In triumph and luxurious wealth, are they
   First seen in acts of prowess eminent
   And great exploits, but of true vertu void;
   Who having spilt much blood, and don much waste
   Subduing Nations, and achievd thereby
   Fame in the World, high titles, and rich prey,
   Shall change thir course to pleasure, ease, and sloth,
   Surfet, and lust, till wantonness and pride
   Raise out of friendship hostil deeds in Peace.
   The conquerd also, and enslav'd by Warr
   Shall with thir freedom lost all vertu loose
   And feare of God, from whom thir pietie feign'd
   In sharp contest of Battel found no aide
   Against invaders; therefore coold in zeale
   Thenceforth shall practice how to live secure,
   Worldlie or dissolute, on what thir Lords
   Shall leave them to enjoy; for th' Earth shall bear
   More then anough, that temperance may be tri'd:
   So all shall turn degenerate, all deprav'd,
   Justice and Temperance, Truth and Faith forgot;
   One Man except, the onely Son of light
   In a dark Age, against example good,
   Against allurement, custom, and a World
   Offended; fearless of reproach and scorn,
   Or violence, hee of thir wicked wayes
   Shall them admonish, and before them set
   The paths of righteousness, how much more safe,
   And full of peace, denouncing wrauth to come
   On thir impenitence; and shall returne
   Of them derided, but of God observd
   The one just Man alive; by his command
   Shall build a wondrous Ark, as thou beheldst,
   To save himself and houshold from amidst
   A World devote to universal rack.
   No sooner hee with them of Man and Beast
   Select for life shall in the Ark be lodg'd,
   And shelterd round, but all the Cataracts
   Of Heav'n set open on the Earth shall powre
   Raine day and night, all fountaines of the Deep
   Broke up, shall heave the Ocean to usurp
   Beyond all bounds, till inundation rise
   Above the highest Hills: then shall this Mount
   Of Paradise by might of Waves be moovd
   Out of his place, pushd by the horned floud,
   With all his verdure spoil'd, and Trees adrift
   Down the great River to the op'ning Gulf,
   And there take root an Iland salt and bare,
   The haunt of Seales and Orcs, and Sea-mews clang.
   To teach thee that God attributes to place
   No sanctitie, if none be thither brought
   By Men who there frequent, or therein dwell.
   And now what further shall ensue, behold.
 
     He lookd, and saw the Ark hull on the floud,
   Which now abated, for the Clouds were fled,
   Drivn by a keen North-winde, that blowing drie
   Wrinkl'd the face of Deluge, as decai'd;
   And the cleer Sun on his wide watrie Glass
   Gaz'd hot, and of the fresh Wave largely drew,
   As after thirst, which made thir flowing shrink
   From standing lake to tripping ebbe, that stole
   With soft foot towards the deep, who now had stopt
   His Sluces, as the Heav'n his windows shut.
   The Ark no more now flotes, but seems on ground
   Fast on the top of som high mountain fixt.
   And now the tops of Hills as Rocks appeer;
   With clamor thence the rapid Currents drive
   Towards the retreating Sea thir furious tyde.
   Forthwith from out the Arke a Raven flies,
   And after him, the surer messenger,
   A Dove sent forth once and agen to spie
   Green Tree or ground whereon his foot may light;
   The second time returning, in his Bill
   An Olive leafe he brings, pacific signe:
   Anon drie ground appeers, and from his Arke
   The ancient Sire descends with all his Train;
   Then with uplifted hands, and eyes devout,
   Grateful to Heav'n, over his head beholds
   A dewie Cloud, and in the Cloud a Bow
   Conspicuous with three lifted colours gay,
   Betok'ning peace from God, and Cov'nant new.
   Whereat the heart of ADAM erst so sad
   Greatly rejoyc'd, and thus his joy broke forth.
 
     O thou that future things canst represent
   As present, Heav'nly instructer, I revive
   At this last sight, assur'd that Man shall live
   With all the Creatures, and thir seed preserve.
   Farr less I now lament for one whole World
   Of wicked Sons destroyd, then I rejoyce
   For one Man found so perfet and so just,
   That God voutsafes to raise another World
   From him, and all his anger to forget.
   But say, what mean those colourd streaks in Heavn,
   Distended as the Brow of God appeas'd,
   Or serve they as a flourie verge to binde
   The fluid skirts of that same watrie Cloud,
   Least it again dissolve and showr the Earth?
 
     To whom th' Archangel.  Dextrously thou aim'st;
   So willingly doth God remit his Ire,
   Though late repenting him of Man deprav'd,
   Griev'd at his heart, when looking down he saw
   The whole Earth fill'd with violence, and all flesh
   Corrupting each thir way; yet those remoov'd,
   Such grace shall one just Man find in his sight,
   That he relents, not to blot out mankind,
   And makes a Covenant never to destroy
   The Earth again by flood, nor let the Sea
   Surpass his bounds, nor Rain to drown the World
   With Man therein or Beast; but when he brings
   Over the Earth a Cloud, will therein set
   His triple-colour'd Bow, whereon to look
   And call to mind his Cov'nant: Day and Night,
   Seed time and Harvest, Heat and hoary Frost
   Shall hold thir course, till fire purge all things new,
   Both Heav'n and Earth, wherein the just shall dwell.
   Thus thou hast seen one World begin and end;
   And Man as from a second stock proceed.
   Much thou hast yet to see, but I perceave
   Thy mortal sight to faile; objects divine
   Must needs impaire and wearie human sense:
   Henceforth what is to com I will relate,
   Thou therefore give due audience, and attend.
   This second sours of Men, while yet but few,
   And while the dread of judgement past remains
   Fresh in thir mindes, fearing the Deitie,
   With some regard to what is just and right
   Shall lead thir lives, and multiplie apace,
   Labouring the soile, and reaping plenteous crop,
   Corn wine and oyle; and from the herd or flock,
   Oft sacrificing Bullock, Lamb, or Kid,
   With large Wine-offerings pour'd, and sacred Feast
   Shal spend thir dayes in joy unblam'd, and dwell
   Long time in peace by Families and Tribes
   Under paternal rule; till one shall rise
   Of proud ambitious heart, who not content
   With fair equalitie, fraternal state,
   Will arrogate Dominion undeserv'd
   Over his brethren, and quite dispossess
   Concord and law of Nature from the Earth;
   Hunting (and Men not Beasts shall be his game)
   With Warr and hostile snare such as refuse
   Subjection to his Empire tyrannous:
   A mightie Hunter thence he shall be styl'd
   Before the Lord, as in despite of Heav'n,
   Or from Heav'n claming second Sovrantie;
   And from Rebellion shall derive his name,
   Though of Rebellion others he accuse.
   Hee with a crew, whom like Ambition joyns
   With him or under him to tyrannize,
   Marching from EDEN towards the West, shall finde
   The Plain, wherein a black bituminous gurge
   Boiles out from under ground, the mouth of Hell;
   Of Brick, and of that stuff they cast to build
   A Citie & Towre, whose top may reach to Heav'n;
   And get themselves a name, least far disperst
   In foraign Lands thir memorie be lost,
   Regardless whether good or evil fame.
   But God who oft descends to visit men
   Unseen, and through thir habitations walks
   To mark thir doings, them beholding soon,
   Comes down to see thir Citie, ere the Tower
   Obstruct Heav'n Towrs, and in derision sets
   Upon thir Tongues a various Spirit to rase
   Quite out thir Native Language, and instead
   To sow a jangling noise of words unknown:
   Forthwith a hideous gabble rises loud
   Among the Builders; each to other calls
   Not understood, till hoarse, and all in rage,
   As mockt they storm; great laughter was in Heav'n
   And looking down, to see the hubbub strange
   And hear the din; thus was the building left
   Ridiculous, and the work Confusion nam'd.
 
     Whereto thus ADAM fatherly displeas'd.
   O execrable Son so to aspire
   Above his Brethren, to himself affirming
   Authoritie usurpt, from God not giv'n:
   He gave us onely over Beast, Fish, Fowl
   Dominion absolute; that right we hold
   By his donation; but Man over men
   He made not Lord; such title to himself
   Reserving, human left from human free.
   But this Usurper his encroachment proud
   Stayes not on Man; to God his Tower intends
   Siege and defiance: Wretched man! what food
   Will he convey up thither to sustain
   Himself and his rash Armie, where thin Aire
   Above the Clouds will pine his entrails gross,
   And famish him of Breath, if not of Bread?
 
     To whom thus MICHAEL.  Justly thou abhorr'st
   That Son, who on the quiet state of men
   Such trouble brought, affecting to subdue
   Rational Libertie; yet know withall,
   Since thy original lapse, true Libertie
   Is lost, which alwayes with right Reason dwells
   Twinn'd, and from her hath no dividual being:
   Reason in man obscur'd, or not obeyd,
   Immediately inordinate desires
   And upstart Passions catch the Government
   From Reason, and to servitude reduce
   Man till then free.  Therefore since hee permits
   Within himself unworthie Powers to reign
   Over free Reason, God in Judgement just
   Subjects him from without to violent Lords;
   Who oft as undeservedly enthrall
   His outward freedom: Tyrannie must be,
   Though to the Tyrant thereby no excuse.
   Yet somtimes Nations will decline so low
   From vertue, which is reason, that no wrong,
   But Justice, and some fatal curse annext
   Deprives them of thir outward libertie,
   Thir inward lost: Witness th' irreverent Son
   Of him who built the Ark, who for the shame
   Don to his Father, heard this heavie curse,
   SERVANT OF SERVANTS, on his vitious Race.
   Thus will this latter, as the former World,
   Still tend from bad to worse, till God at last
   Wearied with their iniquities, withdraw
   His presence from among them, and avert
   His holy Eyes; resolving from thenceforth
   To leave them to thir own polluted wayes;
   And one peculiar Nation to select
   From all the rest, of whom to be invok'd,
   A Nation from one faithful man to spring:
   Him on this side EUPHRATES yet residing,
   Bred up in Idol-worship; O that men
   (Canst thou believe?) should be so stupid grown,
   While yet the Patriark liv'd, who scap'd the Flood,
   As to forsake the living God, and fall
   To-worship thir own work in Wood and Stone
   For Gods! yet him God the most High voutsafes
   To call by Vision from his Fathers house,
   His kindred and false Gods, into a Land
   Which he will shew him, and from him will raise
   A mightie Nation, and upon him showre
   His benediction so, that in his Seed
   All Nations shall be blest; hee straight obeys,
   Not knowing to what Land, yet firm believes:
   I see him, but thou canst not, with what Faith
   He leaves his Gods, his Friends, and native Soile
   UR of CHALDAEA, passing now the Ford
   To HARAN, after him a cumbrous Train
   Of Herds and Flocks, and numerous servitude;
   Not wandring poor, but trusting all his wealth
   With God, who call'd him, in a land unknown.
   CANAAN he now attains, I see his Tents
   Pitcht about SECHEM, and the neighbouring Plaine
   Of MOREB; there by promise he receaves
   Gift to his Progenie of all that Land;
   From HAMATH Northward to the Desert South
   (Things by thir names I call, though yet unnam'd)
   From HERMON East to the great Western Sea,
   Mount HERMON, yonder Sea, each place behold
   In prospect, as I point them; on the shoare
   Mount CARMEL; here the double-founted stream
   JORDAN, true limit Eastward; but his Sons
   Shall dwell to SENIR, that long ridge of Hills.
   This ponder, that all Nations of the Earth
   Shall in his Seed be blessed; by that Seed
   Is meant thy great deliverer, who shall bruise
   The Serpents head; whereof to thee anon
   Plainlier shall be reveald.  This Patriarch blest,
   Whom FAITHFUL ABRAHAM due time shall call,
   A Son, and of his Son a Grand-childe leaves,
   Like him in faith, in wisdom, and renown;
   The Grandchilde with twelve Sons increast, departs
   From CANAAN, to a Land hereafter call'd
   EGYPT, divided by the River NILE;
   See where it flows, disgorging at seaven mouthes
   Into the Sea: to sojourn in that Land
   He comes invited by a yonger Son
   In time of dearth, a Son whose worthy deeds
   Raise him to be the second in that Realme
   Of PHARAO: there he dies, and leaves his Race
   Growing into a Nation, and now grown
   Suspected to a sequent King, who seeks
   To stop thir overgrowth, as inmate guests
   Too numerous; whence of guests he makes them slaves
   Inhospitably, and kills thir infant Males:
   Till by two brethren (those two brethren call
   MOSES and AARON) sent from God to claime
   His people from enthralment, they return
   With glory and spoile back to thir promis'd Land.
   But first the lawless Tyrant, who denies
   To know thir God, or message to regard,
   Must be compelld by Signes and Judgements dire;
   To blood unshed the Rivers must be turnd,
   Frogs, Lice and Flies must all his Palace fill
   With loath'd intrusion, and fill all the land;
   His Cattel must of Rot and Murren die,
   Botches and blaines must all his flesh imboss,
   And all his people; Thunder mixt with Haile,
   Haile mixt with fire must rend th' EGYPTIAN Skie
   And wheel on th' Earth, devouring where it rouls;
   What it devours not, Herb, or Fruit, or Graine,
   A darksom Cloud of Locusts swarming down
   Must eat, and on the ground leave nothing green:
   Darkness must overshadow all his bounds,
   Palpable darkness, and blot out three dayes;
   Last with one midnight stroke all the first-born
   Of EGYPT must lie dead.  Thus with ten wounds
   This River-dragon tam'd at length submits
   To let his sojourners depart, and oft
   Humbles his stubborn heart, but still as Ice
   More hard'nd after thaw, till in his rage
   Pursuing whom he late dismissd, the Sea
   Swallows him with his Host, but them lets pass
   As on drie land between two christal walls,
   Aw'd by the rod of MOSES so to stand
   Divided, till his rescu'd gain thir shoar:
   Such wondrous power God to his Saint will lend,
   Though present in his Angel, who shall goe
   Before them in a Cloud, and Pillar of Fire,
   To guide them in thir journey, and remove
   Behinde them, while th' obdurat King pursues:
   All night he will pursue, but his approach
   Darkness defends between till morning Watch;
   Then through the Firey Pillar and the Cloud
   God looking forth will trouble all his Host
   And craze thir Chariot wheels: when by command
   MOSES once more his potent Rod extends
   Over the Sea; the Sea his Rod obeys;
   On thir imbattelld ranks the Waves return,
   And overwhelm thir Warr: the Race elect
   Safe towards CANAAN from the shoar advance
   Through the wilde Desert, not the readiest way,
   Least entring on the CANAANITE allarmd
   Warr terrifie them inexpert, and feare
   Return them back to EGYPT, choosing rather
   Inglorious life with servitude; for life
   To noble and ignoble is more sweet
   Untraind in Armes, where rashness leads not on.
   This also shall they gain by thir delay
   In the wide Wilderness, there they shall found
   Thir government, and thir great Senate choose
   Through the twelve Tribes, to rule by Laws ordaind:
   God from the Mount of SINAI, whose gray top
   Shall tremble, he descending, will himself
   In Thunder Lightning and loud Trumpets sound
   Ordaine them Lawes; part such as appertaine
   To civil Justice, part religious Rites
   Of sacrifice, informing them, by types
   And shadowes, of that destind Seed to bruise
   The Serpent, by what meanes he shall achieve
   Mankinds deliverance.  But the voice of God
   To mortal eare is dreadful; they beseech
   That MOSES might report to them his will,
   And terror cease; he grants them thir desire,
   Instructed that to God is no access
   Without Mediator, whose high Office now
   MOSES in figure beares, to introduce
   One greater, of whose day he shall foretell,
   And all the Prophets in thir Age the times
   Of great MESSIAH shall sing.  Thus Laws and Rites
   Establisht, such delight hath God in Men
   Obedient to his will, that he voutsafes
   Among them to set up his Tabernacle,
   The holy One with mortal Men to dwell:
   By his prescript a Sanctuary is fram'd
   Of Cedar, overlaid with Gold, therein
   An Ark, and in the Ark his Testimony,
   The Records of his Cov'nant, over these
   A Mercie-seat of Gold between the wings
   Of two bright Cherubim, before him burn
   Seaven Lamps as in a Zodiac representing
   The Heav'nly fires; over the Tent a Cloud
   Shall rest by Day, a fierie gleame by Night,
   Save when they journie, and at length they come,
   Conducted by his Angel to the Land
   Promisd to ABRAHAM and his Seed: the rest
   Were long to tell, how many Battels fought,
   How many Kings destroyd, and Kingdoms won,
   Or how the Sun shall in mid Heav'n stand still
   A day entire, and Nights due course adjourne,
   Mans voice commanding, Sun in GIBEON stand,
   And thou Moon in the vale of AIALON,
   Till ISRAEL overcome; so call the third
   From ABRAHAM, Son of ISAAC, and from him
   His whole descent, who thus shall CANAAN win.
 
     Here ADAM interpos'd.  O sent from Heav'n,
   Enlightner of my darkness, gracious things
   Thou hast reveald, those chiefly which concerne
   Just ABRAHAM and his Seed: now first I finde
   Mine eyes true op'ning, and my heart much eas'd,
   Erwhile perplext with thoughts what would becom
   Of mee and all Mankind; but now I see
   His day, in whom all Nations shall be blest,
   Favour unmerited by me, who sought
   Forbidd'n knowledge by forbidd'n means.
   This yet I apprehend not, why to those
   Among whom God will deigne to dwell on Earth
   So many and so various Laws are giv'n;
   So many Laws argue so many sins
   Among them; how can God with such reside?
 
     To whom thus MICHAEL.  Doubt not but that sin
   Will reign among them, as of thee begot;
   And therefore was Law given them to evince
   Thir natural pravitie, by stirring up
   Sin against Law to fight; that when they see
   Law can discover sin, but not remove,
   Save by those shadowie expiations weak,
   The bloud of Bulls and Goats, they may conclude
   Some bloud more precious must be paid for Man,
   Just for unjust, that in such righteousness
   To them by Faith imputed, they may finde
   Justification towards God, and peace
   Of Conscience, which the Law by Ceremonies
   Cannot appease, nor Man the moral part
   Perform, and not performing cannot live.
   So Law appears imperfet, and but giv'n
   With purpose to resign them in full time
   Up to a better Cov'nant, disciplin'd
   From shadowie Types to Truth, from Flesh to Spirit,
   From imposition of strict Laws, to free
   Acceptance of large Grace, from servil fear
   To filial, works of Law to works of Faith.
   And therefore shall not MOSES, though of God
   Highly belov'd, being but the Minister
   Of Law, his people into CANAAN lead;
   But JOSHUA whom the Gentiles JESUS call,
   His Name and Office bearing, who shall quell
   The adversarie Serpent, and bring back
   Through the worlds wilderness long wanderd man
   Safe to eternal Paradise of rest.
   Meanwhile they in thir earthly CANAAN plac't
   Long time shall dwell and prosper, but when sins
   National interrupt thir public peace,
   Provoking God to raise them enemies:
   From whom as oft he saves them penitent
   By Judges first, then under Kings; of whom
   The second, both for pietie renownd
   And puissant deeds, a promise shall receive
   Irrevocable, that his Regal Throne
   For ever shall endure; the like shall sing
   All Prophecie, That of the Royal Stock
   Of DAVID (so I name this King) shall rise
   A Son, the Womans Seed to thee foretold,
   Foretold to ABRAHAM, as in whom shall trust
   All Nations, and to Kings foretold, of Kings
   The last, for of his Reign shall be no end.
   But first a long succession must ensue,
   And his next Son for Wealth and Wisdom fam'd,
   The clouded Ark of God till then in Tents
   Wandring, shall in a glorious Temple enshrine.
   Such follow him, as shall be registerd
   Part good, part bad, of bad the longer scrowle,
   Whose foul Idolatries, and other faults
   Heapt to the popular summe, will so incense
   God, as to leave them, and expose thir Land,
   Thir Citie, his Temple, and his holy Ark
   With all his sacred things, a scorn and prey
   To that proud Citie, whose high Walls thou saw'st
   Left in confusion, BABYLON thence call'd.
   There in captivitie he lets them dwell
   The space of seventie years, then brings them back,
   Remembring mercie, and his Cov'nant sworn
   To DAVID, stablisht as the dayes of Heav'n.
   Returnd from BABYLON by leave of Kings
   Thir Lords, whom God dispos'd, the house of God
   They first re-edifie, and for a while
   In mean estate live moderate, till grown
   In wealth and multitude, factious they grow;
   But first among the Priests dissension springs,
   Men who attend the Altar, and should most
   Endeavour Peace: thir strife pollution brings
   Upon the Temple it self: at last they seise
   The Scepter, and regard not DAVIDS Sons,
   Then loose it to a stranger, that the true
   Anointed King MESSIAH might be born
   Barr'd of his right; yet at his Birth a Starr
   Unseen before in Heav'n proclaims him com,
   And guides the Eastern Sages, who enquire
   His place, to offer Incense, Myrrh, and Gold;
   His place of birth a solemn Angel tells
   To simple Shepherds, keeping watch by night;
   They gladly thither haste, and by a Quire
   Of squadrond Angels hear his Carol sung.
   A Virgin is his Mother, but his Sire
   The Power of the most High; he shall ascend
   The Throne hereditarie, and bound his Reign
   With earths wide bounds, his glory with the Heav'ns.
 
     He ceas'd, discerning ADAM with such joy
   Surcharg'd, as had like grief bin dew'd in tears,
   Without the vent of words, which these he breathd.
 
     O Prophet of glad tidings, finisher
   Of utmost hope! now clear I understand
   What oft my steddiest thoughts have searcht in vain,
   Why our great expectation should be call'd
   The seed of Woman: Virgin Mother, Haile,
   High in the love of Heav'n, yet from my Loynes
   Thou shalt proceed, and from thy Womb the Son
   Of God most High; So God with man unites.
   Needs must the Serpent now his capital bruise
   Expect with mortal paine: say where and when
   Thir fight, what stroke shall bruise the Victors heel.
 
     To whom thus MICHAEL.  Dream not of thir fight,
   As of a Duel, or the local wounds
   Of head or heel: not therefore joynes the Son
   Manhood to God-head, with more strength to foil
   Thy enemie; nor so is overcome
   SATAN, whose fall from Heav'n, a deadlier bruise,
   Disabl'd not to give thee thy deaths wound:
   Which hee, who comes thy Saviour, shall recure,
   Not by destroying SATAN, but his works
   In thee and in thy Seed: nor can this be,
   But by fulfilling that which thou didst want,
   Obedience to the Law of God, impos'd
   On penaltie of death, and suffering death,
   The penaltie to thy transgression due,
   And due to theirs which out of thine will grow:
   So onely can high Justice rest appaid.
   The Law of God exact he shall fulfill
   Both by obedience and by love, though love
   Alone fulfill the Law; thy punishment
   He shall endure by coming in the Flesh
   To a reproachful life and cursed death,
   Proclaiming Life to all who shall believe
   In his redemption, and that his obedience
   Imputed becomes theirs by Faith, his merits
   To save them, not thir own, though legal works.
   For this he shall live hated, be blasphem'd,
   Seis'd on by force, judg'd, and to death condemnd
   A shameful and accurst, naild to the Cross
   By his own Nation, slaine for bringing Life;
   But to the Cross he nailes thy Enemies,
   The Law that is against thee, and the sins
   Of all mankinde, with him there crucifi'd,
   Never to hurt them more who rightly trust
   In this his satisfaction; so he dies,
   But soon revives, Death over him no power
   Shall long usurp; ere the third dawning light
   Returne, the Starres of Morn shall see him rise
   Out of his grave, fresh as the dawning light,
   Thy ransom paid, which Man from death redeems,
   His death for Man, as many as offerd Life
   Neglect not, and the benefit imbrace
   By Faith not void of works: this God-like act
   Annuls thy doom, the death thou shouldst have dy'd,
   In sin for ever lost from life; this act
   Shall bruise the head of SATAN, crush his strength
   Defeating Sin and Death, his two maine armes,
   And fix farr deeper in his head thir stings
   Then temporal death shall bruise the Victors heel,
   Or theirs whom he redeems, a death like sleep,
   A gentle wafting to immortal Life.
   Nor after resurrection shall he stay
   Longer on Earth then certaine times to appeer
   To his Disciples, Men who in his Life
   Still follow'd him; to them shall leave in charge
   To teach all nations what of him they learn'd
   And his Salvation, them who shall beleeve
   Baptizing in the profluent streame, the signe
   Of washing them from guilt of sin to Life
   Pure, and in mind prepar'd, if so befall,
   For death, like that which the redeemer dy'd.
   All Nations they shall teach; for from that day
   Not onely to the Sons of ABRAHAMS Loines
   Salvation shall be Preacht, but to the Sons
   Of ABRAHAMS Faith wherever through the world;
   So in his seed all Nations shall be blest.
   Then to the Heav'n of Heav'ns he shall ascend
   With victory, triumphing through the aire
   Over his foes and thine; there shall surprise
   The Serpent, Prince of aire, and drag in Chaines
   Through all his realme, & there confounded leave;
   Then enter into glory, and resume
   His Seat at Gods right hand, exalted high
   Above all names in Heav'n; and thence shall come,
   When this worlds dissolution shall be ripe,
   With glory and power to judge both quick & dead,
   To judge th' unfaithful dead, but to reward
   His faithful, and receave them into bliss,
   Whether in Heav'n or Earth, for then the Earth
   Shall all be Paradise, far happier place
   Then this of EDEN, and far happier daies.
 
     So spake th' Archangel MICHAEL, then paus'd,
   As at the Worlds great period; and our Sire
   Replete with joy and wonder thus repli'd.
 
     O goodness infinite, goodness immense!
   That all this good of evil shall produce,
   And evil turn to good; more wonderful
   Then that which by creation first brought forth
   Light out of darkness! full of doubt I stand,
   Whether I should repent me now of sin
   By mee done and occasiond, or rejoyce
   Much more, that much more good thereof shall spring,
   To God more glory, more good will to Men
   From God, and over wrauth grace shall abound.
   But say, if our deliverer up to Heav'n
   Must reascend, what will betide the few
   His faithful, left among th' unfaithful herd,
   The enemies of truth; who then shall guide
   His people, who defend? will they not deale
   Wors with his followers then with him they dealt?
 
     Be sure they will, said th' Angel; but from Heav'n
   Hee to his own a Comforter will send,
   The promise of the Father, who shall dwell
   His Spirit within them, and the Law of Faith
   Working through love, upon thir hearts shall write,
   To guide them in all truth, and also arme
   With spiritual Armour, able to resist
   SATANS assaults, and quench his fierie darts
   What Man can do against them, not affraid,
   Though to the death, against such cruelties
   With inward consolations recompenc't,
   And oft supported so as shall amaze
   Thir proudest persecuters: for the Spirit
   Powrd first on his Apostles, whom he sends
   To evangelize the Nations, then on all
   Baptiz'd, shall them with wondrous gifts endue
   To speak all Tongues, and do all Miracles,
   As did thir Lord before them.  Thus they win
   Great numbers of each Nation to receave
   With joy the tidings brought from Heav'n: at length
   Thir Ministry perform'd, and race well run,
   Thir doctrine and thir story written left,
   They die; but in thir room, as they forewarne,
   Wolves shall succeed for teachers, grievous Wolves,
   Who all the sacred mysteries of Heav'n
   To thir own vile advantages shall turne
   Of lucre and ambition, and the truth
   With superstitions and traditions taint,
   Left onely in those written Records pure,
   Though not but by the Spirit understood.
   Then shall they seek to avail themselves of names,
   Places and titles, and with these to joine
   Secular power, though feigning still to act
   By spiritual, to themselves appropriating
   The Spirit of God, promisd alike and giv'n
   To all Beleevers; and from that pretense,
   Spiritual Lawes by carnal power shall force
   On every conscience; Laws which none shall finde
   Left them inrould, or what the Spirit within
   Shall on the heart engrave.  What will they then
   But force the Spirit of Grace it self, and binde
   His consort Libertie; what, but unbuild
   His living Temples, built by Faith to stand,
   Thir own Faith not anothers: for on Earth
   Who against Faith and Conscience can be heard
   Infallible? yet many will presume:
   Whence heavie persecution shall arise
   On all who in the worship persevere
   Of Spirit and Truth; the rest, farr greater part,
   Will deem in outward Rites and specious formes
   Religion satisfi'd; Truth shall retire
   Bestuck with slandrous darts, and works of Faith
   Rarely be found: so shall the World goe on,
   To good malignant, to bad men benigne,
   Under her own waight groaning, till the day
   Appeer of respiration to the just,
   And vengeance to the wicked, at return
   Of him so lately promis'd to thy aid,
   The Womans seed, obscurely then foretold,
   Now amplier known thy Saviour and thy Lord,
   Last in the Clouds from Heav'n to be reveald
   In glory of the Father, to dissolve
   SATAN with his perverted World, then raise
   From the conflagrant mass, purg'd and refin'd,
   New Heav'ns, new Earth, Ages of endless date
   Founded in righteousness and peace and love,
   To bring forth fruits Joy and eternal Bliss.
 
     He ended; and thus ADAM last reply'd.
   How soon hath thy prediction, Seer blest,
   Measur'd this transient World, the Race of time,
   Till time stand fixt: beyond is all abyss,
   Eternitie, whose end no eye can reach.
   Greatly instructed I shall hence depart,
   Greatly in peace of thought, and have my fill
   Of knowledge, what this vessel can containe;
   Beyond which was my folly to aspire.
   Henceforth I learne, that to obey is best,
   And love with feare the onely God, to walk
   As in his presence, ever to observe
   His providence, and on him sole depend,
   Merciful over all his works, with good
   Still overcoming evil, and by small
   Accomplishing great things, by things deemd weak
   Subverting worldly strong, and worldly wise
   By simply meek; that suffering for Truths sake
   Is fortitude to highest victorie,
   And to the faithful Death the Gate of Life;
   Taught this by his example whom I now
   Acknowledge my Redeemer ever blest.
 
     To whom thus also th' Angel last repli'd:
   This having learnt, thou hast attaind the summe
   Of wisdom; hope no higher, though all the Starrs
   Thou knewst by name, and all th' ethereal Powers,
   All secrets of the deep, all Natures works,
   Or works of God in Heav'n, Air, Earth, or Sea,
   And all the riches of this World enjoydst,
   And all the rule, one Empire; onely add
   Deeds to thy knowledge answerable, add Faith,
   Add Vertue, Patience, Temperance, add Love,
   By name to come call'd Charitie, the soul
   Of all the rest: then wilt thou not be loath
   To leave this Paradise, but shalt possess
   A Paradise within thee, happier farr.
   Let us descend now therefore from this top
   Of Speculation; for the hour precise
   Exacts our parting hence; and see the Guards,
   By mee encampt on yonder Hill, expect
   Thir motion, at whose Front a flaming Sword,
   In signal of remove, waves fiercely round;
   We may no longer stay: go, waken Eve;
   Her also I with gentle Dreams have calm'd
   Portending good, and all her spirits compos'd
   To meek submission: thou at season fit
   Let her with thee partake what thou hast heard,
   Chiefly what may concern her Faith to know,
   The great deliverance by her Seed to come
   (For by the Womans Seed) on all Mankind.
   That ye may live, which will be many dayes,
   Both in one Faith unanimous though sad,
   With cause for evils past, yet much more cheer'd
   With meditation on the happie end.
 
     He ended, and they both descend the Hill;
   Descended, ADAM to the Bowre where EVE
   Lay sleeping ran before, but found her wak't;
   And thus with words not sad she him receav'd.
 
     Whence thou returnst, & whither wentst, I know;
   For God is also in sleep, and Dreams advise,
   Which he hath sent propitious, some great good
   Presaging, since with sorrow and hearts distress
   VVearied I fell asleep: but now lead on;
   In mee is no delay; with thee to goe,
   Is to stay here; without thee here to stay,
   Is to go hence unwilling; thou to mee
   Art all things under Heav'n, all places thou,
   VVho for my wilful crime art banisht hence.
   This further consolation yet secure
   I carry hence; though all by mee is lost,
   Such favour I unworthie am voutsaft,
   By mee the Promis'd Seed shall all restore.
 
     So spake our Mother EVE, and ADAM heard
   VVell pleas'd, but answer'd not; for now too nigh
   Th' Archangel stood, and from the other Hill
   To thir fixt Station, all in bright array
   The Cherubim descended; on the ground
   Gliding meteorous, as Ev'ning Mist
   Ris'n from a River o're the marish glides,
   And gathers ground fast at the Labourers heel
   Homeward returning.  High in Front advanc't,
   The brandisht Sword of God before them blaz'd
   Fierce as a Comet; which with torrid heat,
   And vapour as the LIBYAN Air adust,
   Began to parch that temperate Clime; whereat
   In either hand the hastning Angel caught
   Our lingring Parents, and to th' Eastern Gate
   Let them direct, and down the Cliff as fast
   To the subjected Plaine; then disappeer'd.
   They looking back, all th' Eastern side beheld
   Of Paradise, so late thir happie seat,
   Wav'd over by that flaming Brand, the Gate
   With dreadful Faces throng'd and fierie Armes:
   Som natural tears they drop'd, but wip'd them soon;
   The World was all before them, where to choose
   Thir place of rest, and Providence thir guide:
   They hand in hand with wandring steps and slow,
   Through EDEN took thir solitarie way.
 
 
 
 
   THE END.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 This is the February 1992 Project Gutenberg release of:
 
 Paradise Lost by John Milton
 
 The oldest etext known to Project Gutenberg (ca. 1964-1965)
 (If you know of any older ones, please let us know.)
 
 
 Introduction  (one page)
 
 This etext was originally created in 1964-1965 according to Dr.
 Joseph Raben of Queens College, NY, to whom it is attributed by
 Project Gutenberg.  We had heard of this etext for years but it
 was not until 1991 that we actually managed to track it down to
 a specific location, and then it took months to convince people
 to let us have a copy, then more months for them actually to do
 the copying and get it to us.  Then another month to convert to
 something we could massage with our favorite 486 in DOS.  After
 that is was only a matter of days to get it into this shape you
 will see below.  The original was, of course, in CAPS only, and
 so were all the other etexts of the 60's and early 70's.  Don't
 let anyone fool you into thinking any etext with both upper and
 lower case is an original; all those original Project Gutenberg
 etexts were also in upper case and were translated or rewritten
 many times to get them into their current condition.  They have
 been worked on by many people throughout the world.
 
 In the course of our searches for Professor Raben and his etext
 we were never able to determine where copies were or which of a
 variety of editions he may have used as a source.  We did get a
 little information here and there, but even after we received a
 copy of the etext we were unwilling to release it without first
 determining that it was in fact Public Domain and finding Raben
 to verify this and get his permission.  Interested enough, in a
 totally unrelated action to our searches for him, the professor
 subscribed to the Project Gutenberg listserver and we happened,
 by accident, to notice his name. (We don't really look at every
 subscription request as the computers usually handle them.) The
 etext was then properly identified, copyright analyzed, and the
 current edition prepared.
 
 To give you an estimation of the difference in the original and
 what we have today:  the original was probably entered on cards
 commonly known at the time as "IBM cards" (Do Not Fold, Spindle
 or Mutilate) and probably took in excess of 100,000 of them.  A
 single card could hold 80 characters (hence 80 characters is an
 accepted standard for so many computer margins), and the entire
 original edition we received in all caps was over 800,000 chars
 in length, including line enumeration, symbols for caps and the
 punctuation marks, etc., since they were not available keyboard
 characters at the time (probably the keyboards operated at baud
 rates of around 113, meaning the typists had to type slowly for
 the keyboard to keep up).
 
 This is the second version of Paradise Lost released by Project
 Gutenberg.  The first was released as our October, 1991 etext.
 
 
 
 
 
 Paradise Lost
 
 
 
 
 Book I
 
 
 Of Man's first disobedience, and the fruit
 Of that forbidden tree whose mortal taste
 Brought death into the World, and all our woe,
 With loss of Eden, till one greater Man
 Restore us, and regain the blissful seat,
 Sing, Heavenly Muse, that, on the secret top
 Of Oreb, or of Sinai, didst inspire
 That shepherd who first taught the chosen seed
 In the beginning how the heavens and earth
 Rose out of Chaos: or, if Sion hill
 Delight thee more, and Siloa's brook that flowed
 Fast by the oracle of God, I thence
 Invoke thy aid to my adventurous song,
 That with no middle flight intends to soar
 Above th' Aonian mount, while it pursues
 Things unattempted yet in prose or rhyme.
 And chiefly thou, O Spirit, that dost prefer
 Before all temples th' upright heart and pure,
 Instruct me, for thou know'st; thou from the first
 Wast present, and, with mighty wings outspread,
 Dove-like sat'st brooding on the vast Abyss,
 And mad'st it pregnant: what in me is dark
 Illumine, what is low raise and support;
 That, to the height of this great argument,
 I may assert Eternal Providence,
 And justify the ways of God to men.
   Say first--for Heaven hides nothing from thy view,
 Nor the deep tract of Hell--say first what cause
 Moved our grand parents, in that happy state,
 Favoured of Heaven so highly, to fall off
 From their Creator, and transgress his will
 For one restraint, lords of the World besides.
 Who first seduced them to that foul revolt?
   Th' infernal Serpent; he it was whose guile,
 Stirred up with envy and revenge, deceived
 The mother of mankind, what time his pride
 Had cast him out from Heaven, with all his host
 Of rebel Angels, by whose aid, aspiring
 To set himself in glory above his peers,
 He trusted to have equalled the Most High,
 If he opposed, and with ambitious aim
 Against the throne and monarchy of God,
 Raised impious war in Heaven and battle proud,
 With vain attempt.  Him the Almighty Power
 Hurled headlong flaming from th' ethereal sky,
 With hideous ruin and combustion, down
 To bottomless perdition, there to dwell
 In adamantine chains and penal fire,
 Who durst defy th' Omnipotent to arms.
   Nine times the space that measures day and night
 To mortal men, he, with his horrid crew,
 Lay vanquished, rolling in the fiery gulf,
 Confounded, though immortal.  But his doom
 Reserved him to more wrath; for now the thought
 Both of lost happiness and lasting pain
 Torments him: round he throws his baleful eyes,
 That witnessed huge affliction and dismay,
 Mixed with obdurate pride and steadfast hate.
 At once, as far as Angels ken, he views
 The dismal situation waste and wild.
 A dungeon horrible, on all sides round,
 As one great furnace flamed; yet from those flames
 No light; but rather darkness visible
 Served only to discover sights of woe,
 Regions of sorrow, doleful shades, where peace
 And rest can never dwell, hope never comes
 That comes to all, but torture without end
 Still urges, and a fiery deluge, fed
 With ever-burning sulphur unconsumed.
 Such place Eternal Justice has prepared
 For those rebellious; here their prison ordained
 In utter darkness, and their portion set,
 As far removed from God and light of Heaven
 As from the centre thrice to th' utmost pole.
 Oh how unlike the place from whence they fell!
 There the companions of his fall, o'erwhelmed
 With floods and whirlwinds of tempestuous fire,
 He soon discerns; and, weltering by his side,
 One next himself in power, and next in crime,
 Long after known in Palestine, and named
 Beelzebub.  To whom th' Arch-Enemy,
 And thence in Heaven called Satan, with bold words
 Breaking the horrid silence, thus began:--
   "If thou beest he--but O how fallen! how changed
 From him who, in the happy realms of light
 Clothed with transcendent brightness, didst outshine
 Myriads, though bright!--if he whom mutual league,
 United thoughts and counsels, equal hope
 And hazard in the glorious enterprise
 Joined with me once, now misery hath joined
 In equal ruin; into what pit thou seest
 From what height fallen: so much the stronger proved
 He with his thunder; and till then who knew
 The force of those dire arms?  Yet not for those,
 Nor what the potent Victor in his rage
 Can else inflict, do I repent, or change,
 Though changed in outward lustre, that fixed mind,
 And high disdain from sense of injured merit,
 That with the Mightiest raised me to contend,
 And to the fierce contentions brought along
 Innumerable force of Spirits armed,
 That durst dislike his reign, and, me preferring,
 His utmost power with adverse power opposed
 In dubious battle on the plains of Heaven,
 And shook his throne.  What though the field be lost?
 All is not lost--the unconquerable will,
 And study of revenge, immortal hate,
 And courage never to submit or yield:
 And what is else not to be overcome?
 That glory never shall his wrath or might
 Extort from me.  To bow and sue for grace
 With suppliant knee, and deify his power
 Who, from the terror of this arm, so late
 Doubted his empire--that were low indeed;
 That were an ignominy and shame beneath
 This downfall; since, by fate, the strength of Gods,
 And this empyreal substance, cannot fail;
 Since, through experience of this great event,
 In arms not worse, in foresight much advanced,
 We may with more successful hope resolve
 To wage by force or guile eternal war,
 Irreconcilable to our grand Foe,
 Who now triumphs, and in th' excess of joy
 Sole reigning holds the tyranny of Heaven."
   So spake th' apostate Angel, though in pain,
 Vaunting aloud, but racked with deep despair;
 And him thus answered soon his bold compeer:--
   "O Prince, O Chief of many throned Powers
 That led th' embattled Seraphim to war
 Under thy conduct, and, in dreadful deeds
 Fearless, endangered Heaven's perpetual King,
 And put to proof his high supremacy,
 Whether upheld by strength, or chance, or fate,
 Too well I see and rue the dire event
 That, with sad overthrow and foul defeat,
 Hath lost us Heaven, and all this mighty host
 In horrible destruction laid thus low,
 As far as Gods and heavenly Essences
 Can perish: for the mind and spirit remains
 Invincible, and vigour soon returns,
 Though all our glory extinct, and happy state
 Here swallowed up in endless misery.
 But what if he our Conqueror (whom I now
 Of force believe almighty, since no less
 Than such could have o'erpowered such force as ours)
 Have left us this our spirit and strength entire,
 Strongly to suffer and support our pains,
 That we may so suffice his vengeful ire,
 Or do him mightier service as his thralls
 By right of war, whate'er his business be,
 Here in the heart of Hell to work in fire,
 Or do his errands in the gloomy Deep?
 What can it the avail though yet we feel
 Strength undiminished, or eternal being
 To undergo eternal punishment?"
   Whereto with speedy words th' Arch-Fiend replied:--
 "Fallen Cherub, to be weak is miserable,
 Doing or suffering: but of this be sure--
 To do aught good never will be our task,
 But ever to do ill our sole delight,
 As being the contrary to his high will
 Whom we resist.  If then his providence
 Out of our evil seek to bring forth good,
 Our labour must be to pervert that end,
 And out of good still to find means of evil;
 Which ofttimes may succeed so as perhaps
 Shall grieve him, if I fail not, and disturb
 His inmost counsels from their destined aim.
 But see! the angry Victor hath recalled
 His ministers of vengeance and pursuit
 Back to the gates of Heaven: the sulphurous hail,
 Shot after us in storm, o'erblown hath laid
 The fiery surge that from the precipice
 Of Heaven received us falling; and the thunder,
 Winged with red lightning and impetuous rage,
 Perhaps hath spent his shafts, and ceases now
 To bellow through the vast and boundless Deep.
 Let us not slip th' occasion, whether scorn
 Or satiate fury yield it from our Foe.
 Seest thou yon dreary plain, forlorn and wild,
 The seat of desolation, void of light,
 Save what the glimmering of these livid flames
 Casts pale and dreadful? Thither let us tend
 From off the tossing of these fiery waves;
 There rest, if any rest can harbour there;
 And, re-assembling our afflicted powers,
 Consult how we may henceforth most offend
 Our enemy, our own loss how repair,
 How overcome this dire calamity,
 What reinforcement we may gain from hope,
 If not, what resolution from despair."
   Thus Satan, talking to his nearest mate,
 With head uplift above the wave, and eyes
 That sparkling blazed; his other parts besides
 Prone on the flood, extended long and large,
 Lay floating many a rood, in bulk as huge
 As whom the fables name of monstrous size,
 Titanian or Earth-born, that warred on Jove,
 Briareos or Typhon, whom the den
 By ancient Tarsus held, or that sea-beast
 Leviathan, which God of all his works
 Created hugest that swim th' ocean-stream.
 Him, haply slumbering on the Norway foam,
 The pilot of some small night-foundered skiff,
 Deeming some island, oft, as seamen tell,
 With fixed anchor in his scaly rind,
 Moors by his side under the lee, while night
 Invests the sea, and wished morn delays.
 So stretched out huge in length the Arch-fiend lay,
 Chained on the burning lake; nor ever thence
 Had risen, or heaved his head, but that the will
 And high permission of all-ruling Heaven
 Left him at large to his own dark designs,
 That with reiterated crimes he might
 Heap on himself damnation, while he sought
 Evil to others, and enraged might see
 How all his malice served but to bring forth
 Infinite goodness, grace, and mercy, shewn
 On Man by him seduced, but on himself
 Treble confusion, wrath, and vengeance poured.
   Forthwith upright he rears from off the pool
 His mighty stature; on each hand the flames
 Driven backward slope their pointing spires, and rolled
 In billows, leave i' th' midst a horrid vale.
 Then with expanded wings he steers his flight
 Aloft, incumbent on the dusky air,
 That felt unusual weight; till on dry land
 He lights--if it were land that ever burned
 With solid, as the lake with liquid fire,
 And such appeared in hue as when the force
 Of subterranean wind transports a hill
 Torn from Pelorus, or the shattered side
 Of thundering Etna, whose combustible
 And fuelled entrails, thence conceiving fire,
 Sublimed with mineral fury, aid the winds,
 And leave a singed bottom all involved
 With stench and smoke.  Such resting found the sole
 Of unblest feet.  Him followed his next mate;
 Both glorying to have scaped the Stygian flood
 As gods, and by their own recovered strength,
 Not by the sufferance of supernal Power.
   "Is this the region, this the soil, the clime,"
 Said then the lost Archangel, "this the seat
 That we must change for Heaven?--this mournful gloom
 For that celestial light? Be it so, since he
 Who now is sovereign can dispose and bid
 What shall be right: farthest from him is best
 Whom reason hath equalled, force hath made supreme
 Above his equals.  Farewell, happy fields,
 Where joy for ever dwells! Hail, horrors! hail,
 Infernal world! and thou, profoundest Hell,
 Receive thy new possessor--one who brings
 A mind not to be changed by place or time.
 The mind is its own place, and in itself
 Can make a Heaven of Hell, a Hell of Heaven.
 What matter where, if I be still the same,
 And what I should be, all but less than he
 Whom thunder hath made greater? Here at least
 We shall be free; th' Almighty hath not built
 Here for his envy, will not drive us hence:
 Here we may reign secure; and, in my choice,
 To reign is worth ambition, though in Hell:
 Better to reign in Hell than serve in Heaven.
 But wherefore let we then our faithful friends,
 Th' associates and co-partners of our loss,
 Lie thus astonished on th' oblivious pool,
 And call them not to share with us their part
 In this unhappy mansion, or once more
 With rallied arms to try what may be yet
 Regained in Heaven, or what more lost in Hell?"
   So Satan spake; and him Beelzebub
 Thus answered:--"Leader of those armies bright
 Which, but th' Omnipotent, none could have foiled!
 If once they hear that voice, their liveliest pledge
 Of hope in fears and dangers--heard so oft
 In worst extremes, and on the perilous edge
 Of battle, when it raged, in all assaults
 Their surest signal--they will soon resume
 New courage and revive, though now they lie
 Grovelling and prostrate on yon lake of fire,
 As we erewhile, astounded and amazed;
 No wonder, fallen such a pernicious height!"
   He scarce had ceased when the superior Fiend
 Was moving toward the shore; his ponderous shield,
 Ethereal temper, massy, large, and round,
 Behind him cast.  The broad circumference
 Hung on his shoulders like the moon, whose orb
 Through optic glass the Tuscan artist views
 At evening, from the top of Fesole,
 Or in Valdarno, to descry new lands,
 Rivers, or mountains, in her spotty globe.
 His spear--to equal which the tallest pine
 Hewn on Norwegian hills, to be the mast
 Of some great ammiral, were but a wand--
 He walked with, to support uneasy steps
 Over the burning marl, not like those steps
 On Heaven's azure; and the torrid clime
 Smote on him sore besides, vaulted with fire.
 Nathless he so endured, till on the beach
 Of that inflamed sea he stood, and called
 His legions--Angel Forms, who lay entranced
 Thick as autumnal leaves that strow the brooks
 In Vallombrosa, where th' Etrurian shades
 High over-arched embower; or scattered sedge
 Afloat, when with fierce winds Orion armed
 Hath vexed the Red-Sea coast, whose waves o'erthrew
 Busiris and his Memphian chivalry,
 While with perfidious hatred they pursued
 The sojourners of Goshen, who beheld
 From the safe shore their floating carcases
 And broken chariot-wheels.  So thick bestrown,
 Abject and lost, lay these, covering the flood,
 Under amazement of their hideous change.
 He called so loud that all the hollow deep
 Of Hell resounded:--"Princes, Potentates,
 Warriors, the Flower of Heaven--once yours; now lost,
 If such astonishment as this can seize
 Eternal Spirits! Or have ye chosen this place
 After the toil of battle to repose
 Your wearied virtue, for the ease you find
 To slumber here, as in the vales of Heaven?
 Or in this abject posture have ye sworn
 To adore the Conqueror, who now beholds
 Cherub and Seraph rolling in the flood
 With scattered arms and ensigns, till anon
 His swift pursuers from Heaven-gates discern
 Th' advantage, and, descending, tread us down
 Thus drooping, or with linked thunderbolts
 Transfix us to the bottom of this gulf?
 Awake, arise, or be for ever fallen!"
   They heard, and were abashed, and up they sprung
 Upon the wing, as when men wont to watch
 On duty, sleeping found by whom they dread,
 Rouse and bestir themselves ere well awake.
 Nor did they not perceive the evil plight
 In which they were, or the fierce pains not feel;
 Yet to their General's voice they soon obeyed
 Innumerable.  As when the potent rod
 Of Amram's son, in Egypt's evil day,
 Waved round the coast, up-called a pitchy cloud
 Of locusts, warping on the eastern wind,
 That o'er the realm of impious Pharaoh hung
 Like Night, and darkened all the land of Nile;
 So numberless were those bad Angels seen
 Hovering on wing under the cope of Hell,
 'Twixt upper, nether, and surrounding fires;
 Till, as a signal given, th' uplifted spear
 Of their great Sultan waving to direct
 Their course, in even balance down they light
 On the firm brimstone, and fill all the plain:
 A multitude like which the populous North
 Poured never from her frozen loins to pass
 Rhene or the Danaw, when her barbarous sons
 Came like a deluge on the South, and spread
 Beneath Gibraltar to the Libyan sands.
 Forthwith, form every squadron and each band,
 The heads and leaders thither haste where stood
 Their great Commander--godlike Shapes, and Forms
 Excelling human; princely Dignities;
 And Powers that erst in Heaven sat on thrones,
 Though on their names in Heavenly records now
 Be no memorial, blotted out and rased
 By their rebellion from the Books of Life.
 Nor had they yet among the sons of Eve
 Got them new names, till, wandering o'er the earth,
 Through God's high sufferance for the trial of man,
 By falsities and lies the greatest part
 Of mankind they corrupted to forsake
 God their Creator, and th' invisible
 Glory of him that made them to transform
 Oft to the image of a brute, adorned
 With gay religions full of pomp and gold,
 And devils to adore for deities:
 Then were they known to men by various names,
 And various idols through the heathen world.
   Say, Muse, their names then known, who first, who last,
 Roused from the slumber on that fiery couch,
 At their great Emperor's call, as next in worth
 Came singly where he stood on the bare strand,
 While the promiscuous crowd stood yet aloof?
   The chief were those who, from the pit of Hell
 Roaming to seek their prey on Earth, durst fix
 Their seats, long after, next the seat of God,
 Their altars by his altar, gods adored
 Among the nations round, and durst abide
 Jehovah thundering out of Sion, throned
 Between the Cherubim; yea, often placed
 Within his sanctuary itself their shrines,
 Abominations; and with cursed things
 His holy rites and solemn feasts profaned,
 And with their darkness durst affront his light.
 First, Moloch, horrid king, besmeared with blood
 Of human sacrifice, and parents' tears;
 Though, for the noise of drums and timbrels loud,
 Their children's cries unheard that passed through fire
 To his grim idol.  Him the Ammonite
 Worshiped in Rabba and her watery plain,
 In Argob and in Basan, to the stream
 Of utmost Arnon.  Nor content with such
 Audacious neighbourhood, the wisest heart
 Of Solomon he led by fraud to build
 His temple right against the temple of God
 On that opprobrious hill, and made his grove
 The pleasant valley of Hinnom, Tophet thence
 And black Gehenna called, the type of Hell.
 Next Chemos, th' obscene dread of Moab's sons,
 From Aroar to Nebo and the wild
 Of southmost Abarim; in Hesebon
 And Horonaim, Seon's real, beyond
 The flowery dale of Sibma clad with vines,
 And Eleale to th' Asphaltic Pool:
 Peor his other name, when he enticed
 Israel in Sittim, on their march from Nile,
 To do him wanton rites, which cost them woe.
 Yet thence his lustful orgies he enlarged
 Even to that hill of scandal, by the grove
 Of Moloch homicide, lust hard by hate,
 Till good Josiah drove them thence to Hell.
 With these came they who, from the bordering flood
 Of old Euphrates to the brook that parts
 Egypt from Syrian ground, had general names
 Of Baalim and Ashtaroth--those male,
 These feminine.  For Spirits, when they please,
 Can either sex assume, or both; so soft
 And uncompounded is their essence pure,
 Not tried or manacled with joint or limb,
 Nor founded on the brittle strength of bones,
 Like cumbrous flesh; but, in what shape they choose,
 Dilated or condensed, bright or obscure,
 Can execute their airy purposes,
 And works of love or enmity fulfil.
 For those the race of Israel oft forsook
 Their Living Strength, and unfrequented left
 His righteous altar, bowing lowly down
 To bestial gods; for which their heads as low
 Bowed down in battle, sunk before the spear
 Of despicable foes.  With these in troop
 Came Astoreth, whom the Phoenicians called
 Astarte, queen of heaven, with crescent horns;
 To whose bright image nightly by the moon
 Sidonian virgins paid their vows and songs;
 In Sion also not unsung, where stood
 Her temple on th' offensive mountain, built
 By that uxorious king whose heart, though large,
 Beguiled by fair idolatresses, fell
 To idols foul.  Thammuz came next behind,
 Whose annual wound in Lebanon allured
 The Syrian damsels to lament his fate
 In amorous ditties all a summer's day,
 While smooth Adonis from his native rock
 Ran purple to the sea, supposed with blood
 Of Thammuz yearly wounded: the love-tale
 Infected Sion's daughters with like heat,
 Whose wanton passions in the sacred porch
 Ezekiel saw, when, by the vision led,
 His eye surveyed the dark idolatries
 Of alienated Judah.  Next came one
 Who mourned in earnest, when the captive ark
 Maimed his brute image, head and hands lopt off,
 In his own temple, on the grunsel-edge,
 Where he fell flat and shamed his worshippers:
 Dagon his name, sea-monster, upward man
 And downward fish; yet had his temple high
 Reared in Azotus, dreaded through the coast
 Of Palestine, in Gath and Ascalon,
 And Accaron and Gaza's frontier bounds.
 Him followed Rimmon, whose delightful seat
 Was fair Damascus, on the fertile banks
 Of Abbana and Pharphar, lucid streams.
 He also against the house of God was bold:
 A leper once he lost, and gained a king--
 Ahaz, his sottish conqueror, whom he drew
 God's altar to disparage and displace
 For one of Syrian mode, whereon to burn
 His odious offerings, and adore the gods
 Whom he had vanquished.  After these appeared
 A crew who, under names of old renown--
 Osiris, Isis, Orus, and their train--
 With monstrous shapes and sorceries abused
 Fanatic Egypt and her priests to seek
 Their wandering gods disguised in brutish forms
 Rather than human.  Nor did Israel scape
 Th' infection, when their borrowed gold composed
 The calf in Oreb; and the rebel king
 Doubled that sin in Bethel and in Dan,
 Likening his Maker to the grazed ox--
 Jehovah, who, in one night, when he passed
 From Egypt marching, equalled with one stroke
 Both her first-born and all her bleating gods.
 Belial came last; than whom a Spirit more lewd
 Fell not from Heaven, or more gross to love
 Vice for itself.  To him no temple stood
 Or altar smoked; yet who more oft than he
 In temples and at altars, when the priest
 Turns atheist, as did Eli's sons, who filled
 With lust and violence the house of God?
 In courts and palaces he also reigns,
 And in luxurious cities, where the noise
 Of riot ascends above their loftiest towers,
 And injury and outrage; and, when night
 Darkens the streets, then wander forth the sons
 Of Belial, flown with insolence and wine.
 Witness the streets of Sodom, and that night
 In Gibeah, when the hospitable door
 Exposed a matron, to avoid worse rape.
   These were the prime in order and in might:
 The rest were long to tell; though far renowned
 Th' Ionian gods--of Javan's issue held
 Gods, yet confessed later than Heaven and Earth,
 Their boasted parents;--Titan, Heaven's first-born,
 With his enormous brood, and birthright seized
 By younger Saturn: he from mightier Jove,
 His own and Rhea's son, like measure found;
 So Jove usurping reigned.  These, first in Crete
 And Ida known, thence on the snowy top
 Of cold Olympus ruled the middle air,
 Their highest heaven; or on the Delphian cliff,
 Or in Dodona, and through all the bounds
 Of Doric land; or who with Saturn old
 Fled over Adria to th' Hesperian fields,
 And o'er the Celtic roamed the utmost Isles.
   All these and more came flocking; but with looks
 Downcast and damp; yet such wherein appeared
 Obscure some glimpse of joy to have found their Chief
 Not in despair, to have found themselves not lost
 In loss itself; which on his countenance cast
 Like doubtful hue.  But he, his wonted pride
 Soon recollecting, with high words, that bore
 Semblance of worth, not substance, gently raised
 Their fainting courage, and dispelled their fears.
 Then straight commands that, at the warlike sound
 Of trumpets loud and clarions, be upreared
 His mighty standard.  That proud honour claimed
 Azazel as his right, a Cherub tall:
 Who forthwith from the glittering staff unfurled
 Th' imperial ensign; which, full high advanced,
 Shone like a meteor streaming to the wind,
 With gems and golden lustre rich emblazed,
 Seraphic arms and trophies; all the while
 Sonorous metal blowing martial sounds:
 At which the universal host up-sent
 A shout that tore Hell's concave, and beyond
 Frighted the reign of Chaos and old Night.
 All in a moment through the gloom were seen
 Ten thousand banners rise into the air,
 With orient colours waving: with them rose
 A forest huge of spears; and thronging helms
 Appeared, and serried shields in thick array
 Of depth immeasurable.  Anon they move
 In perfect phalanx to the Dorian mood
 Of flutes and soft recorders--such as raised
 To height of noblest temper heroes old
 Arming to battle, and instead of rage
 Deliberate valour breathed, firm, and unmoved
 With dread of death to flight or foul retreat;
 Nor wanting power to mitigate and swage
 With solemn touches troubled thoughts, and chase
 Anguish and doubt and fear and sorrow and pain
 From mortal or immortal minds.  Thus they,
 Breathing united force with fixed thought,
 Moved on in silence to soft pipes that charmed
 Their painful steps o'er the burnt soil.  And now
 Advanced in view they stand--a horrid front
 Of dreadful length and dazzling arms, in guise
 Of warriors old, with ordered spear and shield,
 Awaiting what command their mighty Chief
 Had to impose.  He through the armed files
 Darts his experienced eye, and soon traverse
 The whole battalion views--their order due,
 Their visages and stature as of gods;
 Their number last he sums.  And now his heart
 Distends with pride, and, hardening in his strength,
 Glories: for never, since created Man,
 Met such embodied force as, named with these,
 Could merit more than that small infantry
 Warred on by cranes--though all the giant brood
 Of Phlegra with th' heroic race were joined
 That fought at Thebes and Ilium, on each side
 Mixed with auxiliar gods; and what resounds
 In fable or romance of Uther's son,
 Begirt with British and Armoric knights;
 And all who since, baptized or infidel,
 Jousted in Aspramont, or Montalban,
 Damasco, or Marocco, or Trebisond,
 Or whom Biserta sent from Afric shore
 When Charlemain with all his peerage fell
 By Fontarabbia.  Thus far these beyond
 Compare of mortal prowess, yet observed
 Their dread Commander.  He, above the rest
 In shape and gesture proudly eminent,
 Stood like a tower.  His form had yet not lost
 All her original brightness, nor appeared
 Less than Archangel ruined, and th' excess
 Of glory obscured: as when the sun new-risen
 Looks through the horizontal misty air
 Shorn of his beams, or, from behind the moon,
 In dim eclipse, disastrous twilight sheds
 On half the nations, and with fear of change
 Perplexes monarchs.  Darkened so, yet shone
 Above them all th' Archangel: but his face
 Deep scars of thunder had intrenched, and care
 Sat on his faded cheek, but under brows
 Of dauntless courage, and considerate pride
 Waiting revenge.  Cruel his eye, but cast
 Signs of remorse and passion, to behold
 The fellows of his crime, the followers rather
 (Far other once beheld in bliss), condemned
 For ever now to have their lot in pain--
 Millions of Spirits for his fault amerced
 Of Heaven, and from eternal splendours flung
 For his revolt--yet faithful how they stood,
 Their glory withered; as, when heaven's fire
 Hath scathed the forest oaks or mountain pines,
 With singed top their stately growth, though bare,
 Stands on the blasted heath.  He now prepared
 To speak; whereat their doubled ranks they bend
 From wing to wing, and half enclose him round
 With all his peers: attention held them mute.
 Thrice he assayed, and thrice, in spite of scorn,
 Tears, such as Angels weep, burst forth: at last
 Words interwove with sighs found out their way:--
   "O myriads of immortal Spirits! O Powers
 Matchless, but with th' Almighty!--and that strife
 Was not inglorious, though th' event was dire,
 As this place testifies, and this dire change,
 Hateful to utter.  But what power of mind,
 Forseeing or presaging, from the depth
 Of knowledge past or present, could have feared
 How such united force of gods, how such
 As stood like these, could ever know repulse?
 For who can yet believe, though after loss,
 That all these puissant legions, whose exile
 Hath emptied Heaven, shall fail to re-ascend,
 Self-raised, and repossess their native seat?
 For me, be witness all the host of Heaven,
 If counsels different, or danger shunned
 By me, have lost our hopes.  But he who reigns
 Monarch in Heaven till then as one secure
 Sat on his throne, upheld by old repute,
 Consent or custom, and his regal state
 Put forth at full, but still his strength concealed--
 Which tempted our attempt, and wrought our fall.
 Henceforth his might we know, and know our own,
 So as not either to provoke, or dread
 New war provoked: our better part remains
 To work in close design, by fraud or guile,
 What force effected not; that he no less
 At length from us may find, who overcomes
 By force hath overcome but half his foe.
 Space may produce new Worlds; whereof so rife
 There went a fame in Heaven that he ere long
 Intended to create, and therein plant
 A generation whom his choice regard
 Should favour equal to the Sons of Heaven.
 Thither, if but to pry, shall be perhaps
 Our first eruption--thither, or elsewhere;
 For this infernal pit shall never hold
 Celestial Spirits in bondage, nor th' Abyss
 Long under darkness cover.  But these thoughts
 Full counsel must mature.  Peace is despaired;
 For who can think submission? War, then, war
 Open or understood, must be resolved."
   He spake; and, to confirm his words, outflew
 Millions of flaming swords, drawn from the thighs
 Of mighty Cherubim; the sudden blaze
 Far round illumined Hell.  Highly they raged
 Against the Highest, and fierce with grasped arms
 Clashed on their sounding shields the din of war,
 Hurling defiance toward the vault of Heaven.
   There stood a hill not far, whose grisly top
 Belched fire and rolling smoke; the rest entire
 Shone with a glossy scurf--undoubted sign
 That in his womb was hid metallic ore,
 The work of sulphur.  Thither, winged with speed,
 A numerous brigade hastened: as when bands
 Of pioneers, with spade and pickaxe armed,
 Forerun the royal camp, to trench a field,
 Or cast a rampart.  Mammon led them on--
 Mammon, the least erected Spirit that fell
 From Heaven; for even in Heaven his looks and thoughts
 Were always downward bent, admiring more
 The riches of heaven's pavement, trodden gold,
 Than aught divine or holy else enjoyed
 In vision beatific.  By him first
 Men also, and by his suggestion taught,
 Ransacked the centre, and with impious hands
 Rifled the bowels of their mother Earth
 For treasures better hid.  Soon had his crew
 Opened into the hill a spacious wound,
 And digged out ribs of gold.  Let none admire
 That riches grow in Hell; that soil may best
 Deserve the precious bane.  And here let those
 Who boast in mortal things, and wondering tell
 Of Babel, and the works of Memphian kings,
 Learn how their greatest monuments of fame
 And strength, and art, are easily outdone
 By Spirits reprobate, and in an hour
 What in an age they, with incessant toil
 And hands innumerable, scarce perform.
 Nigh on the plain, in many cells prepared,
 That underneath had veins of liquid fire
 Sluiced from the lake, a second multitude
 With wondrous art founded the massy ore,
 Severing each kind, and scummed the bullion-dross.
 A third as soon had formed within the ground
 A various mould, and from the boiling cells
 By strange conveyance filled each hollow nook;
 As in an organ, from one blast of wind,
 To many a row of pipes the sound-board breathes.
 Anon out of the earth a fabric huge
 Rose like an exhalation, with the sound
 Of dulcet symphonies and voices sweet--
 Built like a temple, where pilasters round
 Were set, and Doric pillars overlaid
 With golden architrave; nor did there want
 Cornice or frieze, with bossy sculptures graven;
 The roof was fretted gold.  Not Babylon
 Nor great Alcairo such magnificence
 Equalled in all their glories, to enshrine
 Belus or Serapis their gods, or seat
 Their kings, when Egypt with Assyria strove
 In wealth and luxury.  Th' ascending pile
 Stood fixed her stately height, and straight the doors,
 Opening their brazen folds, discover, wide
 Within, her ample spaces o'er the smooth
 And level pavement: from the arched roof,
 Pendent by subtle magic, many a row
 Of starry lamps and blazing cressets, fed
 With naptha and asphaltus, yielded light
 As from a sky.  The hasty multitude
 Admiring entered; and the work some praise,
 And some the architect.  His hand was known
 In Heaven by many a towered structure high,
 Where sceptred Angels held their residence,
 And sat as Princes, whom the supreme King
 Exalted to such power, and gave to rule,
 Each in his Hierarchy, the Orders bright.
 Nor was his name unheard or unadored
 In ancient Greece; and in Ausonian land
 Men called him Mulciber; and how he fell
 From Heaven they fabled, thrown by angry Jove
 Sheer o'er the crystal battlements: from morn
 To noon he fell, from noon to dewy eve,
 A summer's day, and with the setting sun
 Dropt from the zenith, like a falling star,
 On Lemnos, th' Aegaean isle.  Thus they relate,
 Erring; for he with this rebellious rout
 Fell long before; nor aught availed him now
 To have built in Heaven high towers; nor did he scape
 By all his engines, but was headlong sent,
 With his industrious crew, to build in Hell.
   Meanwhile the winged Heralds, by command
 Of sovereign power, with awful ceremony
 And trumpet's sound, throughout the host proclaim
 A solemn council forthwith to be held
 At Pandemonium, the high capital
 Of Satan and his peers.  Their summons called
 From every band and squared regiment
 By place or choice the worthiest: they anon
 With hundreds and with thousands trooping came
 Attended.  All access was thronged; the gates
 And porches wide, but chief the spacious hall
 (Though like a covered field, where champions bold
 Wont ride in armed, and at the Soldan's chair
 Defied the best of Paynim chivalry
 To mortal combat, or career with lance),
 Thick swarmed, both on the ground and in the air,
 Brushed with the hiss of rustling wings.  As bees
 In spring-time, when the Sun with Taurus rides.
 Pour forth their populous youth about the hive
 In clusters; they among fresh dews and flowers
 Fly to and fro, or on the smoothed plank,
 The suburb of their straw-built citadel,
 New rubbed with balm, expatiate, and confer
 Their state-affairs: so thick the airy crowd
 Swarmed and were straitened; till, the signal given,
 Behold a wonder! They but now who seemed
 In bigness to surpass Earth's giant sons,
 Now less than smallest dwarfs, in narrow room
 Throng numberless--like that pygmean race
 Beyond the Indian mount; or faery elves,
 Whose midnight revels, by a forest-side
 Or fountain, some belated peasant sees,
 Or dreams he sees, while overhead the Moon
 Sits arbitress, and nearer to the Earth
 Wheels her pale course: they, on their mirth and dance
 Intent, with jocund music charm his ear;
 At once with joy and fear his heart rebounds.
 Thus incorporeal Spirits to smallest forms
 Reduced their shapes immense, and were at large,
 Though without number still, amidst the hall
 Of that infernal court.  But far within,
 And in their own dimensions like themselves,
 The great Seraphic Lords and Cherubim
 In close recess and secret conclave sat,
 A thousand demi-gods on golden seats,
 Frequent and full.  After short silence then,
 And summons read, the great consult began.
 
 
 
 Book II
 
 
 High on a throne of royal state, which far
 Outshone the wealth of Ormus and of Ind,
 Or where the gorgeous East with richest hand
 Showers on her kings barbaric pearl and gold,
 Satan exalted sat, by merit raised
 To that bad eminence; and, from despair
 Thus high uplifted beyond hope, aspires
 Beyond thus high, insatiate to pursue
 Vain war with Heaven; and, by success untaught,
 His proud imaginations thus displayed:--
   "Powers and Dominions, Deities of Heaven!--
 For, since no deep within her gulf can hold
 Immortal vigour, though oppressed and fallen,
 I give not Heaven for lost: from this descent
 Celestial Virtues rising will appear
 More glorious and more dread than from no fall,
 And trust themselves to fear no second fate!--
 Me though just right, and the fixed laws of Heaven,
 Did first create your leader--next, free choice
 With what besides in council or in fight
 Hath been achieved of merit--yet this loss,
 Thus far at least recovered, hath much more
 Established in a safe, unenvied throne,
 Yielded with full consent.  The happier state
 In Heaven, which follows dignity, might draw
 Envy from each inferior; but who here
 Will envy whom the highest place exposes
 Foremost to stand against the Thunderer's aim
 Your bulwark, and condemns to greatest share
 Of endless pain? Where there is, then, no good
 For which to strive, no strife can grow up there
 From faction: for none sure will claim in Hell
 Precedence; none whose portion is so small
 Of present pain that with ambitious mind
 Will covet more! With this advantage, then,
 To union, and firm faith, and firm accord,
 More than can be in Heaven, we now return
 To claim our just inheritance of old,
 Surer to prosper than prosperity
 Could have assured us; and by what best way,
 Whether of open war or covert guile,
 We now debate.  Who can advise may speak."
   He ceased; and next him Moloch, sceptred king,
 Stood up--the strongest and the fiercest Spirit
 That fought in Heaven, now fiercer by despair.
 His trust was with th' Eternal to be deemed
 Equal in strength, and rather than be less
 Cared not to be at all; with that care lost
 Went all his fear: of God, or Hell, or worse,
 He recked not, and these words thereafter spake:--
   "My sentence is for open war.  Of wiles,
 More unexpert, I boast not: them let those
 Contrive who need, or when they need; not now.
 For, while they sit contriving, shall the rest--
 Millions that stand in arms, and longing wait
 The signal to ascend--sit lingering here,
 Heaven's fugitives, and for their dwelling-place
 Accept this dark opprobrious den of shame,
 The prison of his tyranny who reigns
 By our delay? No! let us rather choose,
 Armed with Hell-flames and fury, all at once
 O'er Heaven's high towers to force resistless way,
 Turning our tortures into horrid arms
 Against the Torturer; when, to meet the noise
 Of his almighty engine, he shall hear
 Infernal thunder, and, for lightning, see
 Black fire and horror shot with equal rage
 Among his Angels, and his throne itself
 Mixed with Tartarean sulphur and strange fire,
 His own invented torments.  But perhaps
 The way seems difficult, and steep to scale
 With upright wing against a higher foe!
 Let such bethink them, if the sleepy drench
 Of that forgetful lake benumb not still,
 That in our proper motion we ascend
 Up to our native seat; descent and fall
 To us is adverse.  Who but felt of late,
 When the fierce foe hung on our broken rear
 Insulting, and pursued us through the Deep,
 With what compulsion and laborious flight
 We sunk thus low? Th' ascent is easy, then;
 Th' event is feared! Should we again provoke
 Our stronger, some worse way his wrath may find
 To our destruction, if there be in Hell
 Fear to be worse destroyed! What can be worse
 Than to dwell here, driven out from bliss, condemned
 In this abhorred deep to utter woe!
 Where pain of unextinguishable fire
 Must exercise us without hope of end
 The vassals of his anger, when the scourge
 Inexorably, and the torturing hour,
 Calls us to penance? More destroyed than thus,
 We should be quite abolished, and expire.
 What fear we then? what doubt we to incense
 His utmost ire? which, to the height enraged,
 Will either quite consume us, and reduce
 To nothing this essential--happier far
 Than miserable to have eternal being!--
 Or, if our substance be indeed divine,
 And cannot cease to be, we are at worst
 On this side nothing; and by proof we feel
 Our power sufficient to disturb his Heaven,
 And with perpetual inroads to alarm,
 Though inaccessible, his fatal throne:
 Which, if not victory, is yet revenge."
   He ended frowning, and his look denounced
 Desperate revenge, and battle dangerous
 To less than gods.  On th' other side up rose
 Belial, in act more graceful and humane.
 A fairer person lost not Heaven; he seemed
 For dignity composed, and high exploit.
 But all was false and hollow; though his tongue
 Dropped manna, and could make the worse appear
 The better reason, to perplex and dash
 Maturest counsels: for his thoughts were low--
 To vice industrious, but to nobler deeds
 Timorous and slothful.  Yet he pleased the ear,
 And with persuasive accent thus began:--
   "I should be much for open war, O Peers,
 As not behind in hate, if what was urged
 Main reason to persuade immediate war
 Did not dissuade me most, and seem to cast
 Ominous conjecture on the whole success;
 When he who most excels in fact of arms,
 In what he counsels and in what excels
 Mistrustful, grounds his courage on despair
 And utter dissolution, as the scope
 Of all his aim, after some dire revenge.
 First, what revenge? The towers of Heaven are filled
 With armed watch, that render all access
 Impregnable: oft on the bordering Deep
 Encamp their legions, or with obscure wing
 Scout far and wide into the realm of Night,
 Scorning surprise.  Or, could we break our way
 By force, and at our heels all Hell should rise
 With blackest insurrection to confound
 Heaven's purest light, yet our great Enemy,
 All incorruptible, would on his throne
 Sit unpolluted, and th' ethereal mould,
 Incapable of stain, would soon expel
 Her mischief, and purge off the baser fire,
 Victorious.  Thus repulsed, our final hope
 Is flat despair: we must exasperate
 Th' Almighty Victor to spend all his rage;
 And that must end us; that must be our cure--
 To be no more.  Sad cure! for who would lose,
 Though full of pain, this intellectual being,
 Those thoughts that wander through eternity,
 To perish rather, swallowed up and lost
 In the wide womb of uncreated Night,
 Devoid of sense and motion? And who knows,
 Let this be good, whether our angry Foe
 Can give it, or will ever? How he can
 Is doubtful; that he never will is sure.
 Will he, so wise, let loose at once his ire,
 Belike through impotence or unaware,
 To give his enemies their wish, and end
 Them in his anger whom his anger saves
 To punish endless? "Wherefore cease we, then?"
 Say they who counsel war; "we are decreed,
 Reserved, and destined to eternal woe;
 Whatever doing, what can we suffer more,
 What can we suffer worse?" Is this, then, worst--
 Thus sitting, thus consulting, thus in arms?
 What when we fled amain, pursued and struck
 With Heaven's afflicting thunder, and besought
 The Deep to shelter us? This Hell then seemed
 A refuge from those wounds.  Or when we lay
 Chained on the burning lake? That sure was worse.
 What if the breath that kindled those grim fires,
 Awaked, should blow them into sevenfold rage,
 And plunge us in the flames; or from above
 Should intermitted vengeance arm again
 His red right hand to plague us? What if all
 Her stores were opened, and this firmament
 Of Hell should spout her cataracts of fire,
 Impendent horrors, threatening hideous fall
 One day upon our heads; while we perhaps,
 Designing or exhorting glorious war,
 Caught in a fiery tempest, shall be hurled,
 Each on his rock transfixed, the sport and prey
 Or racking whirlwinds, or for ever sunk
 Under yon boiling ocean, wrapt in chains,
 There to converse with everlasting groans,
 Unrespited, unpitied, unreprieved,
 Ages of hopeless end? This would be worse.
 War, therefore, open or concealed, alike
 My voice dissuades; for what can force or guile
 With him, or who deceive his mind, whose eye
 Views all things at one view? He from Heaven's height
 All these our motions vain sees and derides,
 Not more almighty to resist our might
 Than wise to frustrate all our plots and wiles.
 Shall we, then, live thus vile--the race of Heaven
 Thus trampled, thus expelled, to suffer here
 Chains and these torments? Better these than worse,
 By my advice; since fate inevitable
 Subdues us, and omnipotent decree,
 The Victor's will.  To suffer, as to do,
 Our strength is equal; nor the law unjust
 That so ordains.  This was at first resolved,
 If we were wise, against so great a foe
 Contending, and so doubtful what might fall.
 I laugh when those who at the spear are bold
 And venturous, if that fail them, shrink, and fear
 What yet they know must follow--to endure
 Exile, or ignominy, or bonds, or pain,
 The sentence of their Conqueror.  This is now
 Our doom; which if we can sustain and bear,
 Our Supreme Foe in time may much remit
 His anger, and perhaps, thus far removed,
 Not mind us not offending, satisfied
 With what is punished; whence these raging fires
 Will slacken, if his breath stir not their flames.
 Our purer essence then will overcome
 Their noxious vapour; or, inured, not feel;
 Or, changed at length, and to the place conformed
 In temper and in nature, will receive
 Familiar the fierce heat; and, void of pain,
 This horror will grow mild, this darkness light;
 Besides what hope the never-ending flight
 Of future days may bring, what chance, what change
 Worth waiting--since our present lot appears
 For happy though but ill, for ill not worst,
 If we procure not to ourselves more woe."
   Thus Belial, with words clothed in reason's garb,
 Counselled ignoble ease and peaceful sloth,
 Not peace; and after him thus Mammon spake:--
   "Either to disenthrone the King of Heaven
 We war, if war be best, or to regain
 Our own right lost.  Him to unthrone we then
 May hope, when everlasting Fate shall yield
 To fickle Chance, and Chaos judge the strife.
 The former, vain to hope, argues as vain
 The latter; for what place can be for us
 Within Heaven's bound, unless Heaven's Lord supreme
 We overpower? Suppose he should relent
 And publish grace to all, on promise made
 Of new subjection; with what eyes could we
 Stand in his presence humble, and receive
 Strict laws imposed, to celebrate his throne
 With warbled hymns, and to his Godhead sing
 Forced hallelujahs, while he lordly sits
 Our envied sovereign, and his altar breathes
 Ambrosial odours and ambrosial flowers,
 Our servile offerings? This must be our task
 In Heaven, this our delight.  How wearisome
 Eternity so spent in worship paid
 To whom we hate! Let us not then pursue,
 By force impossible, by leave obtained
 Unacceptable, though in Heaven, our state
 Of splendid vassalage; but rather seek
 Our own good from ourselves, and from our own
 Live to ourselves, though in this vast recess,
 Free and to none accountable, preferring
 Hard liberty before the easy yoke
 Of servile pomp.  Our greatness will appear
 Then most conspicuous when great things of small,
 Useful of hurtful, prosperous of adverse,
 We can create, and in what place soe'er
 Thrive under evil, and work ease out of pain
 Through labour and endurance.  This deep world
 Of darkness do we dread? How oft amidst
 Thick clouds and dark doth Heaven's all-ruling Sire
 Choose to reside, his glory unobscured,
 And with the majesty of darkness round
 Covers his throne, from whence deep thunders roar.
 Mustering their rage, and Heaven resembles Hell!
 As he our darkness, cannot we his light
 Imitate when we please? This desert soil
 Wants not her hidden lustre, gems and gold;
 Nor want we skill or art from whence to raise
 Magnificence; and what can Heaven show more?
 Our torments also may, in length of time,
 Become our elements, these piercing fires
 As soft as now severe, our temper changed
 Into their temper; which must needs remove
 The sensible of pain.  All things invite
 To peaceful counsels, and the settled state
 Of order, how in safety best we may
 Compose our present evils, with regard
 Of what we are and where, dismissing quite
 All thoughts of war.  Ye have what I advise."
   He scarce had finished, when such murmur filled
 Th' assembly as when hollow rocks retain
 The sound of blustering winds, which all night long
 Had roused the sea, now with hoarse cadence lull
 Seafaring men o'erwatched, whose bark by chance
 Or pinnace, anchors in a craggy bay
 After the tempest.  Such applause was heard
 As Mammon ended, and his sentence pleased,
 Advising peace: for such another field
 They dreaded worse than Hell; so much the fear
 Of thunder and the sword of Michael
 Wrought still within them; and no less desire
 To found this nether empire, which might rise,
 By policy and long process of time,
 In emulation opposite to Heaven.
 Which when Beelzebub perceived--than whom,
 Satan except, none higher sat--with grave
 Aspect he rose, and in his rising seemed
 A pillar of state.  Deep on his front engraven
 Deliberation sat, and public care;
 And princely counsel in his face yet shone,
 Majestic, though in ruin.  Sage he stood
 With Atlantean shoulders, fit to bear
 The weight of mightiest monarchies; his look
 Drew audience and attention still as night
 Or summer's noontide air, while thus he spake:--
   "Thrones and Imperial Powers, Offspring of Heaven,
 Ethereal Virtues! or these titles now
 Must we renounce, and, changing style, be called
 Princes of Hell? for so the popular vote
 Inclines--here to continue, and build up here
 A growing empire; doubtless! while we dream,
 And know not that the King of Heaven hath doomed
 This place our dungeon, not our safe retreat
 Beyond his potent arm, to live exempt
 From Heaven's high jurisdiction, in new league
 Banded against his throne, but to remain
 In strictest bondage, though thus far removed,
 Under th' inevitable curb, reserved
 His captive multitude.  For he, to be sure,
 In height or depth, still first and last will reign
 Sole king, and of his kingdom lose no part
 By our revolt, but over Hell extend
 His empire, and with iron sceptre rule
 Us here, as with his golden those in Heaven.
 What sit we then projecting peace and war?
 War hath determined us and foiled with loss
 Irreparable; terms of peace yet none
 Vouchsafed or sought; for what peace will be given
 To us enslaved, but custody severe,
 And stripes and arbitrary punishment
 Inflicted? and what peace can we return,
 But, to our power, hostility and hate,
 Untamed reluctance, and revenge, though slow,
 Yet ever plotting how the Conqueror least
 May reap his conquest, and may least rejoice
 In doing what we most in suffering feel?
 Nor will occasion want, nor shall we need
 With dangerous expedition to invade
 Heaven, whose high walls fear no assault or siege,
 Or ambush from the Deep.  What if we find
 Some easier enterprise? There is a place
 (If ancient and prophetic fame in Heaven
 Err not)--another World, the happy seat
 Of some new race, called Man, about this time
 To be created like to us, though less
 In power and excellence, but favoured more
 Of him who rules above; so was his will
 Pronounced among the Gods, and by an oath
 That shook Heaven's whole circumference confirmed.
 Thither let us bend all our thoughts, to learn
 What creatures there inhabit, of what mould
 Or substance, how endued, and what their power
 And where their weakness: how attempted best,
 By force of subtlety.  Though Heaven be shut,
 And Heaven's high Arbitrator sit secure
 In his own strength, this place may lie exposed,
 The utmost border of his kingdom, left
 To their defence who hold it: here, perhaps,
 Some advantageous act may be achieved
 By sudden onset--either with Hell-fire
 To waste his whole creation, or possess
 All as our own, and drive, as we were driven,
 The puny habitants; or, if not drive,
 Seduce them to our party, that their God
 May prove their foe, and with repenting hand
 Abolish his own works.  This would surpass
 Common revenge, and interrupt his joy
 In our confusion, and our joy upraise
 In his disturbance; when his darling sons,
 Hurled headlong to partake with us, shall curse
 Their frail original, and faded bliss--
 Faded so soon! Advise if this be worth
 Attempting, or to sit in darkness here
 Hatching vain empires." Thus Beelzebub
 Pleaded his devilish counsel--first devised
 By Satan, and in part proposed: for whence,
 But from the author of all ill, could spring
 So deep a malice, to confound the race
 Of mankind in one root, and Earth with Hell
 To mingle and involve, done all to spite
 The great Creator? But their spite still serves
 His glory to augment.  The bold design
 Pleased highly those infernal States, and joy
 Sparkled in all their eyes: with full assent
 They vote: whereat his speech he thus renews:--
 "Well have ye judged, well ended long debate,
 Synod of Gods, and, like to what ye are,
 Great things resolved, which from the lowest deep
 Will once more lift us up, in spite of fate,
 Nearer our ancient seat--perhaps in view
 Of those bright confines, whence, with neighbouring arms,
 And opportune excursion, we may chance
 Re-enter Heaven; or else in some mild zone
 Dwell, not unvisited of Heaven's fair light,
 Secure, and at the brightening orient beam
 Purge off this gloom: the soft delicious air,
 To heal the scar of these corrosive fires,
 Shall breathe her balm.  But, first, whom shall we send
 In search of this new World? whom shall we find
 Sufficient? who shall tempt with wandering feet
 The dark, unbottomed, infinite Abyss,
 And through the palpable obscure find out
 His uncouth way, or spread his airy flight,
 Upborne with indefatigable wings
 Over the vast abrupt, ere he arrive
 The happy Isle? What strength, what art, can then
 Suffice, or what evasion bear him safe,
 Through the strict senteries and stations thick
 Of Angels watching round? Here he had need
 All circumspection: and we now no less
 Choice in our suffrage; for on whom we send
 The weight of all, and our last hope, relies."
   This said, he sat; and expectation held
 His look suspense, awaiting who appeared
 To second, or oppose, or undertake
 The perilous attempt.  But all sat mute,
 Pondering the danger with deep thoughts; and each
 In other's countenance read his own dismay,
 Astonished.  None among the choice and prime
 Of those Heaven-warring champions could be found
 So hardy as to proffer or accept,
 Alone, the dreadful voyage; till, at last,
 Satan, whom now transcendent glory raised
 Above his fellows, with monarchal pride
 Conscious of highest worth, unmoved thus spake:--
   "O Progeny of Heaven! Empyreal Thrones!
 With reason hath deep silence and demur
 Seized us, though undismayed.  Long is the way
 And hard, that out of Hell leads up to light.
 Our prison strong, this huge convex of fire,
 Outrageous to devour, immures us round
 Ninefold; and gates of burning adamant,
 Barred over us, prohibit all egress.
 These passed, if any pass, the void profound
 Of unessential Night receives him next,
 Wide-gaping, and with utter loss of being
 Threatens him, plunged in that abortive gulf.
 If thence he scape, into whatever world,
 Or unknown region, what remains him less
 Than unknown dangers, and as hard escape?
 But I should ill become this throne, O Peers,
 And this imperial sovereignty, adorned
 With splendour, armed with power, if aught proposed
 And judged of public moment in the shape
 Of difficulty or danger, could deter
 Me from attempting.  Wherefore do I assume
 These royalties, and not refuse to reign,
 Refusing to accept as great a share
 Of hazard as of honour, due alike
 To him who reigns, and so much to him due
 Of hazard more as he above the rest
 High honoured sits? Go, therefore, mighty Powers,
 Terror of Heaven, though fallen; intend at home,
 While here shall be our home, what best may ease
 The present misery, and render Hell
 More tolerable; if there be cure or charm
 To respite, or deceive, or slack the pain
 Of this ill mansion: intermit no watch
 Against a wakeful foe, while I abroad
 Through all the coasts of dark destruction seek
 Deliverance for us all.  This enterprise
 None shall partake with me." Thus saying, rose
 The Monarch, and prevented all reply;
 Prudent lest, from his resolution raised,
 Others among the chief might offer now,
 Certain to be refused, what erst they feared,
 And, so refused, might in opinion stand
 His rivals, winning cheap the high repute
 Which he through hazard huge must earn.  But they
 Dreaded not more th' adventure than his voice
 Forbidding; and at once with him they rose.
 Their rising all at once was as the sound
 Of thunder heard remote.  Towards him they bend
 With awful reverence prone, and as a God
 Extol him equal to the Highest in Heaven.
 Nor failed they to express how much they praised
 That for the general safety he despised
 His own: for neither do the Spirits damned
 Lose all their virtue; lest bad men should boast
 Their specious deeds on earth, which glory excites,
 Or close ambition varnished o'er with zeal.
   Thus they their doubtful consultations dark
 Ended, rejoicing in their matchless Chief:
 As, when from mountain-tops the dusky clouds
 Ascending, while the north wind sleeps, o'erspread
 Heaven's cheerful face, the louring element
 Scowls o'er the darkened landscape snow or shower,
 If chance the radiant sun, with farewell sweet,
 Extend his evening beam, the fields revive,
 The birds their notes renew, and bleating herds
 Attest their joy, that hill and valley rings.
 O shame to men! Devil with devil damned
 Firm concord holds; men only disagree
 Of creatures rational, though under hope
 Of heavenly grace, and, God proclaiming peace,
 Yet live in hatred, enmity, and strife
 Among themselves, and levy cruel wars
 Wasting the earth, each other to destroy:
 As if (which might induce us to accord)
 Man had not hellish foes enow besides,
 That day and night for his destruction wait!
   The Stygian council thus dissolved; and forth
 In order came the grand infernal Peers:
 Midst came their mighty Paramount, and seemed
 Alone th' antagonist of Heaven, nor less
 Than Hell's dread Emperor, with pomp supreme,
 And god-like imitated state: him round
 A globe of fiery Seraphim enclosed
 With bright emblazonry, and horrent arms.
 Then of their session ended they bid cry
 With trumpet's regal sound the great result:
 Toward the four winds four speedy Cherubim
 Put to their mouths the sounding alchemy,
 By herald's voice explained; the hollow Abyss
 Heard far and wide, and all the host of Hell
 With deafening shout returned them loud acclaim.
 Thence more at ease their minds, and somewhat raised
 By false presumptuous hope, the ranged Powers
 Disband; and, wandering, each his several way
 Pursues, as inclination or sad choice
 Leads him perplexed, where he may likeliest find
 Truce to his restless thoughts, and entertain
 The irksome hours, till his great Chief return.
 Part on the plain, or in the air sublime,
 Upon the wing or in swift race contend,
 As at th' Olympian games or Pythian fields;
 Part curb their fiery steeds, or shun the goal
 With rapid wheels, or fronted brigades form:
 As when, to warn proud cities, war appears
 Waged in the troubled sky, and armies rush
 To battle in the clouds; before each van
 Prick forth the airy knights, and couch their spears,
 Till thickest legions close; with feats of arms
 From either end of heaven the welkin burns.
 Others, with vast Typhoean rage, more fell,
 Rend up both rocks and hills, and ride the air
 In whirlwind; Hell scarce holds the wild uproar:--
 As when Alcides, from Oechalia crowned
 With conquest, felt th' envenomed robe, and tore
 Through pain up by the roots Thessalian pines,
 And Lichas from the top of Oeta threw
 Into th' Euboic sea.  Others, more mild,
 Retreated in a silent valley, sing
 With notes angelical to many a harp
 Their own heroic deeds, and hapless fall
 By doom of battle, and complain that Fate
 Free Virtue should enthrall to Force or Chance.
 Their song was partial; but the harmony
 (What could it less when Spirits immortal sing?)
 Suspended Hell, and took with ravishment
 The thronging audience.  In discourse more sweet
 (For Eloquence the Soul, Song charms the Sense)
 Others apart sat on a hill retired,
 In thoughts more elevate, and reasoned high
 Of Providence, Foreknowledge, Will, and Fate--
 Fixed fate, free will, foreknowledge absolute,
 And found no end, in wandering mazes lost.
 Of good and evil much they argued then,
 Of happiness and final misery,
 Passion and apathy, and glory and shame:
 Vain wisdom all, and false philosophy!--
 Yet, with a pleasing sorcery, could charm
 Pain for a while or anguish, and excite
 Fallacious hope, or arm th' obdured breast
 With stubborn patience as with triple steel.
 Another part, in squadrons and gross bands,
 On bold adventure to discover wide
 That dismal world, if any clime perhaps
 Might yield them easier habitation, bend
 Four ways their flying march, along the banks
 Of four infernal rivers, that disgorge
 Into the burning lake their baleful streams--
 Abhorred Styx, the flood of deadly hate;
 Sad Acheron of sorrow, black and deep;
 Cocytus, named of lamentation loud
 Heard on the rueful stream; fierce Phlegeton,
 Whose waves of torrent fire inflame with rage.
 Far off from these, a slow and silent stream,
 Lethe, the river of oblivion, rolls
 Her watery labyrinth, whereof who drinks
 Forthwith his former state and being forgets--
 Forgets both joy and grief, pleasure and pain.
 Beyond this flood a frozen continent
 Lies dark and wild, beat with perpetual storms
 Of whirlwind and dire hail, which on firm land
 Thaws not, but gathers heap, and ruin seems
 Of ancient pile; all else deep snow and ice,
 A gulf profound as that Serbonian bog
 Betwixt Damiata and Mount Casius old,
 Where armies whole have sunk: the parching air
 Burns frore, and cold performs th' effect of fire.
 Thither, by harpy-footed Furies haled,
 At certain revolutions all the damned
 Are brought; and feel by turns the bitter change
 Of fierce extremes, extremes by change more fierce,
 From beds of raging fire to starve in ice
 Their soft ethereal warmth, and there to pine
 Immovable, infixed, and frozen round
 Periods of time,--thence hurried back to fire.
 They ferry over this Lethean sound
 Both to and fro, their sorrow to augment,
 And wish and struggle, as they pass, to reach
 The tempting stream, with one small drop to lose
 In sweet forgetfulness all pain and woe,
 All in one moment, and so near the brink;
 But Fate withstands, and, to oppose th' attempt,
 Medusa with Gorgonian terror guards
 The ford, and of itself the water flies
 All taste of living wight, as once it fled
 The lip of Tantalus.  Thus roving on
 In confused march forlorn, th' adventurous bands,
 With shuddering horror pale, and eyes aghast,
 Viewed first their lamentable lot, and found
 No rest.  Through many a dark and dreary vale
 They passed, and many a region dolorous,
 O'er many a frozen, many a fiery alp,
 Rocks, caves, lakes, fens, bogs, dens, and shades of death--
 A universe of death, which God by curse
 Created evil, for evil only good;
 Where all life dies, death lives, and Nature breeds,
 Perverse, all monstrous, all prodigious things,
 Obominable, inutterable, and worse
 Than fables yet have feigned or fear conceived,
 Gorgons, and Hydras, and Chimeras dire.
   Meanwhile the Adversary of God and Man,
 Satan, with thoughts inflamed of highest design,
 Puts on swift wings, and toward the gates of Hell
 Explores his solitary flight: sometimes
 He scours the right hand coast, sometimes the left;
 Now shaves with level wing the deep, then soars
 Up to the fiery concave towering high.
 As when far off at sea a fleet descried
 Hangs in the clouds, by equinoctial winds
 Close sailing from Bengala, or the isles
 Of Ternate and Tidore, whence merchants bring
 Their spicy drugs; they on the trading flood,
 Through the wide Ethiopian to the Cape,
 Ply stemming nightly toward the pole: so seemed
 Far off the flying Fiend.  At last appear
 Hell-bounds, high reaching to the horrid roof,
 And thrice threefold the gates; three folds were brass,
 Three iron, three of adamantine rock,
 Impenetrable, impaled with circling fire,
 Yet unconsumed.  Before the gates there sat
 On either side a formidable Shape.
 The one seemed woman to the waist, and fair,
 But ended foul in many a scaly fold,
 Voluminous and vast--a serpent armed
 With mortal sting.  About her middle round
 A cry of Hell-hounds never-ceasing barked
 With wide Cerberean mouths full loud, and rung
 A hideous peal; yet, when they list, would creep,
 If aught disturbed their noise, into her womb,
 And kennel there; yet there still barked and howled
 Within unseen.  Far less abhorred than these
 Vexed Scylla, bathing in the sea that parts
 Calabria from the hoarse Trinacrian shore;
 Nor uglier follow the night-hag, when, called
 In secret, riding through the air she comes,
 Lured with the smell of infant blood, to dance
 With Lapland witches, while the labouring moon
 Eclipses at their charms.  The other Shape--
 If shape it might be called that shape had none
 Distinguishable in member, joint, or limb;
 Or substance might be called that shadow seemed,
 For each seemed either--black it stood as Night,
 Fierce as ten Furies, terrible as Hell,
 And shook a dreadful dart: what seemed his head
 The likeness of a kingly crown had on.
 Satan was now at hand, and from his seat
 The monster moving onward came as fast
 With horrid strides; Hell trembled as he strode.
 Th' undaunted Fiend what this might be admired--
 Admired, not feared (God and his Son except,
 Created thing naught valued he nor shunned),
 And with disdainful look thus first began:--
   "Whence and what art thou, execrable Shape,
 That dar'st, though grim and terrible, advance
 Thy miscreated front athwart my way
 To yonder gates? Through them I mean to pass,
 That be assured, without leave asked of thee.
 Retire; or taste thy folly, and learn by proof,
 Hell-born, not to contend with Spirits of Heaven."
   To whom the Goblin, full of wrath, replied:--
 "Art thou that traitor Angel? art thou he,
 Who first broke peace in Heaven and faith, till then
 Unbroken, and in proud rebellious arms
 Drew after him the third part of Heaven's sons,
 Conjured against the Highest--for which both thou
 And they, outcast from God, are here condemned
 To waste eternal days in woe and pain?
 And reckon'st thou thyself with Spirits of Heaven
 Hell-doomed, and breath'st defiance here and scorn,
 Where I reign king, and, to enrage thee more,
 Thy king and lord? Back to thy punishment,
 False fugitive; and to thy speed add wings,
 Lest with a whip of scorpions I pursue
 Thy lingering, or with one stroke of this dart
 Strange horror seize thee, and pangs unfelt before."
   So spake the grisly Terror, and in shape,
 So speaking and so threatening, grew tenfold,
 More dreadful and deform.  On th' other side,
 Incensed with indignation, Satan stood
 Unterrified, and like a comet burned,
 That fires the length of Ophiuchus huge
 In th' arctic sky, and from his horrid hair
 Shakes pestilence and war.  Each at the head
 Levelled his deadly aim; their fatal hands
 No second stroke intend; and such a frown
 Each cast at th' other as when two black clouds,
 With heaven's artillery fraught, came rattling on
 Over the Caspian,--then stand front to front
 Hovering a space, till winds the signal blow
 To join their dark encounter in mid-air.
 So frowned the mighty combatants that Hell
 Grew darker at their frown; so matched they stood;
 For never but once more was wither like
 To meet so great a foe.  And now great deeds
 Had been achieved, whereof all Hell had rung,
 Had not the snaky Sorceress, that sat
 Fast by Hell-gate and kept the fatal key,
 Risen, and with hideous outcry rushed between.
   "O father, what intends thy hand," she cried,
 "Against thy only son? What fury, O son,
 Possesses thee to bend that mortal dart
 Against thy father's head? And know'st for whom?
 For him who sits above, and laughs the while
 At thee, ordained his drudge to execute
 Whate'er his wrath, which he calls justice, bids--
 His wrath, which one day will destroy ye both!"
   She spake, and at her words the hellish Pest
 Forbore: then these to her Satan returned:--
   "So strange thy outcry, and thy words so strange
 Thou interposest, that my sudden hand,
 Prevented, spares to tell thee yet by deeds
 What it intends, till first I know of thee
 What thing thou art, thus double-formed, and why,
 In this infernal vale first met, thou call'st
 Me father, and that phantasm call'st my son.
 I know thee not, nor ever saw till now
 Sight more detestable than him and thee."
   T' whom thus the Portress of Hell-gate replied:--
 "Hast thou forgot me, then; and do I seem
 Now in thine eye so foul?--once deemed so fair
 In Heaven, when at th' assembly, and in sight
 Of all the Seraphim with thee combined
 In bold conspiracy against Heaven's King,
 All on a sudden miserable pain
 Surprised thee, dim thine eyes and dizzy swum
 In darkness, while thy head flames thick and fast
 Threw forth, till on the left side opening wide,
 Likest to thee in shape and countenance bright,
 Then shining heavenly fair, a goddess armed,
 Out of thy head I sprung.  Amazement seized
 All th' host of Heaven; back they recoiled afraid
 At first, and called me Sin, and for a sign
 Portentous held me; but, familiar grown,
 I pleased, and with attractive graces won
 The most averse--thee chiefly, who, full oft
 Thyself in me thy perfect image viewing,
 Becam'st enamoured; and such joy thou took'st
 With me in secret that my womb conceived
 A growing burden.  Meanwhile war arose,
 And fields were fought in Heaven: wherein remained
 (For what could else?) to our Almighty Foe
 Clear victory; to our part loss and rout
 Through all the Empyrean.  Down they fell,
 Driven headlong from the pitch of Heaven, down
 Into this Deep; and in the general fall
 I also: at which time this powerful key
 Into my hands was given, with charge to keep
 These gates for ever shut, which none can pass
 Without my opening.  Pensive here I sat
 Alone; but long I sat not, till my womb,
 Pregnant by thee, and now excessive grown,
 Prodigious motion felt and rueful throes.
 At last this odious offspring whom thou seest,
 Thine own begotten, breaking violent way,
 Tore through my entrails, that, with fear and pain
 Distorted, all my nether shape thus grew
 Transformed: but he my inbred enemy
 Forth issued, brandishing his fatal dart,
 Made to destroy.  I fled, and cried out Death!
 Hell trembled at the hideous name, and sighed
 From all her caves, and back resounded Death!
 I fled; but he pursued (though more, it seems,
 Inflamed with lust than rage), and, swifter far,
 Me overtook, his mother, all dismayed,
 And, in embraces forcible and foul
 Engendering with me, of that rape begot
 These yelling monsters, that with ceaseless cry
 Surround me, as thou saw'st--hourly conceived
 And hourly born, with sorrow infinite
 To me; for, when they list, into the womb
 That bred them they return, and howl, and gnaw
 My bowels, their repast; then, bursting forth
 Afresh, with conscious terrors vex me round,
 That rest or intermission none I find.
 Before mine eyes in opposition sits
 Grim Death, my son and foe, who set them on,
 And me, his parent, would full soon devour
 For want of other prey, but that he knows
 His end with mine involved, and knows that I
 Should prove a bitter morsel, and his bane,
 Whenever that shall be: so Fate pronounced.
 But thou, O father, I forewarn thee, shun
 His deadly arrow; neither vainly hope
 To be invulnerable in those bright arms,
 Through tempered heavenly; for that mortal dint,
 Save he who reigns above, none can resist."
   She finished; and the subtle Fiend his lore
 Soon learned, now milder, and thus answered smooth:--
   "Dear daughter--since thou claim'st me for thy sire,
 And my fair son here show'st me, the dear pledge
 Of dalliance had with thee in Heaven, and joys
 Then sweet, now sad to mention, through dire change
 Befallen us unforeseen, unthought-of--know,
 I come no enemy, but to set free
 From out this dark and dismal house of pain
 Both him and thee, and all the heavenly host
 Of Spirits that, in our just pretences armed,
 Fell with us from on high.  From them I go
 This uncouth errand sole, and one for all
 Myself expose, with lonely steps to tread
 Th' unfounded Deep, and through the void immense
 To search, with wandering quest, a place foretold
 Should be--and, by concurring signs, ere now
 Created vast and round--a place of bliss
 In the purlieus of Heaven; and therein placed
 A race of upstart creatures, to supply
 Perhaps our vacant room, though more removed,
 Lest Heaven, surcharged with potent multitude,
 Might hap to move new broils.  Be this, or aught
 Than this more secret, now designed, I haste
 To know; and, this once known, shall soon return,
 And bring ye to the place where thou and Death
 Shall dwell at ease, and up and down unseen
 Wing silently the buxom air, embalmed
 With odours.  There ye shall be fed and filled
 Immeasurably; all things shall be your prey."
   He ceased; for both seemed highly pleased, and Death
 Grinned horrible a ghastly smile, to hear
 His famine should be filled, and blessed his maw
 Destined to that good hour.  No less rejoiced
 His mother bad, and thus bespake her sire:--
   "The key of this infernal Pit, by due
 And by command of Heaven's all-powerful King,
 I keep, by him forbidden to unlock
 These adamantine gates; against all force
 Death ready stands to interpose his dart,
 Fearless to be o'ermatched by living might.
 But what owe I to his commands above,
 Who hates me, and hath hither thrust me down
 Into this gloom of Tartarus profound,
 To sit in hateful office here confined,
 Inhabitant of Heaven and heavenly born--
 Here in perpetual agony and pain,
 With terrors and with clamours compassed round
 Of mine own brood, that on my bowels feed?
 Thou art my father, thou my author, thou
 My being gav'st me; whom should I obey
 But thee? whom follow? Thou wilt bring me soon
 To that new world of light and bliss, among
 The gods who live at ease, where I shall reign
 At thy right hand voluptuous, as beseems
 Thy daughter and thy darling, without end."
   Thus saying, from her side the fatal key,
 Sad instrument of all our woe, she took;
 And, towards the gate rolling her bestial train,
 Forthwith the huge portcullis high up-drew,
 Which, but herself, not all the Stygian Powers
 Could once have moved; then in the key-hole turns
 Th' intricate wards, and every bolt and bar
 Of massy iron or solid rock with ease
 Unfastens.  On a sudden open fly,
 With impetuous recoil and jarring sound,
 Th' infernal doors, and on their hinges grate
 Harsh thunder, that the lowest bottom shook
 Of Erebus.  She opened; but to shut
 Excelled her power: the gates wide open stood,
 That with extended wings a bannered host,
 Under spread ensigns marching, might pass through
 With horse and chariots ranked in loose array;
 So wide they stood, and like a furnace-mouth
 Cast forth redounding smoke and ruddy flame.
 Before their eyes in sudden view appear
 The secrets of the hoary Deep--a dark
 Illimitable ocean, without bound,
 Without dimension; where length, breadth, and height,
 And time, and place, are lost; where eldest Night
 And Chaos, ancestors of Nature, hold
 Eternal anarchy, amidst the noise
 Of endless wars, and by confusion stand.
 For Hot, Cold, Moist, and Dry, four champions fierce,
 Strive here for mastery, and to battle bring
 Their embryon atoms: they around the flag
 Of each his faction, in their several clans,
 Light-armed or heavy, sharp, smooth, swift, or slow,
 Swarm populous, unnumbered as the sands
 Of Barca or Cyrene's torrid soil,
 Levied to side with warring winds, and poise
 Their lighter wings.  To whom these most adhere
 He rules a moment: Chaos umpire sits,
 And by decision more embroils the fray
 By which he reigns: next him, high arbiter,
 Chance governs all.  Into this wild Abyss,
 The womb of Nature, and perhaps her grave,
 Of neither sea, nor shore, nor air, nor fire,
 But all these in their pregnant causes mixed
 Confusedly, and which thus must ever fight,
 Unless th' Almighty Maker them ordain
 His dark materials to create more worlds--
 Into this wild Abyss the wary Fiend
 Stood on the brink of Hell and looked a while,
 Pondering his voyage; for no narrow frith
 He had to cross.  Nor was his ear less pealed
 With noises loud and ruinous (to compare
 Great things with small) than when Bellona storms
 With all her battering engines, bent to rase
 Some capital city; or less than if this frame
 Of Heaven were falling, and these elements
 In mutiny had from her axle torn
 The steadfast Earth.  At last his sail-broad vans
 He spread for flight, and, in the surging smoke
 Uplifted, spurns the ground; thence many a league,
 As in a cloudy chair, ascending rides
 Audacious; but, that seat soon failing, meets
 A vast vacuity.  All unawares,
 Fluttering his pennons vain, plumb-down he drops
 Ten thousand fathom deep, and to this hour
 Down had been falling, had not, by ill chance,
 The strong rebuff of some tumultuous cloud,
 Instinct with fire and nitre, hurried him
 As many miles aloft.  That fury stayed--
 Quenched in a boggy Syrtis, neither sea,
 Nor good dry land--nigh foundered, on he fares,
 Treading the crude consistence, half on foot,
 Half flying; behoves him now both oar and sail.
 As when a gryphon through the wilderness
 With winged course, o'er hill or moory dale,
 Pursues the Arimaspian, who by stealth
 Had from his wakeful custody purloined
 The guarded gold; so eagerly the Fiend
 O'er bog or steep, through strait, rough, dense, or rare,
 With head, hands, wings, or feet, pursues his way,
 And swims, or sinks, or wades, or creeps, or flies.
 At length a universal hubbub wild
 Of stunning sounds, and voices all confused,
 Borne through the hollow dark, assaults his ear
 With loudest vehemence.  Thither he plies
 Undaunted, to meet there whatever Power
 Or Spirit of the nethermost Abyss
 Might in that noise reside, of whom to ask
 Which way the nearest coast of darkness lies
 Bordering on light; when straight behold the throne
 Of Chaos, and his dark pavilion spread
 Wide on the wasteful Deep! With him enthroned
 Sat sable-vested Night, eldest of things,
 The consort of his reign; and by them stood
 Orcus and Ades, and the dreaded name
 Of Demogorgon; Rumour next, and Chance,
 And Tumult, and Confusion, all embroiled,
 And Discord with a thousand various mouths.
   T' whom Satan, turning boldly, thus:--"Ye Powers
 And Spirits of this nethermost Abyss,
 Chaos and ancient Night, I come no spy
 With purpose to explore or to disturb
 The secrets of your realm; but, by constraint
 Wandering this darksome desert, as my way
 Lies through your spacious empire up to light,
 Alone and without guide, half lost, I seek,
 What readiest path leads where your gloomy bounds
 Confine with Heaven; or, if some other place,
 From your dominion won, th' Ethereal King
 Possesses lately, thither to arrive
 I travel this profound.  Direct my course:
 Directed, no mean recompense it brings
 To your behoof, if I that region lost,
 All usurpation thence expelled, reduce
 To her original darkness and your sway
 (Which is my present journey), and once more
 Erect the standard there of ancient Night.
 Yours be th' advantage all, mine the revenge!"
   Thus Satan; and him thus the Anarch old,
 With faltering speech and visage incomposed,
 Answered:  "I know thee, stranger, who thou art--
 That mighty leading Angel, who of late
 Made head against Heaven's King, though overthrown.
 I saw and heard; for such a numerous host
 Fled not in silence through the frighted Deep,
 With ruin upon ruin, rout on rout,
 Confusion worse confounded; and Heaven-gates
 Poured out by millions her victorious bands,
 Pursuing.  I upon my frontiers here
 Keep residence; if all I can will serve
 That little which is left so to defend,
 Encroached on still through our intestine broils
 Weakening the sceptre of old Night: first, Hell,
 Your dungeon, stretching far and wide beneath;
 Now lately Heaven and Earth, another world
 Hung o'er my realm, linked in a golden chain
 To that side Heaven from whence your legions fell!
 If that way be your walk, you have not far;
 So much the nearer danger.  Go, and speed;
 Havoc, and spoil, and ruin, are my gain."
   He ceased; and Satan stayed not to reply,
 But, glad that now his sea should find a shore,
 With fresh alacrity and force renewed
 Springs upward, like a pyramid of fire,
 Into the wild expanse, and through the shock
 Of fighting elements, on all sides round
 Environed, wins his way; harder beset
 And more endangered than when Argo passed
 Through Bosporus betwixt the justling rocks,
 Or when Ulysses on the larboard shunned
 Charybdis, and by th' other whirlpool steered.
 So he with difficulty and labour hard
 Moved on, with difficulty and labour he;
 But, he once passed, soon after, when Man fell,
 Strange alteration! Sin and Death amain,
 Following his track (such was the will of Heaven)
 Paved after him a broad and beaten way
 Over the dark Abyss, whose boiling gulf
 Tamely endured a bridge of wondrous length,
 From Hell continued, reaching th' utmost orb
 Of this frail World; by which the Spirits perverse
 With easy intercourse pass to and fro
 To tempt or punish mortals, except whom
 God and good Angels guard by special grace.
   But now at last the sacred influence
 Of light appears, and from the walls of Heaven
 Shoots far into the bosom of dim Night
 A glimmering dawn.  Here Nature first begins
 Her farthest verge, and Chaos to retire,
 As from her outmost works, a broken foe,
 With tumult less and with less hostile din;
 That Satan with less toil, and now with ease,
 Wafts on the calmer wave by dubious light,
 And, like a weather-beaten vessel, holds
 Gladly the port, though shrouds and tackle torn;
 Or in the emptier waste, resembling air,
 Weighs his spread wings, at leisure to behold
 Far off th' empyreal Heaven, extended wide
 In circuit, undetermined square or round,
 With opal towers and battlements adorned
 Of living sapphire, once his native seat;
 And, fast by, hanging in a golden chain,
 This pendent World, in bigness as a star
 Of smallest magnitude close by the moon.
 Thither, full fraught with mischievous revenge,
 Accursed, and in a cursed hour, he hies.
 
 
 
 Book III
 
 
 Hail, holy Light, offspring of Heaven firstborn,
 Or of the Eternal coeternal beam
 May I express thee unblam'd?  since God is light,
 And never but in unapproached light
 Dwelt from eternity, dwelt then in thee
 Bright effluence of bright essence increate.
 Or hear'st thou rather pure ethereal stream,
 Whose fountain who shall tell?  before the sun,
 Before the Heavens thou wert, and at the voice
 Of God, as with a mantle, didst invest
 The rising world of waters dark and deep,
 Won from the void and formless infinite.
 Thee I re-visit now with bolder wing,
 Escap'd the Stygian pool, though long detain'd
 In that obscure sojourn, while in my flight
 Through utter and through middle darkness borne,
 With other notes than to the Orphean lyre
 I sung of Chaos and eternal Night;
 Taught by the heavenly Muse to venture down
 The dark descent, and up to re-ascend,
 Though hard and rare:  Thee I revisit safe,
 And feel thy sovran vital lamp; but thou
 Revisit'st not these eyes, that roll in vain
 To find thy piercing ray, and find no dawn;
 So thick a drop serene hath quench'd their orbs,
 Or dim suffusion veil'd.  Yet not the more
 Cease I to wander, where the Muses haunt,
 Clear spring, or shady grove, or sunny hill,
 Smit with the love of sacred song; but chief
 Thee, Sion, and the flowery brooks beneath,
 That wash thy hallow'd feet, and warbling flow,
 Nightly I visit:  nor sometimes forget
 So were I equall'd with them in renown,
 Thy sovran command, that Man should find grace;
 Blind Thamyris, and blind Maeonides,
 And Tiresias, and Phineus, prophets old:
 Then feed on thoughts, that voluntary move
 Harmonious numbers; as the wakeful bird
 Sings darkling, and in shadiest covert hid
 Tunes her nocturnal note.  Thus with the year
 Seasons return; but not to me returns
 Day, or the sweet approach of even or morn,
 Or sight of vernal bloom, or summer's rose,
 Or flocks, or herds, or human face divine;
 But cloud instead, and ever-during dark
 Surrounds me, from the cheerful ways of men
 Cut off, and for the book of knowledge fair
 Presented with a universal blank
 Of nature's works to me expung'd and ras'd,
 And wisdom at one entrance quite shut out.
 So much the rather thou, celestial Light,
 Shine inward, and the mind through all her powers
 Irradiate; there plant eyes, all mist from thence
 Purge and disperse, that I may see and tell
 Of things invisible to mortal sight.
 Now had the Almighty Father from above,
 From the pure empyrean where he sits
 High thron'd above all highth, bent down his eye
 His own works and their works at once to view:
 About him all the Sanctities of Heaven
 Stood thick as stars, and from his sight receiv'd
 Beatitude past utterance; on his right
 The radiant image of his glory sat,
 His only son; on earth he first beheld
 Our two first parents, yet the only two
 Of mankind in the happy garden plac'd
 Reaping immortal fruits of joy and love,
 Uninterrupted joy, unrivall'd love,
 In blissful solitude; he then survey'd
 Hell and the gulf between, and Satan there
 Coasting the wall of Heaven on this side Night
 In the dun air sublime, and ready now
 To stoop with wearied wings, and willing feet,
 On the bare outside of this world, that seem'd
 Firm land imbosom'd, without firmament,
 Uncertain which, in ocean or in air.
 Him God beholding from his prospect high,
 Wherein past, present, future, he beholds,
 Thus to his only Son foreseeing spake.
 Only begotten Son, seest thou what rage
 Transports our Adversary?  whom no bounds
 Prescrib'd no bars of Hell, nor all the chains
 Heap'd on him there, nor yet the main abyss
 Wide interrupt, can hold; so bent he seems
 On desperate revenge, that shall redound
 Upon his own rebellious head.  And now,
 Through all restraint broke loose, he wings his way
 Not far off Heaven, in the precincts of light,
 Directly towards the new created world,
 And man there plac'd, with purpose to assay
 If him by force he can destroy, or, worse,
 By some false guile pervert; and shall pervert;
 For man will hearken to his glozing lies,
 And easily transgress the sole command,
 Sole pledge of his obedience:  So will fall
 He and his faithless progeny:  Whose fault?
 Whose but his own?  ingrate, he had of me
 All he could have; I made him just and right,
 Sufficient to have stood, though free to fall.
 Such I created all the ethereal Powers
 And Spirits, both them who stood, and them who fail'd;
 Freely they stood who stood, and fell who fell.
 Not free, what proof could they have given sincere
 Of true allegiance, constant faith or love,
 Where only what they needs must do appear'd,
 Not what they would?  what praise could they receive?
 What pleasure I from such obedience paid,
 When will and reason (reason also is choice)
 Useless and vain, of freedom both despoil'd,
 Made passive both, had serv'd necessity,
 Not me.  They therefore, as to right belong'd,
 So were created, nor can justly accuse
 Their Maker, or their making, or their fate,
 As if predestination over-rul'd
 Their will dispos'd by absolute decree
 Or high foreknowledge they themselves decreed
 Their own revolt, not I; if I foreknew,
 Foreknowledge had no influence on their fault,
 Which had no less proved certain unforeknown.
 So without least impulse or shadow of fate,
 Or aught by me immutably foreseen,
 They trespass, authors to themselves in all
 Both what they judge, and what they choose; for so
 I form'd them free: and free they must remain,
 Till they enthrall themselves; I else must change
 Their nature, and revoke the high decree
 Unchangeable, eternal, which ordain'd
 Their freedom: they themselves ordain'd their fall.
 The first sort by their own suggestion fell,
 Self-tempted, self-deprav'd:  Man falls, deceiv'd
 By the other first:  Man therefore shall find grace,
 The other none:  In mercy and justice both,
 Through Heaven and Earth, so shall my glory excel;
 But Mercy, first and last, shall brightest shine.
 Thus while God spake, ambrosial fragrance fill'd
 All Heaven, and in the blessed Spirits elect
 Sense of new joy ineffable diffus'd.
 Beyond compare the Son of God was seen
 Most glorious; in him all his Father shone
 Substantially express'd; and in his face
 Divine compassion visibly appear'd,
 Love without end, and without measure grace,
 Which uttering, thus he to his Father spake.
 O Father, gracious was that word which clos'd
 Thy sovran command, that Man should find grace;
 For which both Heaven and earth shall high extol
 Thy praises, with the innumerable sound
 Of hymns and sacred songs, wherewith thy throne
 Encompass'd shall resound thee ever blest.
 For should Man finally be lost, should Man,
 Thy creature late so lov'd, thy youngest son,
 Fall circumvented thus by fraud, though join'd
 With his own folly?  that be from thee far,
 That far be from thee, Father, who art judge
 Of all things made, and judgest only right.
 Or shall the Adversary thus obtain
 His end, and frustrate thine?  shall he fulfill
 His malice, and thy goodness bring to nought,
 Or proud return, though to his heavier doom,
 Yet with revenge accomplish'd, and to Hell
 Draw after him the whole race of mankind,
 By him corrupted?  or wilt thou thyself
 Abolish thy creation, and unmake
 For him, what for thy glory thou hast made?
 So should thy goodness and thy greatness both
 Be question'd and blasphem'd without defence.
 To whom the great Creator thus replied.
 O son, in whom my soul hath chief delight,
 Son of my bosom, Son who art alone.
 My word, my wisdom, and effectual might,
 All hast thou spoken as my thoughts are, all
 As my eternal purpose hath decreed;
 Man shall not quite be lost, but sav'd who will;
 Yet not of will in him, but grace in me
 Freely vouchsaf'd; once more I will renew
 His lapsed powers, though forfeit; and enthrall'd
 By sin to foul exorbitant desires;
 Upheld by me, yet once more he shall stand
 On even ground against his mortal foe;
 By me upheld, that he may know how frail
 His fallen condition is, and to me owe
 All his deliverance, and to none but me.
 Some I have chosen of peculiar grace,
 Elect above the rest; so is my will:
 The rest shall hear me call, and oft be warn'd
 Their sinful state, and to appease betimes
 The incensed Deity, while offer'd grace
 Invites; for I will clear their senses dark,
 What may suffice, and soften stony hearts
 To pray, repent, and bring obedience due.
 To prayer, repentance, and obedience due,
 Though but endeavour'd with sincere intent,
 Mine ear shall not be slow, mine eye not shut.
 And I will place within them as a guide,
 My umpire Conscience; whom if they will hear,
 Light after light, well us'd, they shall attain,
 And to the end, persisting, safe arrive.
 This my long sufferance, and my day of grace,
 They who neglect and scorn, shall never taste;
 But hard be harden'd, blind be blinded more,
 That they may stumble on, and deeper fall;
 And none but such from mercy I exclude.
 But yet all is not done; Man disobeying,
 Disloyal, breaks his fealty, and sins
 Against the high supremacy of Heaven,
 Affecting God-head, and, so losing all,
 To expiate his treason hath nought left,
 But to destruction sacred and devote,
 He, with his whole posterity, must die,
 Die he or justice must; unless for him
 Some other able, and as willing, pay
 The rigid satisfaction, death for death.
 Say, heavenly Powers, where shall we find such love?
 Which of you will be mortal, to redeem
 Man's mortal crime, and just the unjust to save?
 Dwells in all Heaven charity so dear?
 He ask'd, but all the heavenly quire stood mute,
 And silence was in Heaven: on Man's behalf
 Patron or intercessour none appear'd,
 Much less that durst upon his own head draw
 The deadly forfeiture, and ransom set.
 And now without redemption all mankind
 Must have been lost, adjudg'd to Death and Hell
 By doom severe, had not the Son of God,
 In whom the fulness dwells of love divine,
 His dearest mediation thus renew'd.
 Father, thy word is past, Man shall find grace;
 And shall grace not find means, that finds her way,
 The speediest of thy winged messengers,
 To visit all thy creatures, and to all
 Comes unprevented, unimplor'd, unsought?
 Happy for Man, so coming; he her aid
 Can never seek, once dead in sins, and lost;
 Atonement for himself, or offering meet,
 Indebted and undone, hath none to bring;
 Behold me then:  me for him, life for life
 I offer: on me let thine anger fall;
 Account me Man; I for his sake will leave
 Thy bosom, and this glory next to thee
 Freely put off, and for him lastly die
 Well pleased; on me let Death wreak all his rage.
 Under his gloomy power I shall not long
 Lie vanquished.  Thou hast given me to possess
 Life in myself for ever; by thee I live;
 Though now to Death I yield, and am his due,
 All that of me can die, yet, that debt paid,
 Thou wilt not leave me in the loathsome grave
 His prey, nor suffer my unspotted soul
 For ever with corruption there to dwell;
 But I shall rise victorious, and subdue
 My vanquisher, spoiled of his vaunted spoil.
 Death his death's wound shall then receive, and stoop
 Inglorious, of his mortal sting disarmed;
 I through the ample air in triumph high
 Shall lead Hell captive maugre Hell, and show
 The powers of darkness bound.  Thou, at the sight
 Pleased, out of Heaven shalt look down and smile,
 While, by thee raised, I ruin all my foes;
 Death last, and with his carcase glut the grave;
 Then, with the multitude of my redeemed,
 Shall enter Heaven, long absent, and return,
 Father, to see thy face, wherein no cloud
 Of anger shall remain, but peace assured
 And reconcilement: wrath shall be no more
 Thenceforth, but in thy presence joy entire.
   His words here ended; but his meek aspect
 Silent yet spake, and breathed immortal love
 To mortal men, above which only shone
 Filial obedience: as a sacrifice
 Glad to be offered, he attends the will
 Of his great Father.  Admiration seized
 All Heaven, what this might mean, and whither tend,
 Wondering; but soon th' Almighty thus replied:
   O thou in Heaven and Earth the only peace
 Found out for mankind under wrath, O thou
 My sole complacence! Well thou know'st how dear
 To me are all my works; nor Man the least,
 Though last created, that for him I spare
 Thee from my bosom and right hand, to save,
 By losing thee a while, the whole race lost.
 Thou, therefore, whom thou only canst redeem,
 Their nature also to thy nature join;
 And be thyself Man among men on Earth,
 Made flesh, when time shall be, of virgin seed,
 By wondrous birth; be thou in Adam's room
 The head of all mankind, though Adam's son.
 As in him perish all men, so in thee,
 As from a second root, shall be restored
 As many as are restored, without thee none.
 His crime makes guilty all his sons; thy merit,
 Imputed, shall absolve them who renounce
 Their own both righteous and unrighteous deeds,
 And live in thee transplanted, and from thee
 Receive new life.  So Man, as is most just,
 Shall satisfy for Man, be judged and die,
 And dying rise, and rising with him raise
 His brethren, ransomed with his own dear life.
 So heavenly love shall outdo hellish hate,
 Giving to death, and dying to redeem,
 So dearly to redeem what hellish hate
 So easily destroyed, and still destroys
 In those who, when they may, accept not grace.
 Nor shalt thou, by descending to assume
 Man's nature, lessen or degrade thine own.
 Because thou hast, though throned in highest bliss
 Equal to God, and equally enjoying
 God-like fruition, quitted all, to save
 A world from utter loss, and hast been found
 By merit more than birthright Son of God,
 Found worthiest to be so by being good,
 Far more than great or high; because in thee
 Love hath abounded more than glory abounds;
 Therefore thy humiliation shall exalt
 With thee thy manhood also to this throne:
 Here shalt thou sit incarnate, here shalt reign
 Both God and Man, Son both of God and Man,
 Anointed universal King; all power
 I give thee; reign for ever, and assume
 Thy merits; under thee, as head supreme,
 Thrones, Princedoms, Powers, Dominions, I reduce:
 All knees to thee shall bow, of them that bide
 In Heaven, or Earth, or under Earth in Hell.
 When thou, attended gloriously from Heaven,
 Shalt in the sky appear, and from thee send
 The summoning Arch-Angels to proclaim
 Thy dread tribunal; forthwith from all winds,
 The living, and forthwith the cited dead
 Of all past ages, to the general doom
 Shall hasten; such a peal shall rouse their sleep.
 Then, all thy saints assembled, thou shalt judge
 Bad Men and Angels; they, arraigned, shall sink
 Beneath thy sentence; Hell, her numbers full,
 Thenceforth shall be for ever shut.  Mean while
 The world shall burn, and from her ashes spring
 New Heaven and Earth, wherein the just shall dwell,
 And, after all their tribulations long,
 See golden days, fruitful of golden deeds,
 With joy and peace triumphing, and fair truth.
 Then thou thy regal scepter shalt lay by,
 For regal scepter then no more shall need,
 God shall be all in all.  But, all ye Gods,
 Adore him, who to compass all this dies;
 Adore the Son, and honour him as me.
 No sooner had the Almighty ceased, but all
 The multitude of Angels, with a shout
 Loud as from numbers without number, sweet
 As from blest voices, uttering joy, Heaven rung
 With jubilee, and loud Hosannas filled
 The eternal regions:  Lowly reverent
 Towards either throne they bow, and to the ground
 With solemn adoration down they cast
 Their crowns inwove with amarant and gold;
 Immortal amarant, a flower which once
 In Paradise, fast by the tree of life,
 Began to bloom; but soon for man's offence
 To Heaven removed, where first it grew, there grows,
 And flowers aloft shading the fount of life,
 And where the river of bliss through midst of Heaven
 Rolls o'er Elysian flowers her amber stream;
 With these that never fade the Spirits elect
 Bind their resplendent locks inwreathed with beams;
 Now in loose garlands thick thrown off, the bright
 Pavement, that like a sea of jasper shone,
 Impurpled with celestial roses smiled.
 Then, crowned again, their golden harps they took,
 Harps ever tuned, that glittering by their side
 Like quivers hung, and with preamble sweet
 Of charming symphony they introduce
 Their sacred song, and waken raptures high;
 No voice exempt, no voice but well could join
 Melodious part, such concord is in Heaven.
 Thee, Father, first they sung Omnipotent,
 Immutable, Immortal, Infinite,
 Eternal King; the Author of all being,
 Fountain of light, thyself invisible
 Amidst the glorious brightness where thou sit'st
 Throned inaccessible, but when thou shadest
 The full blaze of thy beams, and, through a cloud
 Drawn round about thee like a radiant shrine,
 Dark with excessive bright thy skirts appear,
 Yet dazzle Heaven, that brightest Seraphim
 Approach not, but with both wings veil their eyes.
 Thee next they sang of all creation first,
 Begotten Son, Divine Similitude,
 In whose conspicuous countenance, without cloud
 Made visible, the Almighty Father shines,
 Whom else no creature can behold; on thee
 Impressed the effulgence of his glory abides,
 Transfused on thee his ample Spirit rests.
 He Heaven of Heavens and all the Powers therein
 By thee created; and by thee threw down
 The aspiring Dominations:  Thou that day
 Thy Father's dreadful thunder didst not spare,
 Nor stop thy flaming chariot-wheels, that shook
 Heaven's everlasting frame, while o'er the necks
 Thou drovest of warring Angels disarrayed.
 Back from pursuit thy Powers with loud acclaim
 Thee only extolled, Son of thy Father's might,
 To execute fierce vengeance on his foes,
 Not so on Man:  Him through their malice fallen,
 Father of mercy and grace, thou didst not doom
 So strictly, but much more to pity incline:
 No sooner did thy dear and only Son
 Perceive thee purposed not to doom frail Man
 So strictly, but much more to pity inclined,
 He to appease thy wrath, and end the strife
 Of mercy and justice in thy face discerned,
 Regardless of the bliss wherein he sat
 Second to thee, offered himself to die
 For Man's offence.  O unexampled love,
 Love no where to be found less than Divine!
 Hail, Son of God, Saviour of Men!  Thy name
 Shall be the copious matter of my song
 Henceforth, and never shall my heart thy praise
 Forget, nor from thy Father's praise disjoin.
 Thus they in Heaven, above the starry sphere,
 Their happy hours in joy and hymning spent.
 Mean while upon the firm opacous globe
 Of this round world, whose first convex divides
 The luminous inferiour orbs, enclosed
 From Chaos, and the inroad of Darkness old,
 Satan alighted walks:  A globe far off
 It seemed, now seems a boundless continent
 Dark, waste, and wild, under the frown of Night
 Starless exposed, and ever-threatening storms
 Of Chaos blustering round, inclement sky;
 Save on that side which from the wall of Heaven,
 Though distant far, some small reflection gains
 Of glimmering air less vexed with tempest loud:
 Here walked the Fiend at large in spacious field.
 As when a vultur on Imaus bred,
 Whose snowy ridge the roving Tartar bounds,
 Dislodging from a region scarce of prey
 To gorge the flesh of lambs or yeanling kids,
 On hills where flocks are fed, flies toward the springs
 Of Ganges or Hydaspes, Indian streams;
 But in his way lights on the barren plains
 Of Sericana, where Chineses drive
 With sails and wind their cany waggons light:
 So, on this windy sea of land, the Fiend
 Walked up and down alone, bent on his prey;
 Alone, for other creature in this place,
 Living or lifeless, to be found was none;
 None yet, but store hereafter from the earth
 Up hither like aereal vapours flew
 Of all things transitory and vain, when sin
 With vanity had filled the works of men:
 Both all things vain, and all who in vain things
 Built their fond hopes of glory or lasting fame,
 Or happiness in this or the other life;
 All who have their reward on earth, the fruits
 Of painful superstition and blind zeal,
 Nought seeking but the praise of men, here find
 Fit retribution, empty as their deeds;
 All the unaccomplished works of Nature's hand,
 Abortive, monstrous, or unkindly mixed,
 Dissolved on earth, fleet hither, and in vain,
 Till final dissolution, wander here;
 Not in the neighbouring moon as some have dreamed;
 Those argent fields more likely habitants,
 Translated Saints, or middle Spirits hold
 Betwixt the angelical and human kind.
 Hither of ill-joined sons and daughters born
 First from the ancient world those giants came
 With many a vain exploit, though then renowned:
 The builders next of Babel on the plain
 Of Sennaar, and still with vain design,
 New Babels, had they wherewithal, would build:
 Others came single; he, who, to be deemed
 A God, leaped fondly into Aetna flames,
 Empedocles; and he, who, to enjoy
 Plato's Elysium, leaped into the sea,
 Cleombrotus; and many more too long,
 Embryos, and idiots, eremites, and friars
 White, black, and gray, with all their trumpery.
 Here pilgrims roam, that strayed so far to seek
 In Golgotha him dead, who lives in Heaven;
 And they, who to be sure of Paradise,
 Dying, put on the weeds of Dominick,
 Or in Franciscan think to pass disguised;
 They pass the planets seven, and pass the fixed,
 And that crystalling sphere whose balance weighs
 The trepidation talked, and that first moved;
 And now Saint Peter at Heaven's wicket seems
 To wait them with his keys, and now at foot
 Of Heaven's ascent they lift their feet, when lo
 A violent cross wind from either coast
 Blows them transverse, ten thousand leagues awry
 Into the devious air:  Then might ye see
 Cowls, hoods, and habits, with their wearers, tost
 And fluttered into rags; then reliques, beads,
 Indulgences, dispenses, pardons, bulls,
 The sport of winds:  All these, upwhirled aloft,
 Fly o'er the backside of the world far off
 Into a Limbo large and broad, since called
 The Paradise of Fools, to few unknown
 Long after; now unpeopled, and untrod.
 All this dark globe the Fiend found as he passed,
 And long he wandered, till at last a gleam
 Of dawning light turned thither-ward in haste
 His travelled steps: far distant he descries
 Ascending by degrees magnificent
 Up to the wall of Heaven a structure high;
 At top whereof, but far more rich, appeared
 The work as of a kingly palace-gate,
 With frontispiece of diamond and gold
 Embellished; thick with sparkling orient gems
 The portal shone, inimitable on earth
 By model, or by shading pencil, drawn.
 These stairs were such as whereon Jacob saw
 Angels ascending and descending, bands
 Of guardians bright, when he from Esau fled
 To Padan-Aram, in the field of Luz
 Dreaming by night under the open sky
 And waking cried,  This is the gate of Heaven.
 Each stair mysteriously was meant, nor stood
 There always, but drawn up to Heaven sometimes
 Viewless; and underneath a bright sea flowed
 Of jasper, or of liquid pearl, whereon
 Who after came from earth, failing arrived
 Wafted by Angels, or flew o'er the lake
 Rapt in a chariot drawn by fiery steeds.
 The stairs were then let down, whether to dare
 The Fiend by easy ascent, or aggravate
 His sad exclusion from the doors of bliss:
 Direct against which opened from beneath,
 Just o'er the blissful seat of Paradise,
 A passage down to the Earth, a passage wide,
 Wider by far than that of after-times
 Over mount Sion, and, though that were large,
 Over the Promised Land to God so dear;
 By which, to visit oft those happy tribes,
 On high behests his angels to and fro
 Passed frequent, and his eye with choice regard
 From Paneas, the fount of Jordan's flood,
 To Beersaba, where the Holy Land
 Borders on Egypt and the Arabian shore;
 So wide the opening seemed, where bounds were set
 To darkness, such as bound the ocean wave.
 Satan from hence, now on the lower stair,
 That scaled by steps of gold to Heaven-gate,
 Looks down with wonder at the sudden view
 Of all this world at once.  As when a scout,
 Through dark and desert ways with peril gone
 All night; at last by break of cheerful dawn
 Obtains the brow of some high-climbing hill,
 Which to his eye discovers unaware
 The goodly prospect of some foreign land
 First seen, or some renowned metropolis
 With glistering spires and pinnacles adorned,
 Which now the rising sun gilds with his beams:
 Such wonder seised, though after Heaven seen,
 The Spirit malign, but much more envy seised,
 At sight of all this world beheld so fair.
 Round he surveys (and well might, where he stood
 So high above the circling canopy
 Of night's extended shade,) from eastern point
 Of Libra to the fleecy star that bears
 Andromeda far off Atlantick seas
 Beyond the horizon; then from pole to pole
 He views in breadth, and without longer pause
 Down right into the world's first region throws
 His flight precipitant, and winds with ease
 Through the pure marble air his oblique way
 Amongst innumerable stars, that shone
 Stars distant, but nigh hand seemed other worlds;
 Or other worlds they seemed, or happy isles,
 Like those Hesperian gardens famed of old,
 Fortunate fields, and groves, and flowery vales,
 Thrice happy isles; but who dwelt happy there
 He staid not to inquire:  Above them all
 The golden sun, in splendour likest Heaven,
 Allured his eye; thither his course he bends
 Through the calm firmament, (but up or down,
 By center, or eccentrick, hard to tell,
 Or longitude,) where the great luminary
 Aloof the vulgar constellations thick,
 That from his lordly eye keep distance due,
 Dispenses light from far; they, as they move
 Their starry dance in numbers that compute
 Days, months, and years, towards his all-cheering lamp
 Turn swift their various motions, or are turned
 By his magnetick beam, that gently warms
 The universe, and to each inward part
 With gentle penetration, though unseen,
 Shoots invisible virtue even to the deep;
 So wonderously was set his station bright.
 There lands the Fiend, a spot like which perhaps
 Astronomer in the sun's lucent orb
 Through his glazed optick tube yet never saw.
 The place he found beyond expression bright,
 Compared with aught on earth, metal or stone;
 Not all parts like, but all alike informed
 With radiant light, as glowing iron with fire;
 If metal, part seemed gold, part silver clear;
 If stone, carbuncle most or chrysolite,
 Ruby or topaz, to the twelve that shone
 In Aaron's breast-plate, and a stone besides
 Imagined rather oft than elsewhere seen,
 That stone, or like to that which here below
 Philosophers in vain so long have sought,
 In vain, though by their powerful art they bind
 Volatile Hermes, and call up unbound
 In various shapes old Proteus from the sea,
 Drained through a limbeck to his native form.
 What wonder then if fields and regions here
 Breathe forth Elixir pure, and rivers run
 Potable gold, when with one virtuous touch
 The arch-chemick sun, so far from us remote,
 Produces, with terrestrial humour mixed,
 Here in the dark so many precious things
 Of colour glorious, and effect so rare?
 Here matter new to gaze the Devil met
 Undazzled; far and wide his eye commands;
 For sight no obstacle found here, nor shade,
 But all sun-shine, as when his beams at noon
 Culminate from the equator, as they now
 Shot upward still direct, whence no way round
 Shadow from body opaque can fall; and the air,
 No where so clear, sharpened his visual ray
 To objects distant far, whereby he soon
 Saw within ken a glorious Angel stand,
 The same whom John saw also in the sun:
 His back was turned, but not his brightness hid;
 Of beaming sunny rays a golden tiar
 Circled his head, nor less his locks behind
 Illustrious on his shoulders fledge with wings
 Lay waving round; on some great charge employed
 He seemed, or fixed in cogitation deep.
 Glad was the Spirit impure, as now in hope
 To find who might direct his wandering flight
 To Paradise, the happy seat of Man,
 His journey's end and our beginning woe.
 But first he casts to change his proper shape,
 Which else might work him danger or delay:
 And now a stripling Cherub he appears,
 Not of the prime, yet such as in his face
 Youth smiled celestial, and to every limb
 Suitable grace diffused, so well he feigned:
 Under a coronet his flowing hair
 In curls on either cheek played; wings he wore
 Of many a coloured plume, sprinkled with gold;
 His habit fit for speed succinct, and held
 Before his decent steps a silver wand.
 He drew not nigh unheard; the Angel bright,
 Ere he drew nigh, his radiant visage turned,
 Admonished by his ear, and straight was known
 The Arch-Angel Uriel, one of the seven
 Who in God's presence, nearest to his throne,
 Stand ready at command, and are his eyes
 That run through all the Heavens, or down to the Earth
 Bear his swift errands over moist and dry,
 O'er sea and land: him Satan thus accosts.
 Uriel, for thou of those seven Spirits that stand
 In sight of God's high throne, gloriously bright,
 The first art wont his great authentick will
 Interpreter through highest Heaven to bring,
 Where all his sons thy embassy attend;
 And here art likeliest by supreme decree
 Like honour to obtain, and as his eye
 To visit oft this new creation round;
 Unspeakable desire to see, and know
 All these his wonderous works, but chiefly Man,
 His chief delight and favour, him for whom
 All these his works so wonderous he ordained,
 Hath brought me from the quires of Cherubim
 Alone thus wandering.  Brightest Seraph, tell
 In which of all these shining orbs hath Man
 His fixed seat, or fixed seat hath none,
 But all these shining orbs his choice to dwell;
 That I may find him, and with secret gaze
 Or open admiration him behold,
 On whom the great Creator hath bestowed
 Worlds, and on whom hath all these graces poured;
 That both in him and all things, as is meet,
 The universal Maker we may praise;
 Who justly hath driven out his rebel foes
 To deepest Hell, and, to repair that loss,
 Created this new happy race of Men
 To serve him better:  Wise are all his ways.
 So spake the false dissembler unperceived;
 For neither Man nor Angel can discern
 Hypocrisy, the only evil that walks
 Invisible, except to God alone,
 By his permissive will, through Heaven and Earth:
 And oft, though wisdom wake, suspicion sleeps
 At wisdom's gate, and to simplicity
 Resigns her charge, while goodness thinks no ill
 Where no ill seems:  Which now for once beguiled
 Uriel, though regent of the sun, and held
 The sharpest-sighted Spirit of all in Heaven;
 Who to the fraudulent impostor foul,
 In his uprightness, answer thus returned.
 Fair Angel, thy desire, which tends to know
 The works of God, thereby to glorify
 The great Work-master, leads to no excess
 That reaches blame, but rather merits praise
 The more it seems excess, that led thee hither
 From thy empyreal mansion thus alone,
 To witness with thine eyes what some perhaps,
 Contented with report, hear only in Heaven:
 For wonderful indeed are all his works,
 Pleasant to know, and worthiest to be all
 Had in remembrance always with delight;
 But what created mind can comprehend
 Their number, or the wisdom infinite
 That brought them forth, but hid their causes deep?
 I saw when at his word the formless mass,
 This world's material mould, came to a heap:
 Confusion heard his voice, and wild uproar
 Stood ruled, stood vast infinitude confined;
 Till at his second bidding Darkness fled,
 Light shone, and order from disorder sprung:
 Swift to their several quarters hasted then
 The cumbrous elements, earth, flood, air, fire;
 And this ethereal quintessence of Heaven
 Flew upward, spirited with various forms,
 That rolled orbicular, and turned to stars
 Numberless, as thou seest, and how they move;
 Each had his place appointed, each his course;
 The rest in circuit walls this universe.
 Look downward on that globe, whose hither side
 With light from hence, though but reflected, shines;
 That place is Earth, the seat of Man; that light
 His day, which else, as the other hemisphere,
 Night would invade; but there the neighbouring moon
 (So call that opposite fair star) her aid
 Timely interposes, and her monthly round
 Still ending, still renewing, through mid Heaven,
 With borrowed light her countenance triform
 Hence fills and empties to enlighten the Earth,
 And in her pale dominion checks the night.
 That spot, to which I point, is Paradise,
 Adam's abode; those lofty shades, his bower.
 Thy way thou canst not miss, me mine requires.
 Thus said, he turned; and Satan, bowing low,
 As to superiour Spirits is wont in Heaven,
 Where honour due and reverence none neglects,
 Took leave, and toward the coast of earth beneath,
 Down from the ecliptick, sped with hoped success,
 Throws his steep flight in many an aery wheel;
 Nor staid, till on Niphates' top he lights.
 
 
 
 Book IV
 
 
 O, for that warning voice, which he, who saw
 The Apocalypse, heard cry in Heaven aloud,
 Then when the Dragon, put to second rout,
 Came furious down to be revenged on men,
 Woe to the inhabitants on earth! that now,
 While time was, our first parents had been warned
 The coming of their secret foe, and 'scaped,
 Haply so 'scaped his mortal snare:  For now
 Satan, now first inflamed with rage, came down,
 The tempter ere the accuser of mankind,
 To wreak on innocent frail Man his loss
 Of that first battle, and his flight to Hell:
 Yet, not rejoicing in his speed, though bold
 Far off and fearless, nor with cause to boast,
 Begins his dire attempt; which nigh the birth
 Now rolling boils in his tumultuous breast,
 And like a devilish engine back recoils
 Upon himself; horrour and doubt distract
 His troubled thoughts, and from the bottom stir
 The Hell within him; for within him Hell
 He brings, and round about him, nor from Hell
 One step, no more than from himself, can fly
 By change of place:  Now conscience wakes despair,
 That slumbered; wakes the bitter memory
 Of what he was, what is, and what must be
 Worse; of worse deeds worse sufferings must ensue.
 Sometimes towards Eden, which now in his view
 Lay pleasant, his grieved look he fixes sad;
 Sometimes towards Heaven, and the full-blazing sun,
 Which now sat high in his meridian tower:
 Then, much revolving, thus in sighs began.
 O thou, that, with surpassing glory crowned,
 Lookest from thy sole dominion like the God
 Of this new world; at whose sight all the stars
 Hide their diminished heads; to thee I call,
 But with no friendly voice, and add thy name,
 Of Sun! to tell thee how I hate thy beams,
 That bring to my remembrance from what state
 I fell, how glorious once above thy sphere;
 Till pride and worse ambition threw me down
 Warring in Heaven against Heaven's matchless King:
 Ah, wherefore! he deserved no such return
 From me, whom he created what I was
 In that bright eminence, and with his good
 Upbraided none; nor was his service hard.
 What could be less than to afford him praise,
 The easiest recompence, and pay him thanks,
 How due! yet all his good proved ill in me,
 And wrought but malice; lifted up so high
 I 'sdeined subjection, and thought one step higher
 Would set me highest, and in a moment quit
 The debt immense of endless gratitude,
 So burdensome still paying, still to owe,
 Forgetful what from him I still received,
 And understood not that a grateful mind
 By owing owes not, but still pays, at once
 Indebted and discharged; what burden then
 O, had his powerful destiny ordained
 Me some inferiour Angel, I had stood
 Then happy; no unbounded hope had raised
 Ambition!  Yet why not some other Power
 As great might have aspired, and me, though mean,
 Drawn to his part; but other Powers as great
 Fell not, but stand unshaken, from within
 Or from without, to all temptations armed.
 Hadst thou the same free will and power to stand?
 Thou hadst: whom hast thou then or what to accuse,
 But Heaven's free love dealt equally to all?
 Be then his love accursed, since love or hate,
 To me alike, it deals eternal woe.
 Nay, cursed be thou; since against his thy will
 Chose freely what it now so justly rues.
 Me miserable! which way shall I fly
 Infinite wrath, and infinite despair?
 Which way I fly is Hell; myself am Hell;
 And, in the lowest deep, a lower deep
 Still threatening to devour me opens wide,
 To which the Hell I suffer seems a Heaven.
 O, then, at last relent:  Is there no place
 Left for repentance, none for pardon left?
 None left but by submission; and that word
 Disdain forbids me, and my dread of shame
 Among the Spirits beneath, whom I seduced
 With other promises and other vaunts
 Than to submit, boasting I could subdue
 The Omnipotent.  Ay me! they little know
 How dearly I abide that boast so vain,
 Under what torments inwardly I groan,
 While they adore me on the throne of Hell.
 With diadem and scepter high advanced,
 The lower still I fall, only supreme
 In misery:  Such joy ambition finds.
 But say I could repent, and could obtain,
 By act of grace, my former state; how soon
 Would highth recall high thoughts, how soon unsay
 What feigned submission swore?  Ease would recant
 Vows made in pain, as violent and void.
 For never can true reconcilement grow,
 Where wounds of deadly hate have pierced so deep:
 Which would but lead me to a worse relapse
 And heavier fall:  so should I purchase dear
 Short intermission bought with double smart.
 This knows my Punisher; therefore as far
 From granting he, as I from begging, peace;
 All hope excluded thus, behold, instead
 Of us out-cast, exil'd, his new delight,
 Mankind created, and for him this world.
 So farewell, hope; and with hope farewell, fear;
 Farewell, remorse! all good to me is lost;
 Evil, be thou my good; by thee at least
 Divided empire with Heaven's King I hold,
 By thee, and more than half perhaps will reign;
 As Man ere long, and this new world, shall know.
 Thus while he spake, each passion dimmed his face
 Thrice changed with pale, ire, envy, and despair;
 Which marred his borrowed visage, and betrayed
 Him counterfeit, if any eye beheld.
 For heavenly minds from such distempers foul
 Are ever clear.  Whereof he soon aware,
 Each perturbation smoothed with outward calm,
 Artificer of fraud; and was the first
 That practised falsehood under saintly show,
 Deep malice to conceal, couched with revenge:
 Yet not enough had practised to deceive
 Uriel once warned; whose eye pursued him down
 The way he went, and on the Assyrian mount
 Saw him disfigured, more than could befall
 Spirit of happy sort; his gestures fierce
 He marked and mad demeanour, then alone,
 As he supposed, all unobserved, unseen.
 So on he fares, and to the border comes
 Of Eden, where delicious Paradise,
 Now nearer, crowns with her enclosure green,
 As with a rural mound, the champaign head
 Of a steep wilderness, whose hairy sides
 With thicket overgrown, grotesque and wild,
 Access denied; and overhead upgrew
 Insuperable height of loftiest shade,
 Cedar, and pine, and fir, and branching palm,
 A sylvan scene, and, as the ranks ascend,
 Shade above shade, a woody theatre
 Of stateliest view.  Yet higher than their tops
 The verdurous wall of Paradise upsprung;
 Which to our general sire gave prospect large
 Into his nether empire neighbouring round.
 And higher than that wall a circling row
 Of goodliest trees, loaden with fairest fruit,
 Blossoms and fruits at once of golden hue,
 Appeared, with gay enamelled colours mixed:
 On which the sun more glad impressed his beams
 Than in fair evening cloud, or humid bow,
 When God hath showered the earth; so lovely seemed
 That landskip:  And of pure now purer air
 Meets his approach, and to the heart inspires
 Vernal delight and joy, able to drive
 All sadness but despair:  Now gentle gales,
 Fanning their odoriferous wings, dispense
 Native perfumes, and whisper whence they stole
 Those balmy spoils.  As when to them who fail
 Beyond the Cape of Hope, and now are past
 Mozambick, off at sea north-east winds blow
 Sabean odours from the spicy shore
 Of Araby the blest; with such delay
 Well pleased they slack their course, and many a league
 Cheered with the grateful smell old Ocean smiles:
 So entertained those odorous sweets the Fiend,
 Who came their bane; though with them better pleased
 Than Asmodeus with the fishy fume
 That drove him, though enamoured, from the spouse
 Of Tobit's son, and with a vengeance sent
 From Media post to Egypt, there fast bound.
 Now to the ascent of that steep savage hill
 Satan had journeyed on, pensive and slow;
 But further way found none, so thick entwined,
 As one continued brake, the undergrowth
 Of shrubs and tangling bushes had perplexed
 All path of man or beast that passed that way.
 One gate there only was, and that looked east
 On the other side: which when the arch-felon saw,
 Due entrance he disdained; and, in contempt,
 At one flight bound high over-leaped all bound
 Of hill or highest wall, and sheer within
 Lights on his feet.  As when a prowling wolf,
 Whom hunger drives to seek new haunt for prey,
 Watching where shepherds pen their flocks at eve
 In hurdled cotes amid the field secure,
 Leaps o'er the fence with ease into the fold:
 Or as a thief, bent to unhoard the cash
 Of some rich burgher, whose substantial doors,
 Cross-barred and bolted fast, fear no assault,
 In at the window climbs, or o'er the tiles:
 So clomb this first grand thief into God's fold;
 So since into his church lewd hirelings climb.
 Thence up he flew, and on the tree of life,
 The middle tree and highest there that grew,
 Sat like a cormorant; yet not true life
 Thereby regained, but sat devising death
 To them who lived; nor on the virtue thought
 Of that life-giving plant, but only used
 For prospect, what well used had been the pledge
 Of immortality.  So little knows
 Any, but God alone, to value right
 The good before him, but perverts best things
 To worst abuse, or to their meanest use.
 Beneath him with new wonder now he views,
 To all delight of human sense exposed,
 In narrow room, Nature's whole wealth, yea more,
 A Heaven on Earth:  For blissful Paradise
 Of God the garden was, by him in the east
 Of Eden planted; Eden stretched her line
 From Auran eastward to the royal towers
 Of great Seleucia, built by Grecian kings,
 Or where the sons of Eden long before
 Dwelt in Telassar:  In this pleasant soil
 His far more pleasant garden God ordained;
 Out of the fertile ground he caused to grow
 All trees of noblest kind for sight, smell, taste;
 And all amid them stood the tree of life,
 High eminent, blooming ambrosial fruit
 Of vegetable gold; and next to life,
 Our death, the tree of knowledge, grew fast by,
 Knowledge of good bought dear by knowing ill.
 Southward through Eden went a river large,
 Nor changed his course, but through the shaggy hill
 Passed underneath ingulfed; for God had thrown
 That mountain as his garden-mould high raised
 Upon the rapid current, which, through veins
 Of porous earth with kindly thirst up-drawn,
 Rose a fresh fountain, and with many a rill
 Watered the garden; thence united fell
 Down the steep glade, and met the nether flood,
 Which from his darksome passage now appears,
 And now, divided into four main streams,
 Runs diverse, wandering many a famous realm
 And country, whereof here needs no account;
 But rather to tell how, if Art could tell,
 How from that sapphire fount the crisped brooks,
 Rolling on orient pearl and sands of gold,
 With mazy errour under pendant shades
 Ran nectar, visiting each plant, and fed
 Flowers worthy of Paradise, which not nice Art
 In beds and curious knots, but Nature boon
 Poured forth profuse on hill, and dale, and plain,
 Both where the morning sun first warmly smote
 The open field, and where the unpierced shade
 Imbrowned the noontide bowers:  Thus was this place
 A happy rural seat of various view;
 Groves whose rich trees wept odorous gums and balm,
 Others whose fruit, burnished with golden rind,
 Hung amiable, Hesperian fables true,
 If true, here only, and of delicious taste:
 Betwixt them lawns, or level downs, and flocks
 Grazing the tender herb, were interposed,
 Or palmy hillock; or the flowery lap
 Of some irriguous valley spread her store,
 Flowers of all hue, and without thorn the rose:
 Another side, umbrageous grots and caves
 Of cool recess, o'er which the mantling vine
 Lays forth her purple grape, and gently creeps
 Luxuriant; mean while murmuring waters fall
 Down the slope hills, dispersed, or in a lake,
 That to the fringed bank with myrtle crowned
 Her crystal mirrour holds, unite their streams.
 The birds their quire apply; airs, vernal airs,
 Breathing the smell of field and grove, attune
 The trembling leaves, while universal Pan,
 Knit with the Graces and the Hours in dance,
 Led on the eternal Spring.  Not that fair field
 Of Enna, where Proserpine gathering flowers,
 Herself a fairer flower by gloomy Dis
 Was gathered, which cost Ceres all that pain
 To seek her through the world; nor that sweet grove
 Of Daphne by Orontes, and the inspired
 Castalian spring, might with this Paradise
 Of Eden strive; nor that Nyseian isle
 Girt with the river Triton, where old Cham,
 Whom Gentiles Ammon call and Libyan Jove,
 Hid Amalthea, and her florid son
 Young Bacchus, from his stepdame Rhea's eye;
 Nor where Abassin kings their issue guard,
 Mount Amara, though this by some supposed
 True Paradise under the Ethiop line
 By Nilus' head, enclosed with shining rock,
 A whole day's journey high, but wide remote
 From this Assyrian garden, where the Fiend
 Saw, undelighted, all delight, all kind
 Of living creatures, new to sight, and strange
 Two of far nobler shape, erect and tall,
 Godlike erect, with native honour clad
 In naked majesty seemed lords of all:
 And worthy seemed; for in their looks divine
 The image of their glorious Maker shone,
 Truth, wisdom, sanctitude severe and pure,
 (Severe, but in true filial freedom placed,)
 Whence true authority in men; though both
 Not equal, as their sex not equal seemed;
 For contemplation he and valour formed;
 For softness she and sweet attractive grace;
 He for God only, she for God in him:
 His fair large front and eye sublime declared
 Absolute rule; and hyacinthine locks
 Round from his parted forelock manly hung
 Clustering, but not beneath his shoulders broad:
 She, as a veil, down to the slender waist
 Her unadorned golden tresses wore
 Dishevelled, but in wanton ringlets waved
 As the vine curls her tendrils, which implied
 Subjection, but required with gentle sway,
 And by her yielded, by him best received,
 Yielded with coy submission, modest pride,
 And sweet, reluctant, amorous delay.
 Nor those mysterious parts were then concealed;
 Then was not guilty shame, dishonest shame
 Of nature's works, honour dishonourable,
 Sin-bred, how have ye troubled all mankind
 With shows instead, mere shows of seeming pure,
 And banished from man's life his happiest life,
 Simplicity and spotless innocence!
 So passed they naked on, nor shunned the sight
 Of God or Angel; for they thought no ill:
 So hand in hand they passed, the loveliest pair,
 That ever since in love's embraces met;
 Adam the goodliest man of men since born
 His sons, the fairest of her daughters Eve.
 Under a tuft of shade that on a green
 Stood whispering soft, by a fresh fountain side
 They sat them down; and, after no more toil
 Of their sweet gardening labour than sufficed
 To recommend cool Zephyr, and made ease
 More easy, wholesome thirst and appetite
 More grateful, to their supper-fruits they fell,
 Nectarine fruits which the compliant boughs
 Yielded them, side-long as they sat recline
 On the soft downy bank damasked with flowers:
 The savoury pulp they chew, and in the rind,
 Still as they thirsted, scoop the brimming stream;
 Nor gentle purpose, nor endearing smiles
 Wanted, nor youthful dalliance, as beseems
 Fair couple, linked in happy nuptial league,
 Alone as they.  About them frisking played
 All beasts of the earth, since wild, and of all chase
 In wood or wilderness, forest or den;
 Sporting the lion ramped, and in his paw
 Dandled the kid; bears, tigers, ounces, pards,
 Gambolled before them; the unwieldy elephant,
 To make them mirth, used all his might, and wreathed
 His lithe proboscis; close the serpent sly,
 Insinuating, wove with Gordian twine
 His braided train, and of his fatal guile
 Gave proof unheeded; others on the grass
 Couched, and now filled with pasture gazing sat,
 Or bedward ruminating; for the sun,
 Declined, was hasting now with prone career
 To the ocean isles, and in the ascending scale
 Of Heaven the stars that usher evening rose:
 When Satan still in gaze, as first he stood,
 Scarce thus at length failed speech recovered sad.
 O Hell! what do mine eyes with grief behold!
 Into our room of bliss thus high advanced
 Creatures of other mould, earth-born perhaps,
 Not Spirits, yet to heavenly Spirits bright
 Little inferiour; whom my thoughts pursue
 With wonder, and could love, so lively shines
 In them divine resemblance, and such grace
 The hand that formed them on their shape hath poured.
 Ah! gentle pair, ye little think how nigh
 Your change approaches, when all these delights
 Will vanish, and deliver ye to woe;
 More woe, the more your taste is now of joy;
 Happy, but for so happy ill secured
 Long to continue, and this high seat your Heaven
 Ill fenced for Heaven to keep out such a foe
 As now is entered; yet no purposed foe
 To you, whom I could pity thus forlorn,
 Though I unpitied:  League with you I seek,
 And mutual amity, so strait, so close,
 That I with you must dwell, or you with me
 Henceforth; my dwelling haply may not please,
 Like this fair Paradise, your sense; yet such
 Accept your Maker's work; he gave it me,
 Which I as freely give:  Hell shall unfold,
 To entertain you two, her widest gates,
 And send forth all her kings; there will be room,
 Not like these narrow limits, to receive
 Your numerous offspring; if no better place,
 Thank him who puts me loth to this revenge
 On you who wrong me not for him who wronged.
 And should I at your harmless innocence
 Melt, as I do, yet publick reason just,
 Honour and empire with revenge enlarged,
 By conquering this new world, compels me now
 To do what else, though damned, I should abhor.
 So spake the Fiend, and with necessity,
 The tyrant's plea, excused his devilish deeds.
 Then from his lofty stand on that high tree
 Down he alights among the sportful herd
 Of those four-footed kinds, himself now one,
 Now other, as their shape served best his end
 Nearer to view his prey, and, unespied,
 To mark what of their state he more might learn,
 By word or action marked.  About them round
 A lion now he stalks with fiery glare;
 Then as a tiger, who by chance hath spied
 In some purlieu two gentle fawns at play,
 Straight couches close, then, rising, changes oft
 His couchant watch, as one who chose his ground,
 Whence rushing, he might surest seize them both,
 Griped in each paw: when, Adam first of men
 To first of women Eve thus moving speech,
 Turned him, all ear to hear new utterance flow.
 Sole partner, and sole part, of all these joys,
 Dearer thyself than all; needs must the Power
 That made us, and for us this ample world,
 Be infinitely good, and of his good
 As liberal and free as infinite;
 That raised us from the dust, and placed us here
 In all this happiness, who at his hand
 Have nothing merited, nor can perform
 Aught whereof he hath need; he who requires
 From us no other service than to keep
 This one, this easy charge, of all the trees
 In Paradise that bear delicious fruit
 So various, not to taste that only tree
 Of knowledge, planted by the tree of life;
 So near grows death to life, whate'er death is,
 Some dreadful thing no doubt; for well thou knowest
 God hath pronounced it death to taste that tree,
 The only sign of our obedience left,
 Among so many signs of power and rule
 Conferred upon us, and dominion given
 Over all other creatures that possess
 Earth, air, and sea.  Then let us not think hard
 One easy prohibition, who enjoy
 Free leave so large to all things else, and choice
 Unlimited of manifold delights:
 But let us ever praise him, and extol
 His bounty, following our delightful task,
 To prune these growing plants, and tend these flowers,
 Which were it toilsome, yet with thee were sweet.
 To whom thus Eve replied.  O thou for whom
 And from whom I was formed, flesh of thy flesh,
 And without whom am to no end, my guide
 And head! what thou hast said is just and right.
 For we to him indeed all praises owe,
 And daily thanks; I chiefly, who enjoy
 So far the happier lot, enjoying thee
 Pre-eminent by so much odds, while thou
 Like consort to thyself canst no where find.
 That day I oft remember, when from sleep
 I first awaked, and found myself reposed
 Under a shade on flowers, much wondering where
 And what I was, whence thither brought, and how.
 Not distant far from thence a murmuring sound
 Of waters issued from a cave, and spread
 Into a liquid plain, then stood unmoved
 Pure as the expanse of Heaven; I thither went
 With unexperienced thought, and laid me down
 On the green bank, to look into the clear
 Smooth lake, that to me seemed another sky.
 As I bent down to look, just opposite
 A shape within the watery gleam appeared,
 Bending to look on me:  I started back,
 It started back; but pleased I soon returned,
 Pleased it returned as soon with answering looks
 Of sympathy and love:  There I had fixed
 Mine eyes till now, and pined with vain desire,
 Had not a voice thus warned me;  "What thou seest,
 What there thou seest, fair Creature, is thyself;
 With thee it came and goes: but follow me,
 And I will bring thee where no shadow stays
 Thy coming, and thy soft embraces, he
 Whose image thou art; him thou shalt enjoy
 Inseparably thine, to him shalt bear
 Multitudes like thyself, and thence be called
 Mother of human race."  What could I do,
 But follow straight, invisibly thus led?
 Till I espied thee, fair indeed and tall,
 Under a platane; yet methought less fair,
 Less winning soft, less amiably mild,
 Than that smooth watery image:  Back I turned;
 Thou following cryedst aloud, "Return, fair Eve;
 Whom flyest thou?  whom thou flyest, of him thou art,
 His flesh, his bone; to give thee being I lent
 Out of my side to thee, nearest my heart,
 Substantial life, to have thee by my side
 Henceforth an individual solace dear;
 Part of my soul I seek thee, and thee claim
 My other half:"  With that thy gentle hand
 Seised mine: I yielded; and from that time see
 How beauty is excelled by manly grace,
 And wisdom, which alone is truly fair.
 So spake our general mother, and with eyes
 Of conjugal attraction unreproved,
 And meek surrender, half-embracing leaned
 On our first father; half her swelling breast
 Naked met his, under the flowing gold
 Of her loose tresses hid: he in delight
 Both of her beauty, and submissive charms,
 Smiled with superiour love, as Jupiter
 On Juno smiles, when he impregns the clouds
 That shed Mayflowers; and pressed her matron lip
 With kisses pure:  Aside the Devil turned
 For envy; yet with jealous leer malign
 Eyed them askance, and to himself thus plained.
 Sight hateful, sight tormenting! thus these two,
 Imparadised in one another's arms,
 The happier Eden, shall enjoy their fill
 Of bliss on bliss; while I to Hell am thrust,
 Where neither joy nor love, but fierce desire,
 Among our other torments not the least,
 Still unfulfilled with pain of longing pines.
 Yet let me not forget what I have gained
 From their own mouths:  All is not theirs, it seems;
 One fatal tree there stands, of knowledge called,
 Forbidden them to taste:  Knowledge forbidden
 Suspicious, reasonless.  Why should their Lord
 Envy them that?  Can it be sin to know?
 Can it be death?  And do they only stand
 By ignorance?  Is that their happy state,
 The proof of their obedience and their faith?
 O fair foundation laid whereon to build
 Their ruin! hence I will excite their minds
 With more desire to know, and to reject
 Envious commands, invented with design
 To keep them low, whom knowledge might exalt
 Equal with Gods: aspiring to be such,
 They taste and die:  What likelier can ensue
 But first with narrow search I must walk round
 This garden, and no corner leave unspied;
 A chance but chance may lead where I may meet
 Some wandering Spirit of Heaven by fountain side,
 Or in thick shade retired, from him to draw
 What further would be learned.  Live while ye may,
 Yet happy pair; enjoy, till I return,
 Short pleasures, for long woes are to succeed!
 So saying, his proud step he scornful turned,
 But with sly circumspection, and began
 Through wood, through waste, o'er hill, o'er dale, his roam
 Mean while in utmost longitude, where Heaven
 With earth and ocean meets, the setting sun
 Slowly descended, and with right aspect
 Against the eastern gate of Paradise
 Levelled his evening rays:  It was a rock
 Of alabaster, piled up to the clouds,
 Conspicuous far, winding with one ascent
 Accessible from earth, one entrance high;
 The rest was craggy cliff, that overhung
 Still as it rose, impossible to climb.
 Betwixt these rocky pillars Gabriel sat,
 Chief of the angelick guards, awaiting night;
 About him exercised heroick games
 The unarmed youth of Heaven, but nigh at hand
 Celestial armoury, shields, helms, and spears,
 Hung high with diamond flaming, and with gold.
 Thither came Uriel, gliding through the even
 On a sun-beam, swift as a shooting star
 In autumn thwarts the night, when vapours fired
 Impress the air, and shows the mariner
 From what point of his compass to beware
 Impetuous winds:  He thus began in haste.
 Gabriel, to thee thy course by lot hath given
 Charge and strict watch, that to this happy place
 No evil thing approach or enter in.
 This day at highth of noon came to my sphere
 A Spirit, zealous, as he seemed, to know
 More of the Almighty's works, and chiefly Man,
 God's latest image:  I described his way
 Bent all on speed, and marked his aery gait;
 But in the mount that lies from Eden north,
 Where he first lighted, soon discerned his looks
 Alien from Heaven, with passions foul obscured:
 Mine eye pursued him still, but under shade
 Lost sight of him:  One of the banished crew,
 I fear, hath ventured from the deep, to raise
 New troubles; him thy care must be to find.
 To whom the winged warriour thus returned.
 Uriel, no wonder if thy perfect sight,
 Amid the sun's bright circle where thou sitst,
 See far and wide:  In at this gate none pass
 The vigilance here placed, but such as come
 Well known from Heaven; and since meridian hour
 No creature thence:  If Spirit of other sort,
 So minded, have o'er-leaped these earthly bounds
 On purpose, hard thou knowest it to exclude
 Spiritual substance with corporeal bar.
 But if within the circuit of these walks,
 In whatsoever shape he lurk, of whom
 Thou tellest, by morrow dawning I shall know.
 So promised he; and Uriel to his charge
 Returned on that bright beam, whose point now raised
 Bore him slope downward to the sun now fallen
 Beneath the Azores; whether the prime orb,
 Incredible how swift, had thither rolled
 Diurnal, or this less volubil earth,
 By shorter flight to the east, had left him there
 Arraying with reflected purple and gold
 The clouds that on his western throne attend.
 Now came still Evening on, and Twilight gray
 Had in her sober livery all things clad;
 Silence accompanied; for beast and bird,
 They to their grassy couch, these to their nests
 Were slunk, all but the wakeful nightingale;
 She all night long her amorous descant sung;
 Silence was pleased:  Now glowed the firmament
 With living sapphires:  Hesperus, that led
 The starry host, rode brightest, till the moon,
 Rising in clouded majesty, at length
 Apparent queen unveiled her peerless light,
 And o'er the dark her silver mantle threw.
 When Adam thus to Eve.  Fair Consort, the hour
 Of night, and all things now retired to rest,
 Mind us of like repose; since God hath set
 Labour and rest, as day and night, to men
 Successive; and the timely dew of sleep,
 Now falling with soft slumbrous weight, inclines
 Our eye-lids:  Other creatures all day long
 Rove idle, unemployed, and less need rest;
 Man hath his daily work of body or mind
 Appointed, which declares his dignity,
 And the regard of Heaven on all his ways;
 While other animals unactive range,
 And of their doings God takes no account.
 To-morrow, ere fresh morning streak the east
 With first approach of light, we must be risen,
 And at our pleasant labour, to reform
 Yon flowery arbours, yonder alleys green,
 Our walk at noon, with branches overgrown,
 That mock our scant manuring, and require
 More hands than ours to lop their wanton growth:
 Those blossoms also, and those dropping gums,
 That lie bestrown, unsightly and unsmooth,
 Ask riddance, if we mean to tread with ease;
 Mean while, as Nature wills, night bids us rest.
 To whom thus Eve, with perfect beauty adorned
 My Author and Disposer, what thou bidst
 Unargued I obey:  So God ordains;
 God is thy law, thou mine:  To know no more
 Is woman's happiest knowledge, and her praise.
 With thee conversing I forget all time;
 All seasons, and their change, all please alike.
 Sweet is the breath of Morn, her rising sweet,
 With charm of earliest birds:  pleasant the sun,
 When first on this delightful land he spreads
 His orient beams, on herb, tree, fruit, and flower,
 Glistering with dew; fragrant the fertile earth
 After soft showers; and sweet the coming on
 Of grateful Evening mild; then silent Night,
 With this her solemn bird, and this fair moon,
 And these the gems of Heaven, her starry train:
 But neither breath of Morn, when she ascends
 With charm of earliest birds; nor rising sun
 On this delightful land; nor herb, fruit, flower,
 Glistering with dew; nor fragrance after showers;
 Nor grateful Evening mild; nor silent Night,
 With this her solemn bird, nor walk by moon,
 Or glittering star-light, without thee is sweet.
 But wherefore all night long shine these? for whom
 This glorious sight, when sleep hath shut all eyes?
 To whom our general ancestor replied.
 Daughter of God and Man, accomplished Eve,
 These have their course to finish round the earth,
 By morrow evening, and from land to land
 In order, though to nations yet unborn,
 Ministring light prepared, they set and rise;
 Lest total Darkness should by night regain
 Her old possession, and extinguish life
 In Nature and all things; which these soft fires
 Not only enlighten, but with kindly heat
 Of various influence foment and warm,
 Temper or nourish, or in part shed down
 Their stellar virtue on all kinds that grow
 On earth, made hereby apter to receive
 Perfection from the sun's more potent ray.
 These then, though unbeheld in deep of night,
 Shine not in vain; nor think, though men were none,
 That Heaven would want spectators, God want praise:
 Millions of spiritual creatures walk the earth
 Unseen, both when we wake, and when we sleep:
 All these with ceaseless praise his works behold
 Both day and night:  How often from the steep
 Of echoing hill or thicket have we heard
 Celestial voices to the midnight air,
 Sole, or responsive each to others note,
 Singing their great Creator? oft in bands
 While they keep watch, or nightly rounding walk,
 With heavenly touch of instrumental sounds
 In full harmonick number joined, their songs
 Divide the night, and lift our thoughts to Heaven.
 Thus talking, hand in hand alone they passed
 On to their blissful bower: it was a place
 Chosen by the sovran Planter, when he framed
 All things to Man's delightful use; the roof
 Of thickest covert was inwoven shade
 Laurel and myrtle, and what higher grew
 Of firm and fragrant leaf; on either side
 Acanthus, and each odorous bushy shrub,
 Fenced up the verdant wall; each beauteous flower,
 Iris all hues, roses, and jessamin,
 Reared high their flourished heads between, and wrought
 Mosaick; underfoot the violet,
 Crocus, and hyacinth, with rich inlay
 Broidered the ground, more coloured than with stone
 Of costliest emblem:  Other creature here,
 Bird, beast, insect, or worm, durst enter none,
 Such was their awe of Man.  In shadier bower
 More sacred and sequestered, though but feigned,
 Pan or Sylvanus never slept, nor Nymph
 Nor Faunus haunted.  Here, in close recess,
 With flowers, garlands, and sweet-smelling herbs,
 Espoused Eve decked first her nuptial bed;
 And heavenly quires the hymenaean sung,
 What day the genial Angel to our sire
 Brought her in naked beauty more adorned,
 More lovely, than Pandora, whom the Gods
 Endowed with all their gifts, and O! too like
 In sad event, when to the unwiser son
 Of Japhet brought by Hermes, she ensnared
 Mankind with her fair looks, to be avenged
 On him who had stole Jove's authentick fire.
 Thus, at their shady lodge arrived, both stood,
 Both turned, and under open sky adored
 The God that made both sky, air, earth, and heaven,
 Which they beheld, the moon's resplendent globe,
 And starry pole:  Thou also madest the night,
 Maker Omnipotent, and thou the day,
 Which we, in our appointed work employed,
 Have finished, happy in our mutual help
 And mutual love, the crown of all our bliss
 Ordained by thee; and this delicious place
 For us too large, where thy abundance wants
 Partakers, and uncropt falls to the ground.
 But thou hast promised from us two a race
 To fill the earth, who shall with us extol
 Thy goodness infinite, both when we wake,
 And when we seek, as now, thy gift of sleep.
 This said unanimous, and other rites
 Observing none, but adoration pure
 Which God likes best, into their inmost bower
 Handed they went; and, eased the putting off
 These troublesome disguises which we wear,
 Straight side by side were laid; nor turned, I ween,
 Adam from his fair spouse, nor Eve the rites
 Mysterious of connubial love refused:
 Whatever hypocrites austerely talk
 Of purity, and place, and innocence,
 Defaming as impure what God declares
 Pure, and commands to some, leaves free to all.
 Our Maker bids encrease; who bids abstain
 But our Destroyer, foe to God and Man?
 Hail, wedded Love, mysterious law, true source
 Of human offspring, sole propriety
 In Paradise of all things common else!
 By thee adulterous Lust was driven from men
 Among the bestial herds to range; by thee
 Founded in reason, loyal, just, and pure,
 Relations dear, and all the charities
 Of father, son, and brother, first were known.
 Far be it, that I should write thee sin or blame,
 Or think thee unbefitting holiest place,
 Perpetual fountain of domestick sweets,
 Whose bed is undefiled and chaste pronounced,
 Present, or past, as saints and patriarchs used.
 Here Love his golden shafts employs, here lights
 His constant lamp, and waves his purple wings,
 Reigns here and revels; not in the bought smile
 Of harlots, loveless, joyless, unendeared,
 Casual fruition; nor in court-amours,
 Mixed dance, or wanton mask, or midnight ball,
 Or serenate, which the starved lover sings
 To his proud fair, best quitted with disdain.
 These, lulled by nightingales, embracing slept,
 And on their naked limbs the flowery roof
 Showered roses, which the morn repaired.  Sleep on,
 Blest pair; and O! yet happiest, if ye seek
 No happier state, and know to know no more.
 Now had night measured with her shadowy cone
 Half way up hill this vast sublunar vault,
 And from their ivory port the Cherubim,
 Forth issuing at the accustomed hour, stood armed
 To their night watches in warlike parade;
 When Gabriel to his next in power thus spake.
 Uzziel, half these draw off, and coast the south
 With strictest watch; these other wheel the north;
 Our circuit meets full west.  As flame they part,
 Half wheeling to the shield, half to the spear.
 From these, two strong and subtle Spirits he called
 That near him stood, and gave them thus in charge.
 Ithuriel and Zephon, with winged speed
 Search through this garden, leave unsearched no nook;
 But chiefly where those two fair creatures lodge,
 Now laid perhaps asleep, secure of harm.
 This evening from the sun's decline arrived,
 Who tells of some infernal Spirit seen
 Hitherward bent (who could have thought?) escaped
 The bars of Hell, on errand bad no doubt:
 Such, where ye find, seise fast, and hither bring.
 So saying, on he led his radiant files,
 Dazzling the moon; these to the bower direct
 In search of whom they sought:  Him there they found
 Squat like a toad, close at the ear of Eve,
 Assaying by his devilish art to reach
 The organs of her fancy, and with them forge
 Illusions, as he list, phantasms and dreams;
 Or if, inspiring venom, he might taint
 The animal spirits, that from pure blood arise
 Like gentle breaths from rivers pure, thence raise
 At least distempered, discontented thoughts,
 Vain hopes, vain aims, inordinate desires,
 Blown up with high conceits ingendering pride.
 Him thus intent Ithuriel with his spear
 Touched lightly; for no falshood can endure
 Touch of celestial temper, but returns
 Of force to its own likeness:  Up he starts
 Discovered and surprised.  As when a spark
 Lights on a heap of nitrous powder, laid
 Fit for the tun some magazine to store
 Against a rumoured war, the smutty grain,
 With sudden blaze diffused, inflames the air;
 So started up in his own shape the Fiend.
 Back stept those two fair Angels, half amazed
 So sudden to behold the grisly king;
 Yet thus, unmoved with fear, accost him soon.
 Which of those rebel Spirits adjudged to Hell
 Comest thou, escaped thy prison? and, transformed,
 Why sat'st thou like an enemy in wait,
 Here watching at the head of these that sleep?
 Know ye not then said Satan, filled with scorn,
 Know ye not me? ye knew me once no mate
 For you, there sitting where ye durst not soar:
 Not to know me argues yourselves unknown,
 The lowest of your throng; or, if ye know,
 Why ask ye, and superfluous begin
 Your message, like to end as much in vain?
 To whom thus Zephon, answering scorn with scorn.
 Think not, revolted Spirit, thy shape the same,
 Or undiminished brightness to be known,
 As when thou stoodest in Heaven upright and pure;
 That glory then, when thou no more wast good,
 Departed from thee; and thou resemblest now
 Thy sin and place of doom obscure and foul.
 But come, for thou, be sure, shalt give account
 To him who sent us, whose charge is to keep
 This place inviolable, and these from harm.
 So spake the Cherub; and his grave rebuke,
 Severe in youthful beauty, added grace
 Invincible:  Abashed the Devil stood,
 And felt how awful goodness is, and saw
 Virtue in her shape how lovely; saw, and pined
 His loss; but chiefly to find here observed
 His lustre visibly impaired; yet seemed
 Undaunted.  If I must contend, said he,
 Best with the best, the sender, not the sent,
 Or all at once; more glory will be won,
 Or less be lost.  Thy fear, said Zephon bold,
 Will save us trial what the least can do
 Single against thee wicked, and thence weak.
 The Fiend replied not, overcome with rage;
 But, like a proud steed reined, went haughty on,
 Champing his iron curb:  To strive or fly
 He held it vain; awe from above had quelled
 His heart, not else dismayed.  Now drew they nigh
 The western point, where those half-rounding guards
 Just met, and closing stood in squadron joined,
 A waiting next command.  To whom their Chief,
 Gabriel, from the front thus called aloud.
 O friends!  I hear the tread of nimble feet
 Hasting this way, and now by glimpse discern
 Ithuriel and Zephon through the shade;
 And with them comes a third of regal port,
 But faded splendour wan; who by his gait
 And fierce demeanour seems the Prince of Hell,
 Not likely to part hence without contest;
 Stand firm, for in his look defiance lours.
 He scarce had ended, when those two approached,
 And brief related whom they brought, where found,
 How busied, in what form and posture couched.
 To whom with stern regard thus Gabriel spake.
 Why hast thou, Satan, broke the bounds prescribed
 To thy transgressions, and disturbed the charge
 Of others, who approve not to transgress
 By thy example, but have power and right
 To question thy bold entrance on this place;
 Employed, it seems, to violate sleep, and those
 Whose dwelling God hath planted here in bliss!
 To whom thus Satan with contemptuous brow.
 Gabriel? thou hadst in Heaven the esteem of wise,
 And such I held thee; but this question asked
 Puts me in doubt.  Lives there who loves his pain!
 Who would not, finding way, break loose from Hell,
 Though thither doomed!  Thou wouldst thyself, no doubt
 And boldly venture to whatever place
 Farthest from pain, where thou mightst hope to change
 Torment with ease, and soonest recompense
 Dole with delight, which in this place I sought;
 To thee no reason, who knowest only good,
 But evil hast not tried: and wilt object
 His will who bounds us!  Let him surer bar
 His iron gates, if he intends our stay
 In that dark durance:  Thus much what was asked.
 The rest is true, they found me where they say;
 But that implies not violence or harm.
 Thus he in scorn.  The warlike Angel moved,
 Disdainfully half smiling, thus replied.
 O loss of one in Heaven to judge of wise
 Since Satan fell, whom folly overthrew,
 And now returns him from his prison 'scaped,
 Gravely in doubt whether to hold them wise
 Or not, who ask what boldness brought him hither
 Unlicensed from his bounds in Hell prescribed;
 So wise he judges it to fly from pain
 However, and to 'scape his punishment!
 So judge thou still, presumptuous! till the wrath,
 Which thou incurrest by flying, meet thy flight
 Sevenfold, and scourge that wisdom back to Hell,
 Which taught thee yet no better, that no pain
 Can equal anger infinite provoked.
 But wherefore thou alone? wherefore with thee
 Came not all hell broke loose? or thou than they
 Less hardy to endure?  Courageous Chief!
 The first in flight from pain! hadst thou alleged
 To thy deserted host this cause of flight,
 Thou surely hadst not come sole fugitive.
 To which the Fiend thus answered, frowning stern.
 Not that I less endure, or shrink from pain,
 Insulting Angel! well thou knowest I stood
 Thy fiercest, when in battle to thy aid
 The blasting vollied thunder made all speed,
 And seconded thy else not dreaded spear.
 But still thy words at random, as before,
 Argue thy inexperience what behoves
 From hard assays and ill successes past
 A faithful leader, not to hazard all
 Through ways of danger by himself untried:
 I, therefore, I alone first undertook
 To wing the desolate abyss, and spy
 This new created world, whereof in Hell
 Fame is not silent, here in hope to find
 Better abode, and my afflicted Powers
 To settle here on earth, or in mid air;
 Though for possession put to try once more
 What thou and thy gay legions dare against;
 Whose easier business were to serve their Lord
 High up in Heaven, with songs to hymn his throne,
 And practised distances to cringe, not fight,
 To whom the warriour Angel soon replied.
 To say and straight unsay, pretending first
 Wise to fly pain, professing next the spy,
 Argues no leader but a liar traced,
 Satan, and couldst thou faithful add?  O name,
 O sacred name of faithfulness profaned!
 Faithful to whom? to thy rebellious crew?
 Army of Fiends, fit body to fit head.
 Was this your discipline and faith engaged,
 Your military obedience, to dissolve
 Allegiance to the acknowledged Power supreme?
 And thou, sly hypocrite, who now wouldst seem
 Patron of liberty, who more than thou
 Once fawned, and cringed, and servilely adored
 Heaven's awful Monarch? wherefore, but in hope
 To dispossess him, and thyself to reign?
 But mark what I arreed thee now, Avant;
 Fly neither whence thou fledst!  If from this hour
 Within these hallowed limits thou appear,
 Back to the infernal pit I drag thee chained,
 And seal thee so, as henceforth not to scorn
 The facile gates of Hell too slightly barred.
 So threatened he; but Satan to no threats
 Gave heed, but waxing more in rage replied.
 Then when I am thy captive talk of chains,
 Proud limitary Cherub! but ere then
 Far heavier load thyself expect to feel
 From my prevailing arm, though Heaven's King
 Ride on thy wings, and thou with thy compeers,
 Us'd to the yoke, drawest his triumphant wheels
 In progress through the road of Heaven star-paved.
 While thus he spake, the angelick squadron bright
 Turned fiery red, sharpening in mooned horns
 Their phalanx, and began to hem him round
 With ported spears, as thick as when a field
 Of Ceres ripe for harvest waving bends
 Her bearded grove of ears, which way the wind
 Sways them; the careful plowman doubting stands,
 Left on the threshing floor his hopeless sheaves
 Prove chaff.  On the other side, Satan, alarmed,
 Collecting all his might, dilated stood,
 Like Teneriff or Atlas, unremoved:
 His stature reached the sky, and on his crest
 Sat Horrour plumed; nor wanted in his grasp
 What seemed both spear and shield:  Now dreadful deeds
 Might have ensued, nor only Paradise
 In this commotion, but the starry cope
 Of Heaven perhaps, or all the elements
 At least had gone to wrack, disturbed and torn
 With violence of this conflict, had not soon
 The Eternal, to prevent such horrid fray,
 Hung forth in Heaven his golden scales, yet seen
 Betwixt Astrea and the Scorpion sign,
 Wherein all things created first he weighed,
 The pendulous round earth with balanced air
 In counterpoise, now ponders all events,
 Battles and realms:  In these he put two weights,
 The sequel each of parting and of fight:
 The latter quick up flew, and kicked the beam,
 Which Gabriel spying, thus bespake the Fiend.
 Satan, I know thy strength, and thou knowest mine;
 Neither our own, but given:  What folly then
 To boast what arms can do? since thine no more
 Than Heaven permits, nor mine, though doubled now
 To trample thee as mire:  For proof look up,
 And read thy lot in yon celestial sign;
 Where thou art weighed, and shown how light, how weak,
 If thou resist.  The Fiend looked up, and knew
 His mounted scale aloft:  Nor more; but fled
 Murmuring, and with him fled the shades of night.
 
 
 
 Book V
 
 
 Now Morn, her rosy steps in the eastern clime
 Advancing, sowed the earth with orient pearl,
 When Adam waked, so customed; for his sleep
 Was aery-light, from pure digestion bred,
 And temperate vapours bland, which the only sound
 Of leaves and fuming rills, Aurora's fan,
 Lightly dispersed, and the shrill matin song
 Of birds on every bough; so much the more
 His wonder was to find unwakened Eve
 With tresses discomposed, and glowing cheek,
 As through unquiet rest:  He, on his side
 Leaning half raised, with looks of cordial love
 Hung over her enamoured, and beheld
 Beauty, which, whether waking or asleep,
 Shot forth peculiar graces; then with voice
 Mild, as when Zephyrus on Flora breathes,
 Her hand soft touching, whispered thus.  Awake,
 My fairest, my espoused, my latest found,
 Heaven's last best gift, my ever new delight!
 Awake:  The morning shines, and the fresh field
 Calls us; we lose the prime, to mark how spring
 Our tender plants, how blows the citron grove,
 What drops the myrrh, and what the balmy reed,
 How nature paints her colours, how the bee
 Sits on the bloom extracting liquid sweet.
 Such whispering waked her, but with startled eye
 On Adam, whom embracing, thus she spake.
 O sole in whom my thoughts find all repose,
 My glory, my perfection! glad I see
 Thy face, and morn returned; for I this night
 (Such night till this I never passed) have dreamed,
 If dreamed, not, as I oft am wont, of thee,
 Works of day past, or morrow's next design,
 But of offence and trouble, which my mind
 Knew never till this irksome night:  Methought,
 Close at mine ear one called me forth to walk
 With gentle voice;  I thought it thine: It said,
 "Why sleepest thou, Eve? now is the pleasant time,
 The cool, the silent, save where silence yields
 To the night-warbling bird, that now awake
 Tunes sweetest his love-laboured song; now reigns
 Full-orbed the moon, and with more pleasing light
 Shadowy sets off the face of things; in vain,
 If none regard; Heaven wakes with all his eyes,
 Whom to behold but thee, Nature's desire?
 In whose sight all things joy, with ravishment
 Attracted by thy beauty still to gaze."
 I rose as at thy call, but found thee not;
 To find thee I directed then my walk;
 And on, methought, alone I passed through ways
 That brought me on a sudden to the tree
 Of interdicted knowledge: fair it seemed,
 Much fairer to my fancy than by day:
 And, as I wondering looked, beside it stood
 One shaped and winged like one of those from Heaven
 By us oft seen; his dewy locks distilled
 Ambrosia; on that tree he also gazed;
 And "O fair plant," said he, "with fruit surcharged,
 Deigns none to ease thy load, and taste thy sweet,
 Nor God, nor Man?  Is knowledge so despised?
 Or envy, or what reserve forbids to taste?
 Forbid who will, none shall from me withhold
 Longer thy offered good; why else set here?"
 This said, he paused not, but with venturous arm
 He plucked, he tasted; me damp horrour chilled
 At such bold words vouched with a deed so bold:
 But he thus, overjoyed; "O fruit divine,
 Sweet of thyself, but much more sweet thus cropt,
 Forbidden here, it seems, as only fit
 For Gods, yet able to make Gods of Men:
 And why not Gods of Men; since good, the more
 Communicated, more abundant grows,
 The author not impaired, but honoured more?
 Here, happy creature, fair angelick Eve!
 Partake thou also; happy though thou art,
 Happier thou mayest be, worthier canst not be:
 Taste this, and be henceforth among the Gods
 Thyself a Goddess, not to earth confined,
 But sometimes in the air, as we, sometimes
 Ascend to Heaven, by merit thine, and see
 What life the Gods live there, and such live thou!"
 So saying, he drew nigh, and to me held,
 Even to my mouth of that same fruit held part
 Which he had plucked; the pleasant savoury smell
 So quickened appetite, that I, methought,
 Could not but taste.  Forthwith up to the clouds
 With him I flew, and underneath beheld
 The earth outstretched immense, a prospect wide
 And various:  Wondering at my flight and change
 To this high exaltation; suddenly
 My guide was gone, and I, methought, sunk down,
 And fell asleep; but O, how glad I waked
 To find this but a dream!  Thus Eve her night
 Related, and thus Adam answered sad.
 Best image of myself, and dearer half,
 The trouble of thy thoughts this night in sleep
 Affects me equally; nor can I like
 This uncouth dream, of evil sprung, I fear;
 Yet evil whence? in thee can harbour none,
 Created pure.  But know that in the soul
 Are many lesser faculties, that serve
 Reason as chief; among these Fancy next
 Her office holds; of all external things
 Which the five watchful senses represent,
 She forms imaginations, aery shapes,
 Which Reason, joining or disjoining, frames
 All what we affirm or what deny, and call
 Our knowledge or opinion; then retires
 Into her private cell, when nature rests.
 Oft in her absence mimick Fancy wakes
 To imitate her; but, misjoining shapes,
 Wild work produces oft, and most in dreams;
 Ill matching words and deeds long past or late.
 Some such resemblances, methinks, I find
 Of our last evening's talk, in this thy dream,
 But with addition strange; yet be not sad.
 Evil into the mind of God or Man
 May come and go, so unreproved, and leave
 No spot or blame behind:  Which gives me hope
 That what in sleep thou didst abhor to dream,
 Waking thou never will consent to do.
 Be not disheartened then, nor cloud those looks,
 That wont to be more cheerful and serene,
 Than when fair morning first smiles on the world;
 And let us to our fresh employments rise
 Among the groves, the fountains, and the flowers
 That open now their choisest bosomed smells,
 Reserved from night, and kept for thee in store.
 So cheered he his fair spouse, and she was cheered;
 But silently a gentle tear let fall
 From either eye, and wiped them with her hair;
 Two other precious drops that ready stood,
 Each in their crystal sluice, he ere they fell
 Kissed, as the gracious signs of sweet remorse
 And pious awe, that feared to have offended.
 So all was cleared, and to the field they haste.
 But first, from under shady arborous roof
 Soon as they forth were come to open sight
 Of day-spring, and the sun, who, scarce up-risen,
 With wheels yet hovering o'er the ocean-brim,
 Shot parallel to the earth his dewy ray,
 Discovering in wide landskip all the east
 Of Paradise and Eden's happy plains,
 Lowly they bowed adoring, and began
 Their orisons, each morning duly paid
 In various style; for neither various style
 Nor holy rapture wanted they to praise
 Their Maker, in fit strains pronounced, or sung
 Unmeditated; such prompt eloquence
 Flowed from their lips, in prose or numerous verse,
 More tuneable than needed lute or harp
 To add more sweetness; and they thus began.
 These are thy glorious works, Parent of good,
 Almighty!  Thine this universal frame,
 Thus wonderous fair;  Thyself how wonderous then!
 Unspeakable, who sitst above these heavens
 To us invisible, or dimly seen
 In these thy lowest works; yet these declare
 Thy goodness beyond thought, and power divine.
 Speak, ye who best can tell, ye sons of light,
 Angels; for ye behold him, and with songs
 And choral symphonies, day without night,
 Circle his throne rejoicing; ye in Heaven
 On Earth join all ye Creatures to extol
 Him first, him last, him midst, and without end.
 Fairest of stars, last in the train of night,
 If better thou belong not to the dawn,
 Sure pledge of day, that crownest the smiling morn
 With thy bright circlet, praise him in thy sphere,
 While day arises, that sweet hour of prime.
 Thou Sun, of this great world both eye and soul,
 Acknowledge him thy greater; sound his praise
 In thy eternal course, both when thou climbest,
 And when high noon hast gained, and when thou fallest.
 Moon, that now meetest the orient sun, now flyest,
 With the fixed Stars, fixed in their orb that flies;
 And ye five other wandering Fires, that move
 In mystick dance not without song, resound
 His praise, who out of darkness called up light.
 Air, and ye Elements, the eldest birth
 Of Nature's womb, that in quaternion run
 Perpetual circle, multiform; and mix
 And nourish all things; let your ceaseless change
 Vary to our great Maker still new praise.
 Ye Mists and Exhalations, that now rise
 From hill or steaming lake, dusky or gray,
 Till the sun paint your fleecy skirts with gold,
 In honour to the world's great Author rise;
 Whether to deck with clouds the uncoloured sky,
 Or wet the thirsty earth with falling showers,
 Rising or falling still advance his praise.
 His praise, ye Winds, that from four quarters blow,
 Breathe soft or loud; and, wave your tops, ye Pines,
 With every plant, in sign of worship wave.
 Fountains, and ye that warble, as ye flow,
 Melodious murmurs, warbling tune his praise.
 Join voices, all ye living Souls:  Ye Birds,
 That singing up to Heaven-gate ascend,
 Bear on your wings and in your notes his praise.
 Ye that in waters glide, and ye that walk
 The earth, and stately tread, or lowly creep;
 Witness if I be silent, morn or even,
 To hill, or valley, fountain, or fresh shade,
 Made vocal by my song, and taught his praise.
 Hail, universal Lord, be bounteous still
 To give us only good; and if the night
 Have gathered aught of evil, or concealed,
 Disperse it, as now light dispels the dark!
 So prayed they innocent, and to their thoughts
 Firm peace recovered soon, and wonted calm.
 On to their morning's rural work they haste,
 Among sweet dews and flowers; where any row
 Of fruit-trees over-woody reached too far
 Their pampered boughs, and needed hands to check
 Fruitless embraces: or they led the vine
 To wed her elm; she, spoused, about him twines
 Her marriageable arms, and with him brings
 Her dower, the adopted clusters, to adorn
 His barren leaves.  Them thus employed beheld
 With pity Heaven's high King, and to him called
 Raphael, the sociable Spirit, that deigned
 To travel with Tobias, and secured
 His marriage with the seventimes-wedded maid.
 Raphael, said he, thou hearest what stir on Earth
 Satan, from Hell 'scaped through the darksome gulf,
 Hath raised in Paradise; and how disturbed
 This night the human pair; how he designs
 In them at once to ruin all mankind.
 Go therefore, half this day as friend with friend
 Converse with Adam, in what bower or shade
 Thou findest him from the heat of noon retired,
 To respite his day-labour with repast,
 Or with repose; and such discourse bring on,
 As may advise him of his happy state,
 Happiness in his power left free to will,
 Left to his own free will, his will though free,
 Yet mutable; whence warn him to beware
 He swerve not, too secure:  Tell him withal
 His danger, and from whom; what enemy,
 Late fallen himself from Heaven, is plotting now
 The fall of others from like state of bliss;
 By violence? no, for that shall be withstood;
 But by deceit and lies:  This let him know,
 Lest, wilfully transgressing, he pretend
 Surprisal, unadmonished, unforewarned.
 So spake the Eternal Father, and fulfilled
 All justice:  Nor delayed the winged Saint
 After his charge received; but from among
 Thousand celestial Ardours, where he stood
 Veiled with his gorgeous wings, up springing light,
 Flew through the midst of Heaven; the angelick quires,
 On each hand parting, to his speed gave way
 Through all the empyreal road; till, at the gate
 Of Heaven arrived, the gate self-opened wide
 On golden hinges turning, as by work
 Divine the sovran Architect had framed.
 From hence no cloud, or, to obstruct his sight,
 Star interposed, however small he sees,
 Not unconformed to other shining globes,
 Earth, and the garden of God, with cedars crowned
 Above all hills.  As when by night the glass
 Of Galileo, less assured, observes
 Imagined lands and regions in the moon:
 Or pilot, from amidst the Cyclades
 Delos or Samos first appearing, kens
 A cloudy spot.  Down thither prone in flight
 He speeds, and through the vast ethereal sky
 Sails between worlds and worlds, with steady wing
 Now on the polar winds, then with quick fan
 Winnows the buxom air; till, within soar
 Of towering eagles, to all the fowls he seems
 A phoenix, gazed by all as that sole bird,
 When, to enshrine his reliques in the Sun's
 Bright temple, to Egyptian Thebes he flies.
 At once on the eastern cliff of Paradise
 He lights, and to his proper shape returns
 A Seraph winged:  Six wings he wore, to shade
 His lineaments divine; the pair that clad
 Each shoulder broad, came mantling o'er his breast
 With regal ornament; the middle pair
 Girt like a starry zone his waist, and round
 Skirted his loins and thighs with downy gold
 And colours dipt in Heaven; the third his feet
 Shadowed from either heel with feathered mail,
 Sky-tinctured grain.  Like Maia's son he stood,
 And shook his plumes, that heavenly fragrance filled
 The circuit wide.  Straight knew him all the bands
 Of Angels under watch; and to his state,
 And to his message high, in honour rise;
 For on some message high they guessed him bound.
 Their glittering tents he passed, and now is come
 Into the blissful field, through groves of myrrh,
 And flowering odours, cassia, nard, and balm;
 A wilderness of sweets; for Nature here
 Wantoned as in her prime, and played at will
 Her virgin fancies pouring forth more sweet,
 Wild above rule or art, enormous bliss.
 Him through the spicy forest onward come
 Adam discerned, as in the door he sat
 Of his cool bower, while now the mounted sun
 Shot down direct his fervid rays to warm
 Earth's inmost womb, more warmth than Adam needs:
 And Eve within, due at her hour prepared
 For dinner savoury fruits, of taste to please
 True appetite, and not disrelish thirst
 Of nectarous draughts between, from milky stream,
 Berry or grape:  To whom thus Adam called.
 Haste hither, Eve, and worth thy sight behold
 Eastward among those trees, what glorious shape
 Comes this way moving; seems another morn
 Risen on mid-noon; some great behest from Heaven
 To us perhaps he brings, and will vouchsafe
 This day to be our guest.  But go with speed,
 And, what thy stores contain, bring forth, and pour
 Abundance, fit to honour and receive
 Our heavenly stranger:  Well we may afford
 Our givers their own gifts, and large bestow
 From large bestowed, where Nature multiplies
 Her fertile growth, and by disburthening grows
 More fruitful, which instructs us not to spare.
 To whom thus Eve.  Adam, earth's hallowed mould,
 Of God inspired! small store will serve, where store,
 All seasons, ripe for use hangs on the stalk;
 Save what by frugal storing firmness gains
 To nourish, and superfluous moist consumes:
 But I will haste, and from each bough and brake,
 Each plant and juciest gourd, will pluck such choice
 To entertain our Angel-guest, as he
 Beholding shall confess, that here on Earth
 God hath dispensed his bounties as in Heaven.
 So saying, with dispatchful looks in haste
 She turns, on hospitable thoughts intent
 What choice to choose for delicacy best,
 What order, so contrived as not to mix
 Tastes, not well joined, inelegant, but bring
 Taste after taste upheld with kindliest change;
 Bestirs her then, and from each tender stalk
 Whatever Earth, all-bearing mother, yields
 In India East or West, or middle shore
 In Pontus or the Punick coast, or where
 Alcinous reigned, fruit of all kinds, in coat
 Rough, or smooth rind, or bearded husk, or shell,
 She gathers, tribute large, and on the board
 Heaps with unsparing hand; for drink the grape
 She crushes, inoffensive must, and meaths
 From many a berry, and from sweet kernels pressed
 She tempers dulcet creams; nor these to hold
 Wants her fit vessels pure; then strows the ground
 With rose and odours from the shrub unfumed.
 Mean while our primitive great sire, to meet
 His God-like guest, walks forth, without more train
 Accompanied than with his own complete
 Perfections; in himself was all his state,
 More solemn than the tedious pomp that waits
 On princes, when their rich retinue long
 Of horses led, and grooms besmeared with gold,
 Dazzles the croud, and sets them all agape.
 Nearer his presence Adam, though not awed,
 Yet with submiss approach and reverence meek,
 As to a superiour nature bowing low,
 Thus said.  Native of Heaven, for other place
 None can than Heaven such glorious shape contain;
 Since, by descending from the thrones above,
 Those happy places thou hast deigned a while
 To want, and honour these, vouchsafe with us
 Two only, who yet by sovran gift possess
 This spacious ground, in yonder shady bower
 To rest; and what the garden choicest bears
 To sit and taste, till this meridian heat
 Be over, and the sun more cool decline.
 Whom thus the angelick Virtue answered mild.
 Adam, I therefore came; nor art thou such
 Created, or such place hast here to dwell,
 As may not oft invite, though Spirits of Heaven,
 To visit thee; lead on then where thy bower
 O'ershades; for these mid-hours, till evening rise,
 I have at will.  So to the sylvan lodge
 They came, that like Pomona's arbour smiled,
 With flowerets decked, and fragrant smells; but Eve,
 Undecked save with herself, more lovely fair
 Than Wood-Nymph, or the fairest Goddess feigned
 Of three that in mount Ida naked strove,
 Stood to entertain her guest from Heaven; no veil
 She needed, virtue-proof; no thought infirm
 Altered her cheek.  On whom the Angel Hail
 Bestowed, the holy salutation used
 Long after to blest Mary, second Eve.
 Hail, Mother of Mankind, whose fruitful womb
 Shall fill the world more numerous with thy sons,
 Than with these various fruits the trees of God
 Have heaped this table!--Raised of grassy turf
 Their table was, and mossy seats had round,
 And on her ample square from side to side
 All autumn piled, though spring and autumn here
 Danced hand in hand.  A while discourse they hold;
 No fear lest dinner cool; when thus began
 Our author.  Heavenly stranger, please to taste
 These bounties, which our Nourisher, from whom
 All perfect good, unmeasured out, descends,
 To us for food and for delight hath caused
 The earth to yield; unsavoury food perhaps
 To spiritual natures; only this I know,
 That one celestial Father gives to all.
 To whom the Angel.  Therefore what he gives
 (Whose praise be ever sung) to Man in part
 Spiritual, may of purest Spirits be found
 No ingrateful food:  And food alike those pure
 Intelligential substances require,
 As doth your rational; and both contain
 Within them every lower faculty
 Of sense, whereby they hear, see, smell, touch, taste,
 Tasting concoct, digest, assimilate,
 And corporeal to incorporeal turn.
 For know, whatever was created, needs
 To be sustained and fed:  Of elements
 The grosser feeds the purer, earth the sea,
 Earth and the sea feed air, the air those fires
 Ethereal, and as lowest first the moon;
 Whence in her visage round those spots, unpurged
 Vapours not yet into her substance turned.
 Nor doth the moon no nourishment exhale
 From her moist continent to higher orbs.
 The sun that light imparts to all, receives
 From all his alimental recompence
 In humid exhalations, and at even
 Sups with the ocean.  Though in Heaven the trees
 Of life ambrosial fruitage bear, and vines
 Yield nectar; though from off the boughs each morn
 We brush mellifluous dews, and find the ground
 Covered with pearly grain:  Yet God hath here
 Varied his bounty so with new delights,
 As may compare with Heaven; and to taste
 Think not I shall be nice.  So down they sat,
 And to their viands fell; nor seemingly
 The Angel, nor in mist, the common gloss
 Of Theologians; but with keen dispatch
 Of real hunger, and concoctive heat
 To transubstantiate:  What redounds, transpires
 Through Spirits with ease; nor wonder; if by fire
 Of sooty coal the empirick alchemist
 Can turn, or holds it possible to turn,
 Metals of drossiest ore to perfect gold,
 As from the mine.  Mean while at table Eve
 Ministered naked, and their flowing cups
 With pleasant liquours crowned:  O innocence
 Deserving Paradise! if ever, then,
 Then had the sons of God excuse to have been
 Enamoured at that sight; but in those hearts
 Love unlibidinous reigned, nor jealousy
 Was understood, the injured lover's hell.
 Thus when with meats and drinks they had sufficed,
 Not burdened nature, sudden mind arose
 In Adam, not to let the occasion pass
 Given him by this great conference to know
 Of things above his world, and of their being
 Who dwell in Heaven, whose excellence he saw
 Transcend his own so far; whose radiant forms,
 Divine effulgence, whose high power, so far
 Exceeded human; and his wary speech
 Thus to the empyreal minister he framed.
 Inhabitant with God, now know I well
 Thy favour, in this honour done to Man;
 Under whose lowly roof thou hast vouchsafed
 To enter, and these earthly fruits to taste,
 Food not of Angels, yet accepted so,
 As that more willingly thou couldst not seem
 At Heaven's high feasts to have fed: yet what compare
 To whom the winged Hierarch replied.
 O Adam, One Almighty is, from whom
 All things proceed, and up to him return,
 If not depraved from good, created all
 Such to perfection, one first matter all,
 Endued with various forms, various degrees
 Of substance, and, in things that live, of life;
 But more refined, more spiritous, and pure,
 As nearer to him placed, or nearer tending
 Each in their several active spheres assigned,
 Till body up to spirit work, in bounds
 Proportioned to each kind.  So from the root
 Springs lighter the green stalk, from thence the leaves
 More aery, last the bright consummate flower
 Spirits odorous breathes: flowers and their fruit,
 Man's nourishment, by gradual scale sublimed,
 To vital spirits aspire, to animal,
 To intellectual; give both life and sense,
 Fancy and understanding; whence the soul
 Reason receives, and reason is her being,
 Discursive, or intuitive; discourse
 Is oftest yours, the latter most is ours,
 Differing but in degree, of kind the same.
 Wonder not then, what God for you saw good
 If I refuse not, but convert, as you
 To proper substance.  Time may come, when Men
 With Angels may participate, and find
 No inconvenient diet, nor too light fare;
 And from these corporal nutriments perhaps
 Your bodies may at last turn all to spirit,
 Improved by tract of time, and, winged, ascend
 Ethereal, as we; or may, at choice,
 Here or in heavenly Paradises dwell;
 If ye be found obedient, and retain
 Unalterably firm his love entire,
 Whose progeny you are.  Mean while enjoy
 Your fill what happiness this happy state
 Can comprehend, incapable of more.
 To whom the patriarch of mankind replied.
 O favourable Spirit, propitious guest,
 Well hast thou taught the way that might direct
 Our knowledge, and the scale of nature set
 From center to circumference; whereon,
 In contemplation of created things,
 By steps we may ascend to God.  But say,
 What meant that caution joined, If ye be found
 Obedient?  Can we want obedience then
 To him, or possibly his love desert,
 Who formed us from the dust and placed us here
 Full to the utmost measure of what bliss
 Human desires can seek or apprehend?
 To whom the Angel.  Son of Heaven and Earth,
 Attend!  That thou art happy, owe to God;
 That thou continuest such, owe to thyself,
 That is, to thy obedience; therein stand.
 This was that caution given thee; be advised.
 God made thee perfect, not immutable;
 And good he made thee, but to persevere
 He left it in thy power; ordained thy will
 By nature free, not over-ruled by fate
 Inextricable, or strict necessity:
 Our voluntary service he requires,
 Not our necessitated; such with him
 Finds no acceptance, nor can find; for how
 Can hearts, not free, be tried whether they serve
 Willing or no, who will but what they must
 By destiny, and can no other choose?
 Myself, and all the angelick host, that stand
 In sight of God, enthroned, our happy state
 Hold, as you yours, while our obedience holds;
 On other surety none:  Freely we serve,
 Because we freely love, as in our will
 To love or not; in this we stand or fall:
 And some are fallen, to disobedience fallen,
 And so from Heaven to deepest Hell; O fall
 From what high state of bliss, into what woe!
 To whom our great progenitor.  Thy words
 Attentive, and with more delighted ear,
 Divine instructer, I have heard, than when
 Cherubick songs by night from neighbouring hills
 Aereal musick send:  Nor knew I not
 To be both will and deed created free;
 Yet that we never shall forget to love
 Our Maker, and obey him whose command
 Single is yet so just, my constant thoughts
 Assured me, and still assure:  Though what thou tellest
 Hath passed in Heaven, some doubt within me move,
 But more desire to hear, if thou consent,
 The full relation, which must needs be strange,
 Worthy of sacred silence to be heard;
 And we have yet large day, for scarce the sun
 Hath finished half his journey, and scarce begins
 His other half in the great zone of Heaven.
 Thus Adam made request; and Raphael,
 After short pause assenting, thus began.
 High matter thou enjoinest me, O prime of men,
 Sad task and hard:  For how shall I relate
 To human sense the invisible exploits
 Of warring Spirits? how, without remorse,
 The ruin of so many glorious once
 And perfect while they stood? how last unfold
 The secrets of another world, perhaps
 Not lawful to reveal? yet for thy good
 This is dispensed; and what surmounts the reach
 Of human sense, I shall delineate so,
 By likening spiritual to corporal forms,
 As may express them best; though what if Earth
 Be but a shadow of Heaven, and things therein
 Each to other like, more than on earth is thought?
 As yet this world was not, and Chaos wild
 Reigned where these Heavens now roll, where Earth now rests
 Upon her center poised; when on a day
 (For time, though in eternity, applied
 To motion, measures all things durable
 By present, past, and future,) on such day
 As Heaven's great year brings forth, the empyreal host
 Of Angels by imperial summons called,
 Innumerable before the Almighty's throne
 Forthwith, from all the ends of Heaven, appeared
 Under their Hierarchs in orders bright:
 Ten thousand thousand ensigns high advanced,
 Standards and gonfalons 'twixt van and rear
 Stream in the air, and for distinction serve
 Of hierarchies, of orders, and degrees;
 Or in their glittering tissues bear imblazed
 Holy memorials, acts of zeal and love
 Recorded eminent.  Thus when in orbs
 Of circuit inexpressible they stood,
 Orb within orb, the Father Infinite,
 By whom in bliss imbosomed sat the Son,
 Amidst as from a flaming mount, whose top
 Brightness had made invisible, thus spake.
 Hear, all ye Angels, progeny of light,
 Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Virtues, Powers;
 Hear my decree, which unrevoked shall stand.
 This day I have begot whom I declare
 My only Son, and on this holy hill
 Him have anointed, whom ye now behold
 At my right hand; your head I him appoint;
 And by myself have sworn, to him shall bow
 All knees in Heaven, and shall confess him Lord:
 Under his great vice-gerent reign abide
 United, as one individual soul,
 For ever happy:  Him who disobeys,
 Me disobeys, breaks union, and that day,
 Cast out from God and blessed vision, falls
 Into utter darkness, deep ingulfed, his place
 Ordained without redemption, without end.
 So spake the Omnipotent, and with his words
 All seemed well pleased; all seemed, but were not all.
 That day, as other solemn days, they spent
 In song and dance about the sacred hill;
 Mystical dance, which yonder starry sphere
 Of planets, and of fixed, in all her wheels
 Resembles nearest, mazes intricate,
 Eccentrick, intervolved, yet regular
 Then most, when most irregular they seem;
 And in their motions harmony divine
 So smooths her charming tones, that God's own ear
 Listens delighted.  Evening now approached,
 (For we have also our evening and our morn,
 We ours for change delectable, not need;)
 Forthwith from dance to sweet repast they turn
 Desirous; all in circles as they stood,
 Tables are set, and on a sudden piled
 With Angels food, and rubied nectar flows
 In pearl, in diamond, and massy gold,
 Fruit of delicious vines, the growth of Heaven.
 On flowers reposed, and with fresh flowerets crowned,
 They eat, they drink, and in communion sweet
 Quaff immortality and joy, secure
 Of surfeit, where full measure only bounds
 Excess, before the all-bounteous King, who showered
 With copious hand, rejoicing in their joy.
 Now when ambrosial night with clouds exhaled
 From that high mount of God, whence light and shade
 Spring both, the face of brightest Heaven had changed
 To grateful twilight, (for night comes not there
 In darker veil) and roseate dews disposed
 All but the unsleeping eyes of God to rest;
 Wide over all the plain, and wider far
 Than all this globous earth in plain outspread,
 (Such are the courts of God) the angelick throng,
 Dispersed in bands and files, their camp extend
 By living streams among the trees of life,
 Pavilions numberless, and sudden reared,
 Celestial tabernacles, where they slept
 Fanned with cool winds; save those, who, in their course,
 Melodious hymns about the sovran throne
 Alternate all night long: but not so waked
 Satan; so call him now, his former name
 Is heard no more in Heaven; he of the first,
 If not the first Arch-Angel, great in power,
 In favour and pre-eminence, yet fraught
 With envy against the Son of God, that day
 Honoured by his great Father, and proclaimed
 Messiah King anointed, could not bear
 Through pride that sight, and thought himself impaired.
 Deep malice thence conceiving and disdain,
 Soon as midnight brought on the dusky hour
 Friendliest to sleep and silence, he resolved
 With all his legions to dislodge, and leave
 Unworshipt, unobeyed, the throne supreme,
 Contemptuous; and his next subordinate
 Awakening, thus to him in secret spake.
 Sleepest thou, Companion dear?  What sleep can close
 Thy eye-lids? and rememberest what decree
 Of yesterday, so late hath passed the lips
 Of Heaven's Almighty.  Thou to me thy thoughts
 Wast wont, I mine to thee was wont to impart;
 Both waking we were one; how then can now
 Thy sleep dissent?  New laws thou seest imposed;
 New laws from him who reigns, new minds may raise
 In us who serve, new counsels to debate
 What doubtful may ensue:  More in this place
 To utter is not safe.  Assemble thou
 Of all those myriads which we lead the chief;
 Tell them, that by command, ere yet dim night
 Her shadowy cloud withdraws, I am to haste,
 And all who under me their banners wave,
 Homeward, with flying march, where we possess
 The quarters of the north; there to prepare
 Fit entertainment to receive our King,
 The great Messiah, and his new commands,
 Who speedily through all the hierarchies
 Intends to pass triumphant, and give laws.
 So spake the false Arch-Angel, and infused
 Bad influence into the unwary breast
 Of his associate:  He together calls,
 Or several one by one, the regent Powers,
 Under him Regent; tells, as he was taught,
 That the Most High commanding, now ere night,
 Now ere dim night had disincumbered Heaven,
 The great hierarchal standard was to move;
 Tells the suggested cause, and casts between
 Ambiguous words and jealousies, to sound
 Or taint integrity:  But all obeyed
 The wonted signal, and superiour voice
 Of their great Potentate; for great indeed
 His name, and high was his degree in Heaven;
 His countenance, as the morning-star that guides
 The starry flock, allured them, and with lies
 Drew after him the third part of Heaven's host.
 Mean while the Eternal eye, whose sight discerns
 Abstrusest thoughts, from forth his holy mount,
 And from within the golden lamps that burn
 Nightly before him, saw without their light
 Rebellion rising; saw in whom, how spread
 Among the sons of morn, what multitudes
 Were banded to oppose his high decree;
 And, smiling, to his only Son thus said.
 Son, thou in whom my glory I behold
 In full resplendence, Heir of all my might,
 Nearly it now concerns us to be sure
 Of our Omnipotence, and with what arms
 We mean to hold what anciently we claim
 Of deity or empire:  Such a foe
 Is rising, who intends to erect his throne
 Equal to ours, throughout the spacious north;
 Nor so content, hath in his thought to try
 In battle, what our power is, or our right.
 Let us advise, and to this hazard draw
 With speed what force is left, and all employ
 In our defence; lest unawares we lose
 This our high place, our sanctuary, our hill.
 To whom the Son with calm aspect and clear,
 Lightning divine, ineffable, serene,
 Made answer.  Mighty Father, thou thy foes
 Justly hast in derision, and, secure,
 Laughest at their vain designs and tumults vain,
 Matter to me of glory, whom their hate
 Illustrates, when they see all regal power
 Given me to quell their pride, and in event
 Know whether I be dextrous to subdue
 Thy rebels, or be found the worst in Heaven.
 So spake the Son; but Satan, with his Powers,
 Far was advanced on winged speed; an host
 Innumerable as the stars of night,
 Or stars of morning, dew-drops, which the sun
 Impearls on every leaf and every flower.
 Regions they passed, the mighty regencies
 Of Seraphim, and Potentates, and Thrones,
 In their triple degrees; regions to which
 All thy dominion, Adam, is no more
 Than what this garden is to all the earth,
 And all the sea, from one entire globose
 Stretched into longitude; which having passed,
 At length into the limits of the north
 They came; and Satan to his royal seat
 High on a hill, far blazing, as a mount
 Raised on a mount, with pyramids and towers
 From diamond quarries hewn, and rocks of gold;
 The palace of great Lucifer, (so call
 That structure in the dialect of men
 Interpreted,) which not long after, he
 Affecting all equality with God,
 In imitation of that mount whereon
 Messiah was declared in sight of Heaven,
 The Mountain of the Congregation called;
 For thither he assembled all his train,
 Pretending so commanded to consult
 About the great reception of their King,
 Thither to come, and with calumnious art
 Of counterfeited truth thus held their ears.
 Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Virtues, Powers;
 If these magnifick titles yet remain
 Not merely titular, since by decree
 Another now hath to himself engrossed
 All power, and us eclipsed under the name
 Of King anointed, for whom all this haste
 Of midnight-march, and hurried meeting here,
 This only to consult how we may best,
 With what may be devised of honours new,
 Receive him coming to receive from us
 Knee-tribute yet unpaid, prostration vile!
 Too much to one! but double how endured,
 To one, and to his image now proclaimed?
 But what if better counsels might erect
 Our minds, and teach us to cast off this yoke?
 Will ye submit your necks, and choose to bend
 The supple knee?  Ye will not, if I trust
 To know ye right, or if ye know yourselves
 Natives and sons of Heaven possessed before
 By none; and if not equal all, yet free,
 Equally free; for orders and degrees
 Jar not with liberty, but well consist.
 Who can in reason then, or right, assume
 Monarchy over such as live by right
 His equals, if in power and splendour less,
 In freedom equal? or can introduce
 Law and edict on us, who without law
 Err not? much less for this to be our Lord,
 And look for adoration, to the abuse
 Of those imperial titles, which assert
 Our being ordained to govern, not to serve.
 Thus far his bold discourse without controul
 Had audience; when among the Seraphim
 Abdiel, than whom none with more zeal adored
 The Deity, and divine commands obeyed,
 Stood up, and in a flame of zeal severe
 The current of his fury thus opposed.
 O argument blasphemous, false, and proud!
 Words which no ear ever to hear in Heaven
 Expected, least of all from thee,  Ingrate,
 In place thyself so high above thy peers.
 Canst thou with impious obloquy condemn
 The just decree of God, pronounced and sworn,
 That to his only Son, by right endued
 With regal scepter, every soul in Heaven
 Shall bend the knee, and in that honour due
 Confess him rightful King? unjust, thou sayest,
 Flatly unjust, to bind with laws the free,
 And equal over equals to let reign,
 One over all with unsucceeded power.
 Shalt thou give law to God? shalt thou dispute
 With him the points of liberty, who made
 Thee what thou art, and formed the Powers of Heaven
 Such as he pleased, and circumscribed their being?
 Yet, by experience taught, we know how good,
 And of our good and of our dignity
 How provident he is; how far from thought
 To make us less, bent rather to exalt
 Our happy state, under one head more near
 United.  But to grant it thee unjust,
 That equal over equals monarch reign:
 Thyself, though great and glorious, dost thou count,
 Or all angelick nature joined in one,
 Equal to him begotten Son? by whom,
 As by his Word, the Mighty Father made
 All things, even thee; and all the Spirits of Heaven
 By him created in their bright degrees,
 Crowned them with glory, and to their glory named
 Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Virtues, Powers,
 Essential Powers; nor by his reign obscured,
 But more illustrious made; since he the head
 One of our number thus reduced becomes;
 His laws our laws; all honour to him done
 Returns our own.  Cease then this impious rage,
 And tempt not these; but hasten to appease
 The incensed Father, and the incensed Son,
 While pardon may be found in time besought.
 So spake the fervent Angel; but his zeal
 None seconded, as out of season judged,
 Or singular and rash:  Whereat rejoiced
 The Apostate, and, more haughty, thus replied.
 That we were formed then sayest thou? and the work
 Of secondary hands, by task transferred
 From Father to his Son? strange point and new!
 Doctrine which we would know whence learned: who saw
 When this creation was? rememberest thou
 Thy making, while the Maker gave thee being?
 We know no time when we were not as now;
 Know none before us, self-begot, self-raised
 By our own quickening power, when fatal course
 Had circled his full orb, the birth mature
 Of this our native Heaven, ethereal sons.
 Our puissance is our own; our own right hand
 Shall teach us highest deeds, by proof to try
 Who is our equal:  Then thou shalt behold
 Whether by supplication we intend
 Address, and to begirt the almighty throne
 Beseeching or besieging.  This report,
 These tidings carry to the anointed King;
 And fly, ere evil intercept thy flight.
 He said; and, as the sound of waters deep,
 Hoarse murmur echoed to his words applause
 Through the infinite host; nor less for that
 The flaming Seraph fearless, though alone
 Encompassed round with foes, thus answered bold.
 O alienate from God, O Spirit accursed,
 Forsaken of all good!  I see thy fall
 Determined, and thy hapless crew involved
 In this perfidious fraud, contagion spread
 Both of thy crime and punishment:  Henceforth
 No more be troubled how to quit the yoke
 Of God's Messiah; those indulgent laws
 Will not be now vouchsafed; other decrees
 Against thee are gone forth without recall;
 That golden scepter, which thou didst reject,
 Is now an iron rod to bruise and break
 Thy disobedience.  Well thou didst advise;
 Yet not for thy advice or threats I fly
 These wicked tents devoted, lest the wrath
 Impendent, raging into sudden flame,
 Distinguish not:  For soon expect to feel
 His thunder on thy head, devouring fire.
 Then who created thee lamenting learn,
 When who can uncreate thee thou shalt know.
 So spake the Seraph Abdiel, faithful found
 Among the faithless, faithful only he;
 Among innumerable false, unmoved,
 Unshaken, unseduced, unterrified,
 His loyalty he kept, his love, his zeal;
 Nor number, nor example, with him wrought
 To swerve from truth, or change his constant mind,
 Though single.  From amidst them forth he passed,
 Long way through hostile scorn, which he sustained
 Superiour, nor of violence feared aught;
 And, with retorted scorn, his back he turned
 On those proud towers to swift destruction doomed.
 
 
 
 Book VI
 
 
 All night the dreadless Angel, unpursued,
 Through Heaven's wide champain held his way; till Morn,
 Waked by the circling Hours, with rosy hand
 Unbarred the gates of light.  There is a cave
 Within the mount of God, fast by his throne,
 Where light and darkness in perpetual round
 Lodge and dislodge by turns, which makes through Heaven
 Grateful vicissitude, like day and night;
 Light issues forth, and at the other door
 Obsequious darkness enters, till her hour
 To veil the Heaven, though darkness there might well
 Seem twilight here:  And now went forth the Morn
 Such as in highest Heaven arrayed in gold
 Empyreal; from before her vanished Night,
 Shot through with orient beams; when all the plain
 Covered with thick embattled squadrons bright,
 Chariots, and flaming arms, and fiery steeds,
 Reflecting blaze on blaze, first met his view:
 War he perceived, war in procinct; and found
 Already known what he for news had thought
 To have reported:  Gladly then he mixed
 Among those friendly Powers, who him received
 With joy and acclamations loud, that one,
 That of so many myriads fallen, yet one
 Returned not lost.  On to the sacred hill
 They led him high applauded, and present
 Before the seat supreme; from whence a voice,
 From midst a golden cloud, thus mild was heard.
 Servant of God.  Well done; well hast thou fought
 The better fight, who single hast maintained
 Against revolted multitudes the cause
 Of truth, in word mightier than they in arms;
 And for the testimony of truth hast borne
 Universal reproach, far worse to bear
 Than violence; for this was all thy care
 To stand approved in sight of God, though worlds
 Judged thee perverse:  The easier conquest now
 Remains thee, aided by this host of friends,
 Back on thy foes more glorious to return,
 Than scorned thou didst depart; and to subdue
 By force, who reason for their law refuse,
 Right reason for their law, and for their King
 Messiah, who by right of merit reigns.
 Go, Michael, of celestial armies prince,
 And thou, in military prowess next,
 Gabriel, lead forth to battle these my sons
 Invincible; lead forth my armed Saints,
 By thousands and by millions, ranged for fight,
 Equal in number to that Godless crew
 Rebellious:  Them with fire and hostile arms
 Fearless assault; and, to the brow of Heaven
 Pursuing, drive them out from God and bliss,
 Into their place of punishment, the gulf
 Of Tartarus, which ready opens wide
 His fiery Chaos to receive their fall.
 So spake the Sovran Voice, and clouds began
 To darken all the hill, and smoke to roll
 In dusky wreaths, reluctant flames, the sign
 Of wrath awaked; nor with less dread the loud
 Ethereal trumpet from on high 'gan blow:
 At which command the Powers militant,
 That stood for Heaven, in mighty quadrate joined
 Of union irresistible, moved on
 In silence their bright legions, to the sound
 Of instrumental harmony, that breathed
 Heroick ardour to adventurous deeds
 Under their God-like leaders, in the cause
 Of God and his Messiah.  On they move
 Indissolubly firm; nor obvious hill,
 Nor straitening vale, nor wood, nor stream, divides
 Their perfect ranks; for high above the ground
 Their march was, and the passive air upbore
 Their nimble tread; as when the total kind
 Of birds, in orderly array on wing,
 Came summoned over Eden to receive
 Their names of thee; so over many a tract
 Of Heaven they marched, and many a province wide,
 Tenfold the length of this terrene:  At last,
 Far in the horizon to the north appeared
 From skirt to skirt a fiery region, stretched
 In battailous aspect, and nearer view
 Bristled with upright beams innumerable
 Of rigid spears, and helmets thronged, and shields
 Various, with boastful argument portrayed,
 The banded Powers of Satan hasting on
 With furious expedition; for they weened
 That self-same day, by fight or by surprise,
 To win the mount of God, and on his throne
 To set the Envier of his state, the proud
 Aspirer; but their thoughts proved fond and vain
 In the mid way:  Though strange to us it seemed
 At first, that Angel should with Angel war,
 And in fierce hosting meet, who wont to meet
 So oft in festivals of joy and love
 Unanimous, as sons of one great Sire,
 Hymning the Eternal Father:  But the shout
 Of battle now began, and rushing sound
 Of onset ended soon each milder thought.
 High in the midst, exalted as a God,
 The Apostate in his sun-bright chariot sat,
 Idol of majesty divine, enclosed
 With flaming Cherubim, and golden shields;
 Then lighted from his gorgeous throne, for now
 'Twixt host and host but narrow space was left,
 A dreadful interval, and front to front
 Presented stood in terrible array
 Of hideous length:  Before the cloudy van,
 On the rough edge of battle ere it joined,
 Satan, with vast and haughty strides advanced,
 Came towering, armed in adamant and gold;
 Abdiel that sight endured not, where he stood
 Among the mightiest, bent on highest deeds,
 And thus his own undaunted heart explores.
 O Heaven! that such resemblance of the Highest
 Should yet remain, where faith and realty
 Remain not:  Wherefore should not strength and might
 There fail where virtue fails, or weakest prove
 Where boldest, though to fight unconquerable?
 His puissance, trusting in the Almighty's aid,
 I mean to try, whose reason I have tried
 Unsound and false; nor is it aught but just,
 That he, who in debate of truth hath won,
 Should win in arms, in both disputes alike
 Victor; though brutish that contest and foul,
 When reason hath to deal with force, yet so
 Most reason is that reason overcome.
 So pondering, and from his armed peers
 Forth stepping opposite, half-way he met
 His daring foe, at this prevention more
 Incensed, and thus securely him defied.
 Proud, art thou met? thy hope was to have reached
 The highth of thy aspiring unopposed,
 The throne of God unguarded, and his side
 Abandoned, at the terrour of thy power
 Or potent tongue:  Fool! not to think how vain
 Against the Omnipotent to rise in arms;
 Who out of smallest things could, without end,
 Have raised incessant armies to defeat
 Thy folly; or with solitary hand
 Reaching beyond all limit, at one blow,
 Unaided, could have finished thee, and whelmed
 Thy legions under darkness:  But thou seest
 All are not of thy train; there be, who faith
 Prefer, and piety to God, though then
 To thee not visible, when I alone
 Seemed in thy world erroneous to dissent
 From all:  My sect thou seest; now learn too late
 How few sometimes may know, when thousands err.
 Whom the grand foe, with scornful eye askance,
 Thus answered.  Ill for thee, but in wished hour
 Of my revenge, first sought for, thou returnest
 From flight, seditious Angel! to receive
 Thy merited reward, the first assay
 Of this right hand provoked, since first that tongue,
 Inspired with contradiction, durst oppose
 A third part of the Gods, in synod met
 Their deities to assert; who, while they feel
 Vigour divine within them, can allow
 Omnipotence to none.  But well thou comest
 Before thy fellows, ambitious to win
 From me some plume, that thy success may show
 Destruction to the rest:  This pause between,
 (Unanswered lest thou boast) to let thee know,
 At first I thought that Liberty and Heaven
 To heavenly souls had been all one; but now
 I see that most through sloth had rather serve,
 Ministring Spirits, trained up in feast and song!
 Such hast thou armed, the minstrelsy of Heaven,
 Servility with freedom to contend,
 As both their deeds compared this day shall prove.
 To whom in brief thus Abdiel stern replied.
 Apostate! still thou errest, nor end wilt find
 Of erring, from the path of truth remote:
 Unjustly thou depravest it with the name
 Of servitude, to serve whom God ordains,
 Or Nature:  God and Nature bid the same,
 When he who rules is worthiest, and excels
 Them whom he governs.  This is servitude,
 To serve the unwise, or him who hath rebelled
 Against his worthier, as thine now serve thee,
 Thyself not free, but to thyself enthralled;
 Yet lewdly darest our ministring upbraid.
 Reign thou in Hell, thy kingdom; let me serve
 In Heaven God ever blest, and his divine
 Behests obey, worthiest to be obeyed;
 Yet chains in Hell, not realms, expect:  Mean while
 From me returned, as erst thou saidst, from flight,
 This greeting on thy impious crest receive.
 So saying, a noble stroke he lifted high,
 Which hung not, but so swift with tempest fell
 On the proud crest of Satan, that no sight,
 Nor motion of swift thought, less could his shield,
 Such ruin intercept:  Ten paces huge
 He back recoiled; the tenth on bended knee
 His massy spear upstaid; as if on earth
 Winds under ground, or waters forcing way,
 Sidelong had pushed a mountain from his seat,
 Half sunk with all his pines.  Amazement seised
 The rebel Thrones, but greater rage, to see
 Thus foiled their mightiest; ours joy filled, and shout,
 Presage of victory, and fierce desire
 Of battle:  Whereat Michael bid sound
 The Arch-Angel trumpet; through the vast of Heaven
 It sounded, and the faithful armies rung
 Hosanna to the Highest:  Nor stood at gaze
 The adverse legions, nor less hideous joined
 The horrid shock.  Now storming fury rose,
 And clamour such as heard in Heaven till now
 Was never; arms on armour clashing brayed
 Horrible discord, and the madding wheels
 Of brazen chariots raged; dire was the noise
 Of conflict; over head the dismal hiss
 Of fiery darts in flaming vollies flew,
 And flying vaulted either host with fire.
 So under fiery cope together rushed
 Both battles main, with ruinous assault
 And inextinguishable rage.  All Heaven
 Resounded; and had Earth been then, all Earth
 Had to her center shook.  What wonder? when
 Millions of fierce encountering Angels fought
 On either side, the least of whom could wield
 These elements, and arm him with the force
 Of all their regions:  How much more of power
 Army against army numberless to raise
 Dreadful combustion warring, and disturb,
 Though not destroy, their happy native seat;
 Had not the Eternal King Omnipotent,
 From his strong hold of Heaven, high over-ruled
 And limited their might; though numbered such
 As each divided legion might have seemed
 A numerous host; in strength each armed hand
 A legion; led in fight, yet leader seemed
 Each warriour single as in chief, expert
 When to advance, or stand, or turn the sway
 Of battle, open when, and when to close
 The ridges of grim war:  No thought of flight,
 None of retreat, no unbecoming deed
 That argued fear; each on himself relied,
 As only in his arm the moment lay
 Of victory:  Deeds of eternal fame
 Were done, but infinite; for wide was spread
 That war and various; sometimes on firm ground
 A standing fight, then, soaring on main wing,
 Tormented all the air; all air seemed then
 Conflicting fire.  Long time in even scale
 The battle hung; till Satan, who that day
 Prodigious power had shown, and met in arms
 No equal, ranging through the dire attack
 Of fighting Seraphim confused, at length
 Saw where the sword of Michael smote, and felled
 Squadrons at once; with huge two-handed sway
 Brandished aloft, the horrid edge came down
 Wide-wasting; such destruction to withstand
 He hasted, and opposed the rocky orb
 Of tenfold adamant, his ample shield,
 A vast circumference.  At his approach
 The great Arch-Angel from his warlike toil
 Surceased, and glad, as hoping here to end
 Intestine war in Heaven, the arch-foe subdued
 Or captive dragged in chains, with hostile frown
 And visage all inflamed first thus began.
 Author of evil, unknown till thy revolt,
 Unnamed in Heaven, now plenteous as thou seest
 These acts of hateful strife, hateful to all,
 Though heaviest by just measure on thyself,
 And thy adherents:  How hast thou disturbed
 Heaven's blessed peace, and into nature brought
 Misery, uncreated till the crime
 Of thy rebellion! how hast thou instilled
 Thy malice into thousands, once upright
 And faithful, now proved false!  But think not here
 To trouble holy rest; Heaven casts thee out
 From all her confines.  Heaven, the seat of bliss,
 Brooks not the works of violence and war.
 Hence then, and evil go with thee along,
 Thy offspring, to the place of evil, Hell;
 Thou and thy wicked crew! there mingle broils,
 Ere this avenging sword begin thy doom,
 Or some more sudden vengeance, winged from God,
 Precipitate thee with augmented pain.
 So spake the Prince of Angels; to whom thus
 The Adversary.  Nor think thou with wind
 Of aery threats to awe whom yet with deeds
 Thou canst not.  Hast thou turned the least of these
 To flight, or if to fall, but that they rise
 Unvanquished, easier to transact with me
 That thou shouldst hope, imperious, and with threats
 To chase me hence? err not, that so shall end
 The strife which thou callest evil, but we style
 The strife of glory; which we mean to win,
 Or turn this Heaven itself into the Hell
 Thou fablest; here however to dwell free,
 If not to reign:  Mean while thy utmost force,
 And join him named Almighty to thy aid,
 I fly not, but have sought thee far and nigh.
 They ended parle, and both addressed for fight
 Unspeakable; for who, though with the tongue
 Of Angels, can relate, or to what things
 Liken on earth conspicuous, that may lift
 Human imagination to such highth
 Of Godlike power? for likest Gods they seemed,
 Stood they or moved, in stature, motion, arms,
 Fit to decide the empire of great Heaven.
 Now waved their fiery swords, and in the air
 Made horrid circles; two broad suns their shields
 Blazed opposite, while Expectation stood
 In horrour:  From each hand with speed retired,
 Where erst was thickest fight, the angelick throng,
 And left large field, unsafe within the wind
 Of such commotion; such as, to set forth
 Great things by small, if, nature's concord broke,
 Among the constellations war were sprung,
 Two planets, rushing from aspect malign
 Of fiercest opposition, in mid sky
 Should combat, and their jarring spheres confound.
 Together both with next to almighty arm
 Up-lifted imminent, one stroke they aimed
 That might determine, and not need repeat,
 As not of power at once; nor odds appeared
 In might or swift prevention:  But the sword
 Of Michael from the armoury of God
 Was given him tempered so, that neither keen
 Nor solid might resist that edge: it met
 The sword of Satan, with steep force to smite
 Descending, and in half cut sheer; nor staid,
 But with swift wheel reverse, deep entering, shared
 All his right side:  Then Satan first knew pain,
 And writhed him to and fro convolved; so sore
 The griding sword with discontinuous wound
 Passed through him:  But the ethereal substance closed,
 Not long divisible; and from the gash
 A stream of necturous humour issuing flowed
 Sanguine, such as celestial Spirits may bleed,
 And all his armour stained, ere while so bright.
 Forthwith on all sides to his aid was run
 By Angels many and strong, who interposed
 Defence, while others bore him on their shields
 Back to his chariot, where it stood retired
 From off the files of war:  There they him laid
 Gnashing for anguish, and despite, and shame,
 To find himself not matchless, and his pride
 Humbled by such rebuke, so far beneath
 His confidence to equal God in power.
 Yet soon he healed; for Spirits that live throughout
 Vital in every part, not as frail man
 In entrails, heart of head, liver or reins,
 Cannot but by annihilating die;
 Nor in their liquid texture mortal wound
 Receive, no more than can the fluid air:
 All heart they live, all head, all eye, all ear,
 All intellect, all sense; and, as they please,
 They limb themselves, and colour, shape, or size
 Assume, as likes them best, condense or rare.
 Mean while in other parts like deeds deserved
 Memorial, where the might of Gabriel fought,
 And with fierce ensigns pierced the deep array
 Of Moloch, furious king; who him defied,
 And at his chariot-wheels to drag him bound
 Threatened, nor from the Holy One of Heaven
 Refrained his tongue blasphemous; but anon
 Down cloven to the waist, with shattered arms
 And uncouth pain fled bellowing.  On each wing
 Uriel, and Raphael, his vaunting foe,
 Though huge, and in a rock of diamond armed,
 Vanquished Adramelech, and Asmadai,
 Two potent Thrones, that to be less than Gods
 Disdained, but meaner thoughts learned in their flight,
 Mangled with ghastly wounds through plate and mail.
 Nor stood unmindful Abdiel to annoy
 The atheist crew, but with redoubled blow
 Ariel, and Arioch, and the violence
 Of Ramiel scorched and blasted, overthrew.
 I might relate of thousands, and their names
 Eternize here on earth; but those elect
 Angels, contented with their fame in Heaven,
 Seek not the praise of men:  The other sort,
 In might though wonderous and in acts of war,
 Nor of renown less eager, yet by doom
 Cancelled from Heaven and sacred memory,
 Nameless in dark oblivion let them dwell.
 For strength from truth divided, and from just,
 Illaudable, nought merits but dispraise
 And ignominy; yet to glory aspires
 Vain-glorious, and through infamy seeks fame:
 Therefore eternal silence be their doom.
 And now, their mightiest quelled, the battle swerved,
 With many an inroad gored; deformed rout
 Entered, and foul disorder; all the ground
 With shivered armour strown, and on a heap
 Chariot and charioteer lay overturned,
 And fiery-foaming steeds; what stood, recoiled
 O'er-wearied, through the faint Satanick host
 Defensive scarce, or with pale fear surprised,
 Then first with fear surprised, and sense of pain,
 Fled ignominious, to such evil brought
 By sin of disobedience; till that hour
 Not liable to fear, or flight, or pain.
 Far otherwise the inviolable Saints,
 In cubick phalanx firm, advanced entire,
 Invulnerable, impenetrably armed;
 Such high advantages their innocence
 Gave them above their foes; not to have sinned,
 Not to have disobeyed; in fight they stood
 Unwearied, unobnoxious to be pained
 By wound, though from their place by violence moved,
 Now Night her course began, and, over Heaven
 Inducing darkness, grateful truce imposed,
 And silence on the odious din of war:
 Under her cloudy covert both retired,
 Victor and vanquished:  On the foughten field
 Michael and his Angels prevalent
 Encamping, placed in guard their watches round,
 Cherubick waving fires:  On the other part,
 Satan with his rebellious disappeared,
 Far in the dark dislodged; and, void of rest,
 His potentates to council called by night;
 And in the midst thus undismayed began.
 O now in danger tried, now known in arms
 Not to be overpowered, Companions dear,
 Found worthy not of liberty alone,
 Too mean pretence! but what we more affect,
 Honour, dominion, glory, and renown;
 Who have sustained one day in doubtful fight,
 (And if one day, why not eternal days?)
 What Heaven's Lord had powerfullest to send
 Against us from about his throne, and judged
 Sufficient to subdue us to his will,
 But proves not so:  Then fallible, it seems,
 Of future we may deem him, though till now
 Omniscient thought.  True is, less firmly armed,
 Some disadvantage we endured and pain,
 Till now not known, but, known, as soon contemned;
 Since now we find this our empyreal form
 Incapable of mortal injury,
 Imperishable, and, though pierced with wound,
 Soon closing, and by native vigour healed.
 Of evil then so small as easy think
 The remedy; perhaps more valid arms,
 Weapons more violent, when next we meet,
 May serve to better us, and worse our foes,
 Or equal what between us made the odds,
 In nature none:  If other hidden cause
 Left them superiour, while we can preserve
 Unhurt our minds, and understanding sound,
 Due search and consultation will disclose.
 He sat; and in the assembly next upstood
 Nisroch, of Principalities the prime;
 As one he stood escaped from cruel fight,
 Sore toiled, his riven arms to havock hewn,
 And cloudy in aspect thus answering spake.
 Deliverer from new Lords, leader to free
 Enjoyment of our right as Gods; yet hard
 For Gods, and too unequal work we find,
 Against unequal arms to fight in pain,
 Against unpained, impassive; from which evil
 Ruin must needs ensue; for what avails
 Valour or strength, though matchless, quelled with pain
 Which all subdues, and makes remiss the hands
 Of mightiest?  Sense of pleasure we may well
 Spare out of life perhaps, and not repine,
 But live content, which is the calmest life:
 But pain is perfect misery, the worst
 Of evils, and, excessive, overturns
 All patience.  He, who therefore can invent
 With what more forcible we may offend
 Our yet unwounded enemies, or arm
 Ourselves with like defence, to me deserves
 No less than for deliverance what we owe.
 Whereto with look composed Satan replied.
 Not uninvented that, which thou aright
 Believest so main to our success, I bring.
 Which of us who beholds the bright surface
 Of this ethereous mould whereon we stand,
 This continent of spacious Heaven, adorned
 With plant, fruit, flower ambrosial, gems, and gold;
 Whose eye so superficially surveys
 These things, as not to mind from whence they grow
 Deep under ground, materials dark and crude,
 Of spiritous and fiery spume, till touched
 With Heaven's ray, and tempered, they shoot forth
 So beauteous, opening to the ambient light?
 These in their dark nativity the deep
 Shall yield us, pregnant with infernal flame;
 Which, into hollow engines, long and round,
 Thick rammed, at the other bore with touch of fire
 Dilated and infuriate, shall send forth
 From far, with thundering noise, among our foes
 Such implements of mischief, as shall dash
 To pieces, and o'erwhelm whatever stands
 Adverse, that they shall fear we have disarmed
 The Thunderer of his only dreaded bolt.
 Nor long shall be our labour; yet ere dawn,
 Effect shall end our wish.  Mean while revive;
 Abandon fear; to strength and counsel joined
 Think nothing hard, much less to be despaired.
 He ended, and his words their drooping cheer
 Enlightened, and their languished hope revived.
 The invention all admired, and each, how he
 To be the inventer missed; so easy it seemed
 Once found, which yet unfound most would have thought
 Impossible:  Yet, haply, of thy race
 In future days, if malice should abound,
 Some one intent on mischief, or inspired
 With devilish machination, might devise
 Like instrument to plague the sons of men
 For sin, on war and mutual slaughter bent.
 Forthwith from council to the work they flew;
 None arguing stood; innumerable hands
 Were ready; in a moment up they turned
 Wide the celestial soil, and saw beneath
 The originals of nature in their crude
 Conception; sulphurous and nitrous foam
 They found, they mingled, and, with subtle art,
 Concocted and adusted they reduced
 To blackest grain, and into store conveyed:
 Part hidden veins digged up (nor hath this earth
 Entrails unlike) of mineral and stone,
 Whereof to found their engines and their balls
 Of missive ruin; part incentive reed
 Provide, pernicious with one touch to fire.
 So all ere day-spring, under conscious night,
 Secret they finished, and in order set,
 With silent circumspection, unespied.
 Now when fair morn orient in Heaven appeared,
 Up rose the victor-Angels, and to arms
 The matin trumpet sung:  In arms they stood
 Of golden panoply, refulgent host,
 Soon banded; others from the dawning hills
 Look round, and scouts each coast light-armed scour,
 Each quarter to descry the distant foe,
 Where lodged, or whither fled, or if for fight,
 In motion or in halt:  Him soon they met
 Under spread ensigns moving nigh, in slow
 But firm battalion; back with speediest sail
 Zophiel, of Cherubim the swiftest wing,
 Came flying, and in mid air aloud thus cried.
 Arm, Warriours, arm for fight; the foe at hand,
 Whom fled we thought, will save us long pursuit
 This day; fear not his flight; so thick a cloud
 He comes, and settled in his face I see
 Sad resolution, and secure:  Let each
 His adamantine coat gird well, and each
 Fit well his helm, gripe fast his orbed shield,
 Borne even or high; for this day will pour down,
 If I conjecture aught, no drizzling shower,
 But rattling storm of arrows barbed with fire.
 So warned he them, aware themselves, and soon
 In order, quit of all impediment;
 Instant without disturb they took alarm,
 And onward moved embattled:  When behold!
 Not distant far with heavy pace the foe
 Approaching gross and huge, in hollow cube
 Training his devilish enginery, impaled
 On every side with shadowing squadrons deep,
 To hide the fraud.  At interview both stood
 A while; but suddenly at head appeared
 Satan, and thus was heard commanding loud.
 Vanguard, to right and left the front unfold;
 That all may see who hate us, how we seek
 Peace and composure, and with open breast
 Stand ready to receive them, if they like
 Our overture; and turn not back perverse:
 But that I doubt; however witness, Heaven!
 Heaven, witness thou anon! while we discharge
 Freely our part: ye, who appointed stand
 Do as you have in charge, and briefly touch
 What we propound, and loud that all may hear!
 So scoffing in ambiguous words, he scarce
 Had ended; when to right and left the front
 Divided, and to either flank retired:
 Which to our eyes discovered, new and strange,
 A triple mounted row of pillars laid
 On wheels (for like to pillars most they seemed,
 Or hollowed bodies made of oak or fir,
 With branches lopt, in wood or mountain felled,)
 Brass, iron, stony mould, had not their mouths
 With hideous orifice gaped on us wide,
 Portending hollow truce:  At each behind
 A Seraph stood, and in his hand a reed
 Stood waving tipt with fire; while we, suspense,
 Collected stood within our thoughts amused,
 Not long; for sudden all at once their reeds
 Put forth, and to a narrow vent applied
 With nicest touch.  Immediate in a flame,
 But soon obscured with smoke, all Heaven appeared,
 From those deep-throated engines belched, whose roar
 Embowelled with outrageous noise the air,
 And all her entrails tore, disgorging foul
 Their devilish glut, chained thunderbolts and hail
 Of iron globes; which, on the victor host
 Levelled, with such impetuous fury smote,
 That, whom they hit, none on their feet might stand,
 Though standing else as rocks, but down they fell
 By thousands, Angel on Arch-Angel rolled;
 The sooner for their arms; unarmed, they might
 Have easily, as Spirits, evaded swift
 By quick contraction or remove; but now
 Foul dissipation followed, and forced rout;
 Nor served it to relax their serried files.
 What should they do? if on they rushed, repulse
 Repeated, and indecent overthrow
 Doubled, would render them yet more despised,
 And to their foes a laughter; for in view
 Stood ranked of Seraphim another row,
 In posture to displode their second tire
 Of thunder:  Back defeated to return
 They worse abhorred.  Satan beheld their plight,
 And to his mates thus in derision called.
 O Friends! why come not on these victors proud
 Ere while they fierce were coming; and when we,
 To entertain them fair with open front
 And breast, (what could we more?) propounded terms
 Of composition, straight they changed their minds,
 Flew off, and into strange vagaries fell,
 As they would dance; yet for a dance they seemed
 Somewhat extravagant and wild; perhaps
 For joy of offered peace:  But I suppose,
 If our proposals once again were heard,
 We should compel them to a quick result.
 To whom thus Belial, in like gamesome mood.
 Leader! the terms we sent were terms of weight,
 Of hard contents, and full of force urged home;
 Such as we might perceive amused them all,
 And stumbled many:  Who receives them right,
 Had need from head to foot well understand;
 Not understood, this gift they have besides,
 They show us when our foes walk not upright.
 So they among themselves in pleasant vein
 Stood scoffing, hightened in their thoughts beyond
 All doubt of victory:  Eternal Might
 To match with their inventions they presumed
 So easy, and of his thunder made a scorn,
 And all his host derided, while they stood
 A while in trouble:  But they stood not long;
 Rage prompted them at length, and found them arms
 Against such hellish mischief fit to oppose.
 Forthwith (behold the excellence, the power,
 Which God hath in his mighty Angels placed!)
 Their arms away they threw, and to the hills
 (For Earth hath this variety from Heaven
 Of pleasure situate in hill and dale,)
 Light as the lightning glimpse they ran, they flew;
 From their foundations loosening to and fro,
 They plucked the seated hills, with all their load,
 Rocks, waters, woods, and by the shaggy tops
 Up-lifting bore them in their hands:  Amaze,
 Be sure, and terrour, seized the rebel host,
 When coming towards them so dread they saw
 The bottom of the mountains upward turned;
 Till on those cursed engines' triple-row
 They saw them whelmed, and all their confidence
 Under the weight of mountains buried deep;
 Themselves invaded next, and on their heads
 Main promontories flung, which in the air
 Came shadowing, and oppressed whole legions armed;
 Their armour helped their harm, crushed in and bruised
 Into their substance pent, which wrought them pain
 Implacable, and many a dolorous groan;
 Long struggling underneath, ere they could wind
 Out of such prison, though Spirits of purest light,
 Purest at first, now gross by sinning grown.
 The rest, in imitation, to like arms
 Betook them, and the neighbouring hills uptore:
 So hills amid the air encountered hills,
 Hurled to and fro with jaculation dire;
 That under ground they fought in dismal shade;
 Infernal noise! war seemed a civil game
 To this uproar; horrid confusion heaped
 Upon confusion rose:  And now all Heaven
 Had gone to wrack, with ruin overspread;
 Had not the Almighty Father, where he sits
 Shrined in his sanctuary of Heaven secure,
 Consulting on the sum of things, foreseen
 This tumult, and permitted all, advised:
 That his great purpose he might so fulfil,
 To honour his anointed Son avenged
 Upon his enemies, and to declare
 All power on him transferred:  Whence to his Son,
 The Assessour of his throne, he thus began.
 Effulgence of my glory, Son beloved,
 Son, in whose face invisible is beheld
 Visibly, what by Deity I am;
 And in whose hand what by decree I do,
 Second Omnipotence! two days are past,
 Two days, as we compute the days of Heaven,
 Since Michael and his Powers went forth to tame
 These disobedient:  Sore hath been their fight,
 As likeliest was, when two such foes met armed;
 For to themselves I left them; and thou knowest,
 Equal in their creation they were formed,
 Save what sin hath impaired; which yet hath wrought
 Insensibly, for I suspend their doom;
 Whence in perpetual fight they needs must last
 Endless, and no solution will be found:
 War wearied hath performed what war can do,
 And to disordered rage let loose the reins
 With mountains, as with weapons, armed; which makes
 Wild work in Heaven, and dangerous to the main.
 Two days are therefore past, the third is thine;
 For thee I have ordained it; and thus far
 Have suffered, that the glory may be thine
 Of ending this great war, since none but Thou
 Can end it.  Into thee such virtue and grace
 Immense I have transfused, that all may know
 In Heaven and Hell thy power above compare;
 And, this perverse commotion governed thus,
 To manifest thee worthiest to be Heir
 Of all things; to be Heir, and to be King
 By sacred unction, thy deserved right.
 Go then, Thou Mightiest, in thy Father's might;
 Ascend my chariot, guide the rapid wheels
 That shake Heaven's basis, bring forth all my war,
 My bow and thunder, my almighty arms
 Gird on, and sword upon thy puissant thigh;
 Pursue these sons of darkness, drive them out
 From all Heaven's bounds into the utter deep:
 There let them learn, as likes them, to despise
 God, and Messiah his anointed King.
 He said, and on his Son with rays direct
 Shone full; he all his Father full expressed
 Ineffably into his face received;
 And thus the Filial Godhead answering spake.
 O Father, O Supreme of heavenly Thrones,
 First, Highest, Holiest, Best; thou always seek'st
 To glorify thy Son, I always thee,
 As is most just:  This I my glory account,
 My exaltation, and my whole delight,
 That thou, in me well pleased, declarest thy will
 Fulfilled, which to fulfil is all my bliss.
 Scepter and power, thy giving, I assume,
 And gladlier shall resign, when in the end
 Thou shalt be all in all, and I in thee
 For ever; and in me all whom thou lovest:
 But whom thou hatest, I hate, and can put on
 Thy terrours, as I put thy mildness on,
 Image of thee in all things; and shall soon,
 Armed with thy might, rid Heaven of these rebelled;
 To their prepared ill mansion driven down,
 To chains of darkness, and the undying worm;
 That from thy just obedience could revolt,
 Whom to obey is happiness entire.
 Then shall thy Saints unmixed, and from the impure
 Far separate, circling thy holy mount,
 Unfeigned Halleluiahs to thee sing,
 Hymns of high praise, and I among them Chief.
 So said, he, o'er his scepter bowing, rose
 From the right hand of Glory where he sat;
 And the third sacred morn began to shine,
 Dawning through Heaven.  Forth rushed with whirlwind sound
 The chariot of Paternal Deity,
 Flashing thick flames, wheel within wheel undrawn,
 Itself instinct with Spirit, but convoyed
 By four Cherubick shapes; four faces each
 Had wonderous; as with stars, their bodies all
 And wings were set with eyes; with eyes the wheels
 Of beryl, and careering fires between;
 Over their heads a crystal firmament,
 Whereon a sapphire throne, inlaid with pure
 Amber, and colours of the showery arch.
 He, in celestial panoply all armed
 Of radiant Urim, work divinely wrought,
 Ascended; at his right hand Victory
 Sat eagle-winged; beside him hung his bow
 And quiver with three-bolted thunder stored;
 And from about him fierce effusion rolled
 Of smoke, and bickering flame, and sparkles dire:
 Attended with ten thousand thousand Saints,
 He onward came; far off his coming shone;
 And twenty thousand (I their number heard)
 Chariots of God, half on each hand, were seen;
 He on the wings of Cherub rode sublime
 On the crystalline sky, in sapphire throned,
 Illustrious far and wide; but by his own
 First seen:  Them unexpected joy surprised,
 When the great ensign of Messiah blazed
 Aloft by Angels borne, his sign in Heaven;
 Under whose conduct Michael soon reduced
 His army, circumfused on either wing,
 Under their Head imbodied all in one.
 Before him Power Divine his way prepared;
 At his command the uprooted hills retired
 Each to his place; they heard his voice, and went
 Obsequious; Heaven his wonted face renewed,
 And with fresh flowerets hill and valley smiled.
 This saw his hapless foes, but stood obdured,
 And to rebellious fight rallied their Powers,
 Insensate, hope conceiving from despair.
 In heavenly Spirits could such perverseness dwell?
 But to convince the proud what signs avail,
 Or wonders move the obdurate to relent?
 They, hardened more by what might most reclaim,
 Grieving to see his glory, at the sight
 Took envy; and, aspiring to his highth,
 Stood re-embattled fierce, by force or fraud
 Weening to prosper, and at length prevail
 Against God and Messiah, or to fall
 In universal ruin last; and now
 To final battle drew, disdaining flight,
 Or faint retreat; when the great Son of God
 To all his host on either hand thus spake.
 Stand still in bright array, ye Saints; here stand,
 Ye Angels armed; this day from battle rest:
 Faithful hath been your warfare, and of God
 Accepted, fearless in his righteous cause;
 And as ye have received, so have ye done,
 Invincibly:  But of this cursed crew
 The punishment to other hand belongs;
 Vengeance is his, or whose he sole appoints:
 Number to this day's work is not ordained,
 Nor multitude; stand only, and behold
 God's indignation on these godless poured
 By me; not you, but me, they have despised,
 Yet envied; against me is all their rage,
 Because the Father, to whom in Heaven s'preme
 Kingdom, and power, and glory appertains,
 Hath honoured me, according to his will.
 Therefore to me their doom he hath assigned;
 That they may have their wish, to try with me
 In battle which the stronger proves; they all,
 Or I alone against them; since by strength
 They measure all, of other excellence
 Not emulous, nor care who them excels;
 Nor other strife with them do I vouchsafe.
 So spake the Son, and into terrour changed
 His countenance too severe to be beheld,
 And full of wrath bent on his enemies.
 At once the Four spread out their starry wings
 With dreadful shade contiguous, and the orbs
 Of his fierce chariot rolled, as with the sound
 Of torrent floods, or of a numerous host.
 He on his impious foes right onward drove,
 Gloomy as night; under his burning wheels
 The stedfast empyrean shook throughout,
 All but the throne itself of God.  Full soon
 Among them he arrived; in his right hand
 Grasping ten thousand thunders, which he sent
 Before him, such as in their souls infixed
 Plagues:  They, astonished, all resistance lost,
 All courage; down their idle weapons dropt:
 O'er shields, and helms, and helmed heads he rode
 Of Thrones and mighty Seraphim prostrate,
 That wished the mountains now might be again
 Thrown on them, as a shelter from his ire.
 Nor less on either side tempestuous fell
 His arrows, from the fourfold-visaged Four
 Distinct with eyes, and from the living wheels
 Distinct alike with multitude of eyes;
 One Spirit in them ruled; and every eye
 Glared lightning, and shot forth pernicious fire
 Among the accursed, that withered all their strength,
 And of their wonted vigour left them drained,
 Exhausted, spiritless, afflicted, fallen.
 Yet half his strength he put not forth, but checked
 His thunder in mid volley; for he meant
 Not to destroy, but root them out of Heaven:
 The overthrown he raised, and as a herd
 Of goats or timorous flock together thronged
 Drove them before him thunder-struck, pursued
 With terrours, and with furies, to the bounds
 And crystal wall of Heaven; which, opening wide,
 Rolled inward, and a spacious gap disclosed
 Into the wasteful deep:  The monstrous sight
 Struck them with horrour backward, but far worse
 Urged them behind:  Headlong themselves they threw
 Down from the verge of Heaven; eternal wrath
 Burnt after them to the bottomless pit.
 Hell heard the unsufferable noise, Hell saw
 Heaven ruining from Heaven, and would have fled
 Affrighted; but strict Fate had cast too deep
 Her dark foundations, and too fast had bound.
 Nine days they fell:  Confounded Chaos roared,
 And felt tenfold confusion in their fall
 Through his wild anarchy, so huge a rout
 Incumbered him with ruin:  Hell at last
 Yawning received them whole, and on them closed;
 Hell, their fit habitation, fraught with fire
 Unquenchable, the house of woe and pain.
 Disburdened Heaven rejoiced, and soon repaired
 Her mural breach, returning whence it rolled.
 Sole victor, from the expulsion of his foes,
 Messiah his triumphal chariot turned:
 To meet him all his Saints, who silent stood
 Eye-witnesses of his almighty acts,
 With jubilee advanced; and, as they went,
 Shaded with branching palm, each Order bright,
 Sung triumph, and him sung victorious King,
 Son, Heir, and Lord, to him dominion given,
 Worthiest to reign:  He, celebrated, rode
 Triumphant through mid Heaven, into the courts
 And temple of his Mighty Father throned
 On high; who into glory him received,
 Where now he sits at the right hand of bliss.
 Thus, measuring things in Heaven by things on Earth,
 At thy request, and that thou mayest beware
 By what is past, to thee I have revealed
 What might have else to human race been hid;
 The discord which befel, and war in Heaven
 Among the angelick Powers, and the deep fall
 Of those too high aspiring, who rebelled
 With Satan; he who envies now thy state,
 Who now is plotting how he may seduce
 Thee also from obedience, that, with him
 Bereaved of happiness, thou mayest partake
 His punishment, eternal misery;
 Which would be all his solace and revenge,
 As a despite done against the Most High,
 Thee once to gain companion of his woe.
 But listen not to his temptations, warn
 Thy weaker; let it profit thee to have heard,
 By terrible example, the reward
 Of disobedience; firm they might have stood,
 Yet fell; remember, and fear to transgress.
 
 
 
 Book VII
 
 
 Descend from Heaven, Urania, by that name
 If rightly thou art called, whose voice divine
 Following, above the Olympian hill I soar,
 Above the flight of Pegasean wing!
 The meaning, not the name, I call: for thou
 Nor of the Muses nine, nor on the top
 Of old Olympus dwellest; but, heavenly-born,
 Before the hills appeared, or fountain flowed,
 Thou with eternal Wisdom didst converse,
 Wisdom thy sister, and with her didst play
 In presence of the Almighty Father, pleased
 With thy celestial song.  Up led by thee
 Into the Heaven of Heavens I have presumed,
 An earthly guest, and drawn empyreal air,
 Thy tempering: with like safety guided down
 Return me to my native element:
 Lest from this flying steed unreined, (as once
 Bellerophon, though from a lower clime,)
 Dismounted, on the Aleian field I fall,
 Erroneous there to wander, and forlorn.
 Half yet remains unsung, but narrower bound
 Within the visible diurnal sphere;
 Standing on earth, not rapt above the pole,
 More safe I sing with mortal voice, unchanged
 To hoarse or mute, though fallen on evil days,
 On evil days though fallen, and evil tongues;
 In darkness, and with dangers compassed round,
 And solitude; yet not alone, while thou
 Visitest my slumbers nightly, or when morn
 Purples the east: still govern thou my song,
 Urania, and fit audience find, though few.
 But drive far off the barbarous dissonance
 Of Bacchus and his revellers, the race
 Of that wild rout that tore the Thracian bard
 In Rhodope, where woods and rocks had ears
 To rapture, till the savage clamour drowned
 Both harp and voice; nor could the Muse defend
 Her son.  So fail not thou, who thee implores:
 For thou art heavenly, she an empty dream.
 Say, Goddess, what ensued when Raphael,
 The affable Arch-Angel, had forewarned
 Adam, by dire example, to beware
 Apostasy, by what befel in Heaven
 To those apostates; lest the like befall
 In Paradise to Adam or his race,
 Charged not to touch the interdicted tree,
 If they transgress, and slight that sole command,
 So easily obeyed amid the choice
 Of all tastes else to please their appetite,
 Though wandering.  He, with his consorted Eve,
 The story heard attentive, and was filled
 With admiration and deep muse, to hear
 Of things so high and strange; things, to their thought
 So unimaginable, as hate in Heaven,
 And war so near the peace of God in bliss,
 With such confusion: but the evil, soon
 Driven back, redounded as a flood on those
 From whom it sprung; impossible to mix
 With blessedness.  Whence Adam soon repealed
 The doubts that in his heart arose: and now
 Led on, yet sinless, with desire to know
 What nearer might concern him, how this world
 Of Heaven and Earth conspicuous first began;
 When, and whereof created; for what cause;
 What within Eden, or without, was done
 Before his memory; as one whose drouth
 Yet scarce allayed still eyes the current stream,
 Whose liquid murmur heard new thirst excites,
 Proceeded thus to ask his heavenly guest.
 Great things, and full of wonder in our ears,
 Far differing from this world, thou hast revealed,
 Divine interpreter! by favour sent
 Down from the empyrean, to forewarn
 Us timely of what might else have been our loss,
 Unknown, which human knowledge could not reach;
 For which to the infinitely Good we owe
 Immortal thanks, and his admonishment
 Receive, with solemn purpose to observe
 Immutably his sovran will, the end
 Of what we are.  But since thou hast vouchsafed
 Gently, for our instruction, to impart
 Things above earthly thought, which yet concerned
 Our knowing, as to highest wisdom seemed,
 Deign to descend now lower, and relate
 What may no less perhaps avail us known,
 How first began this Heaven which we behold
 Distant so high, with moving fires adorned
 Innumerable; and this which yields or fills
 All space, the ambient air wide interfused
 Embracing round this floried Earth; what cause
 Moved the Creator, in his holy rest
 Through all eternity, so late to build
 In Chaos; and the work begun, how soon
 Absolved; if unforbid thou mayest unfold
 What we, not to explore the secrets ask
 Of his eternal empire, but the more
 To magnify his works, the more we know.
 And the great light of day yet wants to run
 Much of his race though steep; suspense in Heaven,
 Held by thy voice, thy potent voice, he hears,
 And longer will delay to hear thee tell
 His generation, and the rising birth
 Of Nature from the unapparent Deep:
 Or if the star of evening and the moon
 Haste to thy audience, Night with her will bring,
 Silence; and Sleep, listening to thee, will watch;
 Or we can bid his absence, till thy song
 End, and dismiss thee ere the morning shine.
 Thus Adam his illustrious guest besought:
 And thus the Godlike Angel answered mild.
 This also thy request, with caution asked,
 Obtain; though to recount almighty works
 What words or tongue of Seraph can suffice,
 Or heart of man suffice to comprehend?
 Yet what thou canst attain, which best may serve
 To glorify the Maker, and infer
 Thee also happier, shall not be withheld
 Thy hearing; such commission from above
 I have received, to answer thy desire
 Of knowledge within bounds; beyond, abstain
 To ask; nor let thine own inventions hope
 Things not revealed, which the invisible King,
 Only Omniscient, hath suppressed in night;
 To none communicable in Earth or Heaven:
 Enough is left besides to search and know.
 But knowledge is as food, and needs no less
 Her temperance over appetite, to know
 In measure what the mind may well contain;
 Oppresses else with surfeit, and soon turns
 Wisdom to folly, as nourishment to wind.
 Know then, that, after Lucifer from Heaven
 (So call him, brighter once amidst the host
 Of Angels, than that star the stars among,)
 Fell with his flaming legions through the deep
 Into his place, and the great Son returned
 Victorious with his Saints, the Omnipotent
 Eternal Father from his throne beheld
 Their multitude, and to his Son thus spake.
 At least our envious Foe hath failed, who thought
 All like himself rebellious, by whose aid
 This inaccessible high strength, the seat
 Of Deity supreme, us dispossessed,
 He trusted to have seised, and into fraud
 Drew many, whom their place knows here no more:
 Yet far the greater part have kept, I see,
 Their station; Heaven, yet populous, retains
 Number sufficient to possess her realms
 Though wide, and this high temple to frequent
 With ministeries due, and solemn rites:
 But, lest his heart exalt him in the harm
 Already done, to have dispeopled Heaven,
 My damage fondly deemed, I can repair
 That detriment, if such it be to lose
 Self-lost; and in a moment will create
 Another world, out of one man a race
 Of men innumerable, there to dwell,
 Not here; till, by degrees of merit raised,
 They open to themselves at length the way
 Up hither, under long obedience tried;
 And Earth be changed to Heaven, and Heaven to Earth,
 One kingdom, joy and union without end.
 Mean while inhabit lax, ye Powers of Heaven;
 And thou my Word, begotten Son, by thee
 This I perform; speak thou, and be it done!
 My overshadowing Spirit and Might with thee
 I send along; ride forth, and bid the Deep
 Within appointed bounds be Heaven and Earth;
 Boundless the Deep, because I Am who fill
 Infinitude, nor vacuous the space.
 Though I, uncircumscribed myself, retire,
 And put not forth my goodness, which is free
 To act or not, Necessity and Chance
 Approach not me, and what I will is Fate.
 So spake the Almighty, and to what he spake
 His Word, the Filial Godhead, gave effect.
 Immediate are the acts of God, more swift
 Than time or motion, but to human ears
 Cannot without process of speech be told,
 So told as earthly notion can receive.
 Great triumph and rejoicing was in Heaven,
 When such was heard declared the Almighty's will;
 Glory they sung to the Most High, good will
 To future men, and in their dwellings peace;
 Glory to Him, whose just avenging ire
 Had driven out the ungodly from his sight
 And the habitations of the just; to Him
 Glory and praise, whose wisdom had ordained
 Good out of evil to create; instead
 Of Spirits malign, a better race to bring
 Into their vacant room, and thence diffuse
 His good to worlds and ages infinite.
 So sang the Hierarchies:  Mean while the Son
 On his great expedition now appeared,
 Girt with Omnipotence, with radiance crowned
 Of Majesty Divine; sapience and love
 Immense, and all his Father in him shone.
 About his chariot numberless were poured
 Cherub, and Seraph, Potentates, and Thrones,
 And Virtues, winged Spirits, and chariots winged
 From the armoury of God; where stand of old
 Myriads, between two brazen mountains lodged
 Against a solemn day, harnessed at hand,
 Celestial equipage; and now came forth
 Spontaneous, for within them Spirit lived,
 Attendant on their Lord:  Heaven opened wide
 Her ever-during gates, harmonious sound
 On golden hinges moving, to let forth
 The King of Glory, in his powerful Word
 And Spirit, coming to create new worlds.
 On heavenly ground they stood; and from the shore
 They viewed the vast immeasurable abyss
 Outrageous as a sea, dark, wasteful, wild,
 Up from the bottom turned by furious winds
 And surging waves, as mountains, to assault
 Heaven's highth, and with the center mix the pole.
 Silence, ye troubled Waves, and thou Deep, peace,
 Said then the Omnifick Word; your discord end!
 Nor staid; but, on the wings of Cherubim
 Uplifted, in paternal glory rode
 Far into Chaos, and the world unborn;
 For Chaos heard his voice:  Him all his train
 Followed in bright procession, to behold
 Creation, and the wonders of his might.
 Then staid the fervid wheels, and in his hand
 He took the golden compasses, prepared
 In God's eternal store, to circumscribe
 This universe, and all created things:
 One foot he centered, and the other turned
 Round through the vast profundity obscure;
 And said, Thus far extend, thus far thy bounds,
 This be thy just circumference, O World!
 Thus God the Heaven created, thus the Earth,
 Matter unformed and void:  Darkness profound
 Covered the abyss: but on the watery calm
 His brooding wings the Spirit of God outspread,
 And vital virtue infused, and vital warmth
 Throughout the fluid mass; but downward purged
 The black tartareous cold infernal dregs,
 Adverse to life: then founded, then conglobed
 Like things to like; the rest to several place
 Disparted, and between spun out the air;
 And Earth self-balanced on her center hung.
 Let there be light, said God; and forthwith Light
 Ethereal, first of things, quintessence pure,
 Sprung from the deep; and from her native east
 To journey through the aery gloom began,
 Sphered in a radiant cloud, for yet the sun
 Was not; she in a cloudy tabernacle
 Sojourned the while.  God saw the light was good;
 And light from darkness by the hemisphere
 Divided: light the Day, and darkness Night,
 He named.  Thus was the first day even and morn:
 Nor past uncelebrated, nor unsung
 By the celestial quires, when orient light
 Exhaling first from darkness they beheld;
 Birth-day of Heaven and Earth; with joy and shout
 The hollow universal orb they filled,
 And touched their golden harps, and hymning praised
 God and his works; Creator him they sung,
 Both when first evening was, and when first morn.
 Again, God said,  Let there be firmament
 Amid the waters, and let it divide
 The waters from the waters; and God made
 The firmament, expanse of liquid, pure,
 Transparent, elemental air, diffused
 In circuit to the uttermost convex
 Of this great round; partition firm and sure,
 The waters underneath from those above
 Dividing: for as earth, so he the world
 Built on circumfluous waters calm, in wide
 Crystalline ocean, and the loud misrule
 Of Chaos far removed; lest fierce extremes
 Contiguous might distemper the whole frame:
 And Heaven he named the Firmament:  So even
 And morning chorus sung the second day.
 The Earth was formed, but in the womb as yet
 Of waters, embryon immature involved,
 Appeared not: over all the face of Earth
 Main ocean flowed, not idle; but, with warm
 Prolifick humour softening all her globe,
 Fermented the great mother to conceive,
 Satiate with genial moisture; when God said,
 Be gathered now ye waters under Heaven
 Into one place, and let dry land appear.
 Immediately the mountains huge appear
 Emergent, and their broad bare backs upheave
 Into the clouds; their tops ascend the sky:
 So high as heaved the tumid hills, so low
 Down sunk a hollow bottom broad and deep,
 Capacious bed of waters:  Thither they
 Hasted with glad precipitance, uprolled,
 As drops on dust conglobing from the dry:
 Part rise in crystal wall, or ridge direct,
 For haste; such flight the great command impressed
 On the swift floods:  As armies at the call
 Of trumpet (for of armies thou hast heard)
 Troop to their standard; so the watery throng,
 Wave rolling after wave, where way they found,
 If steep, with torrent rapture, if through plain,
 Soft-ebbing; nor withstood them rock or hill;
 But they, or under ground, or circuit wide
 With serpent errour wandering, found their way,
 And on the washy oose deep channels wore;
 Easy, ere God had bid the ground be dry,
 All but within those banks, where rivers now
 Stream, and perpetual draw their humid train.
 The dry land, Earth; and the great receptacle
 Of congregated waters, he called Seas:
 And saw that it was good; and said, Let the Earth
 Put forth the verdant grass, herb yielding seed,
 And fruit-tree yielding fruit after her kind,
 Whose seed is in herself upon the Earth.
 He scarce had said, when the bare Earth, till then
 Desart and bare, unsightly, unadorned,
 Brought forth the tender grass, whose verdure clad
 Her universal face with pleasant green;
 Then herbs of every leaf, that sudden flowered
 Opening their various colours, and made gay
 Her bosom, smelling sweet: and, these scarce blown,
 Forth flourished thick the clustering vine, forth crept
 The swelling gourd, up stood the corny reed
 Embattled in her field, and the humble shrub,
 And bush with frizzled hair implicit:  Last
 Rose, as in dance, the stately trees, and spread
 Their branches hung with copious fruit, or gemmed
 Their blossoms:  With high woods the hills were crowned;
 With tufts the valleys, and each fountain side;
 With borders long the rivers: that Earth now
 Seemed like to Heaven, a seat where Gods might dwell,
 Or wander with delight, and love to haunt
 Her sacred shades: though God had yet not rained
 Upon the Earth, and man to till the ground
 None was; but from the Earth a dewy mist
 Went up, and watered all the ground, and each
 Plant of the field; which, ere it was in the Earth,
 God made, and every herb, before it grew
 On the green stem:  God saw that it was good:
 So even and morn recorded the third day.
 Again the Almighty spake, Let there be lights
 High in the expanse of Heaven, to divide
 The day from night; and let them be for signs,
 For seasons, and for days, and circling years;
 And let them be for lights, as I ordain
 Their office in the firmament of Heaven,
 To give light on the Earth; and it was so.
 And God made two great lights, great for their use
 To Man, the greater to have rule by day,
 The less by night, altern; and made the stars,
 And set them in the firmament of Heaven
 To illuminate the Earth, and rule the day
 In their vicissitude, and rule the night,
 And light from darkness to divide.  God saw,
 Surveying his great work, that it was good:
 For of celestial bodies first the sun
 A mighty sphere he framed, unlightsome first,
 Though of ethereal mould: then formed the moon
 Globose, and every magnitude of stars,
 And sowed with stars the Heaven, thick as a field:
 Of light by far the greater part he took,
 Transplanted from her cloudy shrine, and placed
 In the sun's orb, made porous to receive
 And drink the liquid light; firm to retain
 Her gathered beams, great palace now of light.
 Hither, as to their fountain, other stars
 Repairing, in their golden urns draw light,
 And hence the morning-planet gilds her horns;
 By tincture or reflection they augment
 Their small peculiar, though from human sight
 So far remote, with diminution seen,
 First in his east the glorious lamp was seen,
 Regent of day, and all the horizon round
 Invested with bright rays, jocund to run
 His longitude through Heaven's high road; the gray
 Dawn, and the Pleiades, before him danced,
 Shedding sweet influence:  Less bright the moon,
 But opposite in levelled west was set,
 His mirrour, with full face borrowing her light
 From him; for other light she needed none
 In that aspect, and still that distance keeps
 Till night; then in the east her turn she shines,
 Revolved on Heaven's great axle, and her reign
 With thousand lesser lights dividual holds,
 With thousand thousand stars, that then appeared
 Spangling the hemisphere:  Then first adorned
 With their bright luminaries that set and rose,
 Glad evening and glad morn crowned the fourth day.
 And God said, Let the waters generate
 Reptile with spawn abundant, living soul:
 And let fowl fly above the Earth, with wings
 Displayed on the open firmament of Heaven.
 And God created the great whales, and each
 Soul living, each that crept, which plenteously
 The waters generated by their kinds;
 And every bird of wing after his kind;
 And saw that it was good, and blessed them, saying.
 Be fruitful, multiply, and in the seas,
 And lakes, and running streams, the waters fill;
 And let the fowl be multiplied, on the Earth.
 Forthwith the sounds and seas, each creek and bay,
 With fry innumerable swarm, and shoals
 Of fish that with their fins, and shining scales,
 Glide under the green wave, in sculls that oft
 Bank the mid sea: part single, or with mate,
 Graze the sea-weed their pasture, and through groves
 Of coral stray; or, sporting with quick glance,
 Show to the sun their waved coats dropt with gold;
 Or, in their pearly shells at ease, attend
 Moist nutriment; or under rocks their food
 In jointed armour watch: on smooth the seal
 And bended dolphins play: part huge of bulk
 Wallowing unwieldy, enormous in their gait,
 Tempest the ocean: there leviathan,
 Hugest of living creatures, on the deep
 Stretched like a promontory sleeps or swims,
 And seems a moving land; and at his gills
 Draws in, and at his trunk spouts out, a sea.
 Mean while the tepid caves, and fens, and shores,
 Their brood as numerous hatch, from the egg that soon
 Bursting with kindly rupture forth disclosed
 Their callow young; but feathered soon and fledge
 They summed their pens; and, soaring the air sublime,
 With clang despised the ground, under a cloud
 In prospect; there the eagle and the stork
 On cliffs and cedar tops their eyries build:
 Part loosely wing the region, part more wise
 In common, ranged in figure, wedge their way,
 Intelligent of seasons, and set forth
 Their aery caravan, high over seas
 Flying, and over lands, with mutual wing
 Easing their flight; so steers the prudent crane
 Her annual voyage, borne on winds; the air
 Floats as they pass, fanned with unnumbered plumes:
 From branch to branch the smaller birds with song
 Solaced the woods, and spread their painted wings
 Till even; nor then the solemn nightingale
 Ceased warbling, but all night tun'd her soft lays:
 Others, on silver lakes and rivers, bathed
 Their downy breast; the swan with arched neck,
 Between her white wings mantling proudly, rows
 Her state with oary feet; yet oft they quit
 The dank, and, rising on stiff pennons, tower
 The mid aereal sky:  Others on ground
 Walked firm; the crested cock whose clarion sounds
 The silent hours, and the other whose gay train
 Adorns him, coloured with the florid hue
 Of rainbows and starry eyes.  The waters thus
 With fish replenished, and the air with fowl,
 Evening and morn solemnized the fifth day.
 The sixth, and of creation last, arose
 With evening harps and matin; when God said,
 Let the Earth bring forth soul living in her kind,
 Cattle, and creeping things, and beast of the Earth,
 Each in their kind.  The Earth obeyed, and straight
 Opening her fertile womb teemed at a birth
 Innumerous living creatures, perfect forms,
 Limbed and full grown:  Out of the ground up rose,
 As from his lair, the wild beast where he wons
 In forest wild, in thicket, brake, or den;
 Among the trees in pairs they rose, they walked:
 The cattle in the fields and meadows green:
 Those rare and solitary, these in flocks
 Pasturing at once, and in broad herds upsprung.
 The grassy clods now calved; now half appeared
 The tawny lion, pawing to get free
 His hinder parts, then springs as broke from bonds,
 And rampant shakes his brinded mane; the ounce,
 The libbard, and the tiger, as the mole
 Rising, the crumbled earth above them threw
 In hillocks:  The swift stag from under ground
 Bore up his branching head:  Scarce from his mould
 Behemoth biggest born of earth upheaved
 His vastness:  Fleeced the flocks and bleating rose,
 As plants:  Ambiguous between sea and land
 The river-horse, and scaly crocodile.
 At once came forth whatever creeps the ground,
 Insect or worm: those waved their limber fans
 For wings, and smallest lineaments exact
 In all the liveries decked of summer's pride
 With spots of gold and purple, azure and green:
 These, as a line, their long dimension drew,
 Streaking the ground with sinuous trace; not all
 Minims of nature; some of serpent-kind,
 Wonderous in length and corpulence, involved
 Their snaky folds, and added wings.  First crept
 The parsimonious emmet, provident
 Of future; in small room large heart enclosed;
 Pattern of just equality perhaps
 Hereafter, joined in her popular tribes
 Of commonalty:  Swarming next appeared
 The female bee, that feeds her husband drone
 Deliciously, and builds her waxen cells
 With honey stored:  The rest are numberless,
 And thou their natures knowest, and gavest them names,
 Needless to thee repeated; nor unknown
 The serpent, subtlest beast of all the field,
 Of huge extent sometimes, with brazen eyes
 And hairy mane terrifick, though to thee
 Not noxious, but obedient at thy call.
 Now Heaven in all her glory shone, and rolled
 Her motions, as the great first Mover's hand
 First wheeled their course:  Earth in her rich attire
 Consummate lovely smiled; air, water, earth,
 By fowl, fish, beast, was flown, was swum, was walked,
 Frequent; and of the sixth day yet remained:
 There wanted yet the master-work, the end
 Of all yet done; a creature, who, not prone
 And brute as other creatures, but endued
 With sanctity of reason, might erect
 His stature, and upright with front serene
 Govern the rest, self-knowing; and from thence
 Magnanimous to correspond with Heaven,
 But grateful to acknowledge whence his good
 Descends, thither with heart, and voice, and eyes
 Directed in devotion, to adore
 And worship God Supreme, who made him chief
 Of all his works:  therefore the Omnipotent
 Eternal Father (for where is not he
 Present?) thus to his Son audibly spake.
 Let us make now Man in our image, Man
 In our similitude, and let them rule
 Over the fish and fowl of sea and air,
 Beast of the field, and over all the Earth,
 And every creeping thing that creeps the ground.
 This said, he formed thee, Adam, thee, O Man,
 Dust of the ground, and in thy nostrils breathed
 The breath of life; in his own image he
 Created thee, in the image of God
 Express; and thou becamest a living soul.
 Male he created thee; but thy consort
 Female, for race; then blessed mankind, and said,
 Be fruitful, multiply, and fill the Earth;
 Subdue it, and throughout dominion hold
 Over fish of the sea, and fowl of the air,
 And every living thing that moves on the Earth.
 Wherever thus created, for no place
 Is yet distinct by name, thence, as thou knowest,
 He brought thee into this delicious grove,
 This garden, planted with the trees of God,
 Delectable both to behold and taste;
 And freely all their pleasant fruit for food
 Gave thee; all sorts are here that all the Earth yields,
 Variety without end; but of the tree,
 Which, tasted, works knowledge of good and evil,
 Thou mayest not; in the day thou eatest, thou diest;
 Death is the penalty imposed; beware,
 And govern well thy appetite; lest Sin
 Surprise thee, and her black attendant Death.
 Here finished he, and all that he had made
 Viewed, and behold all was entirely good;
 So even and morn accomplished the sixth day:
 Yet not till the Creator from his work
 Desisting, though unwearied, up returned,
 Up to the Heaven of Heavens, his high abode;
 Thence to behold this new created world,
 The addition of his empire, how it showed
 In prospect from his throne, how good, how fair,
 Answering his great idea.  Up he rode
 Followed with acclamation, and the sound
 Symphonious of ten thousand harps, that tuned
 Angelick harmonies:  The earth, the air
 Resounded, (thou rememberest, for thou heardst,)
 The heavens and all the constellations rung,
 The planets in their station listening stood,
 While the bright pomp ascended jubilant.
 Open, ye everlasting gates! they sung,
 Open, ye Heavens! your living doors; let in
 The great Creator from his work returned
 Magnificent, his six days work, a World;
 Open, and henceforth oft; for God will deign
 To visit oft the dwellings of just men,
 Delighted; and with frequent intercourse
 Thither will send his winged messengers
 On errands of supernal grace.  So sung
 The glorious train ascending:  He through Heaven,
 That opened wide her blazing portals, led
 To God's eternal house direct the way;
 A broad and ample road, whose dust is gold
 And pavement stars, as stars to thee appear,
 Seen in the galaxy, that milky way,
 Which nightly, as a circling zone, thou seest
 Powdered with stars.  And now on Earth the seventh
 Evening arose in Eden, for the sun
 Was set, and twilight from the east came on,
 Forerunning night; when at the holy mount
 Of Heaven's high-seated top, the imperial throne
 Of Godhead, fixed for ever firm and sure,
 The Filial Power arrived, and sat him down
 With his great Father; for he also went
 Invisible, yet staid, (such privilege
 Hath Omnipresence) and the work ordained,
 Author and End of all things; and, from work
 Now resting, blessed and hallowed the seventh day,
 As resting on that day from all his work,
 But not in silence holy kept: the harp
 Had work and rested not; the solemn pipe,
 And dulcimer, all organs of sweet stop,
 All sounds on fret by string or golden wire,
 Tempered soft tunings, intermixed with voice
 Choral or unison: of incense clouds,
 Fuming from golden censers, hid the mount.
 Creation and the six days acts they sung:
 Great are thy works, Jehovah! infinite
 Thy power! what thought can measure thee, or tongue
 Relate thee!  Greater now in thy return
 Than from the giant Angels:  Thee that day
 Thy thunders magnified; but to create
 Is greater than created to destroy.
 Who can impair thee, Mighty King, or bound
 Thy empire!  Easily the proud attempt
 Of Spirits apostate, and their counsels vain,
 Thou hast repelled; while impiously they thought
 Thee to diminish, and from thee withdraw
 The number of thy worshippers.  Who seeks
 To lessen thee, against his purpose serves
 To manifest the more thy might: his evil
 Thou usest, and from thence createst more good.
 Witness this new-made world, another Heaven
 From Heaven-gate not far, founded in view
 On the clear hyaline, the glassy sea;
 Of amplitude almost immense, with stars
 Numerous, and every star perhaps a world
 Of destined habitation; but thou knowest
 Their seasons: among these the seat of Men,
 Earth, with her nether ocean circumfused,
 Their pleasant dwelling-place.  Thrice happy Men,
 And sons of Men, whom God hath thus advanced!
 Created in his image, there to dwell
 And worship him; and in reward to rule
 Over his works, on earth, in sea, or air,
 And multiply a race of worshippers
 Holy and just:  Thrice happy, if they know
 Their happiness, and persevere upright!
 So sung they, and the empyrean rung
 With halleluiahs:  Thus was sabbath kept.
 And thy request think now fulfilled, that asked
 How first this world and face of things began,
 And what before thy memory was done
 From the beginning; that posterity,
 Informed by thee, might know:  If else thou seekest
 Aught, not surpassing human measure, say.
 
 
 
 Book VIII
 
 
 The Angel ended, and in Adam's ear
 So charming left his voice, that he a while
 Thought him still speaking, still stood fixed to hear;
 Then, as new waked, thus gratefully replied.
 What thanks sufficient, or what recompence
 Equal, have I to render thee, divine
 Historian, who thus largely hast allayed
 The thirst I had of knowledge, and vouchsafed
 This friendly condescension to relate
 Things, else by me unsearchable; now heard
 With wonder, but delight, and, as is due,
 With glory attributed to the high
 Creator!  Something yet of doubt remains,
 Which only thy solution can resolve.
 When I behold this goodly frame, this world,
 Of Heaven and Earth consisting; and compute
 Their magnitudes; this Earth, a spot, a grain,
 An atom, with the firmament compared
 And all her numbered stars, that seem to roll
 Spaces incomprehensible, (for such
 Their distance argues, and their swift return
 Diurnal,) merely to officiate light
 Round this opacous Earth, this punctual spot,
 One day and night; in all her vast survey
 Useless besides; reasoning I oft admire,
 How Nature wise and frugal could commit
 Such disproportions, with superfluous hand
 So many nobler bodies to create,
 Greater so manifold, to this one use,
 For aught appears, and on their orbs impose
 Such restless revolution day by day
 Repeated; while the sedentary Earth,
 That better might with far less compass move,
 Served by more noble than herself, attains
 Her end without least motion, and receives,
 As tribute, such a sumless journey brought
 Of incorporeal speed, her warmth and light;
 Speed, to describe whose swiftness number fails.
 So spake our sire, and by his countenance seemed
 Entering on studious thoughts abstruse; which Eve
 Perceiving, where she sat retired in sight,
 With lowliness majestick from her seat,
 And grace that won who saw to wish her stay,
 Rose, and went forth among her fruits and flowers,
 To visit how they prospered, bud and bloom,
 Her nursery; they at her coming sprung,
 And, touched by her fair tendance, gladlier grew.
 Yet went she not, as not with such discourse
 Delighted, or not capable her ear
 Of what was high: such pleasure she reserved,
 Adam relating, she sole auditress;
 Her husband the relater she preferred
 Before the Angel, and of him to ask
 Chose rather; he, she knew, would intermix
 Grateful digressions, and solve high dispute
 With conjugal caresses: from his lip
 Not words alone pleased her.  O! when meet now
 Such pairs, in love and mutual honour joined?
 With Goddess-like demeanour forth she went,
 Not unattended; for on her, as Queen,
 A pomp of winning Graces waited still,
 And from about her shot darts of desire
 Into all eyes, to wish her still in sight.
 And Raphael now, to Adam's doubt proposed,
 Benevolent and facile thus replied.
 To ask or search, I blame thee not; for Heaven
 Is as the book of God before thee set,
 Wherein to read his wonderous works, and learn
 His seasons, hours, or days, or months, or years:
 This to attain, whether Heaven move or Earth,
 Imports not, if thou reckon right; the rest
 From Man or Angel the great Architect
 Did wisely to conceal, and not divulge
 His secrets to be scanned by them who ought
 Rather admire; or, if they list to try
 Conjecture, he his fabrick of the Heavens
 Hath left to their disputes, perhaps to move
 His laughter at their quaint opinions wide
 Hereafter; when they come to model Heaven
 And calculate the stars, how they will wield
 The mighty frame; how build, unbuild, contrive
 To save appearances; how gird the sphere
 With centrick and eccentrick scribbled o'er,
 Cycle and epicycle, orb in orb:
 Already by thy reasoning this I guess,
 Who art to lead thy offspring, and supposest
 That bodies bright and greater should not serve
 The less not bright, nor Heaven such journeys run,
 Earth sitting still, when she alone receives
 The benefit:  Consider first, that great
 Or bright infers not excellence: the Earth
 Though, in comparison of Heaven, so small,
 Nor glistering, may of solid good contain
 More plenty than the sun that barren shines;
 Whose virtue on itself works no effect,
 But in the fruitful Earth; there first received,
 His beams, unactive else, their vigour find.
 Yet not to Earth are those bright luminaries
 Officious; but to thee, Earth's habitant.
 And for the Heaven's wide circuit, let it speak
 The Maker's high magnificence, who built
 So spacious, and his line stretched out so far;
 That Man may know he dwells not in his own;
 An edifice too large for him to fill,
 Lodged in a small partition; and the rest
 Ordained for uses to his Lord best known.
 The swiftness of those circles attribute,
 Though numberless, to his Omnipotence,
 That to corporeal substances could add
 Speed almost spiritual:  Me thou thinkest not slow,
 Who since the morning-hour set out from Heaven
 Where God resides, and ere mid-day arrived
 In Eden; distance inexpressible
 By numbers that have name.  But this I urge,
 Admitting motion in the Heavens, to show
 Invalid that which thee to doubt it moved;
 Not that I so affirm, though so it seem
 To thee who hast thy dwelling here on Earth.
 God, to remove his ways from human sense,
 Placed Heaven from Earth so far, that earthly sight,
 If it presume, might err in things too high,
 And no advantage gain.  What if the sun
 Be center to the world; and other stars,
 By his attractive virtue and their own
 Incited, dance about him various rounds?
 Their wandering course now high, now low, then hid,
 Progressive, retrograde, or standing still,
 In six thou seest; and what if seventh to these
 The planet earth, so stedfast though she seem,
 Insensibly three different motions move?
 Which else to several spheres thou must ascribe,
 Moved contrary with thwart obliquities;
 Or save the sun his labour, and that swift
 Nocturnal and diurnal rhomb supposed,
 Invisible else above all stars, the wheel
 Of day and night; which needs not thy belief,
 If earth, industrious of herself, fetch day
 Travelling east, and with her part averse
 From the sun's beam meet night, her other part
 Still luminous by his ray.  What if that light,
 Sent from her through the wide transpicuous air,
 To the terrestrial moon be as a star,
 Enlightening her by day, as she by night
 This earth? reciprocal, if land be there,
 Fields and inhabitants:  Her spots thou seest
 As clouds, and clouds may rain, and rain produce
 Fruits in her softened soil for some to eat
 Allotted there; and other suns perhaps,
 With their attendant moons, thou wilt descry,
 Communicating male and female light;
 Which two great sexes animate the world,
 Stored in each orb perhaps with some that live.
 For such vast room in Nature unpossessed
 By living soul, desart and desolate,
 Only to shine, yet scarce to contribute
 Each orb a glimpse of light, conveyed so far
 Down to this habitable, which returns
 Light back to them, is obvious to dispute.
 But whether thus these things, or whether not;
 But whether the sun, predominant in Heaven,
 Rise on the earth; or earth rise on the sun;
 He from the east his flaming road begin;
 Or she from west her silent course advance,
 With inoffensive pace that spinning sleeps
 On her soft axle, while she paces even,
 And bears thee soft with the smooth hair along;
 Sollicit not thy thoughts with matters hid;
 Leave them to God above; him serve, and fear!
 Of other creatures, as him pleases best,
 Wherever placed, let him dispose; joy thou
 In what he gives to thee, this Paradise
 And thy fair Eve; Heaven is for thee too high
 To know what passes there; be lowly wise:
 Think only what concerns thee, and thy being;
 Dream not of other worlds, what creatures there
 Live, in what state, condition, or degree;
 Contented that thus far hath been revealed
 Not of Earth only, but of highest Heaven.
 To whom thus Adam, cleared of doubt, replied.
 How fully hast thou satisfied me, pure
 Intelligence of Heaven, Angel serene!
 And, freed from intricacies, taught to live
 The easiest way; nor with perplexing thoughts
 To interrupt the sweet of life, from which
 God hath bid dwell far off all anxious cares,
 And not molest us; unless we ourselves
 Seek them with wandering thoughts, and notions vain.
 But apt the mind or fancy is to rove
 Unchecked, and of her roving is no end;
 Till warned, or by experience taught, she learn,
 That, not to know at large of things remote
 From use, obscure and subtle; but, to know
 That which before us lies in daily life,
 Is the prime wisdom:  What is more, is fume,
 Or emptiness, or fond impertinence:
 And renders us, in things that most concern,
 Unpractised, unprepared, and still to seek.
 Therefore from this high pitch let us descend
 A lower flight, and speak of things at hand
 Useful; whence, haply, mention may arise
 Of something not unseasonable to ask,
 By sufferance, and thy wonted favour, deigned.
 Thee I have heard relating what was done
 Ere my remembrance: now, hear me relate
 My story, which perhaps thou hast not heard;
 And day is not yet spent; till then thou seest
 How subtly to detain thee I devise;
 Inviting thee to hear while I relate;
 Fond! were it not in hope of thy reply:
 For, while I sit with thee, I seem in Heaven;
 And sweeter thy discourse is to my ear
 Than fruits of palm-tree pleasantest to thirst
 And hunger both, from labour, at the hour
 Of sweet repast; they satiate, and soon fill,
 Though pleasant; but thy words, with grace divine
 Imbued, bring to their sweetness no satiety.
 To whom thus Raphael answered heavenly meek.
 Nor are thy lips ungraceful, Sire of men,
 Nor tongue ineloquent; for God on thee
 Abundantly his gifts hath also poured
 Inward and outward both, his image fair:
 Speaking, or mute, all comeliness and grace
 Attends thee; and each word, each motion, forms;
 Nor less think we in Heaven of thee on Earth
 Than of our fellow-servant, and inquire
 Gladly into the ways of God with Man:
 For God, we see, hath honoured thee, and set
 On Man his equal love:  Say therefore on;
 For I that day was absent, as befel,
 Bound on a voyage uncouth and obscure,
 Far on excursion toward the gates of Hell;
 Squared in full legion (such command we had)
 To see that none thence issued forth a spy,
 Or enemy, while God was in his work;
 Lest he, incensed at such eruption bold,
 Destruction with creation might have mixed.
 Not that they durst without his leave attempt;
 But us he sends upon his high behests
 For state, as Sovran King; and to inure
 Our prompt obedience.  Fast we found, fast shut,
 The dismal gates, and barricadoed strong;
 But long ere our approaching heard within
 Noise, other than the sound of dance or song,
 Torment, and loud lament, and furious rage.
 Glad we returned up to the coasts of light
 Ere sabbath-evening: so we had in charge.
 But thy relation now; for I attend,
 Pleased with thy words no less than thou with mine.
 So spake the Godlike Power, and thus our Sire.
 For Man to tell how human life began
 Is hard; for who himself beginning knew
 Desire with thee still longer to converse
 Induced me.  As new waked from soundest sleep,
 Soft on the flowery herb I found me laid,
 In balmy sweat; which with his beams the sun
 Soon dried, and on the reeking moisture fed.
 Straight toward Heaven my wondering eyes I turned,
 And gazed a while the ample sky; till, raised
 By quick instinctive motion, up I sprung,
 As thitherward endeavouring, and upright
 Stood on my feet: about me round I saw
 Hill, dale, and shady woods, and sunny plains,
 And liquid lapse of murmuring streams; by these,
 Creatures that lived and moved, and walked, or flew;
 Birds on the branches warbling; all things smiled;
 With fragrance and with joy my heart o'erflowed.
 Myself I then perused, and limb by limb
 Surveyed, and sometimes went, and sometimes ran
 With supple joints, as lively vigour led:
 But who I was, or where, or from what cause,
 Knew not; to speak I tried, and forthwith spake;
 My tongue obeyed, and readily could name
 Whate'er I saw.  Thou Sun, said I, fair light,
 And thou enlightened Earth, so fresh and gay,
 Ye Hills, and Dales, ye Rivers, Woods, and Plains,
 And ye that live and move, fair Creatures, tell,
 Tell, if ye saw, how I came thus, how here?--
 Not of myself;--by some great Maker then,
 In goodness and in power pre-eminent:
 Tell me, how may I know him, how adore,
 From whom I have that thus I move and live,
 And feel that I am happier than I know.--
 While thus I called, and strayed I knew not whither,
 From where I first drew air, and first beheld
 This happy light; when, answer none returned,
 On a green shady bank, profuse of flowers,
 Pensive I sat me down:  There gentle sleep
 First found me, and with soft oppression seised
 My droused sense, untroubled, though I thought
 I then was passing to my former state
 Insensible, and forthwith to dissolve:
 When suddenly stood at my head a dream,
 Whose inward apparition gently moved
 My fancy to believe I yet had being,
 And lived:  One came, methought, of shape divine,
 And said, "Thy mansion wants thee, Adam; rise,
 First Man, of men innumerable ordained
 First Father! called by thee, I come thy guide
 To the garden of bliss, thy seat prepared."
 So saying, by the hand he took me raised,
 And over fields and waters, as in air
 Smooth-sliding without step, last led me up
 A woody mountain; whose high top was plain,
 A circuit wide, enclosed, with goodliest trees
 Planted, with walks, and bowers; that what I saw
 Of Earth before scarce pleasant seemed.  Each tree,
 Loaden with fairest fruit that hung to the eye
 Tempting, stirred in me sudden appetite
 To pluck and eat; whereat I waked, and found
 Before mine eyes all real, as the dream
 Had lively shadowed:  Here had new begun
 My wandering, had not he, who was my guide
 Up hither, from among the trees appeared,
 Presence Divine.  Rejoicing, but with awe,
 In adoration at his feet I fell
 Submiss:  He reared me, and "Whom thou soughtest I am,"
 Said mildly, "Author of all this thou seest
 Above, or round about thee, or beneath.
 This Paradise I give thee, count it thine
 To till and keep, and of the fruit to eat:
 Of every tree that in the garden grows
 Eat freely with glad heart; fear here no dearth:
 But of the tree whose operation brings
 Knowledge of good and ill, which I have set
 The pledge of thy obedience and thy faith,
 Amid the garden by the tree of life,
 Remember what I warn thee, shun to taste,
 And shun the bitter consequence: for know,
 The day thou eatest thereof, my sole command
 Transgressed, inevitably thou shalt die,
 From that day mortal; and this happy state
 Shalt lose, expelled from hence into a world
 Of woe and sorrow."  Sternly he pronounced
 The rigid interdiction, which resounds
 Yet dreadful in mine ear, though in my choice
 Not to incur; but soon his clear aspect
 Returned, and gracious purpose thus renewed.
 "Not only these fair bounds, but all the Earth
 To thee and to thy race I give; as lords
 Possess it, and all things that therein live,
 Or live in sea, or air; beast, fish, and fowl.
 In sign whereof, each bird and beast behold
 After their kinds; I bring them to receive
 From thee their names, and pay thee fealty
 With low subjection; understand the same
 Of fish within their watery residence,
 Not hither summoned, since they cannot change
 Their element, to draw the thinner air."
 As thus he spake, each bird and beast behold
 Approaching two and two; these cowering low
 With blandishment; each bird stooped on his wing.
 I named them, as they passed, and understood
 Their nature, with such knowledge God endued
 My sudden apprehension:  But in these
 I found not what methought I wanted still;
 And to the heavenly Vision thus presumed.
 O, by what name, for thou above all these,
 Above mankind, or aught than mankind higher,
 Surpassest far my naming; how may I
 Adore thee, Author of this universe,
 And all this good to man? for whose well being
 So amply, and with hands so liberal,
 Thou hast provided all things:  But with me
 I see not who partakes.  In solitude
 What happiness, who can enjoy alone,
 Or, all enjoying, what contentment find?
 Thus I presumptuous; and the Vision bright,
 As with a smile more brightened, thus replied.
 What callest thou solitude?  Is not the Earth
 With various living creatures, and the air
 Replenished, and all these at thy command
 To come and play before thee?  Knowest thou not
 Their language and their ways?  They also know,
 And reason not contemptibly:  With these
 Find pastime, and bear rule; thy realm is large.
 So spake the Universal Lord, and seemed
 So ordering:  I, with leave of speech implored,
 And humble deprecation, thus replied.
 Let not my words offend thee, Heavenly Power;
 My Maker, be propitious while I speak.
 Hast thou not made me here thy substitute,
 And these inferiour far beneath me set?
 Among unequals what society
 Can sort, what harmony, or true delight?
 Which must be mutual, in proportion due
 Given and received; but, in disparity
 The one intense, the other still remiss,
 Cannot well suit with either, but soon prove
 Tedious alike:  Of fellowship I speak
 Such as I seek, fit to participate
 All rational delight: wherein the brute
 Cannot be human consort:  They rejoice
 Each with their kind, lion with lioness;
 So fitly them in pairs thou hast combined:
 Much less can bird with beast, or fish with fowl
 So well converse, nor with the ox the ape;
 Worse then can man with beast, and least of all.
 Whereto the Almighty answered, not displeased.
 A nice and subtle happiness, I see,
 Thou to thyself proposest, in the choice
 Of thy associates, Adam! and wilt taste
 No pleasure, though in pleasure, solitary.
 What thinkest thou then of me, and this my state?
 Seem I to thee sufficiently possessed
 Of happiness, or not? who am alone
 From all eternity; for none I know
 Second to me or like, equal much less.
 How have I then with whom to hold converse,
 Save with the creatures which I made, and those
 To me inferiour, infinite descents
 Beneath what other creatures are to thee?
 He ceased; I lowly answered.  To attain
 The highth and depth of thy eternal ways
 All human thoughts come short, Supreme of things!
 Thou in thyself art perfect, and in thee
 Is no deficience found:  Not so is Man,
 But in degree; the cause of his desire
 By conversation with his like to help
 Or solace his defects.  No need that thou
 Shouldst propagate, already Infinite;
 And through all numbers absolute, though One:
 But Man by number is to manifest
 His single imperfection, and beget
 Like of his like, his image multiplied,
 In unity defective; which requires
 Collateral love, and dearest amity.
 Thou in thy secresy although alone,
 Best with thyself accompanied, seekest not
 Social communication; yet, so pleased,
 Canst raise thy creature to what highth thou wilt
 Of union or communion, deified:
 I, by conversing, cannot these erect
 From prone; nor in their ways complacence find.
 Thus I emboldened spake, and freedom used
 Permissive, and acceptance found; which gained
 This answer from the gracious Voice Divine.
 Thus far to try thee, Adam, I was pleased;
 And find thee knowing, not of beasts alone,
 Which thou hast rightly named, but of thyself;
 Expressing well the spirit within thee free,
 My image, not imparted to the brute;
 Whose fellowship therefore unmeet for thee
 Good reason was thou freely shouldst dislike;
 And be so minded still:  I, ere thou spakest,
 Knew it not good for Man to be alone;
 And no such company as then thou sawest
 Intended thee; for trial only brought,
 To see how thou couldest judge of fit and meet:
 What next I bring shall please thee, be assured,
 Thy likeness, thy fit help, thy other self,
 Thy wish exactly to thy heart's desire.
 He ended, or I heard no more; for now
 My earthly by his heavenly overpowered,
 Which it had long stood under, strained to the highth
 In that celestial colloquy sublime,
 As with an object that excels the sense
 Dazzled and spent, sunk down; and sought repair
 Of sleep, which instantly fell on me, called
 By Nature as in aid, and closed mine eyes.
 Mine eyes he closed, but open left the cell
 Of fancy, my internal sight; by which,
 Abstract as in a trance, methought I saw,
 Though sleeping, where I lay, and saw the shape
 Still glorious before whom awake I stood:
 Who stooping opened my left side, and took
 From thence a rib, with cordial spirits warm,
 And life-blood streaming fresh; wide was the wound,
 But suddenly with flesh filled up and healed:
 The rib he formed and fashioned with his hands;
 Under his forming hands a creature grew,
 Man-like, but different sex; so lovely fair,
 That what seemed fair in all the world, seemed now
 Mean, or in her summed up, in her contained
 And in her looks; which from that time infused
 Sweetness into my heart, unfelt before,
 And into all things from her air inspired
 The spirit of love and amorous delight.
 She disappeared, and left me dark; I waked
 To find her, or for ever to deplore
 Her loss, and other pleasures all abjure:
 When out of hope, behold her, not far off,
 Such as I saw her in my dream, adorned
 With what all Earth or Heaven could bestow
 To make her amiable:  On she came,
 Led by her heavenly Maker, though unseen,
 And guided by his voice; nor uninformed
 Of nuptial sanctity, and marriage rites:
 Grace was in all her steps, Heaven in her eye,
 In every gesture dignity and love.
 I, overjoyed, could not forbear aloud.
 This turn hath made amends; thou hast fulfilled
 Thy words, Creator bounteous and benign,
 Giver of all things fair! but fairest this
 Of all thy gifts! nor enviest.  I now see
 Bone of my bone, flesh of my flesh, myself
 Before me:  Woman is her name; of Man
 Extracted: for this cause he shall forego
 Father and mother, and to his wife adhere;
 And they shall be one flesh, one heart, one soul.
 She heard me thus; and though divinely brought,
 Yet innocence, and virgin modesty,
 Her virtue, and the conscience of her worth,
 That would be wooed, and not unsought be won,
 Not obvious, not obtrusive, but, retired,
 The more desirable; or, to say all,
 Nature herself, though pure of sinful thought,
 Wrought in her so, that, seeing me, she turned:
 I followed her; she what was honour knew,
 And with obsequious majesty approved
 My pleaded reason.  To the nuptial bower
 I led her blushing like the morn: All Heaven,
 And happy constellations, on that hour
 Shed their selectest influence; the Earth
 Gave sign of gratulation, and each hill;
 Joyous the birds; fresh gales and gentle airs
 Whispered it to the woods, and from their wings
 Flung rose, flung odours from the spicy shrub,
 Disporting, till the amorous bird of night
 Sung spousal, and bid haste the evening-star
 On his hill top, to light the bridal lamp.
 Thus have I told thee all my state, and brought
 My story to the sum of earthly bliss,
 Which I enjoy; and must confess to find
 In all things else delight indeed, but such
 As, used or not, works in the mind no change,
 Nor vehement desire; these delicacies
 I mean of taste, sight, smell, herbs, fruits, and flowers,
 Walks, and the melody of birds: but here
 Far otherwise, transported I behold,
 Transported touch; here passion first I felt,
 Commotion strange! in all enjoyments else
 Superiour and unmoved; here only weak
 Against the charm of Beauty's powerful glance.
 Or Nature failed in me, and left some part
 Not proof enough such object to sustain;
 Or, from my side subducting, took perhaps
 More than enough; at least on her bestowed
 Too much of ornament, in outward show
 Elaborate, of inward less exact.
 For well I understand in the prime end
 Of Nature her the inferiour, in the mind
 And inward faculties, which most excel;
 In outward also her resembling less
 His image who made both, and less expressing
 The character of that dominion given
 O'er other creatures:  Yet when I approach
 Her loveliness, so absolute she seems
 And in herself complete, so well to know
 Her own, that what she wills to do or say,
 Seems wisest, virtuousest, discreetest, best:
 All higher knowledge in her presence falls
 Degraded;  Wisdom in discourse with her
 Loses discountenanced, and like Folly shows;
 Authority and Reason on her wait,
 As one intended first, not after made
 Occasionally; and, to consummate all,
 Greatness of mind and Nobleness their seat
 Build in her loveliest, and create an awe
 About her, as a guard angelick placed.
 To whom the Angel with contracted brow.
 Accuse not Nature, she hath done her part;
 Do thou but thine; and be not diffident
 Of Wisdom; she deserts thee not, if thou
 Dismiss not her, when most thou needest her nigh,
 By attributing overmuch to things
 Less excellent, as thou thyself perceivest.
 For, what admirest thou, what transports thee so,
 An outside? fair, no doubt, and worthy well
 Thy cherishing, thy honouring, and thy love;
 Not thy subjection:  Weigh with her thyself;
 Then value:  Oft-times nothing profits more
 Than self-esteem, grounded on just and right
 Well managed; of that skill the more thou knowest,
 The more she will acknowledge thee her head,
 And to realities yield all her shows:
 Made so adorn for thy delight the more,
 So awful, that with honour thou mayest love
 Thy mate, who sees when thou art seen least wise.
 But if the sense of touch, whereby mankind
 Is propagated, seem such dear delight
 Beyond all other; think the same vouchsafed
 To cattle and each beast; which would not be
 To them made common and divulged, if aught
 Therein enjoyed were worthy to subdue
 The soul of man, or passion in him move.
 What higher in her society thou findest
 Attractive, human, rational, love still;
 In loving thou dost well, in passion not,
 Wherein true love consists not:  Love refines
 The thoughts, and heart enlarges; hath his seat
 In reason, and is judicious; is the scale
 By which to heavenly love thou mayest ascend,
 Not sunk in carnal pleasure; for which cause,
 Among the beasts no mate for thee was found.
 To whom thus, half abashed, Adam replied.
 Neither her outside formed so fair, nor aught
 In procreation common to all kinds,
 (Though higher of the genial bed by far,
 And with mysterious reverence I deem,)
 So much delights me, as those graceful acts,
 Those thousand decencies, that daily flow
 From all her words and actions mixed with love
 And sweet compliance, which declare unfeigned
 Union of mind, or in us both one soul;
 Harmony to behold in wedded pair
 More grateful than harmonious sound to the ear.
 Yet these subject not; I to thee disclose
 What inward thence I feel, not therefore foiled,
 Who meet with various objects, from the sense
 Variously representing; yet, still free,
 Approve the best, and follow what I approve.
 To love, thou blamest me not; for Love, thou sayest,
 Leads up to Heaven, is both the way and guide;
 Bear with me then, if lawful what I ask:
 Love not the heavenly Spirits, and how their love
 Express they? by looks only? or do they mix
 Irradiance, virtual or immediate touch?
 To whom the Angel, with a smile that glowed
 Celestial rosy red, Love's proper hue,
 Answered.  Let it suffice thee that thou knowest
 Us happy, and without love no happiness.
 Whatever pure thou in the body enjoyest,
 (And pure thou wert created) we enjoy
 In eminence; and obstacle find none
 Of membrane, joint, or limb, exclusive bars;
 Easier than air with air, if Spirits embrace,
 Total they mix, union of pure with pure
 Desiring, nor restrained conveyance need,
 As flesh to mix with flesh, or soul with soul.
 But I can now no more; the parting sun
 Beyond the Earth's green Cape and verdant Isles
 Hesperian sets, my signal to depart.
 Be strong, live happy, and love!  But, first of all,
 Him, whom to love is to obey, and keep
 His great command; take heed lest passion sway
 Thy judgement to do aught, which else free will
 Would not admit: thine, and of all thy sons,
 The weal or woe in thee is placed; beware!
 I in thy persevering shall rejoice,
 And all the Blest:  Stand fast; to stand or fall
 Free in thine own arbitrement it lies.
 Perfect within, no outward aid require;
 And all temptation to transgress repel.
 So saying, he arose; whom Adam thus
 Followed with benediction.  Since to part,
 Go, heavenly guest, ethereal Messenger,
 Sent from whose sovran goodness I adore!
 Gentle to me and affable hath been
 Thy condescension, and shall be honoured ever
 With grateful memory:  Thou to mankind
 Be good and friendly still, and oft return!
 So parted they; the Angel up to Heaven
 From the thick shade, and Adam to his bower.
 
 
 
 Book IX
 
 
 No more of talk where God or Angel guest
 With Man, as with his friend, familiar us'd,
 To sit indulgent, and with him partake
 Rural repast; permitting him the while
 Venial discourse unblam'd.  I now must change
 Those notes to tragick; foul distrust, and breach
 Disloyal on the part of Man, revolt,
 And disobedience: on the part of Heaven
 Now alienated, distance and distaste,
 Anger and just rebuke, and judgement given,
 That brought into this world a world of woe,
 Sin and her shadow Death, and Misery
 Death's harbinger: Sad task! yet argument
 Not less but more heroick than the wrath
 Of stern Achilles on his foe pursued
 Thrice fugitive about Troy wall; or rage
 Of Turnus for Lavinia disespous'd;
 Or Neptune's ire, or Juno's, that so long
 Perplexed the Greek, and Cytherea's son:
 If answerable style I can obtain
 Of my celestial patroness, who deigns
 Her nightly visitation unimplor'd,
 And dictates to me slumbering; or inspires
 Easy my unpremeditated verse:
 Since first this subject for heroick song
 Pleas'd me long choosing, and beginning late;
 Not sedulous by nature to indite
 Wars, hitherto the only argument
 Heroick deem'd chief mastery to dissect
 With long and tedious havock fabled knights
 In battles feign'd; the better fortitude
 Of patience and heroick martyrdom
 Unsung; or to describe races and games,
 Or tilting furniture, imblazon'd shields,
 Impresses quaint, caparisons and steeds,
 Bases and tinsel trappings, gorgeous knights
 At joust and tournament; then marshall'd feast
 Serv'd up in hall with sewers and seneshals;
 The skill of artifice or office mean,
 Not that which justly gives heroick name
 To person, or to poem.  Me, of these
 Nor skill'd nor studious, higher argument
 Remains; sufficient of itself to raise
 That name, unless an age too late, or cold
 Climate, or years, damp my intended wing
 Depress'd; and much they may, if all be mine,
 Not hers, who brings it nightly to my ear.
 The sun was sunk, and after him the star
 Of Hesperus, whose office is to bring
 Twilight upon the earth, short arbiter
 'Twixt day and night, and now from end to end
 Night's hemisphere had veil'd the horizon round:
 When satan, who late fled before the threats
 Of Gabriel out of Eden, now improv'd
 In meditated fraud and malice, bent
 On Man's destruction, maugre what might hap
 Of heavier on himself, fearless returned
 By night he fled, and at midnight returned
 From compassing the earth; cautious of day,
 Since Uriel, regent of the sun, descried
 His entrance, and foreworned the Cherubim
 That kept their watch; thence full of anguish driven,
 The space of seven continued nights he rode
 With darkness; thrice the equinoctial line
 He circled; four times crossed the car of night
 From pole to pole, traversing each colure;
 On the eighth returned; and, on the coast averse
 From entrance or Cherubick watch, by stealth
 Found unsuspected way.  There was a place,
 Now not, though sin, not time, first wrought the change,
 Where Tigris, at the foot of Paradise,
 Into a gulf shot under ground, till part
 Rose up a fountain by the tree of life:
 In with the river sunk, and with it rose
 Satan, involved in rising mist; then sought
 Where to lie hid; sea he had searched, and land,
 From Eden over Pontus and the pool
 Maeotis, up beyond the river Ob;
 Downward as far antarctick; and in length,
 West from Orontes to the ocean barred
 At Darien; thence to the land where flows
 Ganges and Indus: Thus the orb he roamed
 With narrow search; and with inspection deep
 Considered every creature, which of all
 Most opportune might serve his wiles; and found
 The Serpent subtlest beast of all the field.
 Him after long debate, irresolute
 Of thoughts revolved, his final sentence chose
 Fit vessel, fittest imp of fraud, in whom
 To enter, and his dark suggestions hide
 From sharpest sight: for, in the wily snake
 Whatever sleights, none would suspicious mark,
 As from his wit and native subtlety
 Proceeding; which, in other beasts observed,
 Doubt might beget of diabolick power
 Active within, beyond the sense of brute.
 Thus he resolved, but first from inward grief
 His bursting passion into plaints thus poured.
 More justly, seat worthier of Gods, as built
 With second thoughts, reforming what was old!
 O Earth, how like to Heaven, if not preferred
 For what God, after better, worse would build?
 Terrestrial Heaven, danced round by other Heavens
 That shine, yet bear their bright officious lamps,
 Light above light, for thee alone, as seems,
 In thee concentring all their precious beams
 Of sacred influence!  As God in Heaven
 Is center, yet extends to all; so thou,
 Centring, receivest from all those orbs: in thee,
 Not in themselves, all their known virtue appears
 Productive in herb, plant, and nobler birth
 Of creatures animate with gradual life
 Of growth, sense, reason, all summed up in Man.
 With what delight could I have walked thee round,
 If I could joy in aught, sweet interchange
 Of hill, and valley, rivers, woods, and plains,
 Now land, now sea and shores with forest crowned,
 Rocks, dens, and caves!  But I in none of these
 Find place or refuge; and the more I see
 Pleasures about me, so much more I feel
 Torment within me, as from the hateful siege
 Of contraries: all good to me becomes
 Bane, and in Heaven much worse would be my state.
 But neither here seek I, no nor in Heaven
 To dwell, unless by mastering Heaven's Supreme;
 Nor hope to be myself less miserable
 By what I seek, but others to make such
 As I, though thereby worse to me redound:
 For only in destroying I find ease
 To my relentless thoughts; and, him destroyed,
 Or won to what may work his utter loss,
 For whom all this was made, all this will soon
 Follow, as to him linked in weal or woe;
 In woe then; that destruction wide may range:
 To me shall be the glory sole among
 The infernal Powers, in one day to have marred
 What he, Almighty styled, six nights and days
 Continued making; and who knows how long
 Before had been contriving? though perhaps
 Not longer than since I, in one night, freed
 From servitude inglorious well nigh half
 The angelick name, and thinner left the throng
 Of his adorers: He, to be avenged,
 And to repair his numbers thus impaired,
 Whether such virtue spent of old now failed
 More Angels to create, if they at least
 Are his created, or, to spite us more,
 Determined to advance into our room
 A creature formed of earth, and him endow,
 Exalted from so base original,
 With heavenly spoils, our spoils: What he decreed,
 He effected; Man he made, and for him built
 Magnificent this world, and earth his seat,
 Him lord pronounced; and, O indignity!
 Subjected to his service angel-wings,
 And flaming ministers to watch and tend
 Their earthly charge: Of these the vigilance
 I dread; and, to elude, thus wrapt in mist
 Of midnight vapour glide obscure, and pry
 In every bush and brake, where hap may find
 The serpent sleeping; in whose mazy folds
 To hide me, and the dark intent I bring.
 O foul descent! that I, who erst contended
 With Gods to sit the highest, am now constrained
 Into a beast; and, mixed with bestial slime,
 This essence to incarnate and imbrute,
 That to the highth of Deity aspired!
 But what will not ambition and revenge
 Descend to?  Who aspires, must down as low
 As high he soared; obnoxious, first or last,
 To basest things.  Revenge, at first though sweet,
 Bitter ere long, back on itself recoils:
 Let it; I reck not, so it light well aimed,
 Since higher I fall short, on him who next
 Provokes my envy, this new favourite
 Of Heaven, this man of clay, son of despite,
 Whom, us the more to spite, his Maker raised
 From dust: Spite then with spite is best repaid.
 So saying, through each thicket dank or dry,
 Like a black mist low-creeping, he held on
 His midnight-search, where soonest he might find
 The serpent; him fast-sleeping soon he found
 In labyrinth of many a round self-rolled,
 His head the midst, well stored with subtile wiles:
 Not yet in horrid shade or dismal den,
 Nor nocent yet; but, on the grassy herb,
 Fearless unfeared he slept: in at his mouth
 The Devil entered; and his brutal sense,
 In heart or head, possessing, soon inspired
 With act intelligential; but his sleep
 Disturbed not, waiting close the approach of morn.
 Now, when as sacred light began to dawn
 In Eden on the humid flowers, that breathed
 Their morning incense, when all things, that breathe,
 From the Earth's great altar send up silent praise
 To the Creator, and his nostrils fill
 With grateful smell, forth came the human pair,
 And joined their vocal worship to the quire
 Of creatures wanting voice; that done, partake
 The season prime for sweetest scents and airs:
 Then commune, how that day they best may ply
 Their growing work: for much their work out-grew
 The hands' dispatch of two gardening so wide,
 And Eve first to her husband thus began.
 Adam, well may we labour still to dress
 This garden, still to tend plant, herb, and flower,
 Our pleasant task enjoined; but, till more hands
 Aid us, the work under our labour grows,
 Luxurious by restraint; what we by day
 Lop overgrown, or prune, or prop, or bind,
 One night or two with wanton growth derides
 Tending to wild.  Thou therefore now advise,
 Or bear what to my mind first thoughts present:
 Let us divide our labours; thou, where choice
 Leads thee, or where most needs, whether to wind
 The woodbine round this arbour, or direct
 The clasping ivy where to climb; while I,
 In yonder spring of roses intermixed
 With myrtle, find what to redress till noon:
 For, while so near each other thus all day
 Our task we choose, what wonder if so near
 Looks intervene and smiles, or object new
 Casual discourse draw on; which intermits
 Our day's work, brought to little, though begun
 Early, and the hour of supper comes unearned?
 To whom mild answer Adam thus returned.
 Sole Eve, associate sole, to me beyond
 Compare above all living creatures dear!
 Well hast thou motioned, well thy thoughts employed,
 How we might best fulfil the work which here
 God hath assigned us; nor of me shalt pass
 Unpraised: for nothing lovelier can be found
 In woman, than to study houshold good,
 And good works in her husband to promote.
 Yet not so strictly hath our Lord imposed
 Labour, as to debar us when we need
 Refreshment, whether food, or talk between,
 Food of the mind, or this sweet intercourse
 Of looks and smiles; for smiles from reason flow,
 To brute denied, and are of love the food;
 Love, not the lowest end of human life.
 For not to irksome toil, but to delight,
 He made us, and delight to reason joined.
 These paths and bowers doubt not but our joint hands
 Will keep from wilderness with ease, as wide
 As we need walk, till younger hands ere long
 Assist us; But, if much converse perhaps
 Thee satiate, to short absence I could yield:
 For solitude sometimes is best society,
 And short retirement urges sweet return.
 But other doubt possesses me, lest harm
 Befall thee severed from me; for thou knowest
 What hath been warned us, what malicious foe
 Envying our happiness, and of his own
 Despairing, seeks to work us woe and shame
 By sly assault; and somewhere nigh at hand
 Watches, no doubt, with greedy hope to find
 His wish and best advantage, us asunder;
 Hopeless to circumvent us joined, where each
 To other speedy aid might lend at need:
 Whether his first design be to withdraw
 Our fealty from God, or to disturb
 Conjugal love, than which perhaps no bliss
 Enjoyed by us excites his envy more;
 Or this, or worse, leave not the faithful side
 That gave thee being, still shades thee, and protects.
 The wife, where danger or dishonour lurks,
 Safest and seemliest by her husband stays,
 Who guards her, or with her the worst endures.
 To whom the virgin majesty of Eve,
 As one who loves, and some unkindness meets,
 With sweet austere composure thus replied.
 Offspring of Heaven and Earth, and all Earth's Lord!
 That such an enemy we have, who seeks
 Our ruin, both by thee informed I learn,
 And from the parting Angel over-heard,
 As in a shady nook I stood behind,
 Just then returned at shut of evening flowers.
 But, that thou shouldst my firmness therefore doubt
 To God or thee, because we have a foe
 May tempt it, I expected not to hear.
 His violence thou fearest not, being such
 As we, not capable of death or pain,
 Can either not receive, or can repel.
 His fraud is then thy fear; which plain infers
 Thy equal fear, that my firm faith and love
 Can by his fraud be shaken or seduced;
 Thoughts, which how found they harbour in thy breast,
 Adam, mis-thought of her to thee so dear?
 To whom with healing words Adam replied.
 Daughter of God and Man, immortal Eve!
 For such thou art; from sin and blame entire:
 Not diffident of thee do I dissuade
 Thy absence from my sight, but to avoid
 The attempt itself, intended by our foe.
 For he who tempts, though in vain, at least asperses
 The tempted with dishonour foul; supposed
 Not incorruptible of faith, not proof
 Against temptation: Thou thyself with scorn
 And anger wouldst resent the offered wrong,
 Though ineffectual found: misdeem not then,
 If such affront I labour to avert
 From thee alone, which on us both at once
 The enemy, though bold, will hardly dare;
 Or daring, first on me the assault shall light.
 Nor thou his malice and false guile contemn;
 Subtle he needs must be, who could seduce
 Angels; nor think superfluous other's aid.
 I, from the influence of thy looks, receive
 Access in every virtue; in thy sight
 More wise, more watchful, stronger, if need were
 Of outward strength; while shame, thou looking on,
 Shame to be overcome or over-reached,
 Would utmost vigour raise, and raised unite.
 Why shouldst not thou like sense within thee feel
 When I am present, and thy trial choose
 With me, best witness of thy virtue tried?
 So spake domestick Adam in his care
 And matrimonial love; but Eve, who thought
 Less attributed to her faith sincere,
 Thus her reply with accent sweet renewed.
 If this be our condition, thus to dwell
 In narrow circuit straitened by a foe,
 Subtle or violent, we not endued
 Single with like defence, wherever met;
 How are we happy, still in fear of harm?
 But harm precedes not sin: only our foe,
 Tempting, affronts us with his foul esteem
 Of our integrity: his foul esteem
 Sticks no dishonour on our front, but turns
 Foul on himself; then wherefore shunned or feared
 By us? who rather double honour gain
 From his surmise proved false; find peace within,
 Favour from Heaven, our witness, from the event.
 And what is faith, love, virtue, unassayed
 Alone, without exteriour help sustained?
 Let us not then suspect our happy state
 Left so imperfect by the Maker wise,
 As not secure to single or combined.
 Frail is our happiness, if this be so,
 And Eden were no Eden, thus exposed.
 To whom thus Adam fervently replied.
 O Woman, best are all things as the will
 Of God ordained them: His creating hand
 Nothing imperfect or deficient left
 Of all that he created, much less Man,
 Or aught that might his happy state secure,
 Secure from outward force; within himself
 The danger lies, yet lies within his power:
 Against his will he can receive no harm.
 But God left free the will; for what obeys
 Reason, is free; and Reason he made right,
 But bid her well be ware, and still erect;
 Lest, by some fair-appearing good surprised,
 She dictate false; and mis-inform the will
 To do what God expressly hath forbid.
 Not then mistrust, but tender love, enjoins,
 That I should mind thee oft; and mind thou me.
 Firm we subsist, yet possible to swerve;
 Since Reason not impossibly may meet
 Some specious object by the foe suborned,
 And fall into deception unaware,
 Not keeping strictest watch, as she was warned.
 Seek not temptation then, which to avoid
 Were better, and most likely if from me
 Thou sever not: Trial will come unsought.
 Wouldst thou approve thy constancy, approve
 First thy obedience; the other who can know,
 Not seeing thee attempted, who attest?
 But, if thou think, trial unsought may find
 Us both securer than thus warned thou seemest,
 Go; for thy stay, not free, absents thee more;
 Go in thy native innocence, rely
 On what thou hast of virtue; summon all!
 For God towards thee hath done his part, do thine.
 So spake the patriarch of mankind; but Eve
 Persisted; yet submiss, though last, replied.
 With thy permission then, and thus forewarned
 Chiefly by what thy own last reasoning words
 Touched only; that our trial, when least sought,
 May find us both perhaps far less prepared,
 The willinger I go, nor much expect
 A foe so proud will first the weaker seek;
 So bent, the more shall shame him his repulse.
 Thus saying, from her husband's hand her hand
 Soft she withdrew; and, like a Wood-Nymph light,
 Oread or Dryad, or of Delia's train,
 Betook her to the groves; but Delia's self
 In gait surpassed, and Goddess-like deport,
 Though not as she with bow and quiver armed,
 But with such gardening tools as Art yet rude,
 Guiltless of fire, had formed, or Angels brought.
 To Pales, or Pomona, thus adorned,
 Likest she seemed, Pomona when she fled
 Vertumnus, or to Ceres in her prime,
 Yet virgin of Proserpina from Jove.
 Her long with ardent look his eye pursued
 Delighted, but desiring more her stay.
 Oft he to her his charge of quick return
 Repeated; she to him as oft engaged
 To be returned by noon amid the bower,
 And all things in best order to invite
 Noontide repast, or afternoon's repose.
 O much deceived, much failing, hapless Eve,
 Of thy presumed return! event perverse!
 Thou never from that hour in Paradise
 Foundst either sweet repast, or sound repose;
 Such ambush, hid among sweet flowers and shades,
 Waited with hellish rancour imminent
 To intercept thy way, or send thee back
 Despoiled of innocence, of faith, of bliss!
 For now, and since first break of dawn, the Fiend,
 Mere serpent in appearance, forth was come;
 And on his quest, where likeliest he might find
 The only two of mankind, but in them
 The whole included race, his purposed prey.
 In bower and field he sought, where any tuft
 Of grove or garden-plot more pleasant lay,
 Their tendance, or plantation for delight;
 By fountain or by shady rivulet
 He sought them both, but wished his hap might find
 Eve separate; he wished, but not with hope
 Of what so seldom chanced; when to his wish,
 Beyond his hope, Eve separate he spies,
 Veiled in a cloud of fragrance, where she stood,
 Half spied, so thick the roses blushing round
 About her glowed, oft stooping to support
 Each flower of slender stalk, whose head, though gay
 Carnation, purple, azure, or specked with gold,
 Hung drooping unsustained; them she upstays
 Gently with myrtle band, mindless the while
 Herself, though fairest unsupported flower,
 From her best prop so far, and storm so nigh.
 Nearer he drew, and many a walk traversed
 Of stateliest covert, cedar, pine, or palm;
 Then voluble and bold, now hid, now seen,
 Among thick-woven arborets, and flowers
 Imbordered on each bank, the hand of Eve:
 Spot more delicious than those gardens feigned
 Or of revived Adonis, or renowned
 Alcinous, host of old Laertes' son;
 Or that, not mystick, where the sapient king
 Held dalliance with his fair Egyptian spouse.
 Much he the place admired, the person more.
 As one who long in populous city pent,
 Where houses thick and sewers annoy the air,
 Forth issuing on a summer's morn, to breathe
 Among the pleasant villages and farms
 Adjoined, from each thing met conceives delight;
 The smell of grain, or tedded grass, or kine,
 Or dairy, each rural sight, each rural sound;
 If chance, with nymph-like step, fair virgin pass,
 What pleasing seemed, for her now pleases more;
 She most, and in her look sums all delight:
 Such pleasure took the Serpent to behold
 This flowery plat, the sweet recess of Eve
 Thus early, thus alone: Her heavenly form
 Angelick, but more soft, and feminine,
 Her graceful innocence, her every air
 Of gesture, or least action, overawed
 His malice, and with rapine sweet bereaved
 His fierceness of the fierce intent it brought:
 That space the Evil-one abstracted stood
 From his own evil, and for the time remained
 Stupidly good; of enmity disarmed,
 Of guile, of hate, of envy, of revenge:
 But the hot Hell that always in him burns,
 Though in mid Heaven, soon ended his delight,
 And tortures him now more, the more he sees
 Of pleasure, not for him ordained: then soon
 Fierce hate he recollects, and all his thoughts
 Of mischief, gratulating, thus excites.
 Thoughts, whither have ye led me! with what sweet
 Compulsion thus transported, to forget
 What hither brought us! hate, not love; nor hope
 Of Paradise for Hell, hope here to taste
 Of pleasure; but all pleasure to destroy,
 Save what is in destroying; other joy
 To me is lost.  Then, let me not let pass
 Occasion which now smiles; behold alone
 The woman, opportune to all attempts,
 Her husband, for I view far round, not nigh,
 Whose higher intellectual more I shun,
 And strength, of courage haughty, and of limb
 Heroick built, though of terrestrial mould;
 Foe not informidable! exempt from wound,
 I not; so much hath Hell debased, and pain
 Enfeebled me, to what I was in Heaven.
 She fair, divinely fair, fit love for Gods!
 Not terrible, though terrour be in love
 And beauty, not approached by stronger hate,
 Hate stronger, under show of love well feigned;
 The way which to her ruin now I tend.
 So spake the enemy of mankind, enclosed
 In serpent, inmate bad! and toward Eve
 Addressed his way: not with indented wave,
 Prone on the ground, as since; but on his rear,
 Circular base of rising folds, that towered
 Fold above fold, a surging maze! his head
 Crested aloft, and carbuncle his eyes;
 With burnished neck of verdant gold, erect
 Amidst his circling spires, that on the grass
 Floated redundant: pleasing was his shape
 And lovely; never since of serpent-kind
 Lovelier, not those that in Illyria changed,
 Hermione and Cadmus, or the god
 In Epidaurus; nor to which transformed
 Ammonian Jove, or Capitoline, was seen;
 He with Olympias; this with her who bore
 Scipio, the highth of Rome.  With tract oblique
 At first, as one who sought access, but feared
 To interrupt, side-long he works his way.
 As when a ship, by skilful steersmen wrought
 Nigh river's mouth or foreland, where the wind
 Veers oft, as oft so steers, and shifts her sail:
 So varied he, and of his tortuous train
 Curled many a wanton wreath in sight of Eve,
 To lure her eye; she, busied, heard the sound
 Of rusling leaves, but minded not, as used
 To such disport before her through the field,
 From every beast; more duteous at her call,
 Than at Circean call the herd disguised.
 He, bolder now, uncalled before her stood,
 But as in gaze admiring: oft he bowed
 His turret crest, and sleek enamelled neck,
 Fawning; and licked the ground whereon she trod.
 His gentle dumb expression turned at length
 The eye of Eve to mark his play; he, glad
 Of her attention gained, with serpent-tongue
 Organick, or impulse of vocal air,
 His fraudulent temptation thus began.
 Wonder not, sovran Mistress, if perhaps
 Thou canst, who art sole wonder! much less arm
 Thy looks, the Heaven of mildness, with disdain,
 Displeased that I approach thee thus, and gaze
 Insatiate; I thus single; nor have feared
 Thy awful brow, more awful thus retired.
 Fairest resemblance of thy Maker fair,
 Thee all things living gaze on, all things thine
 By gift, and thy celestial beauty adore
 With ravishment beheld! there best beheld,
 Where universally admired; but here
 In this enclosure wild, these beasts among,
 Beholders rude, and shallow to discern
 Half what in thee is fair, one man except,
 Who sees thee? and what is one? who should be seen
 A Goddess among Gods, adored and served
 By Angels numberless, thy daily train.
 So glozed the Tempter, and his proem tuned:
 Into the heart of Eve his words made way,
 Though at the voice much marvelling; at length,
 Not unamazed, she thus in answer spake.
 What may this mean? language of man pronounced
 By tongue of brute, and human sense expressed?
 The first, at least, of these I thought denied
 To beasts; whom God, on their creation-day,
 Created mute to all articulate sound:
 The latter I demur; for in their looks
 Much reason, and in their actions, oft appears.
 Thee, Serpent, subtlest beast of all the field
 I knew, but not with human voice endued;
 Redouble then this miracle, and say,
 How camest thou speakable of mute, and how
 To me so friendly grown above the rest
 Of brutal kind, that daily are in sight?
 Say, for such wonder claims attention due.
 To whom the guileful Tempter thus replied.
 Empress of this fair world, resplendent Eve!
 Easy to me it is to tell thee all
 What thou commandest; and right thou shouldst be obeyed:
 I was at first as other beasts that graze
 The trodden herb, of abject thoughts and low,
 As was my food; nor aught but food discerned
 Or sex, and apprehended nothing high:
 Till, on a day roving the field, I chanced
 A goodly tree far distant to behold
 Loaden with fruit of fairest colours mixed,
 Ruddy and gold: I nearer drew to gaze;
 When from the boughs a savoury odour blown,
 Grateful to appetite, more pleased my sense
 Than smell of sweetest fennel, or the teats
 Of ewe or goat dropping with milk at even,
 Unsucked of lamb or kid, that tend their play.
 To satisfy the sharp desire I had
 Of tasting those fair apples, I resolved
 Not to defer; hunger and thirst at once,
 Powerful persuaders, quickened at the scent
 Of that alluring fruit, urged me so keen.
 About the mossy trunk I wound me soon;
 For, high from ground, the branches would require
 Thy utmost reach or Adam's: Round the tree
 All other beasts that saw, with like desire
 Longing and envying stood, but could not reach.
 Amid the tree now got, where plenty hung
 Tempting so nigh, to pluck and eat my fill
 I spared not; for, such pleasure till that hour,
 At feed or fountain, never had I found.
 Sated at length, ere long I might perceive
 Strange alteration in me, to degree
 Of reason in my inward powers; and speech
 Wanted not long; though to this shape retained.
 Thenceforth to speculations high or deep
 I turned my thoughts, and with capacious mind
 Considered all things visible in Heaven,
 Or Earth, or Middle; all things fair and good:
 But all that fair and good in thy divine
 Semblance, and in thy beauty's heavenly ray,
 United I beheld; no fair to thine
 Equivalent or second! which compelled
 Me thus, though importune perhaps, to come
 And gaze, and worship thee of right declared
 Sovran of creatures, universal Dame!
 So talked the spirited sly Snake; and Eve,
 Yet more amazed, unwary thus replied.
 Serpent, thy overpraising leaves in doubt
 The virtue of that fruit, in thee first proved:
 But say, where grows the tree? from hence how far?
 For many are the trees of God that grow
 In Paradise, and various, yet unknown
 To us; in such abundance lies our choice,
 As leaves a greater store of fruit untouched,
 Still hanging incorruptible, till men
 Grow up to their provision, and more hands
 Help to disburden Nature of her birth.
 To whom the wily Adder, blithe and glad.
 Empress, the way is ready, and not long;
 Beyond a row of myrtles, on a flat,
 Fast by a fountain, one small thicket past
 Of blowing myrrh and balm: if thou accept
 My conduct, I can bring thee thither soon
 Lead then, said Eve.  He, leading, swiftly rolled
 In tangles, and made intricate seem straight,
 To mischief swift.  Hope elevates, and joy
 Brightens his crest; as when a wandering fire,
 Compact of unctuous vapour, which the night
 Condenses, and the cold environs round,
 Kindled through agitation to a flame,
 Which oft, they say, some evil Spirit attends,
 Hovering and blazing with delusive light,
 Misleads the amazed night-wanderer from his way
 To bogs and mires, and oft through pond or pool;
 There swallowed up and lost, from succour far.
 So glistered the dire Snake, and into fraud
 Led Eve, our credulous mother, to the tree
 Of prohibition, root of all our woe;
 Which when she saw, thus to her guide she spake.
 Serpent, we might have spared our coming hither,
 Fruitless to me, though fruit be here to excess,
 The credit of whose virtue rest with thee;
 Wonderous indeed, if cause of such effects.
 But of this tree we may not taste nor touch;
 God so commanded, and left that command
 Sole daughter of his voice; the rest, we live
 Law to ourselves; our reason is our law.
 To whom the Tempter guilefully replied.
 Indeed! hath God then said that of the fruit
 Of all these garden-trees ye shall not eat,
 Yet Lords declared of all in earth or air?
 To whom thus Eve, yet sinless.  Of the fruit
 Of each tree in the garden we may eat;
 But of the fruit of this fair tree amidst
 The garden, God hath said, Ye shall not eat
 Thereof, nor shall ye touch it, lest ye die.
 She scarce had said, though brief, when now more bold
 The Tempter, but with show of zeal and love
 To Man, and indignation at his wrong,
 New part puts on; and, as to passion moved,
 Fluctuates disturbed, yet comely and in act
 Raised, as of some great matter to begin.
 As when of old some orator renowned,
 In Athens or free Rome, where eloquence
 Flourished, since mute! to some great cause addressed,
 Stood in himself collected; while each part,
 Motion, each act, won audience ere the tongue;
 Sometimes in highth began, as no delay
 Of preface brooking, through his zeal of right:
 So standing, moving, or to highth up grown,
 The Tempter, all impassioned, thus began.
 O sacred, wise, and wisdom-giving Plant,
 Mother of science! now I feel thy power
 Within me clear; not only to discern
 Things in their causes, but to trace the ways
 Of highest agents, deemed however wise.
 Queen of this universe! do not believe
 Those rigid threats of death: ye shall not die:
 How should you? by the fruit? it gives you life
 To knowledge; by the threatener? look on me,
 Me, who have touched and tasted; yet both live,
 And life more perfect have attained than Fate
 Meant me, by venturing higher than my lot.
 Shall that be shut to Man, which to the Beast
 Is open? or will God incense his ire
 For such a petty trespass? and not praise
 Rather your dauntless virtue, whom the pain
 Of death denounced, whatever thing death be,
 Deterred not from achieving what might lead
 To happier life, knowledge of good and evil;
 Of good, how just? of evil, if what is evil
 Be real, why not known, since easier shunned?
 God therefore cannot hurt ye, and be just;
 Not just, not God; not feared then, nor obeyed:
 Your fear itself of death removes the fear.
 Why then was this forbid?  Why, but to awe;
 Why, but to keep ye low and ignorant,
 His worshippers?  He knows that in the day
 Ye eat thereof, your eyes that seem so clear,
 Yet are but dim, shall perfectly be then
 Opened and cleared, and ye shall be as Gods,
 Knowing both good and evil, as they know.
 That ye shall be as Gods, since I as Man,
 Internal Man, is but proportion meet;
 I, of brute, human; ye, of human, Gods.
 So ye shall die perhaps, by putting off
 Human, to put on Gods; death to be wished,
 Though threatened, which no worse than this can bring.
 And what are Gods, that Man may not become
 As they, participating God-like food?
 The Gods are first, and that advantage use
 On our belief, that all from them proceeds:
 I question it; for this fair earth I see,
 Warmed by the sun, producing every kind;
 Them, nothing: if they all things, who enclosed
 Knowledge of good and evil in this tree,
 That whoso eats thereof, forthwith attains
 Wisdom without their leave? and wherein lies
 The offence, that Man should thus attain to know?
 What can your knowledge hurt him, or this tree
 Impart against his will, if all be his?
 Or is it envy? and can envy dwell
 In heavenly breasts?  These, these, and many more
 Causes import your need of this fair fruit.
 Goddess humane, reach then, and freely taste!
 He ended; and his words, replete with guile,
 Into her heart too easy entrance won:
 Fixed on the fruit she gazed, which to behold
 Might tempt alone; and in her ears the sound
 Yet rung of his persuasive words, impregned
 With reason, to her seeming, and with truth:
 Mean while the hour of noon drew on, and waked
 An eager appetite, raised by the smell
 So savoury of that fruit, which with desire,
 Inclinable now grown to touch or taste,
 Solicited her longing eye; yet first
 Pausing a while, thus to herself she mused.
 Great are thy virtues, doubtless, best of fruits,
 Though kept from man, and worthy to be admired;
 Whose taste, too long forborn, at first assay
 Gave elocution to the mute, and taught
 The tongue not made for speech to speak thy praise:
 Thy praise he also, who forbids thy use,
 Conceals not from us, naming thee the tree
 Of knowledge, knowledge both of good and evil;
 Forbids us then to taste! but his forbidding
 Commends thee more, while it infers the good
 By thee communicated, and our want:
 For good unknown sure is not had; or, had
 And yet unknown, is as not had at all.
 In plain then, what forbids he but to know,
 Forbids us good, forbids us to be wise?
 Such prohibitions bind not.  But, if death
 Bind us with after-bands, what profits then
 Our inward freedom?  In the day we eat
 Of this fair fruit, our doom is, we shall die!
 How dies the Serpent? he hath eaten and lives,
 And knows, and speaks, and reasons, and discerns,
 Irrational till then.  For us alone
 Was death invented? or to us denied
 This intellectual food, for beasts reserved?
 For beasts it seems: yet that one beast which first
 Hath tasted envies not, but brings with joy
 The good befallen him, author unsuspect,
 Friendly to man, far from deceit or guile.
 What fear I then? rather, what know to fear
 Under this ignorance of good and evil,
 Of God or death, of law or penalty?
 Here grows the cure of all, this fruit divine,
 Fair to the eye, inviting to the taste,
 Of virtue to make wise:  What hinders then
 To reach, and feed at once both body and mind?
 So saying, her rash hand in evil hour
 Forth reaching to the fruit, she plucked, she eat!
 Earth felt the wound; and Nature from her seat,
 Sighing through all her works, gave signs of woe,
 That all was lost.  Back to the thicket slunk
 The guilty Serpent; and well might; for Eve,
 Intent now wholly on her taste, nought else
 Regarded; such delight till then, as seemed,
 In fruit she never tasted, whether true
 Or fancied so, through expectation high
 Of knowledge; not was Godhead from her thought.
 Greedily she ingorged without restraint,
 And knew not eating death:  Satiate at length,
 And hightened as with wine, jocund and boon,
 Thus to herself she pleasingly began.
 O sovran, virtuous, precious of all trees
 In Paradise! of operation blest
 To sapience, hitherto obscured, infamed.
 And thy fair fruit let hang, as to no end
 Created; but henceforth my early care,
 Not without song, each morning, and due praise,
 Shall tend thee, and the fertile burden ease
 Of thy full branches offered free to all;
 Till, dieted by thee, I grow mature
 In knowledge, as the Gods, who all things know;
 Though others envy what they cannot give:
 For, had the gift been theirs, it had not here
 Thus grown.  Experience, next, to thee I owe,
 Best guide; not following thee, I had remained
 In ignorance; thou openest wisdom's way,
 And givest access, though secret she retire.
 And I perhaps am secret: Heaven is high,
 High, and remote to see from thence distinct
 Each thing on Earth; and other care perhaps
 May have diverted from continual watch
 Our great Forbidder, safe with all his spies
 About him.  But to Adam in what sort
 Shall I appear? shall I to him make known
 As yet my change, and give him to partake
 Full happiness with me, or rather not,
 But keeps the odds of knowledge in my power
 Without copartner? so to add what wants
 In female sex, the more to draw his love,
 And render me more equal; and perhaps,
 A thing not undesirable, sometime
 Superiour; for, inferiour, who is free
 This may be well:  But what if God have seen,
 And death ensue? then I shall be no more!
 And Adam, wedded to another Eve,
 Shall live with her enjoying, I extinct;
 A death to think!  Confirmed then I resolve,
 Adam shall share with me in bliss or woe:
 So dear I love him, that with him all deaths
 I could endure, without him live no life.
 So saying, from the tree her step she turned;
 But first low reverence done, as to the Power
 That dwelt within, whose presence had infused
 Into the plant sciential sap, derived
 From nectar, drink of Gods.  Adam the while,
 Waiting desirous her return, had wove
 Of choicest flowers a garland, to adorn
 Her tresses, and her rural labours crown;
 As reapers oft are wont their harvest-queen.
 Great joy he promised to his thoughts, and new
 Solace in her return, so long delayed:
 Yet oft his heart, divine of something ill,
 Misgave him; he the faltering measure felt;
 And forth to meet her went, the way she took
 That morn when first they parted: by the tree
 Of knowledge he must pass; there he her met,
 Scarce from the tree returning; in her hand
 A bough of fairest fruit, that downy smiled,
 New gathered, and ambrosial smell diffused.
 To him she hasted; in her face excuse
 Came prologue, and apology too prompt;
 Which, with bland words at will, she thus addressed.
 Hast thou not wondered, Adam, at my stay?
 Thee I have missed, and thought it long, deprived
 Thy presence; agony of love till now
 Not felt, nor shall be twice; for never more
 Mean I to try, what rash untried I sought,
 The pain of absence from thy sight.  But strange
 Hath been the cause, and wonderful to hear:
 This tree is not, as we are told, a tree
 Of danger tasted, nor to evil unknown
 Opening the way, but of divine effect
 To open eyes, and make them Gods who taste;
 And hath been tasted such:  The serpent wise,
 Or not restrained as we, or not obeying,
 Hath eaten of the fruit; and is become,
 Not dead, as we are threatened, but thenceforth
 Endued with human voice and human sense,
 Reasoning to admiration; and with me
 Persuasively hath so prevailed, that I
 Have also tasted, and have also found
 The effects to correspond; opener mine eyes,
 Dim erst, dilated spirits, ampler heart,
 And growing up to Godhead; which for thee
 Chiefly I sought, without thee can despise.
 For bliss, as thou hast part, to me is bliss;
 Tedious, unshared with thee, and odious soon.
 Thou therefore also taste, that equal lot
 May join us, equal joy, as equal love;
 Lest, thou not tasting, different degree
 Disjoin us, and I then too late renounce
 Deity for thee, when Fate will not permit.
 Thus Eve with countenance blithe her story told;
 But in her cheek distemper flushing glowed.
 On the other side Adam, soon as he heard
 The fatal trespass done by Eve, amazed,
 Astonied stood and blank, while horrour chill
 Ran through his veins, and all his joints relaxed;
 From his slack hand the garland wreathed for Eve
 Down dropt, and all the faded roses shed:
 Speechless he stood and pale, till thus at length
 First to himself he inward silence broke.
 O fairest of Creation, last and best
 Of all God's works, Creature in whom excelled
 Whatever can to sight or thought be formed,
 Holy, divine, good, amiable, or sweet!
 How art thou lost! how on a sudden lost,
 Defaced, deflowered, and now to death devote!
 Rather, how hast thou yielded to transgress
 The strict forbiddance, how to violate
 The sacred fruit forbidden!  Some cursed fraud
 Of enemy hath beguiled thee, yet unknown,
 And me with thee hath ruined; for with thee
 Certain my resolution is to die:
 How can I live without thee! how forego
 Thy sweet converse, and love so dearly joined,
 To live again in these wild woods forlorn!
 Should God create another Eve, and I
 Another rib afford, yet loss of thee
 Would never from my heart: no, no! I feel
 The link of Nature draw me: flesh of flesh,
 Bone of my bone thou art, and from thy state
 Mine never shall be parted, bliss or woe.
 So having said, as one from sad dismay
 Recomforted, and after thoughts disturbed
 Submitting to what seemed remediless,
 Thus in calm mood his words to Eve he turned.
 Bold deed thou hast presumed, adventurous Eve,
 And peril great provoked, who thus hast dared,
 Had it been only coveting to eye
 That sacred fruit, sacred to abstinence,
 Much more to taste it under ban to touch.
 But past who can recall, or done undo?
 Not God Omnipotent, nor Fate; yet so
 Perhaps thou shalt not die, perhaps the fact
 Is not so heinous now, foretasted fruit,
 Profaned first by the serpent, by him first
 Made common, and unhallowed, ere our taste;
 Nor yet on him found deadly; yet he lives;
 Lives, as thou saidst, and gains to live, as Man,
 Higher degree of life; inducement strong
 To us, as likely tasting to attain
 Proportional ascent; which cannot be
 But to be Gods, or Angels, demi-Gods.
 Nor can I think that God, Creator wise,
 Though threatening, will in earnest so destroy
 Us his prime creatures, dignified so high,
 Set over all his works; which in our fall,
 For us created, needs with us must fail,
 Dependant made; so God shall uncreate,
 Be frustrate, do, undo, and labour lose;
 Not well conceived of God, who, though his power
 Creation could repeat, yet would be loth
 Us to abolish, lest the Adversary
 Triumph, and say; "Fickle their state whom God
 Most favours; who can please him long? Me first
 He ruined, now Mankind; whom will he next?"
 Matter of scorn, not to be given the Foe.
 However I with thee have fixed my lot,
 Certain to undergo like doom:  If death
 Consort with thee, death is to me as life;
 So forcible within my heart I feel
 The bond of Nature draw me to my own;
 My own in thee, for what thou art is mine;
 Our state cannot be severed; we are one,
 One flesh; to lose thee were to lose myself.
 So Adam; and thus Eve to him replied.
 O glorious trial of exceeding love,
 Illustrious evidence, example high!
 Engaging me to emulate; but, short
 Of thy perfection, how shall I attain,
 Adam, from whose dear side I boast me sprung,
 And gladly of our union hear thee speak,
 One heart, one soul in both; whereof good proof
 This day affords, declaring thee resolved,
 Rather than death, or aught than death more dread,
 Shall separate us, linked in love so dear,
 To undergo with me one guilt, one crime,
 If any be, of tasting this fair fruit;
 Whose virtue for of good still good proceeds,
 Direct, or by occasion, hath presented
 This happy trial of thy love, which else
 So eminently never had been known?
 Were it I thought death menaced would ensue
 This my attempt, I would sustain alone
 The worst, and not persuade thee, rather die
 Deserted, than oblige thee with a fact
 Pernicious to thy peace; chiefly assured
 Remarkably so late of thy so true,
 So faithful, love unequalled: but I feel
 Far otherwise the event; not death, but life
 Augmented, opened eyes, new hopes, new joys,
 Taste so divine, that what of sweet before
 Hath touched my sense, flat seems to this, and harsh.
 On my experience, Adam, freely taste,
 And fear of death deliver to the winds.
 So saying, she embraced him, and for joy
 Tenderly wept; much won, that he his love
 Had so ennobled, as of choice to incur
 Divine displeasure for her sake, or death.
 In recompence (for such compliance bad
 Such recompence best merits) from the bough
 She gave him of that fair enticing fruit
 With liberal hand: he scrupled not to eat,
 Against his better knowledge; not deceived,
 But fondly overcome with female charm.
 Earth trembled from her entrails, as again
 In pangs; and Nature gave a second groan;
 Sky loured; and, muttering thunder, some sad drops
 Wept at completing of the mortal sin
 Original: while Adam took no thought,
 Eating his fill; nor Eve to iterate
 Her former trespass feared, the more to sooth
 Him with her loved society; that now,
 As with new wine intoxicated both,
 They swim in mirth, and fancy that they feel
 Divinity within them breeding wings,
 Wherewith to scorn the earth:  But that false fruit
 Far other operation first displayed,
 Carnal desire inflaming; he on Eve
 Began to cast lascivious eyes; she him
 As wantonly repaid; in lust they burn:
 Till Adam thus 'gan Eve to dalliance move.
 Eve, now I see thou art exact of taste,
 And elegant, of sapience no small part;
 Since to each meaning savour we apply,
 And palate call judicious; I the praise
 Yield thee, so well this day thou hast purveyed.
 Much pleasure we have lost, while we abstained
 From this delightful fruit, nor known till now
 True relish, tasting; if such pleasure be
 In things to us forbidden, it might be wished,
 For this one tree had been forbidden ten.
 But come, so well refreshed, now let us play,
 As meet is, after such delicious fare;
 For never did thy beauty, since the day
 I saw thee first and wedded thee, adorned
 With all perfections, so inflame my sense
 With ardour to enjoy thee, fairer now
 Than ever; bounty of this virtuous tree!
 So said he, and forbore not glance or toy
 Of amorous intent; well understood
 Of Eve, whose eye darted contagious fire.
 Her hand he seised; and to a shady bank,
 Thick over-head with verdant roof imbowered,
 He led her nothing loth; flowers were the couch,
 Pansies, and violets, and asphodel,
 And hyacinth;  Earth's freshest softest lap.
 There they their fill of love and love's disport
 Took largely, of their mutual guilt the seal,
 The solace of their sin; till dewy sleep
 Oppressed them, wearied with their amorous play,
 Soon as the force of that fallacious fruit,
 That with exhilarating vapour bland
 About their spirits had played, and inmost powers
 Made err, was now exhaled; and grosser sleep,
 Bred of unkindly fumes, with conscious dreams
 Incumbered, now had left them; up they rose
 As from unrest; and, each the other viewing,
 Soon found their eyes how opened, and their minds
 How darkened; innocence, that as a veil
 Had shadowed them from knowing ill, was gone;
 Just confidence, and native righteousness,
 And honour, from about them, naked left
 To guilty Shame; he covered, but his robe
 Uncovered more.  So rose the Danite strong,
 Herculean Samson, from the harlot-lap
 Of Philistean Dalilah, and waked
 Shorn of his strength.  They destitute and bare
 Of all their virtue:  Silent, and in face
 Confounded, long they sat, as strucken mute:
 Till Adam, though not less than Eve abashed,
 At length gave utterance to these words constrained.
 O Eve, in evil hour thou didst give ear
 To that false worm, of whomsoever taught
 To counterfeit Man's voice; true in our fall,
 False in our promised rising; since our eyes
 Opened we find indeed, and find we know
 Both good and evil; good lost, and evil got;
 Bad fruit of knowledge, if this be to know;
 Which leaves us naked thus, of honour void,
 Of innocence, of faith, of purity,
 Our wonted ornaments now soiled and stained,
 And in our faces evident the signs
 Of foul concupiscence; whence evil store;
 Even shame, the last of evils; of the first
 Be sure then.--How shall I behold the face
 Henceforth of God or Angel, erst with joy
 And rapture so oft beheld?  Those heavenly shapes
 Will dazzle now this earthly with their blaze
 Insufferably bright.  O! might I here
 In solitude live savage; in some glade
 Obscured, where highest woods, impenetrable
 To star or sun-light, spread their umbrage broad
 And brown as evening:  Cover me, ye Pines!
 Ye Cedars, with innumerable boughs
 Hide me, where I may never see them more!--
 But let us now, as in bad plight, devise
 What best may for the present serve to hide
 The parts of each from other, that seem most
 To shame obnoxious, and unseemliest seen;
 Some tree, whose broad smooth leaves together sewed,
 And girded on our loins, may cover round
 Those middle parts; that this new comer, Shame,
 There sit not, and reproach us as unclean.
 So counselled he, and both together went
 Into the thickest wood; there soon they chose
 The fig-tree; not that kind for fruit renowned,
 But such as at this day, to Indians known,
 In Malabar or Decan spreads her arms
 Branching so broad and long, that in the ground
 The bended twigs take root, and daughters grow
 About the mother tree, a pillared shade
 High over-arched, and echoing walks between:
 There oft the Indian herdsman, shunning heat,
 Shelters in cool, and tends his pasturing herds
 At loop-holes cut through thickest shade:  Those leaves
 They gathered, broad as Amazonian targe;
 And, with what skill they had, together sewed,
 To gird their waist; vain covering, if to hide
 Their guilt and dreaded shame!  O, how unlike
 To that first naked glory!  Such of late
 Columbus found the American, so girt
 With feathered cincture; naked else, and wild
 Among the trees on isles and woody shores.
 Thus fenced, and, as they thought, their shame in part
 Covered, but not at rest or ease of mind,
 They sat them down to weep; nor only tears
 Rained at their eyes, but high winds worse within
 Began to rise, high passions, anger, hate,
 Mistrust, suspicion, discord; and shook sore
 Their inward state of mind, calm region once
 And full of peace, now tost and turbulent:
 For Understanding ruled not, and the Will
 Heard not her lore; both in subjection now
 To sensual Appetite, who from beneath
 Usurping over sovran Reason claimed
 Superiour sway: From thus distempered breast,
 Adam, estranged in look and altered style,
 Speech intermitted thus to Eve renewed.
 Would thou hadst hearkened to my words, and staid
 With me, as I besought thee, when that strange
 Desire of wandering, this unhappy morn,
 I know not whence possessed thee; we had then
 Remained still happy; not, as now, despoiled
 Of all our good; shamed, naked, miserable!
 Let none henceforth seek needless cause to approve
 The faith they owe; when earnestly they seek
 Such proof, conclude, they then begin to fail.
 To whom, soon moved with touch of blame, thus Eve.
 What words have passed thy lips, Adam severe!
 Imputest thou that to my default, or will
 Of wandering, as thou callest it, which who knows
 But might as ill have happened thou being by,
 Or to thyself perhaps?  Hadst thou been there,
 Or here the attempt, thou couldst not have discerned
 Fraud in the Serpent, speaking as he spake;
 No ground of enmity between us known,
 Why he should mean me ill, or seek to harm.
 Was I to have never parted from thy side?
 As good have grown there still a lifeless rib.
 Being as I am, why didst not thou, the head,
 Command me absolutely not to go,
 Going into such danger, as thou saidst?
 Too facile then, thou didst not much gainsay;
 Nay, didst permit, approve, and fair dismiss.
 Hadst thou been firm and fixed in thy dissent,
 Neither had I transgressed, nor thou with me.
 To whom, then first incensed, Adam replied.
 Is this the love, is this the recompence
 Of mine to thee, ingrateful Eve! expressed
 Immutable, when thou wert lost, not I;
 Who might have lived, and joyed immortal bliss,
 Yet willingly chose rather death with thee?
 And am I now upbraided as the cause
 Of thy transgressing?  Not enough severe,
 It seems, in thy restraint:  What could I more
 I warned thee, I admonished thee, foretold
 The danger, and the lurking enemy
 That lay in wait; beyond this, had been force;
 And force upon free will hath here no place.
 But confidence then bore thee on; secure
 Either to meet no danger, or to find
 Matter of glorious trial; and perhaps
 I also erred, in overmuch admiring
 What seemed in thee so perfect, that I thought
 No evil durst attempt thee; but I rue
 The errour now, which is become my crime,
 And thou the accuser.  Thus it shall befall
 Him, who, to worth in women overtrusting,
 Lets her will rule: restraint she will not brook;
 And, left to herself, if evil thence ensue,
 She first his weak indulgence will accuse.
 Thus they in mutual accusation spent
 The fruitless hours, but neither self-condemning;
 And of their vain contest appeared no end.
 
 
 
 Book X
 
 
 Mean while the heinous and despiteful act
 Of Satan, done in Paradise; and how
 He, in the serpent, had perverted Eve,
 Her husband she, to taste the fatal fruit,
 Was known in Heaven; for what can 'scape the eye
 Of God all-seeing, or deceive his heart
 Omniscient? who, in all things wise and just,
 Hindered not Satan to attempt the mind
 Of Man, with strength entire and free will armed,
 Complete to have discovered and repulsed
 Whatever wiles of foe or seeming friend.
 For still they knew, and ought to have still remembered,
 The high injunction, not to taste that fruit,
 Whoever tempted; which they not obeying,
 (Incurred what could they less?) the penalty;
 And, manifold in sin, deserved to fall.
 Up into Heaven from Paradise in haste
 The angelick guards ascended, mute, and sad,
 For Man; for of his state by this they knew,
 Much wondering how the subtle Fiend had stolen
 Entrance unseen.  Soon as the unwelcome news
 From Earth arrived at Heaven-gate, displeased
 All were who heard; dim sadness did not spare
 That time celestial visages, yet, mixed
 With pity, violated not their bliss.
 About the new-arrived, in multitudes
 The ethereal people ran, to hear and know
 How all befel:  They towards the throne supreme,
 Accountable, made haste, to make appear,
 With righteous plea, their utmost vigilance
 And easily approved; when the Most High
 Eternal Father, from his secret cloud,
 Amidst in thunder uttered thus his voice.
 Assembled Angels, and ye Powers returned
 From unsuccessful charge; be not dismayed,
 Nor troubled at these tidings from the earth,
 Which your sincerest care could not prevent;
 Foretold so lately what would come to pass,
 When first this tempter crossed the gulf from Hell.
 I told ye then he should prevail, and speed
 On his bad errand; Man should be seduced,
 And flattered out of all, believing lies
 Against his Maker; no decree of mine
 Concurring to necessitate his fall,
 Or touch with lightest moment of impulse
 His free will, to her own inclining left
 In even scale.  But fallen he is; and now
 What rests, but that the mortal sentence pass
 On his transgression,--death denounced that day?
 Which he presumes already vain and void,
 Because not yet inflicted, as he feared,
 By some immediate stroke; but soon shall find
 Forbearance no acquittance, ere day end.
 Justice shall not return as bounty scorned.
 But whom send I to judge them? whom but thee,
 Vicegerent Son?  To thee I have transferred
 All judgement, whether in Heaven, or Earth, or Hell.
 Easy it may be seen that I intend
 Mercy colleague with justice, sending thee
 Man's friend, his Mediator, his designed
 Both ransom and Redeemer voluntary,
 And destined Man himself to judge Man fallen.
 So spake the Father; and, unfolding bright
 Toward the right hand his glory, on the Son
 Blazed forth unclouded Deity: He full
 Resplendent all his Father manifest
 Expressed, and thus divinely answered mild.
 Father Eternal, thine is to decree;
 Mine, both in Heaven and Earth, to do thy will
 Supreme; that thou in me, thy Son beloved,
 Mayest ever rest well pleased.  I go to judge
 On earth these thy transgressours; but thou knowest,
 Whoever judged, the worst on me must light,
 When time shall be; for so I undertook
 Before thee; and, not repenting, this obtain
 Of right, that I may mitigate their doom
 On me derived; yet I shall temper so
 Justice with mercy, as may illustrate most
 Them fully satisfied, and thee appease.
 Attendance none shall need, nor train, where none
 Are to behold the judgement, but the judged,
 Those two; the third best absent is condemned,
 Convict by flight, and rebel to all law:
 Conviction to the serpent none belongs.
 Thus saying, from his radiant seat he rose
 Of high collateral glory: Him Thrones, and Powers,
 Princedoms, and Dominations ministrant,
 Accompanied to Heaven-gate; from whence
 Eden, and all the coast, in prospect lay.
 Down he descended straight; the speed of Gods
 Time counts not, though with swiftest minutes winged.
 Now was the sun in western cadence low
 From noon, and gentle airs, due at their hour,
 To fan the earth now waked, and usher in
 The evening cool; when he, from wrath more cool,
 Came the mild Judge, and Intercessour both,
 To sentence Man:  The voice of God they heard
 Now walking in the garden, by soft winds
 Brought to their ears, while day declined; they heard,
 And from his presence hid themselves among
 The thickest trees, both man and wife; till God,
 Approaching, thus to Adam called aloud.
 Where art thou, Adam, wont with joy to meet
 My coming seen far off?  I miss thee here,
 Not pleased, thus entertained with solitude,
 Where obvious duty ere while appeared unsought:
 Or come I less conspicuous, or what change
 Absents thee, or what chance detains?--Come forth!
 He came; and with him Eve, more loth, though first
 To offend; discountenanced both, and discomposed;
 Love was not in their looks, either to God,
 Or to each other; but apparent guilt,
 And shame, and perturbation, and despair,
 Anger, and obstinacy, and hate, and guile.
 Whence Adam, faltering long, thus answered brief.
 I heard thee in the garden, and of thy voice
 Afraid, being naked, hid myself.  To whom
 The gracious Judge without revile replied.
 My voice thou oft hast heard, and hast not feared,
 But still rejoiced; how is it now become
 So dreadful to thee?  That thou art naked, who
 Hath told thee?  Hast thou eaten of the tree,
 Whereof I gave thee charge thou shouldst not eat?
 To whom thus Adam sore beset replied.
 O Heaven! in evil strait this day I stand
 Before my Judge; either to undergo
 Myself the total crime, or to accuse
 My other self, the partner of my life;
 Whose failing, while her faith to me remains,
 I should conceal, and not expose to blame
 By my complaint: but strict necessity
 Subdues me, and calamitous constraint;
 Lest on my head both sin and punishment,
 However insupportable, be all
 Devolved; though should I hold my peace, yet thou
 Wouldst easily detect what I conceal.--
 This Woman, whom thou madest to be my help,
 And gavest me as thy perfect gift, so good,
 So fit, so acceptable, so divine,
 That from her hand I could suspect no ill,
 And what she did, whatever in itself,
 Her doing seemed to justify the deed;
 She gave me of the tree, and I did eat.
 To whom the Sovran Presence thus replied.
 Was she thy God, that her thou didst obey
 Before his voice? or was she made thy guide,
 Superiour, or but equal, that to her
 Thou didst resign thy manhood, and the place
 Wherein God set thee above her made of thee,
 And for thee, whose perfection far excelled
 Hers in all real dignity?  Adorned
 She was indeed, and lovely, to attract
 Thy love, not thy subjection; and her gifts
 Were such, as under government well seemed;
 Unseemly to bear rule; which was thy part
 And person, hadst thou known thyself aright.
 So having said, he thus to Eve in few.
 Say, Woman, what is this which thou hast done?
 To whom sad Eve, with shame nigh overwhelmed,
 Confessing soon, yet not before her Judge
 Bold or loquacious, thus abashed replied.
 The Serpent me beguiled, and I did eat.
 Which when the Lord God heard, without delay
 To judgement he proceeded on the accused
 Serpent, though brute; unable to transfer
 The guilt on him, who made him instrument
 Of mischief, and polluted from the end
 Of his creation; justly then accursed,
 As vitiated in nature:  More to know
 Concerned not Man, (since he no further knew)
 Nor altered his offence; yet God at last
 To Satan first in sin his doom applied,
 Though in mysterious terms, judged as then best:
 And on the Serpent thus his curse let fall.
 Because thou hast done this, thou art accursed
 Above all cattle, each beast of the field;
 Upon thy belly groveling thou shalt go,
 And dust shalt eat all the days of thy life.
 Between thee and the woman I will put
 Enmity, and between thine and her seed;
 Her seed shall bruise thy head, thou bruise his heel.
 So spake this oracle, then verified
 When Jesus, Son of Mary, second Eve,
 Saw Satan fall, like lightning, down from Heaven,
 Prince of the air; then, rising from his grave
 Spoiled Principalities and Powers, triumphed
 In open show; and, with ascension bright,
 Captivity led captive through the air,
 The realm itself of Satan, long usurped;
 Whom he shall tread at last under our feet;
 Even he, who now foretold his fatal bruise;
 And to the Woman thus his sentence turned.
 Thy sorrow I will greatly multiply
 By thy conception; children thou shalt bring
 In sorrow forth; and to thy husband's will
 Thine shall submit; he over thee shall rule.
 On Adam last thus judgement he pronounced.
 Because thou hast hearkened to the voice of thy wife,
 And eaten of the tree, concerning which
 I charged thee, saying, Thou shalt not eat thereof:
 Cursed is the ground for thy sake; thou in sorrow
 Shalt eat thereof, all the days of thy life;
 Thorns also and thistles it shall bring thee forth
 Unbid; and thou shalt eat the herb of the field;
 In the sweat of thy face shalt thou eat bread,
 Till thou return unto the ground; for thou
 Out of the ground wast taken, know thy birth,
 For dust thou art, and shalt to dust return.
 So judged he Man, both Judge and Saviour sent;
 And the instant stroke of death, denounced that day,
 Removed far off; then, pitying how they stood
 Before him naked to the air, that now
 Must suffer change, disdained not to begin
 Thenceforth the form of servant to assume;
 As when he washed his servants feet; so now,
 As father of his family, he clad
 Their nakedness with skins of beasts, or slain,
 Or as the snake with youthful coat repaid;
 And thought not much to clothe his enemies;
 Nor he their outward only with the skins
 Of beasts, but inward nakedness, much more.
 Opprobrious, with his robe of righteousness,
 Arraying, covered from his Father's sight.
 To him with swift ascent he up returned,
 Into his blissful bosom reassumed
 In glory, as of old; to him appeased
 All, though all-knowing, what had passed with Man
 Recounted, mixing intercession sweet.
 Mean while, ere thus was sinned and judged on Earth,
 Within the gates of Hell sat Sin and Death,
 In counterview within the gates, that now
 Stood open wide, belching outrageous flame
 Far into Chaos, since the Fiend passed through,
 Sin opening; who thus now to Death began.
 O Son, why sit we here each other viewing
 Idly, while Satan, our great author, thrives
 In other worlds, and happier seat provides
 For us, his offspring dear?  It cannot be
 But that success attends him; if mishap,
 Ere this he had returned, with fury driven
 By his avengers; since no place like this
 Can fit his punishment, or their revenge.
 Methinks I feel new strength within me rise,
 Wings growing, and dominion given me large
 Beyond this deep; whatever draws me on,
 Or sympathy, or some connatural force,
 Powerful at greatest distance to unite,
 With secret amity, things of like kind,
 By secretest conveyance.  Thou, my shade
 Inseparable, must with me along;
 For Death from Sin no power can separate.
 But, lest the difficulty of passing back
 Stay his return perhaps over this gulf
 Impassable, impervious; let us try
 Adventurous work, yet to thy power and mine
 Not unagreeable, to found a path
 Over this main from Hell to that new world,
 Where Satan now prevails; a monument
 Of merit high to all the infernal host,
 Easing their passage hence, for intercourse,
 Or transmigration, as their lot shall lead.
 Nor can I miss the way, so strongly drawn
 By this new-felt attraction and instinct.
 Whom thus the meager Shadow answered soon.
 Go, whither Fate, and inclination strong,
 Leads thee; I shall not lag behind, nor err
 The way, thou leading; such a scent I draw
 Of carnage, prey innumerable, and taste
 The savour of death from all things there that live:
 Nor shall I to the work thou enterprisest
 Be wanting, but afford thee equal aid.
 So saying, with delight he snuffed the smell
 Of mortal change on earth.  As when a flock
 Of ravenous fowl, though many a league remote,
 Against the day of battle, to a field,
 Where armies lie encamped, come flying, lured
 With scent of living carcasses designed
 For death, the following day, in bloody fight:
 So scented the grim Feature, and upturned
 His nostril wide into the murky air;
 Sagacious of his quarry from so far.
 Then both from out Hell-gates, into the waste
 Wide anarchy of Chaos, damp and dark,
 Flew diverse; and with power (their power was great)
 Hovering upon the waters, what they met
 Solid or slimy, as in raging sea
 Tost up and down, together crouded drove,
 From each side shoaling towards the mouth of Hell;
 As when two polar winds, blowing adverse
 Upon the Cronian sea, together drive
 Mountains of ice, that stop the imagined way
 Beyond Petsora eastward, to the rich
 Cathaian coast.  The aggregated soil
 Death with his mace petrifick, cold and dry,
 As with a trident, smote; and fixed as firm
 As Delos, floating once; the rest his look
 Bound with Gorgonian rigour not to move;
 And with Asphaltick slime, broad as the gate,
 Deep to the roots of Hell the gathered beach
 They fastened, and the mole immense wrought on
 Over the foaming deep high-arched, a bridge
 Of length prodigious, joining to the wall
 Immoveable of this now fenceless world,
 Forfeit to Death; from hence a passage broad,
 Smooth, easy, inoffensive, down to Hell.
 So, if great things to small may be compared,
 Xerxes, the liberty of Greece to yoke,
 From Susa, his Memnonian palace high,
 Came to the sea: and, over Hellespont
 Bridging his way, Europe with Asia joined,
 And scourged with many a stroke the indignant waves.
 Now had they brought the work by wonderous art
 Pontifical, a ridge of pendant rock,
 Over the vexed abyss, following the track
 Of Satan to the self-same place where he
 First lighted from his wing, and landed safe
 From out of Chaos, to the outside bare
 Of this round world:  With pins of adamant
 And chains they made all fast, too fast they made
 And durable!  And now in little space
 The confines met of empyrean Heaven,
 And of this World; and, on the left hand, Hell
 With long reach interposed; three several ways
 In sight, to each of these three places led.
 And now their way to Earth they had descried,
 To Paradise first tending; when, behold!
 Satan, in likeness of an Angel bright,
 Betwixt the Centaur and the Scorpion steering
 His zenith, while the sun in Aries rose:
 Disguised he came; but those his children dear
 Their parent soon discerned, though in disguise.
 He, after Eve seduced, unminded slunk
 Into the wood fast by; and, changing shape,
 To observe the sequel, saw his guileful act
 By Eve, though all unweeting, seconded
 Upon her husband; saw their shame that sought
 Vain covertures; but when he saw descend
 The Son of God to judge them, terrified
 He fled; not hoping to escape, but shun
 The present; fearing, guilty, what his wrath
 Might suddenly inflict; that past, returned
 By night, and listening where the hapless pair
 Sat in their sad discourse, and various plaint,
 Thence gathered his own doom; which understood
 Not instant, but of future time, with joy
 And tidings fraught, to Hell he now returned;
 And at the brink of Chaos, near the foot
 Of this new wonderous pontifice, unhoped
 Met, who to meet him came, his offspring dear.
 Great joy was at their meeting, and at sight
 Of that stupendous bridge his joy encreased.
 Long he admiring stood, till Sin, his fair
 Enchanting daughter, thus the silence broke.
 O Parent, these are thy magnifick deeds,
 Thy trophies! which thou viewest as not thine own;
 Thou art their author, and prime architect:
 For I no sooner in my heart divined,
 My heart, which by a secret harmony
 Still moves with thine, joined in connexion sweet,
 That thou on earth hadst prospered, which thy looks
 Now also evidence, but straight I felt,
 Though distant from thee worlds between, yet felt,
 That I must after thee, with this thy son;
 Such fatal consequence unites us three!
 Hell could no longer hold us in our bounds,
 Nor this unvoyageable gulf obscure
 Detain from following thy illustrious track.
 Thou hast achieved our liberty, confined
 Within Hell-gates till now; thou us impowered
 To fortify thus far, and overlay,
 With this portentous bridge, the dark abyss.
 Thine now is all this world; thy virtue hath won
 What thy hands builded not; thy wisdom gained
 With odds what war hath lost, and fully avenged
 Our foil in Heaven; here thou shalt monarch reign,
 There didst not; there let him still victor sway,
 As battle hath adjudged; from this new world
 Retiring, by his own doom alienated;
 And henceforth monarchy with thee divide
 Of all things, parted by the empyreal bounds,
 His quadrature, from thy orbicular world;
 Or try thee now more dangerous to his throne.
 Whom thus the Prince of darkness answered glad.
 Fair Daughter, and thou Son and Grandchild both;
 High proof ye now have given to be the race
 Of Satan (for I glory in the name,
 Antagonist of Heaven's Almighty King,)
 Amply have merited of me, of all
 The infernal empire, that so near Heaven's door
 Triumphal with triumphal act have met,
 Mine, with this glorious work; and made one realm,
 Hell and this world, one realm, one continent
 Of easy thorough-fare.  Therefore, while I
 Descend through darkness, on your road with ease,
 To my associate Powers, them to acquaint
 With these successes, and with them rejoice;
 You two this way, among these numerous orbs,
 All yours, right down to Paradise descend;
 There dwell, and reign in bliss; thence on the earth
 Dominion exercise and in the air,
 Chiefly on Man, sole lord of all declared;
 Him first make sure your thrall, and lastly kill.
 My substitutes I send ye, and create
 Plenipotent on earth, of matchless might
 Issuing from me: on your joint vigour now
 My hold of this new kingdom all depends,
 Through Sin to Death exposed by my exploit.
 If your joint power prevail, the affairs of Hell
 No detriment need fear; go, and be strong!
 So saying he dismissed them; they with speed
 Their course through thickest constellations held,
 Spreading their bane; the blasted stars looked wan,
 And planets, planet-struck, real eclipse
 Then suffered.  The other way Satan went down
 The causey to Hell-gate:  On either side
 Disparted Chaos overbuilt exclaimed,
 And with rebounding surge the bars assailed,
 That scorned his indignation:  Through the gate,
 Wide open and unguarded, Satan passed,
 And all about found desolate; for those,
 Appointed to sit there, had left their charge,
 Flown to the upper world; the rest were all
 Far to the inland retired, about the walls
 Of Pandemonium; city and proud seat
 Of Lucifer, so by allusion called
 Of that bright star to Satan paragoned;
 There kept their watch the legions, while the Grand
 In council sat, solicitous what chance
 Might intercept their emperour sent; so he
 Departing gave command, and they observed.
 As when the Tartar from his Russian foe,
 By Astracan, over the snowy plains,
 Retires; or Bactrin Sophi, from the horns
 Of Turkish crescent, leaves all waste beyond
 The realm of Aladule, in his retreat
 To Tauris or Casbeen:  So these, the late
 Heaven-banished host, left desart utmost Hell
 Many a dark league, reduced in careful watch
 Round their metropolis; and now expecting
 Each hour their great adventurer, from the search
 Of foreign worlds:  He through the midst unmarked,
 In show plebeian Angel militant
 Of lowest order, passed; and from the door
 Of that Plutonian hall, invisible
 Ascended his high throne; which, under state
 Of richest texture spread, at the upper end
 Was placed in regal lustre.  Down a while
 He sat, and round about him saw unseen:
 At last, as from a cloud, his fulgent head
 And shape star-bright appeared, or brighter; clad
 With what permissive glory since his fall
 Was left him, or false glitter:  All amazed
 At that so sudden blaze the Stygian throng
 Bent their aspect, and whom they wished beheld,
 Their mighty Chief returned: loud was the acclaim:
 Forth rushed in haste the great consulting peers,
 Raised from their dark Divan, and with like joy
 Congratulant approached him; who with hand
 Silence, and with these words attention, won.
 Thrones, Dominations, Princedoms, Virtues, Powers;
 For in possession such, not only of right,
 I call ye, and declare ye now; returned
 Successful beyond hope, to lead ye forth
 Triumphant out of this infernal pit
 Abominable, accursed, the house of woe,
 And dungeon of our tyrant:  Now possess,
 As Lords, a spacious world, to our native Heaven
 Little inferiour, by my adventure hard
 With peril great achieved.  Long were to tell
 What I have done; what suffered; with what pain
 Voyaged th' unreal, vast, unbounded deep
 Of horrible confusion; over which
 By Sin and Death a broad way now is paved,
 To expedite your glorious march; but I
 Toiled out my uncouth passage, forced to ride
 The untractable abyss, plunged in the womb
 Of unoriginal Night and Chaos wild;
 That, jealous of their secrets, fiercely opposed
 My journey strange, with clamorous uproar
 Protesting Fate supreme; thence how I found
 The new created world, which fame in Heaven
 Long had foretold, a fabrick wonderful
 Of absolute perfection! therein Man
 Placed in a Paradise, by our exile
 Made happy:  Him by fraud I have seduced
 From his Creator; and, the more to encrease
 Your wonder, with an apple; he, thereat
 Offended, worth your laughter! hath given up
 Both his beloved Man, and all his world,
 To Sin and Death a prey, and so to us,
 Without our hazard, labour, or alarm;
 To range in, and to dwell, and over Man
 To rule, as over all he should have ruled.
 True is, me also he hath judged, or rather
 Me not, but the brute serpent in whose shape
 Man I deceived: that which to me belongs,
 Is enmity which he will put between
 Me and mankind; I am to bruise his heel;
 His seed, when is not set, shall bruise my head:
 A world who would not purchase with a bruise,
 Or much more grievous pain?--Ye have the account
 Of my performance:  What remains, ye Gods,
 But up, and enter now into full bliss?
 So having said, a while he stood, expecting
 Their universal shout, and high applause,
 To fill his ear; when, contrary, he hears
 On all sides, from innumerable tongues,
 A dismal universal hiss, the sound
 Of publick scorn; he wondered, but not long
 Had leisure, wondering at himself now more,
 His visage drawn he felt to sharp and spare;
 His arms clung to his ribs; his legs entwining
 Each other, till supplanted down he fell
 A monstrous serpent on his belly prone,
 Reluctant, but in vain; a greater power
 Now ruled him, punished in the shape he sinned,
 According to his doom: he would have spoke,
 But hiss for hiss returned with forked tongue
 To forked tongue; for now were all transformed
 Alike, to serpents all, as accessories
 To his bold riot:  Dreadful was the din
 Of hissing through the hall, thick swarming now
 With complicated monsters head and tail,
 Scorpion, and Asp, and Amphisbaena dire,
 Cerastes horned, Hydrus, and Elops drear,
 And Dipsas; (not so thick swarmed once the soil
 Bedropt with blood of Gorgon, or the isle
 Ophiusa,) but still greatest he the midst,
 Now Dragon grown, larger than whom the sun
 Ingendered in the Pythian vale or slime,
 Huge Python, and his power no less he seemed
 Above the rest still to retain; they all
 Him followed, issuing forth to the open field,
 Where all yet left of that revolted rout,
 Heaven-fallen, in station stood or just array;
 Sublime with expectation when to see
 In triumph issuing forth their glorious Chief;
 They saw, but other sight instead! a croud
 Of ugly serpents; horrour on them fell,
 And horrid sympathy; for, what they saw,
 They felt themselves, now changing; down their arms,
 Down fell both spear and shield; down they as fast;
 And the dire hiss renewed, and the dire form
 Catched, by contagion; like in punishment,
 As in their crime.  Thus was the applause they meant,
 Turned to exploding hiss, triumph to shame
 Cast on themselves from their own mouths.  There stood
 A grove hard by, sprung up with this their change,
 His will who reigns above, to aggravate
 Their penance, laden with fair fruit, like that
 Which grew in Paradise, the bait of Eve
 Used by the Tempter: on that prospect strange
 Their earnest eyes they fixed, imagining
 For one forbidden tree a multitude
 Now risen, to work them further woe or shame;
 Yet, parched with scalding thirst and hunger fierce,
 Though to delude them sent, could not abstain;
 But on they rolled in heaps, and, up the trees
 Climbing, sat thicker than the snaky locks
 That curled Megaera: greedily they plucked
 The fruitage fair to sight, like that which grew
 Near that bituminous lake where Sodom flamed;
 This more delusive, not the touch, but taste
 Deceived; they, fondly thinking to allay
 Their appetite with gust, instead of fruit
 Chewed bitter ashes, which the offended taste
 With spattering noise rejected: oft they assayed,
 Hunger and thirst constraining; drugged as oft,
 With hatefullest disrelish writhed their jaws,
 With soot and cinders filled; so oft they fell
 Into the same illusion, not as Man
 Whom they triumphed once lapsed.  Thus were they plagued
 And worn with famine, long and ceaseless hiss,
 Till their lost shape, permitted, they resumed;
 Yearly enjoined, some say, to undergo,
 This annual humbling certain numbered days,
 To dash their pride, and joy, for Man seduced.
 However, some tradition they dispersed
 Among the Heathen, of their purchase got,
 And fabled how the Serpent, whom they called
 Ophion, with Eurynome, the wide--
 Encroaching Eve perhaps, had first the rule
 Of high Olympus; thence by Saturn driven
 And Ops, ere yet Dictaean Jove was born.
 Mean while in Paradise the hellish pair
 Too soon arrived; Sin, there in power before,
 Once actual; now in body, and to dwell
 Habitual habitant; behind her Death,
 Close following pace for pace, not mounted yet
 On his pale horse: to whom Sin thus began.
 Second of Satan sprung, all-conquering Death!
 What thinkest thou of our empire now, though earned
 With travel difficult, not better far
 Than still at Hell's dark threshold to have sat watch,
 Unnamed, undreaded, and thyself half starved?
 Whom thus the Sin-born monster answered soon.
 To me, who with eternal famine pine,
 Alike is Hell, or Paradise, or Heaven;
 There best, where most with ravine I may meet;
 Which here, though plenteous, all too little seems
 To stuff this maw, this vast unhide-bound corps.
 To whom the incestuous mother thus replied.
 Thou therefore on these herbs, and fruits, and flowers,
 Feed first; on each beast next, and fish, and fowl;
 No homely morsels! and, whatever thing
 The sithe of Time mows down, devour unspared;
 Till I, in Man residing, through the race,
 His thoughts, his looks, words, actions, all infect;
 And season him thy last and sweetest prey.
 This said, they both betook them several ways,
 Both to destroy, or unimmortal make
 All kinds, and for destruction to mature
 Sooner or later; which the Almighty seeing,
 From his transcendent seat the Saints among,
 To those bright Orders uttered thus his voice.
 See, with what heat these dogs of Hell advance
 To waste and havock yonder world, which I
 So fair and good created; and had still
 Kept in that state, had not the folly of Man
 Let in these wasteful furies, who impute
 Folly to me; so doth the Prince of Hell
 And his adherents, that with so much ease
 I suffer them to enter and possess
 A place so heavenly; and, conniving, seem
 To gratify my scornful enemies,
 That laugh, as if, transported with some fit
 Of passion, I to them had quitted all,
 At random yielded up to their misrule;
 And know not that I called, and drew them thither,
 My Hell-hounds, to lick up the draff and filth
 Which Man's polluting sin with taint hath shed
 On what was pure; til, crammed and gorged, nigh burst
 With sucked and glutted offal, at one sling
 Of thy victorious arm, well-pleasing Son,
 Both Sin, and Death, and yawning Grave, at last,
 Through Chaos hurled, obstruct the mouth of Hell
 For ever, and seal up his ravenous jaws.
 Then Heaven and Earth renewed shall be made pure
 To sanctity, that shall receive no stain:
 Till then, the curse pronounced on both precedes.
 He ended, and the heavenly audience loud
 Sung Halleluiah, as the sound of seas,
 Through multitude that sung:  Just are thy ways,
 Righteous are thy decrees on all thy works;
 Who can extenuate thee?  Next, to the Son,
 Destined Restorer of mankind, by whom
 New Heaven and Earth shall to the ages rise,
 Or down from Heaven descend.--Such was their song;
 While the Creator, calling forth by name
 His mighty Angels, gave them several charge,
 As sorted best with present things.  The sun
 Had first his precept so to move, so shine,
 As might affect the earth with cold and heat
 Scarce tolerable; and from the north to call
 Decrepit winter; from the south to bring
 Solstitial summer's heat.  To the blanc moon
 Her office they prescribed; to the other five
 Their planetary motions, and aspects,
 In sextile, square, and trine, and opposite,
 Of noxious efficacy, and when to join
 In synod unbenign; and taught the fixed
 Their influence malignant when to shower,
 Which of them rising with the sun, or falling,
 Should prove tempestuous:  To the winds they set
 Their corners, when with bluster to confound
 Sea, air, and shore; the thunder when to roll
 With terrour through the dark aereal hall.
 Some say, he bid his Angels turn ascanse
 The poles of earth, twice ten degrees and more,
 From the sun's axle; they with labour pushed
 Oblique the centrick globe:  Some say, the sun
 Was bid turn reins from the equinoctial road
 Like distant breadth to Taurus with the seven
 Atlantick Sisters, and the Spartan Twins,
 Up to the Tropick Crab: thence down amain
 By Leo, and the Virgin, and the Scales,
 As deep as Capricorn; to bring in change
 Of seasons to each clime; else had the spring
 Perpetual smiled on earth with vernant flowers,
 Equal in days and nights, except to those
 Beyond the polar circles; to them day
 Had unbenighted shone, while the low sun,
 To recompense his distance, in their sight
 Had rounded still the horizon, and not known
 Or east or west; which had forbid the snow
 From cold Estotiland, and south as far
 Beneath Magellan.  At that tasted fruit
 The sun, as from Thyestean banquet, turned
 His course intended; else, how had the world
 Inhabited, though sinless, more than now,
 Avoided pinching cold and scorching heat?
 These changes in the Heavens, though slow, produced
 Like change on sea and land; sideral blast,
 Vapour, and mist, and exhalation hot,
 Corrupt and pestilent:  Now from the north
 Of Norumbega, and the Samoed shore,
 Bursting their brazen dungeon, armed with ice,
 And snow, and hail, and stormy gust and flaw,
 Boreas, and Caecias, and Argestes loud,
 And Thrascias, rend the woods, and seas upturn;
 With adverse blast upturns them from the south
 Notus, and Afer black with thunderous clouds
 From Serraliona; thwart of these, as fierce,
 Forth rush the Levant and the Ponent winds,
 Eurus and Zephyr, with their lateral noise,
 Sirocco and Libecchio.  Thus began
 Outrage from lifeless things; but Discord first,
 Daughter of Sin, among the irrational
 Death introduced, through fierce antipathy:
 Beast now with beast 'gan war, and fowl with fowl,
 And fish with fish; to graze the herb all leaving,
 Devoured each other; nor stood much in awe
 Of Man, but fled him; or, with countenance grim,
 Glared on him passing.  These were from without
 The growing miseries, which Adam saw
 Already in part, though hid in gloomiest shade,
 To sorrow abandoned, but worse felt within;
 And, in a troubled sea of passion tost,
 Thus to disburden sought with sad complaint.
 O miserable of happy!  Is this the end
 Of this new glorious world, and me so late
 The glory of that glory, who now become
 Accursed, of blessed? hide me from the face
 Of God, whom to behold was then my highth
 Of happiness!--Yet well, if here would end
 The misery; I deserved it, and would bear
 My own deservings; but this will not serve:
 All that I eat or drink, or shall beget,
 Is propagated curse.  O voice, once heard
 Delightfully, Encrease and multiply;
 Now death to hear! for what can I encrease,
 Or multiply, but curses on my head?
 Who of all ages to succeed, but, feeling
 The evil on him brought by me, will curse
 My head?  Ill fare our ancestor impure,
 For this we may thank Adam! but his thanks
 Shall be the execration: so, besides
 Mine own that bide upon me, all from me
 Shall with a fierce reflux on me rebound;
 On me, as on their natural center, light
 Heavy, though in their place.  O fleeting joys
 Of Paradise, dear bought with lasting woes!
 Did I request thee, Maker, from my clay
 To mould me Man? did I solicit thee
 From darkness to promote me, or here place
 In this delicious garden?  As my will
 Concurred not to my being, it were but right
 And equal to reduce me to my dust;
 Desirous to resign and render back
 All I received; unable to perform
 Thy terms too hard, by which I was to hold
 The good I sought not.  To the loss of that,
 Sufficient penalty, why hast thou added
 The sense of endless woes?  Inexplicable
 Thy justice seems; yet to say truth, too late
 I thus contest; then should have been refused
 Those terms whatever, when they were proposed:
 Thou didst accept them; wilt thou enjoy the good,
 Then cavil the conditions?  And, though God
 Made thee without thy leave, what if thy son
 Prove disobedient, and reproved, retort,
 "Wherefore didst thou beget me? I sought it not!"
 Wouldst thou admit for his contempt of thee
 That proud excuse? yet him not thy election,
 But natural necessity begot.
 God made thee of choice his own, and of his own
 To serve him; thy reward was of his grace;
 Thy punishment then, justly is at his will.
 Be it so, for I submit; his doom is fair,
 That dust I am, and shall to dust return.
 O welcome hour whenever! Why delays
 His hand to execute what his decree
 Fixed on this day? Why do I overlive,
 Why am I mocked with death, and lengthened out
 To deathless pain?  How gladly would I meet
 Mortality my sentence, and be earth
 Insensible!  How glad would lay me down
 As in my mother's lap!  There I should rest,
 And sleep secure; his dreadful voice no more
 Would thunder in my ears; no fear of worse
 To me, and to my offspring, would torment me
 With cruel expectation.  Yet one doubt
 Pursues me still, lest all I cannot die;
 Lest that pure breath of life, the spirit of Man
 Which God inspired, cannot together perish
 With this corporeal clod; then, in the grave,
 Or in some other dismal place, who knows
 But I shall die a living death?  O thought
 Horrid, if true!  Yet why? It was but breath
 Of life that sinned; what dies but what had life
 And sin?  The body properly had neither,
 All of me then shall die: let this appease
 The doubt, since human reach no further knows.
 For though the Lord of all be infinite,
 Is his wrath also?  Be it, Man is not so,
 But mortal doomed.  How can he exercise
 Wrath without end on Man, whom death must end?
 Can he make deathless death?  That were to make
 Strange contradiction, which to God himself
 Impossible is held; as argument
 Of weakness, not of power.  Will he draw out,
 For anger's sake, finite to infinite,
 In punished Man, to satisfy his rigour,
 Satisfied never?  That were to extend
 His sentence beyond dust and Nature's law;
 By which all causes else, according still
 To the reception of their matter, act;
 Not to the extent of their own sphere.  But say
 That death be not one stroke, as I supposed,
 Bereaving sense, but endless misery
 From this day onward; which I feel begun
 Both in me, and without me; and so last
 To perpetuity;--Ay me! that fear
 Comes thundering back with dreadful revolution
 On my defenceless head; both Death and I
 Am found eternal, and incorporate both;
 Nor I on my part single; in me all
 Posterity stands cursed:  Fair patrimony
 That I must leave ye, Sons!  O, were I able
 To waste it all myself, and leave ye none!
 So disinherited, how would you bless
 Me, now your curse!  Ah, why should all mankind,
 For one man's fault, thus guiltless be condemned,
 It guiltless?  But from me what can proceed,
 But all corrupt; both mind and will depraved
 Not to do only, but to will the same
 With me?  How can they then acquitted stand
 In sight of God?  Him, after all disputes,
 Forced I absolve: all my evasions vain,
 And reasonings, though through mazes, lead me still
 But to my own conviction: first and last
 On me, me only, as the source and spring
 Of all corruption, all the blame lights due;
 So might the wrath!  Fond wish! couldst thou support
 That burden, heavier than the earth to bear;
 Than all the world much heavier, though divided
 With that bad Woman?  Thus, what thou desirest,
 And what thou fearest, alike destroys all hope
 Of refuge, and concludes thee miserable
 Beyond all past example and future;
 To Satan only like both crime and doom.
 O Conscience! into what abyss of fears
 And horrours hast thou driven me; out of which
 I find no way, from deep to deeper plunged!
 Thus Adam to himself lamented loud,
 Through the still night; not now, as ere Man fell,
 Wholesome, and cool, and mild, but with black air
 Accompanied; with damps, and dreadful gloom;
 Which to his evil conscience represented
 All things with double terrour:  On the ground
 Outstretched he lay, on the cold ground; and oft
 Cursed his creation;  Death as oft accused
 Of tardy execution, since denounced
 The day of his offence.  Why comes not Death,
 Said he, with one thrice-acceptable stroke
 To end me?  Shall Truth fail to keep her word,
 Justice Divine not hasten to be just?
 But Death comes not at call; Justice Divine
 Mends not her slowest pace for prayers or cries,
 O woods, O fountains, hillocks, dales, and bowers!
 With other echo late I taught your shades
 To answer, and resound far other song.--
 Whom thus afflicted when sad Eve beheld,
 Desolate where she sat, approaching nigh,
 Soft words to his fierce passion she assayed:
 But her with stern regard he thus repelled.
 Out of my sight, thou Serpent!  That name best
 Befits thee with him leagued, thyself as false
 And hateful; nothing wants, but that thy shape,
 Like his, and colour serpentine, may show
 Thy inward fraud; to warn all creatures from thee
 Henceforth; lest that too heavenly form, pretended
 To hellish falshood, snare them!  But for thee
 I had persisted happy; had not thy pride
 And wandering vanity, when least was safe,
 Rejected my forewarning, and disdained
 Not to be trusted; longing to be seen,
 Though by the Devil himself; him overweening
 To over-reach; but, with the serpent meeting,
 Fooled and beguiled; by him thou, I by thee
 To trust thee from my side; imagined wise,
 Constant, mature, proof against all assaults;
 And understood not all was but a show,
 Rather than solid virtue; all but a rib
 Crooked by nature, bent, as now appears,
 More to the part sinister, from me drawn;
 Well if thrown out, as supernumerary
 To my just number found.  O! why did God,
 Creator wise, that peopled highest Heaven
 With Spirits masculine, create at last
 This novelty on earth, this fair defect
 Of nature, and not fill the world at once
 With Men, as Angels, without feminine;
 Or find some other way to generate
 Mankind?  This mischief had not been befallen,
 And more that shall befall; innumerable
 Disturbances on earth through female snares,
 And strait conjunction with this sex: for either
 He never shall find out fit mate, but such
 As some misfortune brings him, or mistake;
 Or whom he wishes most shall seldom gain
 Through her perverseness, but shall see her gained
 By a far worse; or, if she love, withheld
 By parents; or his happiest choice too late
 Shall meet, already linked and wedlock-bound
 To a fell adversary, his hate or shame:
 Which infinite calamity shall cause
 To human life, and houshold peace confound.
 He added not, and from her turned; but Eve,
 Not so repulsed, with tears that ceased not flowing
 And tresses all disordered, at his feet
 Fell humble; and, embracing them, besought
 His peace, and thus proceeded in her plaint.
 Forsake me not thus, Adam! witness Heaven
 What love sincere, and reverence in my heart
 I bear thee, and unweeting have offended,
 Unhappily deceived!  Thy suppliant
 I beg, and clasp thy knees; bereave me not,
 Whereon I live, thy gentle looks, thy aid,
 Thy counsel, in this uttermost distress,
 My only strength and stay:  Forlorn of thee,
 Whither shall I betake me, where subsist?
 While yet we live, scarce one short hour perhaps,
 Between us two let there be peace; both joining,
 As joined in injuries, one enmity
 Against a foe by doom express assigned us,
 That cruel Serpent:  On me exercise not
 Thy hatred for this misery befallen;
 On me already lost, me than thyself
 More miserable!  Both have sinned; but thou
 Against God only; I against God and thee;
 And to the place of judgement will return,
 There with my cries importune Heaven; that all
 The sentence, from thy head removed, may light
 On me, sole cause to thee of all this woe;
 Me, me only, just object of his ire!
 She ended weeping; and her lowly plight,
 Immoveable, till peace obtained from fault
 Acknowledged and deplored, in Adam wrought
 Commiseration:  Soon his heart relented
 Towards her, his life so late, and sole delight,
 Now at his feet submissive in distress;
 Creature so fair his reconcilement seeking,
 His counsel, whom she had displeased, his aid:
 As one disarmed, his anger all he lost,
 And thus with peaceful words upraised her soon.
 Unwary, and too desirous, as before,
 So now of what thou knowest not, who desirest
 The punishment all on thyself; alas!
 Bear thine own first, ill able to sustain
 His full wrath, whose thou feelest as yet least part,
 And my displeasure bearest so ill.  If prayers
 Could alter high decrees, I to that place
 Would speed before thee, and be louder heard,
 That on my head all might be visited;
 Thy frailty and infirmer sex forgiven,
 To me committed, and by me exposed.
 But rise;--let us no more contend, nor blame
 Each other, blamed enough elsewhere; but strive
 In offices of love, how we may lighten
 Each other's burden, in our share of woe;
 Since this day's death denounced, if aught I see,
 Will prove no sudden, but a slow-paced evil;
 A long day's dying, to augment our pain;
 And to our seed (O hapless seed!) derived.
 To whom thus Eve, recovering heart, replied.
 Adam, by sad experiment I know
 How little weight my words with thee can find,
 Found so erroneous; thence by just event
 Found so unfortunate:  Nevertheless,
 Restored by thee, vile as I am, to place
 Of new acceptance, hopeful to regain
 Thy love, the sole contentment of my heart
 Living or dying, from thee I will not hide
 What thoughts in my unquiet breast are risen,
 Tending to some relief of our extremes,
 Or end; though sharp and sad, yet tolerable,
 As in our evils, and of easier choice.
 If care of our descent perplex us most,
 Which must be born to certain woe, devoured
 By Death at last; and miserable it is
 To be to others cause of misery,
 Our own begotten, and of our loins to bring
 Into this cursed world a woeful race,
 That after wretched life must be at last
 Food for so foul a monster; in thy power
 It lies, yet ere conception to prevent
 The race unblest, to being yet unbegot.
 Childless thou art, childless remain: so Death
 Shall be deceived his glut, and with us two
 Be forced to satisfy his ravenous maw.
 But if thou judge it hard and difficult,
 Conversing, looking, loving, to abstain
 From love's due rights, nuptial embraces sweet;
 And with desire to languish without hope,
 Before the present object languishing
 With like desire; which would be misery
 And torment less than none of what we dread;
 Then, both ourselves and seed at once to free
 From what we fear for both, let us make short,--
 Let us seek Death;--or, he not found, supply
 With our own hands his office on ourselves:
 Why stand we longer shivering under fears,
 That show no end but death, and have the power,
 Of many ways to die the shortest choosing,
 Destruction with destruction to destroy?--
 She ended here, or vehement despair
 Broke off the rest: so much of death her thoughts
 Had entertained, as dyed her cheeks with pale.
 But Adam, with such counsel nothing swayed,
 To better hopes his more attentive mind
 Labouring had raised; and thus to Eve replied.
 Eve, thy contempt of life and pleasure seems
 To argue in thee something more sublime
 And excellent, than what thy mind contemns;
 But self-destruction therefore sought, refutes
 That excellence thought in thee; and implies,
 Not thy contempt, but anguish and regret
 For loss of life and pleasure overloved.
 Or if thou covet death, as utmost end
 Of misery, so thinking to evade
 The penalty pronounced; doubt not but God
 Hath wiselier armed his vengeful ire, than so
 To be forestalled; much more I fear lest death,
 So snatched, will not exempt us from the pain
 We are by doom to pay; rather, such acts
 Of contumacy will provoke the Highest
 To make death in us live:  Then let us seek
 Some safer resolution, which methinks
 I have in view, calling to mind with heed
 Part of our sentence, that thy seed shall bruise
 The Serpent's head; piteous amends! unless
 Be meant, whom I conjecture, our grand foe,
 Satan; who, in the serpent, hath contrived
 Against us this deceit:  To crush his head
 Would be revenge indeed! which will be lost
 By death brought on ourselves, or childless days
 Resolved, as thou proposest; so our foe
 Shal 'scape his punishment ordained, and we
 Instead shall double ours upon our heads.
 No more be mentioned then of violence
 Against ourselves; and wilful barrenness,
 That cuts us off from hope; and savours only
 Rancour and pride, impatience and despite,
 Reluctance against God and his just yoke
 Laid on our necks.  Remember with what mild
 And gracious temper he both heard, and judged,
 Without wrath or reviling; we expected
 Immediate dissolution, which we thought
 Was meant by death that day; when lo! to thee
 Pains only in child-bearing were foretold,
 And bringing forth; soon recompensed with joy,
 Fruit of thy womb:  On me the curse aslope
 Glanced on the ground; with labour I must earn
 My bread; what harm? Idleness had been worse;
 My labour will sustain me; and, lest cold
 Or heat should injure us, his timely care
 Hath, unbesought, provided; and his hands
 Clothed us unworthy, pitying while he judged;
 How much more, if we pray him, will his ear
 Be open, and his heart to pity incline,
 And teach us further by what means to shun
 The inclement seasons, rain, ice, hail, and snow!
 Which now the sky, with various face, begins
 To show us in this mountain; while the winds
 Blow moist and keen, shattering the graceful locks
 Of these fair spreading trees; which bids us seek
 Some better shroud, some better warmth to cherish
 Our limbs benummed, ere this diurnal star
 Leave cold the night, how we his gathered beams
 Reflected may with matter sere foment;
 Or, by collision of two bodies, grind
 The air attrite to fire; as late the clouds
 Justling, or pushed with winds, rude in their shock,
 Tine the slant lightning; whose thwart flame, driven down
 Kindles the gummy bark of fir or pine;
 And sends a comfortable heat from far,
 Which might supply the sun:  Such fire to use,
 And what may else be remedy or cure
 To evils which our own misdeeds have wrought,
 He will instruct us praying, and of grace
 Beseeching him; so as we need not fear
 To pass commodiously this life, sustained
 By him with many comforts, till we end
 In dust, our final rest and native home.
 What better can we do, than, to the place
 Repairing where he judged us, prostrate fall
 Before him reverent; and there confess
 Humbly our faults, and pardon beg; with tears
 Watering the ground, and with our sighs the air
 Frequenting, sent from hearts contrite, in sign
 Of sorrow unfeigned, and humiliation meek.
 Undoubtedly he will relent, and turn
 From his displeasure; in whose look serene,
 When angry most he seemed and most severe,
 What else but favour, grace, and mercy, shone?
 So spake our father penitent; nor Eve
 Felt less remorse: they, forthwith to the place
 Repairing where he judged them, prostrate fell
 Before him reverent; and both confessed
 Humbly their faults, and pardon begged; with tears
 Watering the ground, and with their sighs the air
 Frequenting, sent from hearts contrite, in sign
 Of sorrow unfeigned, and humiliation meek.
 
 
 
 Book XI
 
 
 Thus they, in lowliest plight, repentant stood
 Praying; for from the mercy-seat above
 Prevenient grace descending had removed
 The stony from their hearts, and made new flesh
 Regenerate grow instead; that sighs now breathed
 Unutterable; which the Spirit of prayer
 Inspired, and winged for Heaven with speedier flight
 Than loudest oratory:  Yet their port
 Not of mean suitors; nor important less
 Seemed their petition, than when the ancient pair
 In fables old, less ancient yet than these,
 Deucalion and chaste Pyrrha, to restore
 The race of mankind drowned, before the shrine
 Of Themis stood devout.  To Heaven their prayers
 Flew up, nor missed the way, by envious winds
 Blown vagabond or frustrate: in they passed
 Dimensionless through heavenly doors; then clad
 With incense, where the golden altar fumed,
 By their great intercessour, came in sight
 Before the Father's throne: them the glad Son
 Presenting, thus to intercede began.
 See Father, what first-fruits on earth are sprung
 From thy implanted grace in Man; these sighs
 And prayers, which in this golden censer mixed
 With incense, I thy priest before thee bring;
 Fruits of more pleasing savour, from thy seed
 Sown with contrition in his heart, than those
 Which, his own hand manuring, all the trees
 Of Paradise could have produced, ere fallen
 From innocence.  Now therefore, bend thine ear
 To supplication; hear his sighs, though mute;
 Unskilful with what words to pray, let me
 Interpret for him; me, his advocate
 And propitiation; all his works on me,
 Good, or not good, ingraft; my merit those
 Shall perfect, and for these my death shall pay.
 Accept me; and, in me, from these receive
 The smell of peace toward mankind: let him live
 Before thee reconciled, at least his days
 Numbered, though sad; till death, his doom, (which I
 To mitigate thus plead, not to reverse,)
 To better life shall yield him: where with me
 All my redeemed may dwell in joy and bliss;
 Made one with me, as I with thee am one.
 To whom the Father, without cloud, serene.
 All thy request for Man, accepted Son,
 Obtain; all thy request was my decree:
 But, longer in that Paradise to dwell,
 The law I gave to Nature him forbids:
 Those pure immortal elements, that know,
 No gross, no unharmonious mixture foul,
 Eject him, tainted now; and purge him off,
 As a distemper, gross, to air as gross,
 And mortal food; as may dispose him best
 For dissolution wrought by sin, that first
 Distempered all things, and of incorrupt
 Corrupted.  I, at first, with two fair gifts
 Created him endowed; with happiness,
 And immortality: that fondly lost,
 This other served but to eternize woe;
 Till I provided death: so death becomes
 His final remedy; and, after life,
 Tried in sharp tribulation, and refined
 By faith and faithful works, to second life,
 Waked in the renovation of the just,
 Resigns him up with Heaven and Earth renewed.
 But let us call to synod all the Blest,
 Through Heaven's wide bounds: from them I will not hide
 My judgements; how with mankind I proceed,
 As how with peccant Angels late they saw,
 And in their state, though firm, stood more confirmed.
 He ended, and the Son gave signal high
 To the bright minister that watched; he blew
 His trumpet, heard in Oreb since perhaps
 When God descended, and perhaps once more
 To sound at general doom.  The angelick blast
 Filled all the regions: from their blisful bowers
 Of amarantine shade, fountain or spring,
 By the waters of life, where'er they sat
 In fellowships of joy, the sons of light
 Hasted, resorting to the summons high;
 And took their seats; till from his throne supreme
 The Almighty thus pronounced his sovran will.
 O Sons, like one of us Man is become
 To know both good and evil, since his taste
 Of that defended fruit; but let him boast
 His knowledge of good lost, and evil got;
 Happier! had it sufficed him to have known
 Good by itself, and evil not at all.
 He sorrows now, repents, and prays contrite,
 My motions in him; longer than they move,
 His heart I know, how variable and vain,
 Self-left.  Lest therefore his now bolder hand
 Reach also of the tree of life, and eat,
 And live for ever, dream at least to live
 For ever, to remove him I decree,
 And send him from the garden forth to till
 The ground whence he was taken, fitter soil.
 Michael, this my behest have thou in charge;
 Take to thee from among the Cherubim
 Thy choice of flaming warriours, lest the Fiend,
 Or in behalf of Man, or to invade
 Vacant possession, some new trouble raise:
 Haste thee, and from the Paradise of God
 Without remorse drive out the sinful pair;
 From hallowed ground the unholy; and denounce
 To them, and to their progeny, from thence
 Perpetual banishment.  Yet, lest they faint
 At the sad sentence rigorously urged,
 (For I behold them softened, and with tears
 Bewailing their excess,) all terrour hide.
 If patiently thy bidding they obey,
 Dismiss them not disconsolate; reveal
 To Adam what shall come in future days,
 As I shall thee enlighten; intermix
 My covenant in the Woman's seed renewed;
 So send them forth, though sorrowing, yet in peace:
 And on the east side of the garden place,
 Where entrance up from Eden easiest climbs,
 Cherubick watch; and of a sword the flame
 Wide-waving; all approach far off to fright,
 And guard all passage to the tree of life:
 Lest Paradise a receptacle prove
 To Spirits foul, and all my trees their prey;
 With whose stolen fruit Man once more to delude.
 He ceased; and the arch-angelick Power prepared
 For swift descent; with him the cohort bright
 Of watchful Cherubim: four faces each
 Had, like a double Janus; all their shape
 Spangled with eyes more numerous than those
 Of Argus, and more wakeful than to drouse,
 Charmed with Arcadian pipe, the pastoral reed
 Of Hermes, or his opiate rod.  Mean while,
 To re-salute the world with sacred light,
 Leucothea waked; and with fresh dews imbalmed
 The earth; when Adam and first matron Eve
 Had ended now their orisons, and found
 Strength added from above; new hope to spring
 Out of despair; joy, but with fear yet linked;
 Which thus to Eve his welcome words renewed.
 Eve, easily my faith admit, that all
 The good which we enjoy from Heaven descends;
 But, that from us aught should ascend to Heaven
 So prevalent as to concern the mind
 Of God high-blest, or to incline his will,
 Hard to belief may seem; yet this will prayer
 Or one short sigh of human breath, upborne
 Even to the seat of God.  For since I sought
 By prayer the offended Deity to appease;
 Kneeled, and before him humbled all my heart;
 Methought I saw him placable and mild,
 Bending his ear; persuasion in me grew
 That I was heard with favour; peace returned
 Home to my breast, and to my memory
 His promise, that thy seed shall bruise our foe;
 Which, then not minded in dismay, yet now
 Assures me that the bitterness of death
 Is past, and we shall live.  Whence hail to thee,
 Eve rightly called, mother of all mankind,
 Mother of all things living, since by thee
 Man is to live; and all things live for Man.
 To whom thus Eve with sad demeanour meek.
 Ill-worthy I such title should belong
 To me transgressour; who, for thee ordained
 A help, became thy snare; to me reproach
 Rather belongs, distrust, and all dispraise:
 But infinite in pardon was my Judge,
 That I, who first brought death on all, am graced
 The source of life; next favourable thou,
 Who highly thus to entitle me vouchsaf'st,
 Far other name deserving.  But the field
 To labour calls us, now with sweat imposed,
 Though after sleepless night; for see! the morn,
 All unconcerned with our unrest, begins
 Her rosy progress smiling: let us forth;
 I never from thy side henceforth to stray,
 Where'er our day's work lies, though now enjoined
 Laborious, till day droop; while here we dwell,
 What can be toilsome in these pleasant walks?
 Here let us live, though in fallen state, content.
 So spake, so wished much humbled Eve; but Fate
 Subscribed not:  Nature first gave signs, impressed
 On bird, beast, air; air suddenly eclipsed,
 After short blush of morn; nigh in her sight
 The bird of Jove, stooped from his aery tour,
 Two birds of gayest plume before him drove;
 Down from a hill the beast that reigns in woods,
 First hunter then, pursued a gentle brace,
 Goodliest of all the forest, hart and hind;
 Direct to the eastern gate was bent their flight.
 Adam observed, and with his eye the chase
 Pursuing, not unmoved, to Eve thus spake.
 O Eve, some further change awaits us nigh,
 Which Heaven, by these mute signs in Nature, shows
 Forerunners of his purpose; or to warn
 Us, haply too secure, of our discharge
 From penalty, because from death released
 Some days: how long, and what till then our life,
 Who knows? or more than this, that we are dust,
 And thither must return, and be no more?
 Why else this double object in our sight
 Of flight pursued in the air, and o'er the ground,
 One way the self-same hour? why in the east
 Darkness ere day's mid-course, and morning-light
 More orient in yon western cloud, that draws
 O'er the blue firmament a radiant white,
 And slow descends with something heavenly fraught?
 He erred not; for by this the heavenly bands
 Down from a sky of jasper lighted now
 In Paradise, and on a hill made halt;
 A glorious apparition, had not doubt
 And carnal fear that day dimmed Adam's eye.
 Not that more glorious, when the Angels met
 Jacob in Mahanaim, where he saw
 The field pavilioned with his guardians bright;
 Nor that, which on the flaming mount appeared
 In Dothan, covered with a camp of fire,
 Against the Syrian king, who to surprise
 One man, assassin-like, had levied war,
 War unproclaimed.  The princely Hierarch
 In their bright stand there left his Powers, to seise
 Possession of the garden; he alone,
 To find where Adam sheltered, took his way,
 Not unperceived of Adam; who to Eve,
 While the great visitant approached, thus spake.
 Eve, now expect great tidings, which perhaps
 Of us will soon determine, or impose
 New laws to be observed; for I descry,
 From yonder blazing cloud that veils the hill,
 One of the heavenly host; and, by his gait,
 None of the meanest; some great Potentate
 Or of the Thrones above; such majesty
 Invests him coming! yet not terrible,
 That I should fear; nor sociably mild,
 As Raphael, that I should much confide;
 But solemn and sublime; whom not to offend,
 With reverence I must meet, and thou retire.
 He ended: and the Arch-Angel soon drew nigh,
 Not in his shape celestial, but as man
 Clad to meet man; over his lucid arms
 A military vest of purple flowed,
 Livelier than Meliboean, or the grain
 Of Sarra, worn by kings and heroes old
 In time of truce; Iris had dipt the woof;
 His starry helm unbuckled showed him prime
 In manhood where youth ended; by his side,
 As in a glistering zodiack, hung the sword,
 Satan's dire dread; and in his hand the spear.
 Adam bowed low; he, kingly, from his state
 Inclined not, but his coming thus declared.
 Adam, Heaven's high behest no preface needs:
 Sufficient that thy prayers are heard; and Death,
 Then due by sentence when thou didst transgress,
 Defeated of his seisure many days
 Given thee of grace; wherein thou mayest repent,
 And one bad act with many deeds well done
 Mayest cover:  Well may then thy Lord, appeased,
 Redeem thee quite from Death's rapacious claim;
 But longer in this Paradise to dwell
 Permits not: to remove thee I am come,
 And send thee from the garden forth to till
 The ground whence thou wast taken, fitter soil.
 He added not; for Adam at the news
 Heart-struck with chilling gripe of sorrow stood,
 That all his senses bound; Eve, who unseen
 Yet all had heard, with audible lament
 Discovered soon the place of her retire.
 O unexpected stroke, worse than of Death!
 Must I thus leave thee Paradise? thus leave
 Thee, native soil! these happy walks and shades,
 Fit haunt of Gods? where I had hope to spend,
 Quiet though sad, the respite of that day
 That must be mortal to us both.  O flowers,
 That never will in other climate grow,
 My early visitation, and my last
 At even, which I bred up with tender hand
 From the first opening bud, and gave ye names,
 Who now shall rear ye to the sun, or rank
 Your tribes, and water from the ambrosial fount?
 Thee lastly, nuptial bower! by me adorned
 With what to sight or smell was sweet! from thee
 How shall I part, and whither wander down
 Into a lower world; to this obscure
 And wild, how shall we breathe in other air
 Less pure, accustomed to immortal fruits?
 Whom thus the Angel interrupted mild.
 Lament not, Eve, but patiently resign
 What justly thou hast lost, nor set thy heart,
 Thus over-fond, on that which is not thine:
 Thy going is not lonely; with thee goes
 Thy husband; whom to follow thou art bound;
 Where he abides, think there thy native soil.
 Adam, by this from the cold sudden damp
 Recovering, and his scattered spirits returned,
 To Michael thus his humble words addressed.
 Celestial, whether among the Thrones, or named
 Of them the highest; for such of shape may seem
 Prince above princes! gently hast thou told
 Thy message, which might else in telling wound,
 And in performing end us; what besides
 Of sorrow, and dejection, and despair,
 Our frailty can sustain, thy tidings bring,
 Departure from this happy place, our sweet
 Recess, and only consolation left
 Familiar to our eyes! all places else
 Inhospitable appear, and desolate;
 Nor knowing us, nor known:  And, if by prayer
 Incessant I could hope to change the will
 Of Him who all things can, I would not cease
 To weary him with my assiduous cries:
 But prayer against his absolute decree
 No more avails than breath against the wind,
 Blown stifling back on him that breathes it forth:
 Therefore to his great bidding I submit.
 This most afflicts me, that, departing hence,
 As from his face I shall be hid, deprived
 His blessed countenance:  Here I could frequent
 With worship place by place where he vouchsafed
 Presence Divine; and to my sons relate,
 On this mount he appeared; under this tree
 Stood visible; among these pines his voice
 I heard; here with him at this fountain talked:
 So many grateful altars I would rear
 Of grassy turf, and pile up every stone
 Of lustre from the brook, in memory,
 Or monument to ages; and theron
 Offer sweet-smelling gums, and fruits, and flowers:
 In yonder nether world where shall I seek
 His bright appearances, or foot-step trace?
 For though I fled him angry, yet recalled
 To life prolonged and promised race, I now
 Gladly behold though but his utmost skirts
 Of glory; and far off his steps adore.
 To whom thus Michael with regard benign.
 Adam, thou knowest Heaven his, and all the Earth;
 Not this rock only; his Omnipresence fills
 Land, sea, and air, and every kind that lives,
 Fomented by his virtual power and warmed:
 All the earth he gave thee to possess and rule,
 No despicable gift; surmise not then
 His presence to these narrow bounds confined
 Of Paradise, or Eden: this had been
 Perhaps thy capital seat, from whence had spread
 All generations; and had hither come
 From all the ends of the earth, to celebrate
 And reverence thee, their great progenitor.
 But this pre-eminence thou hast lost, brought down
 To dwell on even ground now with thy sons:
 Yet doubt not but in valley, and in plain,
 God is, as here; and will be found alike
 Present; and of his presence many a sign
 Still following thee, still compassing thee round
 With goodness and paternal love, his face
 Express, and of his steps the track divine.
 Which that thou mayest believe, and be confirmed
 Ere thou from hence depart; know, I am sent
 To show thee what shall come in future days
 To thee, and to thy offspring: good with bad
 Expect to hear; supernal grace contending
 With sinfulness of men; thereby to learn
 True patience, and to temper joy with fear
 And pious sorrow; equally inured
 By moderation either state to bear,
 Prosperous or adverse: so shalt thou lead
 Safest thy life, and best prepared endure
 Thy mortal passage when it comes.--Ascend
 This hill; let Eve (for I have drenched her eyes)
 Here sleep below; while thou to foresight wakest;
 As once thou sleptst, while she to life was formed.
 To whom thus Adam gratefully replied.
 Ascend, I follow thee, safe Guide, the path
 Thou leadest me; and to the hand of Heaven submit,
 However chastening; to the evil turn
 My obvious breast; arming to overcome
 By suffering, and earn rest from labour won,
 If so I may attain.--So both ascend
 In the visions of God.  It was a hill,
 Of Paradise the highest; from whose top
 The hemisphere of earth, in clearest ken,
 Stretched out to the amplest reach of prospect lay.
 Not higher that hill, nor wider looking round,
 Whereon, for different cause, the Tempter set
 Our second Adam, in the wilderness;
 To show him all Earth's kingdoms, and their glory.
 His eye might there command wherever stood
 City of old or modern fame, the seat
 Of mightiest empire, from the destined walls
 Of Cambalu, seat of Cathaian Can,
 And Samarchand by Oxus, Temir's throne,
 To Paquin of Sinaean kings; and thence
 To Agra and Lahor of great Mogul,
 Down to the golden Chersonese; or where
 The Persian in Ecbatan sat, or since
 In Hispahan; or where the Russian Ksar
 In Mosco; or the Sultan in Bizance,
 Turchestan-born; nor could his eye not ken
 The empire of Negus to his utmost port
 Ercoco, and the less maritim kings
 Mombaza, and Quiloa, and Melind,
 And Sofala, thought Ophir, to the realm
 Of Congo, and Angola farthest south;
 Or thence from Niger flood to Atlas mount
 The kingdoms of Almansor, Fez and Sus,
 Morocco, and Algiers, and Tremisen;
 On Europe thence, and where Rome was to sway
 The world: in spirit perhaps he also saw
 Rich Mexico, the seat of Montezume,
 And Cusco in Peru, the richer seat
 Of Atabalipa; and yet unspoiled
 Guiana, whose great city Geryon's sons
 Call El Dorado.  But to nobler sights
 Michael from Adam's eyes the film removed,
 Which that false fruit that promised clearer sight
 Had bred; then purged with euphrasy and rue
 The visual nerve, for he had much to see;
 And from the well of life three drops instilled.
 So deep the power of these ingredients pierced,
 Even to the inmost seat of mental sight,
 That Adam, now enforced to close his eyes,
 Sunk down, and all his spirits became entranced;
 But him the gentle Angel by the hand
 Soon raised, and his attention thus recalled.
 Adam, now ope thine eyes; and first behold
 The effects, which thy original crime hath wrought
 In some to spring from thee; who never touched
 The excepted tree; nor with the snake conspired;
 Nor sinned thy sin; yet from that sin derive
 Corruption, to bring forth more violent deeds.
 His eyes he opened, and beheld a field,
 Part arable and tilth, whereon were sheaves
 New reaped; the other part sheep-walks and folds;
 I' the midst an altar as the land-mark stood,
 Rustick, of grassy sord; thither anon
 A sweaty reaper from his tillage brought
 First fruits, the green ear, and the yellow sheaf,
 Unculled, as came to hand; a shepherd next,
 More meek, came with the firstlings of his flock,
 Choicest and best; then, sacrificing, laid
 The inwards and their fat, with incense strowed,
 On the cleft wood, and all due rights performed:
 His offering soon propitious fire from Heaven
 Consumed with nimble glance, and grateful steam;
 The other's not, for his was not sincere;
 Whereat he inly raged, and, as they talked,
 Smote him into the midriff with a stone
 That beat out life; he fell; and, deadly pale,
 Groaned out his soul with gushing blood effused.
 Much at that sight was Adam in his heart
 Dismayed, and thus in haste to the Angel cried.
 O Teacher, some great mischief hath befallen
 To that meek man, who well had sacrificed;
 Is piety thus and pure devotion paid?
 To whom Michael thus, he also moved, replied.
 These two are brethren, Adam, and to come
 Out of thy loins; the unjust the just hath slain,
 For envy that his brother's offering found
 From Heaven acceptance; but the bloody fact
 Will be avenged; and the other's faith, approved,
 Lose no reward; though here thou see him die,
 Rolling in dust and gore.  To which our sire.
 Alas! both for the deed, and for the cause!
 But have I now seen Death?  Is this the way
 I must return to native dust?  O sight
 Of terrour, foul and ugly to behold,
 Horrid to think, how horrible to feel!
 To whom thus Michael.  Death thou hast seen
 In his first shape on Man; but many shapes
 Of Death, and many are the ways that lead
 To his grim cave, all dismal; yet to sense
 More terrible at the entrance, than within.
 Some, as thou sawest, by violent stroke shall die;
 By fire, flood, famine, by intemperance more
 In meats and drinks, which on the earth shall bring
 Diseases dire, of which a monstrous crew
 Before thee shall appear; that thou mayest know
 What misery the inabstinence of Eve
 Shall bring on Men.  Immediately a place
 Before his eyes appeared, sad, noisome, dark;
 A lazar-house it seemed; wherein were laid
 Numbers of all diseased; all maladies
 Of ghastly spasm, or racking torture, qualms
 Of heart-sick agony, all feverous kinds,
 Convulsions, epilepsies, fierce catarrhs,
 Intestine stone and ulcer, colick-pangs,
 Demoniack phrenzy, moaping melancholy,
 And moon-struck madness, pining atrophy,
 Marasmus, and wide-wasting pestilence,
 Dropsies, and asthmas, and joint-racking rheums.
 Dire was the tossing, deep the groans; Despair
 Tended the sick busiest from couch to couch;
 And over them triumphant Death his dart
 Shook, but delayed to strike, though oft invoked
 With vows, as their chief good, and final hope.
 Sight so deform what heart of rock could long
 Dry-eyed behold?  Adam could not, but wept,
 Though not of woman born; compassion quelled
 His best of man, and gave him up to tears
 A space, till firmer thoughts restrained excess;
 And, scarce recovering words, his plaint renewed.
 O miserable mankind, to what fall
 Degraded, to what wretched state reserved!
 Better end here unborn.  Why is life given
 To be thus wrested from us? rather, why
 Obtruded on us thus? who, if we knew
 What we receive, would either no accept
 Life offered, or soon beg to lay it down;
 Glad to be so dismissed in peace.  Can thus
 The image of God in Man, created once
 So goodly and erect, though faulty since,
 To such unsightly sufferings be debased
 Under inhuman pains?  Why should not Man,
 Retaining still divine similitude
 In part, from such deformities be free,
 And, for his Maker's image sake, exempt?
 Their Maker's image, answered Michael, then
 Forsook them, when themselves they vilified
 To serve ungoverned Appetite; and took
 His image whom they served, a brutish vice,
 Inductive mainly to the sin of Eve.
 Therefore so abject is their punishment,
 Disfiguring not God's likeness, but their own;
 Or if his likeness, by themselves defaced;
 While they pervert pure Nature's healthful rules
 To loathsome sickness; worthily, since they
 God's image did not reverence in themselves.
 I yield it just, said Adam, and submit.
 But is there yet no other way, besides
 These painful passages, how we may come
 To death, and mix with our connatural dust?
 There is, said Michael, if thou well observe
 The rule of Not too much; by temperance taught,
 In what thou eatest and drinkest; seeking from thence
 Due nourishment, not gluttonous delight,
 Till many years over thy head return:
 So mayest thou live; till, like ripe fruit, thou drop
 Into thy mother's lap; or be with ease
 Gathered, nor harshly plucked; for death mature:
 This is Old Age; but then, thou must outlive
 Thy youth, thy strength, thy beauty; which will change
 To withered, weak, and gray; thy senses then,
 Obtuse, all taste of pleasure must forego,
 To what thou hast; and, for the air of youth,
 Hopeful and cheerful, in thy blood will reign
 A melancholy damp of cold and dry
 To weigh thy spirits down, and last consume
 The balm of life.  To whom our ancestor.
 Henceforth I fly not death, nor would prolong
 Life much; bent rather, how I may be quit,
 Fairest and easiest, of this cumbrous charge;
 Which I must keep till my appointed day
 Of rendering up, and patiently attend
 My dissolution.  Michael replied.
 Nor love thy life, nor hate; but what thou livest
 Live well; how long, or short, permit to Heaven:
 And now prepare thee for another sight.
 He looked, and saw a spacious plain, whereon
 Were tents of various hue; by some, were herds
 Of cattle grazing; others, whence the sound
 Of instruments, that made melodious chime,
 Was heard, of harp and organ; and, who moved
 Their stops and chords, was seen; his volant touch,
 Instinct through all proportions, low and high,
 Fled and pursued transverse the resonant fugue.
 In other part stood one who, at the forge
 Labouring, two massy clods of iron and brass
 Had melted, (whether found where casual fire
 Had wasted woods on mountain or in vale,
 Down to the veins of earth; thence gliding hot
 To some cave's mouth; or whether washed by stream
 From underground;) the liquid ore he drained
 Into fit moulds prepared; from which he formed
 First his own tools; then, what might else be wrought
 Fusil or graven in metal.  After these,
 But on the hither side, a different sort
 From the high neighbouring hills, which was their seat,
 Down to the plain descended; by their guise
 Just men they seemed, and all their study bent
 To worship God aright, and know his works
 Not hid; nor those things last, which might preserve
 Freedom and peace to Men; they on the plain
 Long had not walked, when from the tents, behold!
 A bevy of fair women, richly gay
 In gems and wanton dress; to the harp they sung
 Soft amorous ditties, and in dance came on:
 The men, though grave, eyed them; and let their eyes
 Rove without rein; till, in the amorous net
 Fast caught, they liked; and each his liking chose;
 And now of love they treat, till the evening-star,
 Love's harbinger, appeared; then, all in heat
 They light the nuptial torch, and bid invoke
 Hymen, then first to marriage rites invoked:
 With feast and musick all the tents resound.
 Such happy interview, and fair event
 Of love and youth not lost, songs, garlands, flowers,
 And charming symphonies, attached the heart
 Of Adam, soon inclined to admit delight,
 The bent of nature; which he thus expressed.
 True opener of mine eyes, prime Angel blest;
 Much better seems this vision, and more hope
 Of peaceful days portends, than those two past;
 Those were of hate and death, or pain much worse;
 Here Nature seems fulfilled in all her ends.
 To whom thus Michael.  Judge not what is best
 By pleasure, though to nature seeming meet;
 Created, as thou art, to nobler end
 Holy and pure, conformity divine.
 Those tents thou sawest so pleasant, were the tents
 Of wickedness, wherein shall dwell his race
 Who slew his brother; studious they appear
 Of arts that polish life, inventers rare;
 Unmindful of their Maker, though his Spirit
 Taught them; but they his gifts acknowledged none.
 Yet they a beauteous offspring shall beget;
 For that fair female troop thou sawest, that seemed
 Of Goddesses, so blithe, so smooth, so gay,
 Yet empty of all good wherein consists
 Woman's domestick honour and chief praise;
 Bred only and completed to the taste
 Of lustful appetence, to sing, to dance,
 To dress, and troll the tongue, and roll the eye:
 To these that sober race of men, whose lives
 Religious titled them the sons of God,
 Shall yield up all their virtue, all their fame
 Ignobly, to the trains and to the smiles
 Of these fair atheists; and now swim in joy,
 Erelong to swim at large; and laugh, for which
 The world erelong a world of tears must weep.
 To whom thus Adam, of short joy bereft.
 O pity and shame, that they, who to live well
 Entered so fair, should turn aside to tread
 Paths indirect, or in the mid way faint!
 But still I see the tenour of Man's woe
 Holds on the same, from Woman to begin.
 From Man's effeminate slackness it begins,
 Said the Angel, who should better hold his place
 By wisdom, and superiour gifts received.
 But now prepare thee for another scene.
 He looked, and saw wide territory spread
 Before him, towns, and rural works between;
 Cities of men with lofty gates and towers,
 Concourse in arms, fierce faces threatening war,
 Giants of mighty bone and bold emprise;
 Part wield their arms, part curb the foaming steed,
 Single or in array of battle ranged
 Both horse and foot, nor idly mustering stood;
 One way a band select from forage drives
 A herd of beeves, fair oxen and fair kine,
 From a fat meadow ground; or fleecy flock,
 Ewes and their bleating lambs over the plain,
 Their booty; scarce with life the shepherds fly,
 But call in aid, which makes a bloody fray;
 With cruel tournament the squadrons join;
 Where cattle pastured late, now scattered lies
 With carcasses and arms the ensanguined field,
 Deserted:  Others to a city strong
 Lay siege, encamped; by battery, scale, and mine,
 Assaulting; others from the wall defend
 With dart and javelin, stones, and sulphurous fire;
 On each hand slaughter, and gigantick deeds.
 In other part the sceptered heralds call
 To council, in the city-gates; anon
 Gray-headed men and grave, with warriours mixed,
 Assemble, and harangues are heard; but soon,
 In factious opposition; till at last,
 Of middle age one rising, eminent
 In wise deport, spake much of right and wrong,
 Of justice, or religion, truth, and peace,
 And judgement from above: him old and young
 Exploded, and had seized with violent hands,
 Had not a cloud descending snatched him thence
 Unseen amid the throng: so violence
 Proceeded, and oppression, and sword-law,
 Through all the plain, and refuge none was found.
 Adam was all in tears, and to his guide
 Lamenting turned full sad; O! what are these,
 Death's ministers, not men? who thus deal death
 Inhumanly to men, and multiply
 Ten thousandfold the sin of him who slew
 His brother: for of whom such massacre
 Make they, but of their brethren; men of men
 But who was that just man, whom had not Heaven
 Rescued, had in his righteousness been lost?
 To whom thus Michael.  These are the product
 Of those ill-mated marriages thou sawest;
 Where good with bad were matched, who of themselves
 Abhor to join; and, by imprudence mixed,
 Produce prodigious births of body or mind.
 Such were these giants, men of high renown;
 For in those days might only shall be admired,
 And valour and heroick virtue called;
 To overcome in battle, and subdue
 Nations, and bring home spoils with infinite
 Man-slaughter, shall be held the highest pitch
 Of human glory; and for glory done
 Of triumph, to be styled great conquerours
 Patrons of mankind, Gods, and sons of Gods;
 Destroyers rightlier called, and plagues of men.
 Thus fame shall be achieved, renown on earth;
 And what most merits fame, in silence hid.
 But he, the seventh from thee, whom thou beheldst
 The only righteous in a world preverse,
 And therefore hated, therefore so beset
 With foes, for daring single to be just,
 And utter odious truth, that God would come
 To judge them with his Saints; him the Most High
 Rapt in a balmy cloud with winged steeds
 Did, as thou sawest, receive, to walk with God
 High in salvation and the climes of bliss,
 Exempt from death; to show thee what reward
 Awaits the good; the rest what punishment;
 Which now direct thine eyes and soon behold.
 He looked, and saw the face of things quite changed;
 The brazen throat of war had ceased to roar;
 All now was turned to jollity and game,
 To luxury and riot, feast and dance;
 Marrying or prostituting, as befel,
 Rape or adultery, where passing fair
 Allured them; thence from cups to civil broils.
 At length a reverend sire among them came,
 And of their doings great dislike declared,
 And testified against their ways; he oft
 Frequented their assemblies, whereso met,
 Triumphs or festivals; and to them preached
 Conversion and repentance, as to souls
 In prison, under judgements imminent:
 But all in vain: which when he saw, he ceased
 Contending, and removed his tents far off;
 Then, from the mountain hewing timber tall,
 Began to build a vessel of huge bulk;
 Measured by cubit, length, and breadth, and highth;
 Smeared round with pitch; and in the side a door
 Contrived; and of provisions laid in large,
 For man and beast: when lo, a wonder strange!
 Of every beast, and bird, and insect small,
 Came sevens, and pairs; and entered in as taught
 Their order: last the sire and his three sons,
 With their four wives; and God made fast the door.
 Mean while the south-wind rose, and, with black wings
 Wide-hovering, all the clouds together drove
 From under Heaven; the hills to their supply
 Vapour, and exhalation dusk and moist,
 Sent up amain; and now the thickened sky
 Like a dark ceiling stood; down rushed the rain
 Impetuous; and continued, till the earth
 No more was seen: the floating vessel swum
 Uplifted, and secure with beaked prow
 Rode tilting o'er the waves; all dwellings else
 Flood overwhelmed, and them with all their pomp
 Deep under water rolled; sea covered sea,
 Sea without shore; and in their palaces,
 Where luxury late reigned, sea-monsters whelped
 And stabled; of mankind, so numerous late,
 All left, in one small bottom swum imbarked.
 How didst thou grieve then, Adam, to behold
 The end of all thy offspring, end so sad,
 Depopulation!  Thee another flood,
 Of tears and sorrow a flood, thee also drowned,
 And sunk thee as thy sons; till, gently reared
 By the Angel, on thy feet thou stoodest at last,
 Though comfortless; as when a father mourns
 His children, all in view destroyed at once;
 And scarce to the Angel utter'dst thus thy plaint.
 O visions ill foreseen!  Better had I
 Lived ignorant of future! so had borne
 My part of evil only, each day's lot
 Enough to bear; those now, that were dispensed
 The burden of many ages, on me light
 At once, by my foreknowledge gaining birth
 Abortive, to torment me ere their being,
 With thought that they must be.  Let no man seek
 Henceforth to be foretold, what shall befall
 Him or his children; evil he may be sure,
 Which neither his foreknowing can prevent;
 And he the future evil shall no less
 In apprehension than in substance feel,
 Grievous to bear: but that care now is past,
 Man is not whom to warn: those few escaped
 Famine and anguish will at last consume,
 Wandering that watery desart:  I had hope,
 When violence was ceased, and war on earth,
 All would have then gone well; peace would have crowned
 With length of happy days the race of Man;
 But I was far deceived; for now I see
 Peace to corrupt no less than war to waste.
 How comes it thus? unfold, celestial Guide,
 And whether here the race of Man will end.
 To whom thus Michael.  Those, whom last thou sawest
 In triumph and luxurious wealth, are they
 First seen in acts of prowess eminent
 And great exploits, but of true virtue void;
 Who, having spilt much blood, and done much wast
 Subduing nations, and achieved thereby
 Fame in the world, high titles, and rich prey;
 Shall change their course to pleasure, ease, and sloth,
 Surfeit, and lust; till wantonness and pride
 Raise out of friendship hostile deeds in peace.
 The conquered also, and enslaved by war,
 Shall, with their freedom lost, all virtue lose
 And fear of God; from whom their piety feigned
 In sharp contest of battle found no aid
 Against invaders; therefore, cooled in zeal,
 Thenceforth shall practice how to live secure,
 Worldly or dissolute, on what their lords
 Shall leave them to enjoy; for the earth shall bear
 More than enough, that temperance may be tried:
 So all shall turn degenerate, all depraved;
 Justice and temperance, truth and faith, forgot;
 One man except, the only son of light
 In a dark age, against example good,
 Against allurement, custom, and a world
 Offended: fearless of reproach and scorn,
 Or violence, he of their wicked ways
 Shall them admonish; and before them set
 The paths of righteousness, how much more safe
 And full of peace; denouncing wrath to come
 On their impenitence; and shall return
 Of them derided, but of God observed
 The one just man alive; by his command
 Shall build a wonderous ark, as thou beheldst,
 To save himself, and houshold, from amidst
 A world devote to universal wrack.
 No sooner he, with them of man and beast
 Select for life, shall in the ark be lodged,
 And sheltered round; but all the cataracts
 Of Heaven set open on the Earth shall pour
 Rain, day and night; all fountains of the deep,
 Broke up, shall heave the ocean to usurp
 Beyond all bounds; till inundation rise
 Above the highest hills:  Then shall this mount
 Of Paradise by might of waves be moved
 Out of his place, pushed by the horned flood,
 With all his verdure spoiled, and trees adrift,
 Down the great river to the opening gulf,
 And there take root an island salt and bare,
 The haunt of seals, and orcs, and sea-mews' clang:
 To teach thee that God attributes to place
 No sanctity, if none be thither brought
 By men who there frequent, or therein dwell.
 And now, what further shall ensue, behold.
 He looked, and saw the ark hull on the flood,
 Which now abated; for the clouds were fled,
 Driven by a keen north-wind, that, blowing dry,
 Wrinkled the face of deluge, as decayed;
 And the clear sun on his wide watery glass
 Gazed hot, and of the fresh wave largely drew,
 As after thirst; which made their flowing shrink
 From standing lake to tripping ebb, that stole
 With soft foot towards the deep; who now had stopt
 His sluces, as the Heaven his windows shut.
 The ark no more now floats, but seems on ground,
 Fast on the top of some high mountain fixed.
 And now the tops of hills, as rocks, appear;
 With clamour thence the rapid currents drive,
 Towards the retreating sea, their furious tide.
 Forthwith from out the ark a raven flies,
 And after him, the surer messenger,
 A dove sent forth once and again to spy
 Green tree or ground, whereon his foot may light:
 The second time returning, in his bill
 An olive-leaf he brings, pacifick sign:
 Anon dry ground appears, and from his ark
 The ancient sire descends, with all his train;
 Then with uplifted hands, and eyes devout,
 Grateful to Heaven, over his head beholds
 A dewy cloud, and in the cloud a bow
 Conspicuous with three lifted colours gay,
 Betokening peace from God, and covenant new.
 Whereat the heart of Adam, erst so sad,
 Greatly rejoiced; and thus his joy broke forth.
 O thou, who future things canst represent
 As present, heavenly Instructer!  I revive
 At this last sight; assured that Man shall live,
 With all the creatures, and their seed preserve.
 Far less I now lament for one whole world
 Of wicked sons destroyed, than I rejoice
 For one man found so perfect, and so just,
 That God vouchsafes to raise another world
 From him, and all his anger to forget.
 But say, what mean those coloured streaks in Heaven
 Distended, as the brow of God appeased?
 Or serve they, as a flowery verge, to bind
 The fluid skirts of that same watery cloud,
 Lest it again dissolve, and shower the earth?
 To whom the Arch-Angel.  Dextrously thou aimest;
 So willingly doth God remit his ire,
 Though late repenting him of Man depraved;
 Grieved at his heart, when looking down he saw
 The whole earth filled with violence, and all flesh
 Corrupting each their way; yet, those removed,
 Such grace shall one just man find in his sight,
 That he relents, not to blot out mankind;
 And makes a covenant never to destroy
 The earth again by flood; nor let the sea
 Surpass his bounds; nor rain to drown the world,
 With man therein or beast; but, when he brings
 Over the earth a cloud, will therein set
 His triple-coloured bow, whereon to look,
 And call to mind his covenant: Day and night,
 Seed-time and harvest, heat and hoary frost,
 Shall hold their course; till fire purge all things new,
 Both Heaven and Earth, wherein the just shall dwell.
 
 
 
 Book XII
 
 
 As one who in his journey bates at noon,
 Though bent on speed; so here the Arch-Angel paused
 Betwixt the world destroyed and world restored,
 If Adam aught perhaps might interpose;
 Then, with transition sweet, new speech resumes.
 Thus thou hast seen one world begin, and end;
 And Man, as from a second stock, proceed.
 Much thou hast yet to see; but I perceive
 Thy mortal sight to fail; objects divine
 Must needs impair and weary human sense:
 Henceforth what is to come I will relate;
 Thou therefore give due audience, and attend.
 This second source of Men, while yet but few,
 And while the dread of judgement past remains
 Fresh in their minds, fearing the Deity,
 With some regard to what is just and right
 Shall lead their lives, and multiply apace;
 Labouring the soil, and reaping plenteous crop,
 Corn, wine, and oil; and, from the herd or flock,
 Oft sacrificing bullock, lamb, or kid,
 With large wine-offerings poured, and sacred feast,
 Shall spend their days in joy unblamed; and dwell
 Long time in peace, by families and tribes,
 Under paternal rule: till one shall rise
 Of proud ambitious heart; who, not content
 With fair equality, fraternal state,
 Will arrogate dominion undeserved
 Over his brethren, and quite dispossess
 Concord and law of nature from the earth;
 Hunting (and men not beasts shall be his game)
 With war, and hostile snare, such as refuse
 Subjection to his empire tyrannous:
 A mighty hunter thence he shall be styled
 Before the Lord; as in despite of Heaven,
 Or from Heaven, claiming second sovranty;
 And from rebellion shall derive his name,
 Though of rebellion others he accuse.
 He with a crew, whom like ambition joins
 With him or under him to tyrannize,
 Marching from Eden towards the west, shall find
 The plain, wherein a black bituminous gurge
 Boils out from under ground, the mouth of Hell:
 Of brick, and of that stuff, they cast to build
 A city and tower, whose top may reach to Heaven;
 And get themselves a name; lest, far dispersed
 In foreign lands, their memory be lost;
 Regardless whether good or evil fame.
 But God, who oft descends to visit men
 Unseen, and through their habitations walks
 To mark their doings, them beholding soon,
 Comes down to see their city, ere the tower
 Obstruct Heaven-towers, and in derision sets
 Upon their tongues a various spirit, to rase
 Quite out their native language; and, instead,
 To sow a jangling noise of words unknown:
 Forthwith a hideous gabble rises loud,
 Among the builders; each to other calls
 Not understood; till hoarse, and all in rage,
 As mocked they storm: great laughter was in Heaven,
 And looking down, to see the hubbub strange,
 And hear the din:  Thus was the building left
 Ridiculous, and the work Confusion named.
 Whereto thus Adam, fatherly displeased.
 O execrable son! so to aspire
 Above his brethren; to himself assuming
 Authority usurped, from God not given:
 He gave us only over beast, fish, fowl,
 Dominion absolute; that right we hold
 By his donation; but man over men
 He made not lord; such title to himself
 Reserving, human left from human free.
 But this usurper his encroachment proud
 Stays not on Man; to God his tower intends
 Siege and defiance:  Wretched man! what food
 Will he convey up thither, to sustain
 Himself and his rash army; where thin air
 Above the clouds will pine his entrails gross,
 And famish him of breath, if not of bread?
 To whom thus Michael.  Justly thou abhorrest
 That son, who on the quiet state of men
 Such trouble brought, affecting to subdue
 Rational liberty; yet know withal,
 Since thy original lapse, true liberty
 Is lost, which always with right reason dwells
 Twinned, and from her hath no dividual being:
 Reason in man obscured, or not obeyed,
 Immediately inordinate desires,
 And upstart passions, catch the government
 From reason; and to servitude reduce
 Man, till then free.  Therefore, since he permits
 Within himself unworthy powers to reign
 Over free reason, God, in judgement just,
 Subjects him from without to violent lords;
 Who oft as undeservedly enthrall
 His outward freedom:  Tyranny must be;
 Though to the tyrant thereby no excuse.
 Yet sometimes nations will decline so low
 From virtue, which is reason, that no wrong,
 But justice, and some fatal curse annexed,
 Deprives them of their outward liberty;
 Their inward lost:  Witness the irreverent son
 Of him who built the ark; who, for the shame
 Done to his father, heard this heavy curse,
 Servant of servants, on his vicious race.
 Thus will this latter, as the former world,
 Still tend from bad to worse; till God at last,
 Wearied with their iniquities, withdraw
 His presence from among them, and avert
 His holy eyes; resolving from thenceforth
 To leave them to their own polluted ways;
 And one peculiar nation to select
 From all the rest, of whom to be invoked,
 A nation from one faithful man to spring:
 Him on this side Euphrates yet residing,
 Bred up in idol-worship:  O, that men
 (Canst thou believe?) should be so stupid grown,
 While yet the patriarch lived, who 'scaped the flood,
 As to forsake the living God, and fall
 To worship their own work in wood and stone
 For Gods!  Yet him God the Most High vouchsafes
 To call by vision, from his father's house,
 His kindred, and false Gods, into a land
 Which he will show him; and from him will raise
 A mighty nation; and upon him shower
 His benediction so, that in his seed
 All nations shall be blest: he straight obeys;
 Not knowing to what land, yet firm believes:
 I see him, but thou canst not, with what faith
 He leaves his Gods, his friends, and native soil,
 Ur of Chaldaea, passing now the ford
 To Haran; after him a cumbrous train
 Of herds and flocks, and numerous servitude;
 Not wandering poor, but trusting all his wealth
 With God, who called him, in a land unknown.
 Canaan he now attains; I see his tents
 Pitched about Sechem, and the neighbouring plain
 Of Moreh; there by promise he receives
 Gift to his progeny of all that land,
 From Hameth northward to the Desart south;
 (Things by their names I call, though yet unnamed;)
 From Hermon east to the great western Sea;
 Mount Hermon, yonder sea; each place behold
 In prospect, as I point them; on the shore
 Mount Carmel; here, the double-founted stream,
 Jordan, true limit eastward; but his sons
 Shall dwell to Senir, that long ridge of hills.
 This ponder, that all nations of the earth
 Shall in his seed be blessed:  By that seed
 Is meant thy great Deliverer, who shall bruise
 The Serpent's head; whereof to thee anon
 Plainlier shall be revealed.  This patriarch blest,
 Whom faithful Abraham due time shall call,
 A son, and of his son a grand-child, leaves;
 Like him in faith, in wisdom, and renown:
 The grandchild, with twelve sons increased, departs
 From Canaan to a land hereafter called
 Egypt, divided by the river Nile
 See where it flows, disgorging at seven mouths
 Into the sea.  To sojourn in that land
 He comes, invited by a younger son
 In time of dearth, a son whose worthy deeds
 Raise him to be the second in that realm
 Of Pharaoh.  There he dies, and leaves his race
 Growing into a nation, and now grown
 Suspected to a sequent king, who seeks
 To stop their overgrowth, as inmate guests
 Too numerous; whence of guests he makes them slaves
 Inhospitably, and kills their infant males:
 Till by two brethren (these two brethren call
 Moses and Aaron) sent from God to claim
 His people from enthralment, they return,
 With glory and spoil, back to their promised land.
 But first, the lawless tyrant, who denies
 To know their God, or message to regard,
 Must be compelled by signs and judgements dire;
 To blood unshed the rivers must be turned;
 Frogs, lice, and flies, must all his palace fill
 With loathed intrusion, and fill all the land;
 His cattle must of rot and murren die;
 Botches and blains must all his flesh emboss,
 And all his people; thunder mixed with hail,
 Hail mixed with fire, must rend the Egyptians sky,
 And wheel on the earth, devouring where it rolls;
 What it devours not, herb, or fruit, or grain,
 A darksome cloud of locusts swarming down
 Must eat, and on the ground leave nothing green;
 Darkness must overshadow all his bounds,
 Palpable darkness, and blot out three days;
 Last, with one midnight stroke, all the first-born
 Of Egypt must lie dead.  Thus with ten wounds
 The river-dragon tamed at length submits
 To let his sojourners depart, and oft
 Humbles his stubborn heart; but still, as ice
 More hardened after thaw; till, in his rage
 Pursuing whom he late dismissed, the sea
 Swallows him with his host; but them lets pass,
 As on dry land, between two crystal walls;
 Awed by the rod of Moses so to stand
 Divided, till his rescued gain their shore:
 Such wondrous power God to his saint will lend,
 Though present in his Angel; who shall go
 Before them in a cloud, and pillar of fire;
 By day a cloud, by night a pillar of fire;
 To guide them in their journey, and remove
 Behind them, while the obdurate king pursues:
 All night he will pursue; but his approach
 Darkness defends between till morning watch;
 Then through the fiery pillar, and the cloud,
 God looking forth will trouble all his host,
 And craze their chariot-wheels: when by command
 Moses once more his potent rod extends
 Over the sea; the sea his rod obeys;
 On their embattled ranks the waves return,
 And overwhelm their war:  The race elect
 Safe toward Canaan from the shore advance
 Through the wild Desart, not the readiest way;
 Lest, entering on the Canaanite alarmed,
 War terrify them inexpert, and fear
 Return them back to Egypt, choosing rather
 Inglorious life with servitude; for life
 To noble and ignoble is more sweet
 Untrained in arms, where rashness leads not on.
 This also shall they gain by their delay
 In the wide wilderness; there they shall found
 Their government, and their great senate choose
 Through the twelve tribes, to rule by laws ordained:
 God from the mount of Sinai, whose gray top
 Shall tremble, he descending, will himself
 In thunder, lightning, and loud trumpets' sound,
 Ordain them laws; part, such as appertain
 To civil justice; part, religious rites
 Of sacrifice; informing them, by types
 And shadows, of that destined Seed to bruise
 The Serpent, by what means he shall achieve
 Mankind's deliverance.  But the voice of God
 To mortal ear is dreadful:  They beseech
 That Moses might report to them his will,
 And terrour cease; he grants what they besought,
 Instructed that to God is no access
 Without Mediator, whose high office now
 Moses in figure bears; to introduce
 One greater, of whose day he shall foretel,
 And all the Prophets in their age the times
 Of great Messiah shall sing.  Thus, laws and rites
 Established, such delight hath God in Men
 Obedient to his will, that he vouchsafes
 Among them to set up his tabernacle;
 The Holy One with mortal Men to dwell:
 By his prescript a sanctuary is framed
 Of cedar, overlaid with gold; therein
 An ark, and in the ark his testimony,
 The records of his covenant; over these
 A mercy-seat of gold, between the wings
 Of two bright Cherubim; before him burn
 Seven lamps as in a zodiack representing
 The heavenly fires; over the tent a cloud
 Shall rest by day, a fiery gleam by night;
 Save when they journey, and at length they come,
 Conducted by his Angel, to the land
 Promised to Abraham and his seed:--The rest
 Were long to tell; how many battles fought
 How many kings destroyed; and kingdoms won;
 Or how the sun shall in mid Heaven stand still
 A day entire, and night's due course adjourn,
 Man's voice commanding, "Sun, in Gibeon stand,
 And thou moon in the vale of Aialon,
 Till Israel overcome!" so call the third
 From Abraham, son of Isaac; and from him
 His whole descent, who thus shall Canaan win.
 Here Adam interposed.  O sent from Heaven,
 Enlightener of my darkness, gracious things
 Thou hast revealed; those chiefly, which concern
 Just Abraham and his seed: now first I find
 Mine eyes true-opening, and my heart much eased;
 Erewhile perplexed with thoughts, what would become
 Of me and all mankind:  But now I see
 His day, in whom all nations shall be blest;
 Favour unmerited by me, who sought
 Forbidden knowledge by forbidden means.
 This yet I apprehend not, why to those
 Among whom God will deign to dwell on earth
 So many and so various laws are given;
 So many laws argue so many sins
 Among them; how can God with such reside?
 To whom thus Michael.  Doubt not but that sin
 Will reign among them, as of thee begot;
 And therefore was law given them, to evince
 Their natural pravity, by stirring up
 Sin against law to fight: that when they see
 Law can discover sin, but not remove,
 Save by those shadowy expiations weak,
 The blood of bulls and goats, they may conclude
 Some blood more precious must be paid for Man;
 Just for unjust; that, in such righteousness
 To them by faith imputed, they may find
 Justification towards God, and peace
 Of conscience; which the law by ceremonies
 Cannot appease; nor Man the mortal part
 Perform; and, not performing, cannot live.
 So law appears imperfect; and but given
 With purpose to resign them, in full time,
 Up to a better covenant; disciplined
 From shadowy types to truth; from flesh to spirit;
 From imposition of strict laws to free
 Acceptance of large grace; from servile fear
 To filial; works of law to works of faith.
 And therefore shall not Moses, though of God
 Highly beloved, being but the minister
 Of law, his people into Canaan lead;
 But Joshua, whom the Gentiles Jesus call,
 His name and office bearing, who shall quell
 The adversary-Serpent, and bring back
 Through the world's wilderness long-wandered Man
 Safe to eternal Paradise of rest.
 Mean while they, in their earthly Canaan placed,
 Long time shall dwell and prosper, but when sins
 National interrupt their publick peace,
 Provoking God to raise them enemies;
 From whom as oft he saves them penitent
 By Judges first, then under Kings; of whom
 The second, both for piety renowned
 And puissant deeds, a promise shall receive
 Irrevocable, that his regal throne
 For ever shall endure; the like shall sing
 All Prophecy, that of the royal stock
 Of David (so I name this king) shall rise
 A Son, the Woman's seed to thee foretold,
 Foretold to Abraham, as in whom shall trust
 All nations; and to kings foretold, of kings
 The last; for of his reign shall be no end.
 But first, a long succession must ensue;
 And his next son, for wealth and wisdom famed,
 The clouded ark of God, till then in tents
 Wandering, shall in a glorious temple enshrine.
 Such follow him, as shall be registered
 Part good, part bad; of bad the longer scroll;
 Whose foul idolatries, and other faults
 Heaped to the popular sum, will so incense
 God, as to leave them, and expose their land,
 Their city, his temple, and his holy ark,
 With all his sacred things, a scorn and prey
 To that proud city, whose high walls thou sawest
 Left in confusion; Babylon thence called.
 There in captivity he lets them dwell
 The space of seventy years; then brings them back,
 Remembering mercy, and his covenant sworn
 To David, stablished as the days of Heaven.
 Returned from Babylon by leave of kings
 Their lords, whom God disposed, the house of God
 They first re-edify; and for a while
 In mean estate live moderate; till, grown
 In wealth and multitude, factious they grow;
 But first among the priests dissention springs,
 Men who attend the altar, and should most
 Endeavour peace: their strife pollution brings
 Upon the temple itself: at last they seise
 The scepter, and regard not David's sons;
 Then lose it to a stranger, that the true
 Anointed King Messiah might be born
 Barred of his right; yet at his birth a star,
 Unseen before in Heaven, proclaims him come;
 And guides the eastern sages, who inquire
 His place, to offer incense, myrrh, and gold:
 His place of birth a solemn Angel tells
 To simple shepherds, keeping watch by night;
 They gladly thither haste, and by a quire
 Of squadroned Angels hear his carol sung.
 A virgin is his mother, but his sire
 The power of the Most High:  He shall ascend
 The throne hereditary, and bound his reign
 With Earth's wide bounds, his glory with the Heavens.
 He ceased, discerning Adam with such joy
 Surcharged, as had like grief been dewed in tears,
 Without the vent of words; which these he breathed.
 O prophet of glad tidings, finisher
 Of utmost hope! now clear I understand
 What oft my steadiest thoughts have searched in vain;
 Why our great Expectation should be called
 The seed of Woman:  Virgin Mother, hail,
 High in the love of Heaven; yet from my loins
 Thou shalt proceed, and from thy womb the Son
 Of God Most High: so God with Man unites!
 Needs must the Serpent now his capital bruise
 Expect with mortal pain:  Say where and when
 Their fight, what stroke shall bruise the victor's heel.
 To whom thus Michael.  Dream not of their fight,
 As of a duel, or the local wounds
 Of head or heel:  Not therefore joins the Son
 Manhood to Godhead, with more strength to foil
 Thy enemy; nor so is overcome
 Satan, whose fall from Heaven, a deadlier bruise,
 Disabled, not to give thee thy death's wound:
 Which he, who comes thy Saviour, shall recure,
 Not by destroying Satan, but his works
 In thee, and in thy seed:  Nor can this be,
 But by fulfilling that which thou didst want,
 Obedience to the law of God, imposed
 On penalty of death, and suffering death;
 The penalty to thy transgression due,
 And due to theirs which out of thine will grow:
 So only can high Justice rest appaid.
 The law of God exact he shall fulfil
 Both by obedience and by love, though love
 Alone fulfil the law; thy punishment
 He shall endure, by coming in the flesh
 To a reproachful life, and cursed death;
 Proclaiming life to all who shall believe
 In his redemption; and that his obedience,
 Imputed, becomes theirs by faith; his merits
 To save them, not their own, though legal, works.
 For this he shall live hated, be blasphemed,
 Seised on by force, judged, and to death condemned
 A shameful and accursed, nailed to the cross
 By his own nation; slain for bringing life:
 But to the cross he nails thy enemies,
 The law that is against thee, and the sins
 Of all mankind, with him there crucified,
 Never to hurt them more who rightly trust
 In this his satisfaction; so he dies,
 But soon revives; Death over him no power
 Shall long usurp; ere the third dawning light
 Return, the stars of morn shall see him rise
 Out of his grave, fresh as the dawning light,
 Thy ransom paid, which Man from death redeems,
 His death for Man, as many as offered life
 Neglect not, and the benefit embrace
 By faith not void of works:  This God-like act
 Annuls thy doom, the death thou shouldest have died,
 In sin for ever lost from life; this act
 Shall bruise the head of Satan, crush his strength,
 Defeating Sin and Death, his two main arms;
 And fix far deeper in his head their stings
 Than temporal death shall bruise the victor's heel,
 Or theirs whom he redeems; a death, like sleep,
 A gentle wafting to immortal life.
 Nor after resurrection shall he stay
 Longer on earth, than certain times to appear
 To his disciples, men who in his life
 Still followed him; to them shall leave in charge
 To teach all nations what of him they learned
 And his salvation; them who shall believe
 Baptizing in the profluent stream, the sign
 Of washing them from guilt of sin to life
 Pure, and in mind prepared, if so befall,
 For death, like that which the Redeemer died.
 All nations they shall teach; for, from that day,
 Not only to the sons of Abraham's loins
 Salvation shall be preached, but to the sons
 Of Abraham's faith wherever through the world;
 So in his seed all nations shall be blest.
 Then to the Heaven of Heavens he shall ascend
 With victory, triumphing through the air
 Over his foes and thine; there shall surprise
 The Serpent, prince of air, and drag in chains
 Through all his realm, and there confounded leave;
 Then enter into glory, and resume
 His seat at God's right hand, exalted high
 Above all names in Heaven; and thence shall come,
 When this world's dissolution shall be ripe,
 With glory and power to judge both quick and dead;
 To judge the unfaithful dead, but to reward
 His faithful, and receive them into bliss,
 Whether in Heaven or Earth; for then the Earth
 Shall all be Paradise, far happier place
 Than this of Eden, and far happier days.
 So spake the Arch-Angel Michael; then paused,
 As at the world's great period; and our sire,
 Replete with joy and wonder, thus replied.
 O Goodness infinite, Goodness immense!
 That all this good of evil shall produce,
 And evil turn to good; more wonderful
 Than that which by creation first brought forth
 Light out of darkness!  Full of doubt I stand,
 Whether I should repent me now of sin
 By me done, and occasioned; or rejoice
 Much more, that much more good thereof shall spring;
 To God more glory, more good-will to Men
 From God, and over wrath grace shall abound.
 But say, if our Deliverer up to Heaven
 Must re-ascend, what will betide the few
 His faithful, left among the unfaithful herd,
 The enemies of truth?  Who then shall guide
 His people, who defend?  Will they not deal
 Worse with his followers than with him they dealt?
 Be sure they will, said the Angel; but from Heaven
 He to his own a Comforter will send,
 The promise of the Father, who shall dwell
 His Spirit within them; and the law of faith,
 Working through love, upon their hearts shall write,
 To guide them in all truth; and also arm
 With spiritual armour, able to resist
 Satan's assaults, and quench his fiery darts;
 What man can do against them, not afraid,
 Though to the death; against such cruelties
 With inward consolations recompensed,
 And oft supported so as shall amaze
 Their proudest persecutors:  For the Spirit,
 Poured first on his Apostles, whom he sends
 To evangelize the nations, then on all
 Baptized, shall them with wonderous gifts endue
 To speak all tongues, and do all miracles,
 As did their Lord before them.  Thus they win
 Great numbers of each nation to receive
 With joy the tidings brought from Heaven:  At length
 Their ministry performed, and race well run,
 Their doctrine and their story written left,
 They die; but in their room, as they forewarn,
 Wolves shall succeed for teachers, grievous wolves,
 Who all the sacred mysteries of Heaven
 To their own vile advantages shall turn
 Of lucre and ambition; and the truth
 With superstitions and traditions taint,
 Left only in those written records pure,
 Though not but by the Spirit understood.
 Then shall they seek to avail themselves of names,
 Places, and titles, and with these to join
 Secular power; though feigning still to act
 By spiritual, to themselves appropriating
 The Spirit of God, promised alike and given
 To all believers; and, from that pretence,
 Spiritual laws by carnal power shall force
 On every conscience; laws which none shall find
 Left them inrolled, or what the Spirit within
 Shall on the heart engrave.  What will they then
 But force the Spirit of Grace itself, and bind
 His consort Liberty? what, but unbuild
 His living temples, built by faith to stand,
 Their own faith, not another's? for, on earth,
 Who against faith and conscience can be heard
 Infallible? yet many will presume:
 Whence heavy persecution shall arise
 On all, who in the worship persevere
 Of spirit and truth; the rest, far greater part,
 Will deem in outward rites and specious forms
 Religion satisfied; Truth shall retire
 Bestuck with slanderous darts, and works of faith
 Rarely be found:  So shall the world go on,
 To good malignant, to bad men benign;
 Under her own weight groaning; till the day
 Appear of respiration to the just,
 And vengeance to the wicked, at return
 Of him so lately promised to thy aid,
 The Woman's Seed; obscurely then foretold,
 Now ampler known thy Saviour and thy Lord;
 Last, in the clouds, from Heaven to be revealed
 In glory of the Father, to dissolve
 Satan with his perverted world; then raise
 From the conflagrant mass, purged and refined,
 New Heavens, new Earth, ages of endless date,
 Founded in righteousness, and peace, and love;
 To bring forth fruits, joy and eternal bliss.
 He ended; and thus Adam last replied.
 How soon hath thy prediction, Seer blest,
 Measured this transient world, the race of time,
 Till time stand fixed!  Beyond is all abyss,
 Eternity, whose end no eye can reach.
 Greatly-instructed I shall hence depart;
 Greatly in peace of thought; and have my fill
 Of knowledge, what this vessel can contain;
 Beyond which was my folly to aspire.
 Henceforth I learn, that to obey is best,
 And love with fear the only God; to walk
 As in his presence; ever to observe
 His providence; and on him sole depend,
 Merciful over all his works, with good
 Still overcoming evil, and by small
 Accomplishing great things, by things deemed weak
 Subverting worldly strong, and worldly wise
 By simply meek: that suffering for truth's sake
 Is fortitude to highest victory,
 And, to the faithful, death the gate of life;
 Taught this by his example, whom I now
 Acknowledge my Redeemer ever blest.
 To whom thus also the Angel last replied.
 This having learned, thou hast attained the sum
 Of wisdom; hope no higher, though all the stars
 Thou knewest by name, and all the ethereal powers,
 All secrets of the deep, all Nature's works,
 Or works of God in Heaven, air, earth, or sea,
 And all the riches of this world enjoyedst,
 And all the rule, one empire; only add
 Deeds to thy knowledge answerable; add faith,
 Add virtue, patience, temperance; add love,
 By name to come called charity, the soul
 Of all the rest: then wilt thou not be loth
 To leave this Paradise, but shalt possess
 A Paradise within thee, happier far.--
 Let us descend now therefore from this top
 Of speculation; for the hour precise
 Exacts our parting hence; and see the guards,
 By me encamped on yonder hill, expect
 Their motion; at whose front a flaming sword,
 In signal of remove, waves fiercely round:
 We may no longer stay: go, waken Eve;
 Her also I with gentle dreams have calmed
 Portending good, and all her spirits composed
 To meek submission: thou, at season fit,
 Let her with thee partake what thou hast heard;
 Chiefly what may concern her faith to know,
 The great deliverance by her seed to come
 (For by the Woman's seed) on all mankind:
 That ye may live, which will be many days,
 Both in one faith unanimous, though sad,
 With cause, for evils past; yet much more cheered
 With meditation on the happy end.
 He ended, and they both descend the hill;
 Descended, Adam to the bower, where Eve
 Lay sleeping, ran before; but found her waked;
 And thus with words not sad she him received.
 Whence thou returnest, and whither wentest, I know;
 For God is also in sleep; and dreams advise,
 Which he hath sent propitious, some great good
 Presaging, since with sorrow and heart's distress
 Wearied I fell asleep:  But now lead on;
 In me is no delay; with thee to go,
 Is to stay here; without thee here to stay,
 Is to go hence unwilling; thou to me
 Art all things under Heaven, all places thou,
 Who for my wilful crime art banished hence.
 This further consolation yet secure
 I carry hence; though all by me is lost,
 Such favour I unworthy am vouchsafed,
 By me the Promised Seed shall all restore.
 So spake our mother Eve; and Adam heard
 Well pleased, but answered not:  For now, too nigh
 The Arch-Angel stood; and, from the other hill
 To their fixed station, all in bright array
 The Cherubim descended; on the ground
 Gliding meteorous, as evening-mist
 Risen from a river o'er the marish glides,
 And gathers ground fast at the labourer's heel
 Homeward returning.  High in front advanced,
 The brandished sword of God before them blazed,
 Fierce as a comet; which with torrid heat,
 And vapour as the Libyan air adust,
 Began to parch that temperate clime; whereat
 In either hand the hastening Angel caught
 Our lingering parents, and to the eastern gate
 Led them direct, and down the cliff as fast
 To the subjected plain; then disappeared.
 They, looking back, all the eastern side beheld
 Of Paradise, so late their happy seat,
 Waved over by that flaming brand; the gate
 With dreadful faces thronged, and fiery arms:
 Some natural tears they dropt, but wiped them soon;
 The world was all before them, where to choose
 Their place of rest, and Providence their guide:
 They, hand in hand, with wandering steps and slow,
 Through Eden took their solitary way.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Thierry Alberto, Stephen Hutcheson and the
 Online Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                  The Academy Series of English Classics
 
 
 
 
                                 _MILTON_
                                MINOR POEMS
 
 
               L'Allegro        Il Penseroso        Comus
               Arcades          On the Nativity     Lycidas
               On Shakespeare   At a Solemn Music   Sonnets
 
 
                        WITH INTRODUCTION AND NOTES
                                    BY
                              SAMUEL THURBER
 
                              ALLYN AND BACON
                           _Boston and Chicago_
 
                             COPYRIGHT, 1901,
                            BY SAMUEL THURBER.
 
                              _Norwood Press_
                   J. S. Cushing & Co.--Berwick & Smith
                           Norwood Mass. U.S.A.
 
 
 
 
                                 CONTENTS.
 
 
   Preface
   Outlines of the Life of Milton
   TEXT:
     On the Morning of Christ's Nativity
     On Shakespeare
     L'Allegro
     Il Penseroso
     Arcades
     At a Solemn Music
     Comus
     Lycidas
     Sonnets:
       I. To the Nightingale
       II. On his having arrived at the Age of Twenty-three             68
       VIII. When the Assault was intended to the City                  69
       IX. To a Virtuous Young Lady                                     70
       X. To the Lady Margaret Ley                                      70
       XIII. To Mr. H. Lawes on his Airs                                71
       XV. On the Lord General Fairfax, at the Siege of Colchester      72
       XVI. To the Lord General Cromwell, May, 1652                     72
       XVII. To Sir Henry Vane the Younger                              73
       XVIII. On the Late Massacre in Piedmont                          74
       XIX. On his Blindness                                            74
       XX. To Mr. Lawrence                                              75
       XXI. To Cyriack Skinner                                          76
       XXII. To the Same                                                76
       XXIII. On his Deceased Wife                                      77
   Notes                                                                79
 
 
 
 
                                 PREFACE.
 
 
 The purpose held in view by those who place the study of Milton in high
 school English courses is twofold: first, that youth may seasonably
 become acquainted with a portion of our great classic poetry; and,
 secondly, that they may in this poetry encounter and learn to conquer
 difficulties more serious than those they have met in the literature they
 have hitherto read. It is for the teacher to see to it that both these
 aims are attained. The pupil must read with interest, and he must expect
 at the same time to have to do some strenuous thinking and not to object
 to turning over many books.
 
 The average pupil will not at first read anything of Milton with perfect
 enjoyment. He will, with his wonted docility, commit passages to memory,
 and he will do his best to speak these passages with the elocution on
 which you insist. But the taste for this poetry is an acquired one, and
 in the acquisition usually costs efforts quite alien to the prevailing
 conceptions of reading as a pleasurable recreation.
 
 The task of pedagogy at this point becomes delicate. First of all, the
 teacher must recognize the fact that his class will not, however good
 their intentions, leap to a liking for Comus or Lycidas or even for the
 Nativity Ode. It is of no use to assign stanzas or lines as lessons and
 to expect these to be studied to a conclusion like a task of French
 translation. The only way not to be disappointed in the performance of
 the class is to expect nothing. It will be well at first, except where
 the test is quite simple, for the teacher to read it himself, making
 comment, in the way of explanation, as he goes on. Now and then he will
 stop and have a little quiz to hold attention. When classical allusions
 come up requiring research, the teacher will tell in what books the
 matter may be looked up, and will show how other poets, or Milton
 elsewhere, have played with the same piece of history or mythology. Thus
 a poem may be dealt with for a number of days. Repetition is, to a
 certain extent, excellent. The verses begin to sink into the young minds;
 the measure appeals to the inborn sense of rhythm; the poem is caught by
 the ear like a piece of music; the utterance of it becomes more like
 singing than speaking. In fact, the great secret of teaching poetry in
 school is to get rid of the commonplace manner of speech befitting a
 recitation in language or science, and to put in practice the obvious
 truth that verse has its own form, which is very different from the form
 of prose. But repetition may go too far. Over-familiarity may beget
 indifference. Other poems await the attention of the class.
 
 The teacher who really means to interest his classes, and begins by being
 interested and interesting himself, will rarely fail to accomplish his
 purpose. The principal obstacle to success here is the necessity, that
 frequently exists, of conforming to the custom of examining, marking, and
 ranking--a practice that thwarts genuine personal influence, formalizes
 all procedures, and tends to deaden natural interest by substituting for
 it the artificial interest of school standing. The Milton lesson must be
 a serious one because it is given to the study of the serious work of the
 gravest and most high-minded of men; and it must be an enjoyable one
 because it deals with the verse of the most musical of poets, and because
 one mood of joy is the only mood in which literature can be profitably
 studied.
 
 As to the difficulties which the learner first encounters when he comes
 to Milton, these grow sometimes out of the diction, sometimes out of the
 syntax, and sometimes out of the poet's figures and allusions. Some
 difficulties can be explained at once and completely. Others cannot be
 explained at all with any reasonable hope of touching the beginner's mind
 with matter that he can appropriate. Often the young reader slips over
 points of possible learned annotation without the least consciousness
 that here great scholarship might make an imposing display. Perfectly
 useless is it to set forth for the pupil the interesting echoes from
 ancient poets which generations of delving scholars have accumulated in
 their notes to Milton, pleasing as these are to mature readers.
 
 The rule should be to expound and illustrate sufficiently to remove those
 perplexities which really tease the pupil's mind and cause him to feel
 dissatisfaction with himself. In many cases our only course is to
 postpone exposition and to trust that the learner will grow up to the
 insight which he as yet does not possess and which we cannot possibly
 give him. A learned writer, like Milton, who has read all antiquity, and
 who has no purpose of writing for children, inevitably contemplates a
 public of men approximately his equals in culture, and expects to find
 "fit audience, though few."
 
 But many of the difficulties that confront the beginner in Milton ask
 only to be explained at once by some one who has had more experience in
 the older literature. Archaic forms of words and expressions, with which
 the ripe student is familiar, worry the tyro, and must be accounted for.
 Often the common dictionaries will give all needed help; but the best
 means of acquiring speedy familiarity with obsolete and rare forms is a
 Milton concordance--such as that of Bradshaw--in connection with the
 Century Dictionary, or with the Oxford Dictionary, so far as this goes.
 These means of easy research should be at hand. I find that pupils often
 need a pretty sharp spur to make them use even their abridged
 dictionaries. But so far as concerns acquaintance with the vocabulary of
 poetic diction, nothing will do except the dictionary habit, accompanied
 by an effort of the memory to retain what has been learned.
 
 Difficulties that lurk in an involved syntax the pupil may usually be
 expected to solve by study. But such a peculiar construction as that in
 Sonnet X 9 will probably have to be explained to him.
 
 In the puritan theology and its implications he cannot take much
 interest, and will of course not be asked to do so. But high school
 students of Milton will ordinarily, in their historical courses, have
 come down to the times in which the poet lived, will understand his
 relation to public events, and will appreciate his feeling toward the
 English ecclesiastical system. Puritanism, a phenomenon of the most
 tremendous importance at a certain period of English history, has so
 completely disappeared from the modern world, that the utterances of a
 seventeenth-century poet, professedly a partisan, on matters of church
 and state, no longer exasperate, and can barely even interest, students
 of literature.
 
 To read either Paradise Lost or the Divine Comedy we must find the poet's
 cosmical and his theological standpoint. We have no right to be surprised
 or shocked at his conceptions. We must take him as he is, and let him
 lead us through the universe as he has planned it. So long as we set up
 our modern views as a standard, and by this standard judge the ancient
 men, we fail in hospitality of thought, and come short of our duty as
 readers.
 
 This consideration suggests yet another purpose in setting youth to the
 reading of Milton. By no means an ancient poet, he takes us,
 nevertheless, to a world different from our own, and in some sense helps
 us out of the modern time in which our lives have fallen, to show us how
 other ages conceived of God and Heaven. The mark of an educated man is
 respect for the past; the old philosophies and religions do not startle
 and repel him; his ancestors were once in those stages of belief; in some
 stage of this vast movement of thought he and his fellows are at the
 present moment. This largeness of view can be fruitfully impressed on
 youth only by letting them read, under wise guidance, the older poets.
 
 
 
 
                      OUTLINES OF THE LIFE OF MILTON.
 
 
 John Milton was born in London on the ninth of December, 1608. Queen
 Elizabeth had then been dead five years, and the literature which we call
 Elizabethan was still being written by the men who had begun their
 careers under her reign. Spenser had died in 1599. The theatres were yet
 in the enjoyment of full popularity, and the play-writers were producing
 works that continued the traditions and the manner of the Elizabethan
 drama. Shakespeare had still eight years to live, and at least four of
 the great plays to write. Bacon's fame was already great, but the events
 of eighteen years were to cloud his reputation and establish his renown.
 Jonson, great as a writer of masks, was to live till he might have seen,
 in Comus, how a young and scholarly puritan humanist thought that a mask
 should be conceived.
 
 Born thus in the fifth year of the first of the Stuarts, Milton lived to
 witness all the vicissitudes of English politics in which that family was
 involved, except the very last. He did not see the Revolution of 1688.
 Surviving for fourteen years the restoration of Charles II., he died in
 1674, at the age of sixty-six.
 
 Milton's social position can be inferred from the fact that his father
 was what was then called a scrivener,--that is, he kept an office in his
 dwelling, and was employed to draw up contracts, wills, and other legal
 documents. This occupation implied knowledge at least of the forms of the
 law, though not of its history or principles. It did not imply liberal
 education, though it brought its practitioner, doubtless, more or less
 into contact with men of really professional standing in the science of
 jurisprudence. Perhaps the elder Milton cherished a deeper conviction of
 the value of classic culture than do those who simply inherit, and take
 as a matter of course, the custom of devoting years to the study of
 ancient languages and literatures.
 
 Evidently the father thought he saw in his son that promise of
 intellectual vigor and of sound moral stamina which justified the
 innovation, in his family, of sending his boy to the university. His
 preparation for college Milton got under private masters and at the
 famous public school of St. Paul's, which was near his home. This
 preparation consisted chiefly in exercises in Latin composition and
 literature, and was both thorough and effectual. At sixteen, when he went
 to college, he had already composed Latin verse, and he read and wrote
 Latin with facility.
 
 In 1625 Milton entered Christ's College, Cambridge. Here he remained as a
 student seven years, or till 1632, taking in course his A.B. and A.M.
 degrees, and, in spite of his studious habits and his aversion to the
 rough and wayward customs of student life, winning more and more, and at
 last having in full measure, the respect of his fellow-collegians. During
 these years he wrote, but did not publish, in Latin or English, no less
 than twenty-five pieces of verse, among them poems of no less note than
 the Nativity Ode, and the Sonnet on arriving at the age of twenty-three.
 The lines on Shakespeare were also composed in this period, and appeared
 in print among the poems prefixed to the second Shakespeare folio in
 1632.
 
 Returning, at the close of his university course, to the paternal
 residence, the poet came, not to London, but to the village of Horton, in
 Buckinghamshire, where his father had taken a house in order to live in
 the country. Now had to be debated the question of a profession. Hitherto
 the son had seemed silently to acquiesce in the understood hope of the
 family that he would devote himself to a career in the church. But during
 his university years of study and observation his views had become fixed,
 his mind had advanced to self-determination, and he could not remain
 content with a future that seemed to hamper his intellectual freedom.
 This difference between father and son was settled, apparently without
 strife, by the elder man's entire yielding to the desires of the younger.
 The son could not, as we can well understand if we have read even only a
 little of his verse or his prose, be otherwise than strenuous, insistent,
 and masterful. To his father he was of course filial and respectful, we
 may imagine him even gentle; but conciliatory, yielding, the point being
 a vital one, it was not in his nature to be.
 
 What the young Milton desired was to lead a life devoted to literature,
 or, more specifically, to poetry. This meant that he wished still to
 study a long time, to fathom all learning in all tongues. In college he
 had, besides Latin, mastered Greek, French, Italian, and Hebrew. His
 conception of a poet was of a most profoundly learned man. He had become
 aware of the existence of vast areas of knowledge that he had not yet
 explored. Other young men turned aside without misgiving from the
 ambition to know everything, and eagerly entered into useful and
 lucrative professions. But Milton scorns the thought of applying learning
 to the service of material gain. This is his poetical conception of his
 duty as a scholar. It will dominate the spirit of his life work. To
 understand his feelings at this time both toward his father and toward
 his ideals, we must read the Latin poem _Ad Patrem_, of which Professor
 Masson gives an English translation.
 
 At Horton, therefore, Milton remains, still subsisting on his father's
 bounty. Having come back thither at the age of twenty-three, he continues
 to live at home for nearly six years, not yet practising any art by which
 to earn a livelihood. Occasionally he goes, on scholarly errands, to
 London, which is not far distant. He devotes himself simply to study, and
 having the poetic temperament, he cannot help devoting himself also to
 observation of nature. His learning becomes immense; his appetite is
 insatiable.
 
 To the Horton time belong the "minor poems" not already produced during
 the student years at Cambridge. Of the circumstances in which the several
 poems were written, an account is given in the Notes in this volume. This
 early, or minor, verse of Milton is elicited by passing events, and is
 considered to concern only himself and a few friends. For immediate fame
 he takes no thought. He feels his immaturity. His ambition contemplates a
 distant future, and he meditates plans, as yet undefined and vague, of
 some great work that the world shall not willingly let die.
 
 Very important in Milton's intellectual development is his journey to
 France and Italy, on which he set out in April, 1638. As an indication of
 his social position in England, we must note that he carries with him
 letters of introduction which secure to him notice and recognition from
 men of rank or of notable literary and scientific standing. He goes
 abroad as a cultivated private gentleman, known to have achieved
 distinction as a student. Undoubtedly his chief qualification for holding
 his own in learned Italian society was his command of languages,
 especially of Latin, unless indeed we are to put before his linguistic
 accomplishments the refined and gentlemanly personal bearing which was
 his birthright, and which, in his years of intense application to books,
 he had not forfeited. In Italy he associated with men whose intellectual
 interests were the universal ones of science, in which he was as much at
 home as they. Thus he possessed a perfect outfit of the endowments and
 the acquisitions which a traveller needs to make his travel fruitful to
 himself and honorable to his country.
 
 In Italy he made friends among men of note, and established relations
 which were to have their importance in his future life. But most
 memorable among his Italian experiences was his visit to the aged
 Galileo, who was then a "prisoner to the Inquisition" for teaching that
 the earth moves round the sun. The modern astronomy was then winning its
 way among men of thought very much as the doctrine of evolution has been
 winning its way during the last half century. Few minds surrendered
 instantly and without misgiving to the new conception. Milton has still
 many years to meditate the question before he comes to the composition of
 Paradise Lost, when his scheme of the physical universe will have to
 recognize the requirements of poetic art and the prevalence of ancient
 beliefs regarding the origin and order of the cosmos. From the fact that
 the poet puts the earth in the centre of the universe, that he adopts, in
 fact, the Ptolemaic system, though he knew the Copernican, we are not
 entitled to infer that he held a fixed conviction in the matter, and
 that, on direct examination as to his views, he would have absolutely
 professed one theory and rejected the other. The poet has all rights of
 choice, and may be said to know best where to stand to take his view of
 the world.
 
 Milton remained abroad some sixteen months, and was home again in August,
 1639. The Horton household was now broken up, the father going to live,
 first with his younger son, Christopher, at Reading, and afterward to
 spend his last years in the family of John in London, where he died in
 1647.
 
 With his removal to London in 1639 a distinct period in Milton's life
 comes to an end. He has hitherto been uninterruptedly acquiring knowledge
 both by studious devotion to books and by observation of human life in
 foreign lands. He has read all the great literatures in ancient and
 modern languages. He has felt the poetic impulse and has proved to
 himself that he has at command creative power. His purpose still is to
 produce a poem. But this poem of his aspirations is distinctly a great
 and majestic affair, and not at all a continuation of such work as that
 which he has hitherto given to his friends, and which he esteems as
 prolusions of his youth.
 
 The poetic waiting-time which Milton, now in full vigor of manhood,
 prescribes for himself, he is constrained, both by inner conviction and
 by external necessity, to fill with hard and earnest work. Henceforth,
 for a score of years, he ceases almost entirely to write verse, and he
 earns his living. He becomes a householder in London, where, as the
 father had gained his livelihood by drawing up contracts and mortgages
 for his fellow-citizens, the son proceeds to gain his by teaching their
 boys Latin.
 
 To the work of teaching, Milton addressed himself with intelligence and
 predilection. About education he had ideas of his own which he applied in
 practice and advocated in writing. His Tract on Education is a document
 of importance in the history of pedagogy, and is, besides, one of those
 memorable pieces of English prose which every student of literature,
 whatever his professional aims, must include in his reading. He kept his
 school in his own house, where he boarded some of his pupils. We could
 not imagine John Milton going into a great public school, like St.
 Paul's, to serve as under-teacher to one of the tyrannical head-masters
 of the day. The only school befitting his absolutely convinced and
 masterful spirit is one in which he reigns supreme. The great subject is
 Latin, and so thoroughly is Latin taught that finally other subjects are
 explained through the medium of this language. He had, himself, brought
 from his school and college days very decided discontent with the methods
 then in vogue. This discontent he expresses in language of peculiar
 energy and even harshness. He is a true reformer.
 
 In 1643 Milton, then thirty-five years old, married Mary Powell, a girl
 of just half his own age, daughter of a royalist residing near Oxford. We
 must imagine this young wife as coming to preside, somewhat in the
 capacity of matron, over a family of boys held severely to their tasks of
 study by a master in whom the sense of humor was almost entirely lacking,
 and whose discipline was of the sternest. That she could not endure the
 situation was but natural. Very soon after the wedding she went home with
 the understanding that she was to make a short visit to her parents and
 sisters; but she did not return for two years. Her husband summoned her,
 but she would not come back. In 1645 she at last repented of her
 waywardness, sought reconciliation, and was forgiven. These two years had
 wrought a change in Mary Powell Milton. She was now ready to live with
 her husband, and did so till her death in 1652. She left him three
 daughters, the youngest of whom, Deborah, lived till 1723, and was known
 to Addison and his contemporaries, from whom she received distinguished
 honors.
 
 In reading Milton we find that all the vicissitudes of his life reflect
 themselves in his works, so that the political and social events in which
 he is personally concerned usurp his attention, color his views, and
 often become his themes. Thus he is not, like Shakespeare, a critic of
 the whole of humanity, but is usually an advocate or an accuser of the
 leaders in church and state and of the principles which they profess. He
 is by nature a partisan. All the energy of his mind goes into
 denunciation or vindication. His experience of wedded life made him an
 advocate of easier divorce, and determined in him a mood which expressed
 itself in writings that naturally brought upon him obloquy even from
 those who held him most in honor.
 
 It would be most interesting to know something of the daily routine of
 Milton's school, to ascertain what his pupils knew and could do when he
 had done with them. But we must remember that during all the years of his
 teaching the great Revolution was in progress, that all men of thought
 were profoundly stirred on public questions, and that Milton himself was
 a politician and an eager partisan of the cause of Parliament. He did not
 consider himself a teacher finally and for good. His school did not
 develop into anything great or conspicuous, and never became an object of
 curiosity. While yet engaged in such teaching as he found to do, he had
 written the pamphlets on education and on divorce, and also the famous
 one entitled Areopagitica, a Speech for the Liberty of Unlicensed
 Printing to the Parliament of England. This is the best worth reading of
 all his prose writings. The subject of it is perfectly intelligible
 still, and its English shows to perfection the qualities of the great
 Miltonic style.
 
 After the execution of Charles I., Jan. 30, 1649, it became more than
 ever necessary for all thoughtful men to express their convictions. For a
 people to put to death its king by judicial process was an unheard of
 event. Those who considered that the Parliament had acted within the law
 and could not have done otherwise with due regard to the welfare of the
 nation had to convince doubting and timid citizens at home, and also, so
 far as was possible, to placate critics in other nations who still
 believed that the king could do no wrong; for all Europe interested
 itself in this tremendous act of the English Parliament.
 
 Within a fortnight after the death of the king, Milton published his
 pamphlet on The Tenure of Kings and Magistrates. This work so impressed
 the parliamentary leaders as a thorough and unanswerable argument in
 defence of their cause that they sought out its author, and in March
 appointed him to the important post of Secretary for Foreign Tongues.
 Milton's perfect command of Latin now stood him in good stead. Here was
 an uncompromising puritan, fully the equal of the foreign ecclesiastics
 in theology, and capable of holding his own in Latin composition with the
 most famous humanists of the time. Latin was then the language of
 international intercourse. Milton's duty was to translate into and from
 Latin the despatches that passed between his own and foreign governments.
 He also composed original treatises, some in English and some in Latin,
 the most important of which continued his justification of the national
 act of regicide. The importance of these writings was very great.
 Milton's services to the puritan cause can to-day hardly be appreciated.
 It was the constant aim of royalists at home and abroad to represent
 England as having fallen under the control of ignorant fanatics, of
 ambitious, barbarous, blood-thirsty men. By his very personality, his
 knowledge of affairs, his familiarity with ancient and mediaeval history,
 and, above all, by his fluency in Latin invective, Milton thwarted
 attempts to disparage his countrymen as lawless barbarians. He helped to
 maintain the good name of his country as a land of intellectual light and
 of respect for ancient usage. Foreigners who attempted personal
 vilification found him ready to meet them with their own weapons. The
 poet of Comus now shows himself a controversialist of unbounded energy.
 
 In 1652, shortly before the death of his wife, Milton became totally
 blind. Henceforward the duties of his secretaryship had to be performed
 with the aid of an amanuensis. He continued, however, to fill the office
 till just before the end of the Protectorate in 1659. In November, 1656,
 he married Katharine Woodcocke, who lived but till March, 1658. She left
 an infant which died a month after the mother.
 
 Milton's duties as Secretary for Foreign Tongues must have brought him,
 one would think, into some sort of personal relation with Cromwell and
 the other great parliamentary leaders. The poet leaves us in no doubt as
 to the high esteem in which he held these men. But no gossip of the time
 admits us to a glimpse of their intercourse with each other. It falls to
 Milton to eulogize Cromwell; it never came in Cromwell's way to put on
 record his estimate of Milton.
 
 With the restoration of royalty in the person of Charles II., in 1660,
 Milton's public activity of course ceased, and the second period of his
 life comes to an end. We saw his first period devoted to preparation and
 to early essays in poetry, with the distinct conception that poetry was
 yet to be the great work of his life. In his second period he expresses
 himself in verse but rarely and briefly, but produces controversial
 prose, now in English, now in Latin. In this second period he works, as
 teacher or as public secretary, for payment, supporting himself and
 family. When the third period begins, he loses all employment, goes into
 closest retirement, a widower with three daughters growing up from
 childhood, and devotes himself to the poetry that he has always
 contemplated as the object of his ambition. He has now been blind eight
 years.
 
 In view of the conspicuous part that Milton had taken in defending the
 right of Parliament to bring a king to the scaffold, it is surprising
 that of the Restoration he was not included in the number of those marked
 out for the punishment of death. He was for some time undoubtedly in
 danger. Fortunately he was overlooked, or, perhaps, was purposely
 neglected as being henceforce harmless.
 
 In February, 1663, he married his third wife Elizabeth Minshull, who
 faithfully cared for him till his death in 1674.
 
 During this last period of his life Milton composed and published his
 _major_ poems,--Paradise Lost, 1667, Paradise Regained, and Samson
 Agonistes, 1671. For Paradise Lost he received from his publisher five
 pounds in cash, with promise of five pounds when thirteen hundred copies
 should have been sold, and of two more payments, each of the same sum,
 when two more editions of the same size should have been disposed of.
 
 The last years of his life Milton appears to have spent in comparative
 comfort. His three daughters had gone out to learn trades. It seems he
 had given them no education. It may be they showed no desire or aptitude
 for instruction. Far more probably, however, he took no interest in their
 education. His ideal of womanhood, as may be gathered from numerous
 passages in his poems, is as far as possible removed from the modern
 conception of sexual equality as to opportunity for education and for
 training to self-determination. He shared in this respect the views that
 prevailed during his day in all classes of society, and he maintained
 these views as a parent no less than as the poet of Paradise.
 
 Besides the poems named above as produced during this last period of his
 life, Milton published also in these years several prose works, which
 have now little value except as showing the bent and occupation of his
 mind. Among these may be named a small Latin Grammar, written in English,
 which he had composed long before, and a History of Britain to the Norman
 Conquest.
 
 Though the immediate sale of Paradise Lost was not large, according to
 our ideas, it was yet sufficient to indicate a very respectable interest
 in the reading public of the day. We must remember that it appeared in
 the corrupt time of the Restoration, when the prevailing literary fashion
 was wholly adverse to seriousness and ideality. The age was spiritually
 degenerate. Milton himself considered that he lived "an age too late."
 The great poem had no royal or noble sponsors to give it vogue; yet it
 made its way. By no means had all minds become frivolous. The minor poems
 had been published by themselves in 1645. These had always had their
 readers. The prose pamphlets of the secretary for foreign tongues were,
 at least by a small class of observant persons, known to be the work of
 the author of Comus and Lycidas. There were not wanting men to take a
 sympathetic interest in the fate of the poet in his retirement, and to
 note the appearance of Paradise Lost as a literary event.
 
 Thus it was that Milton lived to have some slight foretaste of the honor
 which two centuries have bestowed on his memory. Visitors came to see him
 in his modest dwelling in an unfashionable quarter of London. Foreigners
 occasionally came to satisfy their curiosity. Dryden, the chief poet who
 wrote in the spirit of the Restoration, called to talk with the author of
 Paradise Lost, and to suggest improvements in the form of the poem, which
 he thought should be in rhyme. The recognition which the poet thus got in
 his lifetime is small only in comparison with the immense fame he has won
 since his death.
 
 Milton has now become an object of the profoundest curiosity. His life
 has been investigated by Professor Masson, with a minute scrutiny into
 detail such as has been devoted to no other writer but Shakespeare. His
 works are perpetually reprinted in all imaginable forms, whether of
 cheapness or of sumptuous elegance. They are read as text-books in
 schools by hosts of youth. Our beliefs regarding the great themes of the
 sacred scriptures are so colored by the Miltonic epics that we hardly
 know to-day just what part of our conceptions we owe to the Bible and
 what to the poet. Next to the Shakespearean dramas, the poems of Milton
 are the largest single influence that knits the English-speaking race
 into one vast brotherhood.
 
 All students of Milton have to acknowledge their indebtedness to
 Professor David Masson of Edinburgh, who has devoted years of labor to
 research in every department of Miltonic lore. Masson's great Life of
 Milton in Connexion with the History of his Time is far too bulky for use
 except for reference on special points. The index volume makes the
 enormous Work accessible as occasion requires.
 
 To his edition of the poetical works, Masson prefixes a life, which will
 suffice for all the needs likely to arise in school. Yet again, Masson is
 the writer of the article on Milton in the Encyclopaedia Britannica, a
 most complete presentment of everything a student ordinarily needs to
 know.
 
 In the series of Classical Writers is a little book, or primer, on
 Milton, written by Stopford A. Brooke.
 
 In the English Men of Letters series, the Milton is the work of Mark
 Pattison.
 
 The latest good account of Milton is the book entitled simply John
 Milton, by Walter Raleigh, professor at University College, Liverpool.
 This is a remarkably vigorous and illuminating piece of criticism.
 
 Perhaps the most interesting writing on a Milton subject is the book by
 Mrs. Anne Manning, The Maiden and Married Life of Mary Powell (afterward
 Mrs. Milton), and the sequel thereto, Deborah's Diary. This the student
 must read with the full understanding that it is a work of fiction.
 
 It is right to warn young readers against the natural tendency to give
 their time to critical and expository books and articles before they make
 acquaintance with originals. Almost every essayist of note has written on
 Milton. There is danger lest we accept opinions at second hand. The only
 opinions on Milton to which we have any right are those we form from our
 own reading of his works.
 
 
 
 
                           MILTON'S MINOR POEMS.
 
 
 
 
                   ON THE MORNING OF CHRIST'S NATIVITY.
 
 
                             [Composed 1629.]
 
 
                                    I.
 
     This is the month, and this the happy morn,
     Wherein the Son of Heaven's eternal King,
     Of wedded maid and virgin mother born,
     Our great redemption from above did bring;
     For so the holy sages once did sing,                               5
       That he our deadly forfeit should release,
     And with his Father work us a perpetual peace.
 
 
                                    II.
 
     That glorious form, that light unsufferable,
     And that far-beaming blaze of majesty,
     Wherewith he wont at Heaven's high council-table                  10
     To sit the midst of Trinal Unity,
     He laid aside, and, here with us to be,
       Forsook the courts of everlasting day,
     And chose with us a darksome house of mortal clay.
 
 
                                   III.
 
     Say, Heavenly Muse, shall not thy sacred vein                     15
     Afford a present to the Infant God?
     Hast thou no verse, no hymn, or solemn strain,
     To welcome him to this his new abode,
     Now while the heaven, by the Sun's team untrod,
       Hath took no print of the approaching light,                    20
     And all the spangled host keep watch in squadrons bright?
 
 
                                    IV.
 
     See how from far upon the eastern road
     The star-led wizards haste with odors sweet!
     Oh! run; prevent them with thy humble ode,
     And lay it lowly at his blessed feet;                             25
     Have thou the honor first thy Lord to greet,
       And join thy voice unto the Angel Quire,
     From out his secret altar touched with hallowed fire.
 
 
                                 The Hymn.
 
 
                                    I.
 
         It was the winter wild,
         While the heaven-born child                                   30
       All meanly wrapt in the rude manger lies;
         Nature, in awe to him,
         Had doffed her gaudy trim,
       With her great Master so to sympathize:
     It was no season then for her                                     35
     To wanton with the Sun, her lusty paramour.
 
 
                                    II.
 
         Only with speeches fair
         She woos the gentle air
       To hide her guilty front with innocent snow,
         And on her naked shame,                                       40
         Pollute with sinful blame,
       The saintly veil of maiden white to throw;
     Confounded, that her Maker's eyes
     Should look so near upon her foul deformities.
 
 
                                   III.
 
         But he, her fears to cease,                                   45
         Sent down the meek-eyed Peace:
       She, crowned with olive green, came softly sliding
         Down through the turning sphere,
         His ready harbinger,
       With turtle wing the amorous clouds dividing;                   50
     And, waving wide her myrtle wand,
     She strikes a universal peace through sea and land.
 
 
                                    IV.
 
         No war, or battle's sound,
         Was heard the world around;
       The idle spear and shield were high uphung;                     55
         The hooked chariot stood,
         Unstained with hostile blood;
       The trumpet spake not to the armed throng;
     And kings sat still with awful eye,
     As if they surely knew their sovran Lord was by.                  60
 
 
                                    V.
 
         But peaceful was the night
         Wherein the Prince of Light
       His reign of peace upon the earth began.
         The winds, with wonder whist,
         Smoothly the waters kissed,                                   65
       Whispering new joys to the mild Ocean,
     Who now hath quite forgot to rave,
     While birds of calm sit brooding on the charmed wave.
 
 
                                    VI.
 
         The stars, with deep amaze,
         Stand fixed in steadfast gaze,                                70
       Bending one way their precious influence,
         And will not take their flight,
         For all the morning light,
       Or Lucifer that often warned them thence;
     But in their glimmering orbs did glow,                            75
     Until their Lord himself bespake, and bid them go.
 
 
                                   VII.
 
         And, though the shady gloom
         Had given day her room,
       The Sun himself withheld his wonted speed,
         And hid his head for shame,                                   80
         As his inferior flame
       The new-enlightened world no more should need:
     He saw a greater Sun appear
     Than his bright throne or burning axletree could bear.
 
 
                                   VIII.
 
         The shepherds on the lawn,                                    85
         Or ere the point of dawn,
       Sat simply chatting in a rustic row;
         Full little thought they than
         That the mighty Pan
       Was kindly come to live with them below:                        90
     Perhaps their loves, or else their sheep,
     Was all that did their silly thoughts so busy keep.
 
 
                                    IX.
 
         When such music sweet
         Their hearts and ears did greet
       As never was by mortal finger strook,                           95
         Divinely-warbled voice
         Answering the stringed noise,
       As all their souls in blissful rapture took:
     The air, such pleasure loth to lose,                              99
     With thousand echoes still prolongs each heavenly close.
 
 
                                    X.
 
         Nature, that heard such sound
         Beneath the hollow round
       Of Cynthia's seat the Airy region thrilling,
         Now was almost won
         To think her part was done,                                  105
       And that her reign had here its last fulfilling:
     She knew such harmony alone
     Could hold all Heaven and Earth in happier union.
 
 
                                    XI.
 
         At last surrounds their sight
         A globe of circular light,                                   110
       That with long beams the shamefaced Night arrayed;
         The helmed cherubim
         And sworded seraphim
       Are seen in glittering ranks with wings displayed,
     Harping in loud and solemn quire,                                115
     With unexpressive notes, to Heaven's new-born Heir.
 
 
                                   XII.
 
         Such music (as 'tis said)
         Before was never made,
       But when of old the Sons of Morning sung,
         While the Creator great                                      120
         His constellations set,
       And the well-balanced World on hinges hung,
     And cast the dark foundations deep,
     And bid the weltering waves their oozy channel keep.
 
 
                                   XIII.
 
         Ring out, ye crystal spheres!                                125
         Once bless our human ears,
       If ye have power to touch our senses so;
         And let your silver chime
         Move in melodious time;
       And let the bass of heaven's deep organ blow;                  130
     And with your ninefold harmony
     Make up full consort to the angelic symphony.
 
 
                                   XIV.
 
         For, if such holy song
         Enwrap our fancy long,
       Time will run back and fetch the Age of Gold;                  135
         And speckled Vanity
         Will sicken soon and die,
       And leprous Sin will melt from earthly mould;
     And Hell itself will pass away,
     And leave her dolorous mansions to the peering day.              140
 
 
                                    XV.
 
         Yea, Truth and Justice then
         Will down return to men,
       Orbed in a rainbow; and, like glories wearing,
         Mercy will sit between,
         Throned in celestial sheen,                                  145
       With radiant feet the tissued clouds down steering;
     And Heaven, as at some festival,
     Will open wide the gates of her high palace-hall.
 
 
                                   XVI.
 
         But wisest Fate says No,
         This must not yet be so;                                     150
       The Babe yet lies in smiling infancy
         That on the bitter cross
         Must redeem our loss,
       So both himself and us to glorify:
     Yet first, to those ychained in sleep,                           155
     The wakeful trump of doom must thunder through the deep.
 
 
                                   XVII.
 
         With such a horrid clang
         As on Mount Sinai rang,
       While the red fire and smouldering clouds outbrake:
         The aged Earth, aghast                                       160
         With terror of that blast,
       Shall from the surface to the centre shake,
     When, at the world's last session,
     The dreadful Judge in middle air shall spread his throne.
 
 
                                  XVIII.
 
         And then at last our bliss                                   165
         Full and perfect is,
       But now begins; for from this happy day
         The Old Dragon under ground,
         In straiter limits bound,
       Not half so far casts his usurped sway,                        170
     And, wroth to see his kingdom fail,
     Swinges the scaly horror of his folded tail.
 
 
                                   XIX.
 
         The Oracles are dumb;
         No voice or hideous hum
       Runs through the arched roof in words deceiving.               175
         Apollo from his shrine
         Can no more divine,
       With hollow shriek the steep of Delphos leaving.
     No nightly trance, or breathed spell,
     Inspires the pale-eyed priest from the prophetic cell.           180
 
 
                                    XX.
 
         The lonely mountains o'er,
         And the resounding shore,
       A voice of weeping heard and loud lament;
         From haunted spring, and dale
         Edged with poplar pale,                                      185
       The parting Genius is with sighing sent;
     With flower-inwoven tresses torn
     The Nymphs in twilight shade of tangled thickets mourn.
 
 
                                   XXI.
 
         In consecrated earth,
         And on the holy hearth,                                      190
       The Lars and Lemures moan with midnight plaint;
         In urns, and altars round,
         A drear and dying sound
       Affrights the flamens at their service quaint;
     And the chill marble seems to sweat,                             195
     While each peculiar power forgoes his wonted seat.
 
 
                                   XXII.
 
         Peor and Baaelim
         Forsake their temples dim,
       With that twice-battered god of Palestine;
         And mooned Ashtaroth,                                        200
         Heaven's queen and mother both,
       Now sits not girt with tapers' holy shine:
     The Lybic Hammon shrinks his horn;
     In vain the Tyrian maids their wounded Thammuz mourn.
 
 
                                  XXIII.
 
         And sullen Moloch, fled,                                     205
         Hath left in shadows dread
       His burning idol all of blackest hue;
         In vain with cymbals' ring
         They call the grisly king,
       In dismal dance about the furnace blue;                        210
     The brutish gods of Nile as fast,
     Isis, and Orus, and the dog Anubis, haste.
 
 
                                   XXIV.
 
         Nor is Osiris seen
         In Memphian grove or green,                                  214
       Trampling the unshowered grass with lowings loud;              215
         Nor can he be at rest
         Within his sacred chest;
       Nought but profoundest Hell can be his shroud;
     In vain, with timbrelled anthems dark,
     The sable-stoled sorcerers bear his worshipped ark.              220
 
 
                                   XXV.
 
         He feels from Juda's land
         The dreaded Infant's hand;
       The rays of Bethlehem blind his dusky eyn;
         Nor all the gods beside
         Longer dare abide,                                           225
       Not Typhon huge ending in snaky twine:
     Our Babe, to show his Godhead true,
     Can in his swaddling bands control the damned crew.
 
 
                                   XXVI.
 
         So, when the sun in bed,
         Curtained with cloudy red,                                   230
       Pillows his chin upon an orient wave,
         The flocking shadows pale
         Troop to the infernal jail,
       Each fettered ghost slips to his several grave,
     And the yellow-skirted fays                                      235
     Fly after the night-steeds, leaving their moon-loved maze.
 
 
                                  XXVII.
 
         But see! the Virgin blest
         Hath laid her Babe to rest.
       Time is our tedious song should here have ending:
         Heaven's youngest-teemed star                                240
         Hath fixed her polished car,
       Her sleeping Lord with handmaid lamp attending;
     And all about the courtly stable
     Bright-harnessed Angels sit in order serviceable.
 
 
 
 
                           ON SHAKESPEARE. 1630.
 
 
     What needs my Shakespeare for his honored bones
     The labor of an age in piled stones?
     Or that his hallowed reliques should be hid
     Under a star-ypointing pyramid?
     Dear son of memory, great heir of fame,                            5
     What need'st thou such weak witness of thy name?
     Thou in our wonder and astonishment
     Hast built thyself a livelong monument.
     For whilst, to the shame of slow-endeavoring art
     Thy easy numbers flow, and that each heart                        10
     Hath from the leaves of thy unvalued book
     Those Delphic lines with deep impression took,
     Then thou, our fancy of itself bereaving,
     Dost make _us_ marble with too much conceiving,
     And so sepulchred in such pomp dost lie                           15
     That kings for such a tomb would wish to die.
 
 
 
 
                                L'ALLEGRO.
 
 
     Hence, loathed Melancholy,
       Of Cerberus and blackest Midnight born
     In Stygian cave forlorn
       'Mongst horrid shapes, and shrieks, and sights unholy!
     Find out some uncouth cell,                                        5
       Where brooding Darkness spreads his jealous wings,
     And the night-raven sings;
       There, under ebon shades and low-browed rocks,
     As ragged as thy locks,
       In dark Cimmerian desert ever dwell.                            10
     But come, thou Goddess fair and free,
     In heaven yclept Euphrosyne,
     And by men heart-easing Mirth;
     Whom lovely Venus, at a birth,
     With two sister Graces more,                                      15
     To ivy-crowned Bacchus bore:
     Or whether (as some sager sing)
     The frolic wind that breathes the spring,
     Zephyr, with Aurora playing,
     As he met her once a-Maying,                                      20
     There, on beds of violets blue,
     And fresh-blown roses washed in dew,
     Filled her with thee, a daughter fair,
     So buxom, blithe, and debonair.
     Haste thee, Nymph, and bring with thee                            25
     Jest, and youthful Jollity,
     Quips and Cranks and wanton Wiles,
     Nods and Becks and wreathed Smiles,
     Such as hang on Hebe's cheek,
     And love to live in dimple sleek;                                 30
     Sport that wrinkled Care derides,
     And Laughter holding both his sides.
     Come, and trip it, as you go,
     On the light fantastic toe;
     And in thy right hand lead with thee                              35
     The mountain-nymph, sweet Liberty;
     And, if I give thee honor due,
     Mirth, admit me of thy crew,
     To live with her, and live with thee,
     In unreproved pleasures free;                                     40
     To hear the lark begin his flight,
     And, singing, startle the dull night,
     From his watch-tower in the skies,
     Till the dappled dawn doth rise;
     Then to come, in spite of sorrow,                                 45
     And at my window bid good-morrow,
     Through the sweet-briar or the vine,
     Or the twisted eglantine;
     While the cock, with lively din,
     Scatters the rear of darkness thin;                               50
     And to the stack, or the barn-door,
     Stoutly struts his dames before:
     Oft listening how the hounds and horn
     Cheerly rouse the slumbering morn,
     From the side of some hoar hill,                                  55
     Through the high wood echoing shrill:
     Sometime walking, not unseen,
     By hedgerow elms, on hillocks green,
     Right against the eastern gate
     Where the great Sun begins his state,                             60
     Robed in flames and amber light,
     The clouds in thousand liveries dight;
     While the ploughman, near at hand,
     Whistles o'er the furrowed land,
     And the milkmaid singeth blithe,                                  65
     And the mower whets his scythe,
     And every shepherd tells his tale
     Under the hawthorn in the dale.
     Straight mine eye hath caught new pleasures,
     Whilst the landskip round it measures:                            70
     Russet lawns, and fallows gray,
     Where the nibbling flocks do stray;
     Mountains on whose barren breast
     The laboring clouds do often rest;
     Meadows trim, with daisies pied;                                  75
     Shallow brooks, and rivers wide;
     Towers and battlements it sees
     Bosomed high in tufted trees,
     Where perhaps some beauty lies,
     The cynosure of neighboring eyes.                                 80
     Hard by a cottage chimney smokes
     From betwixt two aged oaks,
     Where Corydon and Thyrsis met
     Are at their savory dinner set
     Of herbs and other country messes,                                85
     Which the neat-handed Phyllis dresses;
     And then in haste her bower she leaves,
     With Thestylis to bind the sheaves;
     Or, if the earlier season lead,
     To the tanned haycock in the mead.                                90
     Sometimes, with secure delight,
     The upland hamlets will invite,
     When the merry bells ring round,
     And the jocund rebecks sound
     To many a youth and many a maid                                   95
     Dancing in the chequered shade,
     And young and old come forth to play
     On a sunshine holiday,
     Till the livelong daylight fail:
     Then to the spicy nut-brown ale,                                 100
     With stories told of many a feat,
     How Faery Mab the junkets eat.
     She was pinched and pulled, she said;
     And he, by Friar's lantern led,
     Tells how the drudging goblin sweat                              105
     To earn his cream-bowl duly set,
     When in one night, ere glimpse of morn,
     His shadowy flail hath threshed the corn
     That ten day-laborers could not end;
     Then lies him down, the lubber fiend,                            110
     And, stretched out all the chimney's length,
     Basks at the fire his hairy strength,
     And crop-full out of doors he flings,
     Ere the first cock his matin rings.
     Thus done the tales, to bed they creep,                          115
     By whispering winds soon lulled asleep.
     Towered cities please us then,
     And the busy hum of men,
     Where throngs of knights and barons bold,
     In weeds of peace, high triumphs hold,                           120
     With store of ladies, whose bright eyes
     Rain influence, and judge the prize
     Of wit or arms, while both contend
     To win her grace whom all commend.
     There let Hymen oft appear                                       125
     In saffron robe, with taper clear,
     And pomp, and feast, and revelry,
     With mask and antique pageantry;
     Such sights as youthful poets dream,
     On summer eves by haunted stream.                                130
     Then to the well-trod stage anon,
     If Jonson's learned sock be on,
     Or sweetest Shakespeare, Fancy's child,
     Warble his native wood-notes wild,
     And ever, against eating cares,                                  135
     Lap me in soft Lydian airs,
     Married to immortal verse,
     Such as the meeting soul may pierce,
     In notes with many a winding bout
     Of linked sweetness long drawn out                               140
     With wanton heed and giddy cunning,
     The melting voice through mazes running,
     Untwisting all the chains that tie
     The hidden soul of harmony;
     That Orpheus' self may heave his head                            145
     From golden slumber on a bed
     Of heaped Elysian flowers, and hear
     Such strains as would have won the ear
     Of Pluto to have quite set free
     His half-regained Eurydice.                                      150
     These delights if thou canst give,
     Mirth, with thee I mean to live.
 
 
 
 
                               IL PENSEROSO.
 
 
     Hence, vain deluding Joys,
       The brood of Folly without father bred!
     How little you bested,
       Or fill the fixed mind with all your toys!
     Dwell in some idle brain,                                          5
       And fancies fond with gaudy shapes possess,
     As thick and numberless
       As the gay motes that people the sun-beams,
     Or likest hovering dreams,
       The fickle pensioners of Morpheus' train.                       10
     But, hail! thou Goddess sage and holy!
     Hail, divinest Melancholy!
     Whose saintly visage is too bright
     To hit the sense of human sight,
     And therefore to our weaker view,                                 15
     O'erlaid with black, staid Wisdom's hue;
     Black, but such as in esteem
     Prince Memnon's sister might beseem,
     Or that starred Ethiop queen that strove
     To set her beauty's praise above                                  20
     The Sea-Nymphs, and their powers offended.
     Yet thou art higher far descended:
     Thee bright-haired Vesta long of yore
     To solitary Saturn bore;
     His daughter she; in Saturn's reign                               25
     Such mixture was not held a stain.
     Oft in glimmering bowers and glades
     He met her, and in secret shades
     Of woody Ida's inmost grove,
     Whilst yet there was no fear of Jove.                             30
     Come, pensive Nun, devout and pure,
     Sober, steadfast, and demure,
     All in a robe of darkest grain,
     Flowing with majestic train,
     And sable stole of cypress lawn                                   35
     Over thy decent shoulders drawn.
     Come; but keep thy wonted state,
     With even step, and musing gait,
     And looks commercing with the skies
     Thy rapt soul sitting in thine eyes:                              40
     There, held in holy passion still,
     Forget thyself to marble, till
     With a sad leaden downward cast
     Thou fix them on the earth as fast.
     And join with thee calm Peace and Quiet,                          45
     Spare Fast, that oft with gods doth diet,
     And hears the Muses in a ring
     Aye round about Jove's altar sing;
     And add to these retired Leisure,
     That in trim gardens takes his pleasure;                          50
     But, first and chiefest, with thee bring
     Him that yon soars on golden wing,
     Guiding the fiery-wheeled throne,
     The Cherub Contemplation;
     And the mute Silence hist along,                                  55
     'Less Philomel will deign a song,
     In her sweetest, saddest plight,
     Smoothing the rugged brow of Night,
     While Cynthia checks her dragon yoke
     Gently o'er the accustomed oak.                                   60
     Sweet bird, that shunn'st the noise of folly,
     Most musical, most melancholy!
     Thee, chauntress, oft the woods among
     I woo, to hear thy even-song;
     And, missing thee, I walk unseen                                  65
     On the dry smooth-shaven green,
     To behold the wandering moon,
     Riding near her highest noon,
     Like one that had been led astray
     Through the heaven's wide pathless way,                           70
     And oft, as if her head she bowed,
     Stooping through a fleecy cloud.
     Oft, on a plat of rising ground,
     I hear the far-off curfew sound,
     Over some wide-watered shore,                                     75
     Swinging slow with sullen roar;
     Or, if the air will not permit,
     Some still removed place will fit,
     Where glowing embers through the room
     Teach light to counterfeit a gloom,                               80
     Far from all resort of mirth,
     Save the cricket on the hearth,
     Or the bellman's drowsy charm
     To bless the doors from nightly harm.
     Or let my lamp, at midnight hour,                                 85
     Be seen in some high lonely tower,
     Where I may oft outwatch the Bear,
     With thrice great Hermes, or unsphere
     The spirit of Plato, to unfold
     What worlds or what vast regions hold                             90
     The immortal mind that hath forsook
     Her mansion in this fleshly nook;
     And of those demons that are found
     In fire, air, flood, or underground,
     Whose power hath a true consent                                   95
     With planet or with element.
     Sometime let gorgeous Tragedy
     In sceptred pall come sweeping by,
     Presenting Thebes, or Pelops' line,
     Or the tale of Troy divine,                                      100
     Or what (though rare) of later age
     Ennobled hath the buskined stage.
     But, O sad Virgin! that thy power
     Might raise Musaeus from his bower;
     Or bid the soul of Orpheus sing                                  105
     Such notes as, warbled to the string,
     Drew iron tears down Pluto's cheek,
     And made Hell grant what love did seek;
     Or call up him that left half-told
     The story of Cambuscan bold,                                     110
     Of Camball, and of Algarsife,
     And who had Canace to wife,
     That owned the virtuous ring and glass,
     And of the wondrous horse of brass
     On which the Tartar king did ride;                               115
     And if aught else great bards beside
     In sage and solemn tunes have sung,
     Of turneys, and of trophies hung,
     Of forests, and enchantments drear,
     Where more is meant than meets the ear.                          120
     Thus, Night, oft see me in thy pale career,
     Till civil-suited Morn appear,
     Not tricked and frounced, as she was wont
     With the Attic boy to hunt,
     But kerchieft in a comely cloud,                                 125
     While rocking winds are piping loud
     Or ushered with a shower still,
     When the gust hath blown his fill,
     Ending on the rustling leaves,
     With minute-drops from off the eaves.                            130
     And, when the sun begins to fling
     His flaring beams, me, Goddess, bring
     To arched walks of twilight groves,
     And shadows brown, that Sylvan loves,
     Of pine, or monumental oak,                                      135
     Where the rude axe with heaved stroke
     Was never heard the nymphs to daunt,
     Or fright them from their hallowed haunt.
     There, in close covert, by some brook,
     Where no profaner eye may look,                                  140
     Hide me from day's garish eye,
     While the bee with honeyed thigh,
     That at her flowery work doth sing,
     And the waters murmuring,
     With such consort as they keep,                                  145
     Entice the dewy-feathered Sleep.
     And let some strange mysterious dream
     Wave at his wings, in airy stream
     Of lively portraiture displayed,
     Softly on my eyelids laid;                                       150
     And, as I wake, sweet music breathe
     Above, about, or underneath,
     Sent by some Spirit to mortals good,
     Or the unseen Genius of the wood.
     But let my due feet never fail                                   155
     To walk the studious cloister's pale,
     And love the high embowed roof,
     With antique pillars massy-proof,
     And storied windows richly dight,
     Casting a dim religious light.                                   160
     There let the pealing organ blow,
     To the full-voiced quire below,
     In service high and anthems clear,
     As may with sweetness, through mine ear,
     Dissolve me into ecstasies,                                      165
     And bring all Heaven before mine eyes.
     And may at last my weary age
     Find out the peaceful hermitage,
     The hairy gown and mossy cell,
     Where I may sit and rightly spell                                170
     Of every star that heaven doth shew,
     And every herb that sips the dew,
     Till old experience do attain
     To something like prophetic strain.
     These pleasures, Melancholy, give;                               175
     And I with thee will choose to live.
 
 
 
 
                                 ARCADES.
 
 
 _Part of an Entertainment presented to the Countess Dowager of Derby at
 Harefield by some Noble Persons of her Family; who appear on the Scene in
 pastoral habit, moving toward the seat of state, with this song:--_
 
 
                                I. _Song._
 
     Look, Nymphs and Shepherds, look!
     What sudden blaze of majesty
     Is that which we from hence descry,
     Too divine to be mistook?
       This, this is she                                                5
     To whom our vows and wishes bend:
     Here our solemn search hath end.
     Fame, that her high worth to raise
     Seemed erst so lavish and profuse,
     We may justly now accuse                                          10
     Of detraction from her praise:
       Less than half we find expressed;
       Envy bid conceal the rest.
 
     Mark what radiant state she spreads,
     In circle round her shining throne                                15
     Shooting her beams like silver threads:
     This, this is she alone,
       Sitting like a goddess bright
       In the centre of her light.
 
     Might she the wise Latona be,                                     20
     Or the towered Cybele,
     Mother of a hundred gods?
     Juno dares not give her odds:
       Who had thought this clime had held
       A deity so unparalleled?                                        25
 
           As they come forward, the Genius of the Wood appears,
                     and, turning toward them, speaks.
 
       _Gen._ Stay, gentle Swains, for, though in this disguise,
     I see bright honor sparkle through your eyes;
     Of famous Arcady ye are, and sprung
     Of that renowned flood, so often sung,
     Divine Alpheus, who, by secret sluice,                            30
     Stole under seas to meet his Arethuse;
     And ye, the breathing roses of the wood,
     Fair silver-buskined Nymphs, as great and good.
     I know this quest of yours and free intent
     Was all in honor and devotion meant                               35
     To the great mistress of yon princely shrine,
     Whom with low reverence I adore as mine,
     And with all helpful service will comply
     To further this night's glad solemnity,
     And lead ye where ye may more near behold                         40
     What shallow-searching Fame hath left untold;
     Which I full oft, amidst those shades alone,
     Have sat to wonder at, and gaze upon.
     For know, by lot from Jove, I am the Power
     Of this fair wood, and live in oaken bower,                       45
     To nurse the saplings tall, and curl the grove
     With ringlets quaint and wanton windings wove;
     And all my plants I save from nightly ill
     Of noisome winds and blasting vapors chill;
     And from the boughs brush off the evil dew,                       50
     And heal the harms of thwarting thunder blue,
     Or what the cross dire-looking planet smites,
     Or hurtful worm with cankered venom bites.
     When evening gray doth rise, I fetch my round
     Over the mount, and all this hallowed ground;                     55
     And early, ere the odorous breath of morn
     Awakes the slumbering leaves, or tasselled horn
     Shakes the high thicket, haste I all about,
     Number my ranks, and visit every sprout
     With puissant words and murmurs made to bless.                    60
     But else, in deep of night, when drowsiness
     Hath locked up mortal sense, then listen I
     To the celestial Sirens' harmony,
     That sit upon the nine infolded spheres,
     And sing to those that hold the vital shears,                     65
     And turn the adamantine spindle round
     On which the fate of gods and men is wound.
     Such sweet compulsion doth in music lie,
     To lull the daughters of Necessity,
     And keep unsteady Nature to her law,                              70
     And the low world in measured motion draw
     After the heavenly tune, which none can hear
     Of human mould with gross unpurged ear.
     And yet such music worthiest were to blaze
     The peerless height of her immortal praise                        75
     Whose lustre leads us, and for her most fit,
     If my inferior hand or voice could hit
     Inimitable sounds. Yet, as we go,
     Whate'er the skill of lesser gods can show
     I will assay, her worth to celebrate,                             80
     And so attend ye toward her glittering state;
     Where ye may all, that are of noble stem,
     Approach, and kiss her sacred vesture's hem.
 
 
                                II. _Song._
 
     O'er the smooth enamelled green,
     Where no print of step hath been,                                 85
       Follow me, as I sing
       And touch the warbled string:
     Under the shady roof
     Of branching elm star-proof
           Follow me.                                                  90
     I will bring you where she sits,
     Clad in splendor as befits
           Her deity.
     Such a rural Queen
     All Arcadia hath not seen.                                        95
 
 
                               III. _Song._
 
     Nymphs and Shepherds, dance no more
       By sandy Ladon's lilied banks;
     On old Lycaeus, or Cyllene hoar,
       Trip no more in twilight ranks;
     Though Erymanth your loss deplore,                               100
       A better soil shall give ye thanks.
     From the stony Maenalus
     Bring your flocks, and live with us;
     Here ye shall have greater grace,
     To serve the Lady of this place.                                 105
     Though Syrinx your Pan's mistress were,
     Yet Syrinx well might wait on her.
       Such a rural Queen
       All Arcadia hath not seen.
 
 
 
 
                            AT A SOLEMN MUSIC.
 
 
     Blest pair of Sirens, pledges of Heaven's joy,
     Sphere-born harmonious sisters, Voice and Verse,
     Wed your divine sounds, and mixed power employ,
     Dead things with inbreathed sense able to pierce;
     And to our high-raised phantasy present                            5
     That undisturbed song of pure concent,
     Aye sung before the sapphire-colored throne
     To Him that sits thereon,
     With saintly shout and solemn jubilee;
     Where the bright Seraphim in burning row                          10
     Their loud uplifted angel-trumpets blow,
     And the Cherubic host in thousand quires
     Touch their immortal harps of golden wires,
     With those just Spirits that wear victorious palms,
     Hymns devout and holy psalms                                      15
     Singing everlastingly:
     That we on Earth, with undiscording voice,
     May rightly answer that melodious noise;
     As once we did, till disproportioned sin
     Jarred against nature's chime, and with harsh din                 20
     Broke the fair music that all creatures made
     To their great Lord, whose love their motion swayed
     In perfect diapason, whilst they stood
     In first obedience, and their state of good.
     O, may we soon again renew that song,                             25
     And keep in tune with Heaven, till God ere long
     To his celestial consort us unite,
     To live with Him, and sing in endless morn of light!
 
 
 
 
                                  COMUS.
 
 
                A MASQUE PRESENTED AT LUDLOW CASTLE, 1634.
 
 
                               THE PERSONS.
 
 
   The Attendant Spirit, afterwards in the habit of Thyrsis.
   Comus, with his Crew.
   The Lady.
   First Brother.
   Second Brother.
   Sabrina, the Nymph.
 
 
                  The first Scene discovers a wild wood.
 
                 The Attendant Spirit descends or enters.
 
       _Spirit._ Before the starry threshold of Jove's court
     My mansion is, where those immortal shapes
     Of bright aerial spirits live insphered
     In regions mild of calm and serene air,
     Above the smoke and stir of this dim spot                          5
     Which men call Earth, and, with low-thoughted care,
     Confined and pestered in this pinfold here,
     Strive to keep up a frail and feverish being,
     Unmindful of the crown that Virtue gives,
     After this mortal change, to her true servants                    10
     Amongst the enthroned gods on sainted seats.
     Yet some there be that by due steps aspire
     To lay their just hands on that golden key
     That opes the palace of eternity.
     To such my errand is; and, but for such,                          15
     I would not soil these pure ambrosial weeds
     With the rank vapors of this sin-worn mould.
       But to my task. Neptune, besides the sway
     Of every salt flood and each ebbing stream
     Took in, by lot 'twixt high and nether Jove.                      20
     Imperial rule of all the sea-girt isles
     That, like to rich and various gems, inlay
     The unadorned bosom of the deep;
     Which he, to grace his tributary gods,
     By course commits to several government,                          25
     And gives them leave to wear their sapphire crowns
     And wield their little tridents. But this Isle,
     The greatest and the best of all the main,
     He quarters to his blue-haired deities;
     And all this tract that fronts the falling sun                    30
     A noble Peer of mickle trust and power
     Has in his charge, with tempered awe to guide
     An old and haughty nation, proud in arms:
     Where his fair offspring, nursed in princely lore,
     Are coming to attend their father's state,                        35
     And new-intrusted sceptre. But their way
     Lies through the perplexed paths of this drear wood,
     The nodding horror of those shady brows
     Threats the forlorn and wandering passenger;
     And here their tender age might suffer peril,                     40
     But that, by quick command from sovran Jove,
     I was despatched for their defence and guard!
     And listen why; for I will tell you now
     What never yet was heard in tale or song,
     From old or modern bard, in hall or bower.                        45
       Bacchus, that first from out the purple grape
     Crushed the sweet poison of misused wine,
     After the Tuscan mariners transformed,
     Coasting the Tyrrhene shore, as the winds listed,
     On Circe's island fell. (Who knows not Circe,                     50
     The daughter of the Sun, whose charmed cup
     Whoever tasted lost his upright shape,
     And downward fell into a grovelling swine?)
     This Nymph, that gazed upon his clustering locks,
     With ivy berries wreathed, and his blithe youth,                  55
     Had by him, ere he parted thence, a son
     Much like his father, but his mother more,
     Whom therefore she brought up, and Comus named:
     Who, ripe and frolic of his full-grown age,
     Roving the Celtic and Iberian fields,                             60
     At last betakes him to this ominous wood,
     And, in thick shelter of black shades imbowered,
     Excels his mother at her mighty art;
     Offering to every weary traveller
     His orient liquor in a crystal glass,                             65
     To quench the drouth of Phoebus; which as they taste
     (For most do taste through fond intemperate thirst),
     Soon as the potion works, their human count'nance,
     The express resemblance of the gods, is changed
     Into some brutish form of wolf or bear,                           70
     Or ounce or tiger, hog, or bearded goat,
     All other parts remaining as they were.
     And they, so perfect in their misery,
     Not once perceive their foul disfigurement,
     But boast themselves more comely than before,                     75
     And all their friends and native home forget,
     To roll with pleasure in a sensual sty.
     Therefore, when any favored of high Jove
     Chances to pass through this adventurous glade,
     Swift as the sparkle of a glancing star                           80
     I shoot from heaven, to give him safe convoy,
     As now I do. But first I must put off
     These my sky-robes, spun out of Iris' woof,
     And take the weeds and likeness of a swain
     That to the service of this house belongs,                        85
     Who, with his soft pipe and smooth-dittied song,
     Well knows to still the wild winds when they roar,
     And hush the waving woods; nor of less faith,
     And in this office of his mountain watch
     Likeliest, and nearest to the present aid                         90
     Of this occasion. But I hear the tread
     Of hateful steps; I must be viewless now.
 
 Comus enters, with a charming-rod in one hand, his glass in the other;
 with him a rout of monsters, headed like sundry sorts of wild beasts, but
 otherwise like men and women, their apparel glistering. They come in
 making a riotous and unruly noise, with torches in their hands.
 
       _Comus._ The star that bids the shepherd fold
     Now the top of heaven doth hold;
     And the gilded car of day                                         95
     His glowing axle doth allay
     In the steep Atlantic stream:
     And the slope sun his upward beam
     Shoots against the dusky pole,
     Pacing toward the other goal                                     100
     Of his chamber in the east.
     Meanwhile, welcome joy and feast,
     Midnight shout and revelry,
     Tipsy dance and jollity.
     Braid your locks with rosy twine,                                105
     Dropping odors, dropping wine.
     Rigor now is gone to bed;
     And Advice with scrupulous head,
     Strict Age, and sour Severity,
     With their grave saws, in slumber lie.                           110
     We, that are of purer fire,
     Imitate the starry quire,
     Who, in their nightly watchful spheres,
     Lead in swift round the months and years.
     The sounds and seas, with all their finny drove,                 115
     Now to the moon in wavering morrice move;
     And on the tawny sands and shelves
     Trip the pert fairies and the dapper elves.
     By dimpled brook and fountain-brim,
     The wood-nymphs, decked with daisies trim,                       120
     Their merry wakes and pastimes keep:
     What hath night to do with sleep?
     Night hath better sweets to prove;
     Venus now wakes, and wakens Love.
     Come, let us our rites begin;                                    125
     'Tis only daylight that makes sin,
     Which these dun shades will ne'er report.
     Hail, goddess of nocturnal sport,
     Dark-veiled Cotytto, to whom the secret flame
     Of midnight torches burns! mysterious dame,                      130
     That ne'er art called but when the dragon womb
     Of Stygian darkness spets her thickest gloom,
     And makes one blot of all the air!
     Stay thy cloudy ebon chair,
     Wherein thou ridest with Hecat', and befriend                    135
     Us thy vowed priests, till utmost end
     Of all thy dues be done, and none left out
     Ere the blabbing eastern scout,
     The nice Morn on the Indian steep,
     From her cabined loop-hole peep,                                 140
     And to the tell-tale Sun descry
     Our concealed solemnity.
     Come, knit hands, and beat the ground
     In a light fantastic round.
 
 
                              _The Measure._
 
     Break off, break off! I feel the different pace                  145
     Of some chaste footing near about this ground.
     Run to your shrouds within these brakes and trees;
     Our number may affright. Some virgin sure
     (For so I can distinguish by mine art)
     Benighted in these woods! Now to my charms,                      150
     And to my wily trains: I shall ere long
     Be well stocked with as fair a herd as grazed
     About my mother Circe. Thus I hurl
     My dazzling spells into the spongy air,
     Of power to cheat the eye with blear illusion,                   155
     And give it false presentments, lest the place
     And my quaint habits breed astonishment,
     And put the damsel to suspicious flight;
     Which must not be, for that's against my course.
     I, under fair pretence of friendly ends,                         160
     And well-placed words of glozing courtesy,
     Baited with reasons not unplausible,
     Wind me into the easy-hearted man,
     And hug him into snares. When once her eye
     Hath met the virtue of this magic dust                           165
     I shall appear some harmless villager,
     Whom thrift keeps up about his country gear.
     But here she comes; I fairly step aside,
     And hearken, if I may her business hear.
 
                             The Lady enters.
 
       _Lady._ This way the noise was, if mine ear be true,           170
     My best guide now. Methought it was the sound
     Of riot and ill-managed merriment,
     Such as the jocund flute or gamesome pipe
     Stirs up among the loose unlettered hinds,
     When, for their teeming flocks and granges full,                 175
     In wanton dance they praise the bounteous Pan,
     And thank the gods amiss. I should be loth
     To meet the rudeness and swilled insolence
     Of such late wassailers; yet, oh! where else
     Shall I inform my unacquainted feet                              180
     In the blind mazes of this tangled wood?
     My brothers, when they saw me wearied out
     With this long way, resolving here to lodge
     Under the spreading favor of these pines,
     Stepped, as they said, to the next thicket-side                  185
     To bring me berries, or such cooling fruit
     As the kind hospitable woods provide.
     They left me then when the gray-hooded Even,
     Like a sad votarist in palmer's weed,
     Rose from the hindmost wheels of Phoebus' wain.                  190
     But where they are, and why they came not back,
     Is now the labor of my thoughts. 'Tis likeliest
     They had engaged their wandering steps too far;
     And envious darkness, ere they could return,
     Had stole them from me. Else, O thievish Night,                  195
     Why shouldst thou, but for some felonious end,
     In thy dark lantern thus close up the stars
     That Nature hung in heaven, and filled their lamps
     With everlasting oil, to give due light
     To the misled and lonely traveller?                              200
     This is the place, as well as I may guess,
     Whence even now the tumult of loud mirth
     Was rife, and perfect in my listening ear;
     Yet nought but single darkness do I find.
     What might this be? A thousand fantasies                         205
     Begin to throng into my memory,
     Of calling shapes, and beckoning shadows dire,
     And airy tongues that syllable men's names
     On sands and shores and desert wildernesses.
     These thoughts may startle well, but not astound                 210
     The virtuous mind, that ever walks attended
     By a strong siding champion, Conscience.
     O, welcome, pure-eyed Faith, white-handed Hope,
     Thou hovering angel girt with golden wings,
     And thou unblemished form of Chastity!                           215
     I see thee visibly, and now believe
     That He, the Supreme Good, to whom all things ill
     Are but as slavish officers of vengeance,
     Would send a glistering guardian, if need were,
     To keep my life and honor unassailed....                         220
     Was I deceived, or did a sable cloud
     Turn forth her silver lining on the night?
     I did not err: there does a sable cloud
     Turn forth her silver lining on the night,
     And casts a gleam over this tufted grove.                        225
     I cannot hallo to my brothers, but
     Such noise as I can make to be heard farthest
     I'll venture; for my new-enlivened spirits
     Prompt me, and they perhaps are not far off.
 
 
                                  _Song._
 
     Sweet Echo, sweetest nymph, that liv'st unseen                   230
           Within thy airy shell
         By slow Meander's margent green,
     And in the violet-embroidered vale
         Where the love-lorn nightingale
     Nightly to thee her sad song mourneth well:                      235
     Canst thou not tell me of a gentle pair
         That likest thy Narcissus are?
           O, if thou have
         Hid them in some flowery cave,
           Tell me but where,                                         240
       Sweet Queen of Parley, Daughter of the Sphere!
       So may'st thou be translated to the skies,
     And give resounding grace to all Heaven's harmonies!
 
       _Comus._ Can any mortal mixture of earth's mould
     Breathe such divine enchanting ravishment?                       245
     Sure something holy lodges in that breast,
     And with these raptures moves the vocal air
     To testify his hidden residence.
     How sweetly did they float upon the wings
     Of silence, through the empty-vaulted night,                     250
     At every fall smoothing the raven down
     Of darkness till it smiled! I have oft heard
     My mother Circe with the Sirens three,
     Amidst the flowery-kirtled Naiades,
     Culling their potent herbs and baleful drugs,                    255
     Who, as they sung, would take the prisoned soul,
     And lap it in Elysium: Scylla wept,
     And chid her barking waves into attention,
     And fell Charybdis murmured soft applause.
     Yet they in pleasing slumber lulled the sense,                   260
     And in sweet madness robbed it of itself;
     But such a sacred and home-felt delight,
     Such sober certainty of waking bliss,
     I never heard till now. I'll speak to her,
     And she shall be my queen.--Hail, foreign wonder!                265
     Whom certain these rough shades did never breed,
     Unless the goddess that in rural shrine
     Dwell'st here with Pan or Sylvan, by blest song
     Forbidding every bleak unkindly fog
     To touch the prosperous growth of this tall wood.                270
 
       _Lady._ Nay, gentle shepherd, ill is lost that praise
     That is addressed to unattending ears.
     Not any boast of skill, but extreme shift
     How to regain my severed company,
     Compelled me to awake the courteous Echo                         275
     To give me answer from her mossy couch.
 
       _Comus._ What chance, good Lady, hath bereft you thus?
 
       _Lady._ Dim darkness and this leavy labyrinth.
 
       _Comus._ Could that divide you from near-ushering guides?
 
       _Lady._ They left me weary on a grassy turf.                   280
 
       _Comus._ By falsehood, or discourtesy, or why?
 
       _Lady._ To seek i' the valley some cool friendly spring.
 
       _Comus._ And left your fair side all unguarded, Lady?
 
       _Lady._ They were but twain, and purposed quick return.
 
       _Comus._ Perhaps forestalling night prevented them.            285
 
       _Lady._ How easy my misfortune is to hit!
 
       _Comus._ Imports their loss, beside the present need?
 
       _Lady._ No less than if I should my brothers lose.
 
       _Comus._ Were they of manly prime, or youthful bloom?
 
       _Lady._ As smooth as Hebe's their unrazored lips.              290
 
       _Comus._ Two such I saw, what time the labored ox
     In his loose traces from the furrow came,
     And the swinked hedger at his supper sat.
     I saw them under a green mantling vine,
     That crawls along the side of yon small hill,                    295
     Plucking ripe clusters from the tender shoots;
     Their port was more than human, as they stood.
     I took it for a faery vision
     Of some gay creatures of the element,
     That in the colors of the rainbow live,                          300
     And play i' the plighted clouds. I was awe-strook,
     And, as I passed, I worshiped. If those you seek,
     It were a journey like the path to Heaven
     To help you find them.
 
       _Lady._               Gentle villager,
     What readiest way would bring me to that place?                  305
 
       _Comus._ Due west it rises from this shrubby point.
 
       _Lady._ To find out that, good shepherd, I suppose,
     In such a scant allowance of star-light,
     Would overtask the best land-pilot's art,
     Without the sure guess of well-practised feet.                   310
 
       _Comus._ I know each lane, and every alley green,
     Dingle, or bushy dell, of this wild wood,
     And every bosky bourn from side to side,
     My daily walks and ancient neighborhood;
     And, if your stray attendance be yet lodged,                     315
     Or shroud within these limits, I shall know
     Ere morrow wake, or the low-roosted lark
     From her thatched pallet rouse. If otherwise,
     I can conduct you, Lady, to a low
     But loyal cottage, where you may be safe                         320
     Till further quest.
 
       _Lady._           Shepherd, I take thy word,
     And trust thy honest-offered courtesy,
     Which oft is sooner found in lowly sheds,
     With smoky rafters, than in tapestry halls
     And courts of princes, where it first was named,                 325
     And yet is most pretended. In a place
     Less warranted than this, or less secure,
     I cannot be, that I should fear to change it.
     Eye me, blest Providence, and square my trial
     To my proportioned strength! Shepherd, lead on....               330
 
                             The Two Brothers.
 
       _Eld. Bro._ Unmuffle, ye faint stars; and thou, fair moon,
     That wont'st to love the traveller's benison,
     Stoop thy pale visage through an amber cloud,
     And disinherit Chaos, that reigns here
     In double night of darkness and of shades;                       335
     Or, if your influence be quite dammed up
     With black usurping mists, some gentle taper,
     Though a rush-candle from the wicker hole
     Of some clay habitation, visit us
     With thy long levelled rule of streaming light,                  340
     And thou shalt be our star of Arcady,
     Or Tyrian Cynosure.
 
       _Sec. Bro._       Or, if our eyes
     Be barred that happiness, might we but hear
     The folded flocks, penned in their wattled cotes,
     Or sound of pastoral reed with oaten stops,                      345
     Or whistle from the lodge, or village cock
     Count the night-watches to his feathery dames,
     'Twould be some solace yet, some little cheering,
     In this close dungeon of innumerous boughs.
     But, Oh, that hapless virgin, our lost sister!                   350
     Where may she wander now, whither betake her
     From the chill dew, amongst rude burs and thistles?
     Perhaps some cold bank is her bolster now,
     Or 'gainst the rugged bark of some broad elm
     Leans her unpillowed head, fraught with sad fears.               355
     What if in wild amazement and affright,
     Or, while we speak, within the direful grasp
     Of savage hunger, or of savage heat!
 
       _Eld. Bro._ Peace, brother: be not over-exquisite
     To cast the fashion of uncertain evils;                          360
     For, grant they be so, while they rest unknown,
     What need a man forestall his date of grief,
     And run to meet what he would most avoid?
     Or, if they be but false alarms of fear,
     How bitter is such self-delusion!                                365
     I do not think my sister so to seek,
     Or so unprincipled in virtue's book,
     And the sweet peace that goodness bosoms ever,
     As that the single want of light and noise
     (Not being in danger, as I trust she is not)                     370
     Could stir the constant mood of her calm thoughts,
     And put them into misbecoming plight.
     Virtue could see to do what Virtue would
     By her own radiant light, though sun and moon
     Were in the flat sea sunk. And Wisdom's self                     375
     Oft seeks to sweet retired solitude,
     Where, with her best nurse, Contemplation,
     She plumes her feathers, and lets grow her wings,
     That, in the various bustle of resort,
     Were all to-ruffled, and sometimes impaired.                     380
     He that has light within his own clear breast
     May sit i' the centre, and enjoy bright day:
     But he that hides a dark soul and foul thoughts
     Benighted walks under the mid-day sun;
     Himself is his own dungeon.
 
       _Sec. Bro._             'Tis most true                         385
     That musing Meditation most affects
     The pensive secrecy of desert cell,
     Far from the cheerful haunt of men and herds,
     And sits as safe as in a senate-house;
     For who would rob a hermit of his weeds,                         390
     His few books, or his beads, or maple dish,
     Or do his gray hairs any violence?
     But Beauty, like the fair Hesperian tree
     Laden with blooming gold, had need the guard
     Of dragon-watch with unenchanted eye                             395
     To save her blossoms, and defend her fruit,
     From the rash hand of bold Incontinence.
     You may as well spread out the unsunned heaps
     Of miser's treasure by an outlaw's den,
     And tell me it is safe, as bid me hope                           400
     Danger will wink on Opportunity,
     And let a single helpless maiden pass
     Uninjured in this wild surrounding waste.
     Of night or loneliness it recks me not;
     I fear the dread events that dog them both,                      405
     Lest some ill-greeting touch attempt the person
     Of our unowned sister.
 
       _Eld. Bro._         I do not, brother,
     Infer as if I thought my sister's state
     Secure without all doubt or controversy;
     Yet, where an equal poise of hope and fear                       410
     Does arbitrate the event, my nature is
     That I incline to hope rather than fear,
     And gladly banish squint suspicion.
     My sister is not so defenceless left
     As you imagine; she has a hidden strength,                       415
     Which you remember not.
 
       _Sec. Bro._           What hidden strength,
     Unless the strength of Heaven, if you mean that?
 
       _Eld. Bro._ I mean that too, but yet a hidden strength,
     Which, if Heaven gave it, may be termed her own.
     'Tis chastity, my brother, chastity:                             420
     She that has that is clad in complete steel,
     And, like a quivered nymph with arrows keen,
     May trace huge forests, and unharbored heaths,
     Infamous hills, and sandy perilous wilds;
     Where, through the sacred rays of chastity,                      425
     No savage fierce, bandite, or mountaineer,
     Will dare to soil her virgin purity.
     Yea, there where very desolation dwells,
     By grots and caverns shagged with horrid shades,
     She may pass on with unblenched majesty,                         430
     Be it not done in pride, or in presumption.
     Some say no evil thing that walks by night,
     In fog or fire, by lake or moorish fen,
     Blue meagre hag, or stubborn unlaid ghost,
     That breaks his magic chains at curfew time,                     435
     No goblin or swart faery of the mine,
     Hath hurtful power o'er true virginity.
     Do ye believe me yet, or shall I call
     Antiquity from the old schools of Greece
     To testify the arms of chastity?                                 440
     Hence had the huntress Dian her dread bow,
     Fair silver-shafted queen forever chaste,
     Wherewith she tamed the brinded lioness
     And spotted mountain-pard, but set at nought
     The frivolous bolt of Cupid; gods and men                        445
     Feared her stern frown, and she was queen o' the woods.
     What was that snaky-headed Gorgon shield
     That wise Minerva wore, unconquered virgin,
     Wherewith she freezed her foes to congealed stone,
     But rigid looks of chaste austerity,                             450
     And noble grace that dashed brute violence
     With sudden adoration and blank awe?
     So dear to Heaven is saintly chastity
     That, when a soul is found sincerely so,
     A thousand liveried angels lackey her,                           455
     Driving far off each thing of sin and guilt,
     And in clear dream and solemn vision
     Tell her of things that no gross ear can hear;
     Till oft converse with heavenly habitants
     Begin to cast a beam on the outward shape,                       460
     The unpolluted temple of the mind,
     And turns it by degrees to the soul's essence,
     Till all be made immortal. But, when lust,
     By unchaste looks, loose gestures, and foul talk,
     But most by lewd and lavish act of sin,                          465
     Lets in defilement to the inward parts,
     The soul grows clotted by contagion,
     Imbodies, and imbrutes, till she quite lose
     The divine property of her first being.
     Such are those thick and gloomy shadows damp                     470
     Oft seen in charnel-vaults and sepulchres,
     Lingering and sitting by a new-made grave,
     As loth to leave the body that it loved,
     And linked itself by carnal sensualty
     To a degenerate and degraded state.                              475
 
       _Sec. Bro._ How charming is divine Philosophy!
     Not harsh and crabbed, as dull fools suppose,
     But musical as is Apollo's lute,
     And a perpetual feast of nectared sweets,
     Where no crude surfeit reigns.
 
       _Eld. Bro._               List! list! I hear                   480
     Some far-off hallo break the silent air.
 
       _Sec. Bro._ Methought so too; what should it be?
 
       _Eld. Bro._                           For certain,
     Either some one, like us, night-foundered here,
     Or else some neighbor woodman, or, at worst,
     Some roving robber calling to his fellows.                       485
 
       _Sec. Bro._ Heaven help my sister! Again, again, and near!
     Best draw, and stand upon our guard.
 
       _Eld. Bro._                     I'll hallo.
     If he be friendly, he comes well: if not,
     Defence is a good cause, and Heaven be for us!
 
              The Attendant Spirit, habited like a shepherd.
 
     That hallo I should know. What are you? speak.                   490
     Come not too near; you fall on iron stakes else.
 
       _Spir._ What voice is that? my young lord? speak again.
 
       _Sec. Bro._ O brother, 'tis my father's Shepherd, sure.
 
       _Eld. Bro._ Thyrsis! whose artful strains have oft delayed
     The huddling brook to hear his madrigal,                         495
     And sweetened every musk-rose of the dale.
     How camest thou here, good swain? Hath any ram
     Slipped from the fold, or young kid lost his dam,
     Or straggling wether the pent flock forsook?
     How could'st thou find this dark sequestered nook?               500
 
       _Spir._ O my loved master's heir, and his next joy,
     I came not here on such a trivial toy
     As a strayed ewe, or to pursue the stealth
     Of pilfering wolf; not all the fleecy wealth
     That doth enrich these downs is worth a thought                  505
     To this my errand, and the care it brought.
     But, oh! my virgin Lady, where is she?
     How chance she is not in your company?
 
       _Eld. Bro._ To tell thee sadly, Shepherd, without blame
     Or our neglect, we lost her as we came.                          510
 
       _Spir._ Ay me unhappy! then my fears are true.
 
       _Eld. Bro._ What fears, good Thyrsis? Prithee briefly shew.
 
       _Spir._ I'll tell ye. 'Tis not vain or fabulous
     (Though so esteemed by shallow ignorance)
     What the sage poets, taught by the heavenly Muse,                515
     Storied of old in high immortal verse
     Of dire Chimeras and enchanted isles,
     And rifted rocks whose entrance leads to Hell;
     For such there be, but unbelief is blind.
       Within the navel of this hideous wood,                         520
     Immured in cypress shades, a sorcerer dwells,
     Of Bacchus and of Circe born, great Comus,
     Deep skilled in all his mother's witcheries,
     And here to every thirsty wanderer
     By sly enticement gives his baneful cup,                         525
     With many murmurs mixed, whose pleasing poison
     The visage quite transforms of him that drinks,
     And the inglorious likeness of a beast
     Fixes instead, unmoulding reason's mintage
     Charactered in the face. This have I learnt                      530
     Tending my flocks hard by i' the hilly crofts
     That brow this bottom glade; whence night by night
     He and his monstrous rout are heard to howl
     Like stabled wolves, or tigers at their prey,
     Doing abhorred rites to Hecate                                   535
     In their obscured haunts of inmost bowers.
     Yet have they many baits and guileful spells
     To inveigle and invite the unwary sense
     Of them that pass unweeting by the way.
     This evening late, by then the chewing flocks                    540
     Had ta'en their supper on the savory herb
     Of knot-grass dew-besprent, and were in fold,
     I sat me down to watch upon a bank
     With ivy canopied, and interwove
     With flaunting honeysuckle, and began,                           545
     Wrapt in a pleasing fit of melancholy,
     To meditate my rural minstrelsy,
     Till fancy had her fill. But ere a close
     The wonted roar was up amidst the woods,
     And filled the air with barbarous dissonance;                    550
     At which I ceased, and listened them a while,
     Till an unusual stop of sudden silence
     Gave respite to the drowsy-flighted steeds
     That draw the litter of close-curtained Sleep.
     At last a soft and solemn-breathing sound                        555
     Rose like a steam of rich distilled perfumes,
     And stole upon the air, that even Silence
     Was took ere she was ware, and wished she might
     Deny her nature, and be never more,
     Still to be so displaced. I was all ear,                         560
     And took in strains that might create a soul
     Under the ribs of Death. But, oh! ere long
     Too well I did perceive it was the voice
     Of my most honored Lady, your dear sister.
     Amazed I stood, harrowed with grief and fear;                    565
     And 'O poor hapless nightingale,' thought I,
     'How sweet thou sing'st, how near the deadly snare!'
     Then down the lawns I ran with headlong haste,
     Through paths and turnings often trod by day,
     Till, guided by mine ear, I found the place                      570
     Where that damned wizard, hid in sly disguise
     (For so by certain signs I knew), had met
     Already, ere my best speed could prevent,
     The aidless innocent lady, his wished prey;
     Who gently asked if he had seen such two,                        575
     Supposing him some neighbor villager.
     Longer I durst not stay, but soon I guessed
     Ye were the two she meant; with that I sprung
     Into swift flight, till I had found you here;
     But further know I not.
 
       _Sec. Bro._         O night and shades,                        580
     How are ye joined with hell in triple knot
     Against the unarmed weakness of one virgin,
     Alone and helpless! Is this the confidence
     You gave me, brother?
 
       _Eld. Bro._         Yes, and keep it still;
     Lean on it safely; not a period                                  585
     Shall be unsaid for me. Against the threats
     Of malice or of sorcery, or that power
     Which erring men call Chance, this I hold firm:
     Virtue may be assailed, but never hurt,
     Surprised by unjust force, but not enthralled;                   590
     Yea, even that which Mischief meant most harm
     Shall in the happy trial prove most glory.
     But evil on itself shall back recoil,
     And mix no more with goodness, when at last,
     Gathered like scum, and settled to itself,                       595
     It shall be in eternal restless change
     Self-fed and self-consumed. If this fail,
     The pillared firmament is rottenness,
     And earth's base built on stubble. But come, let's on!
     Against the opposing will and arm of Heaven                      600
     May never this just sword be lifted up;
     But for that damned magician, let him be girt
     With all the griesly legions that troop
     Under the sooty flag of Acheron,
     Harpies and Hydras, or all the monstrous forms                   605
     'Twixt Africa and Ind, I'll find him out,
     And force him to return his purchase back,
     Or drag him by the curls to a foul death,
     Cursed as his life.
 
       _Spir._             Alas! good venturous youth,
     I love thy courage yet, and bold emprise;                        610
     But here thy sword can do thee little stead.
     Far other arms and other weapons must
     Be those that quell the might of hellish charms.
     He with his bare wand can unthread thy joints,
     And crumble all thy sinews.
 
       _Eld. Bro._             Why, prithee, Shepherd,                615
     How durst thou then thyself approach so near
     As to make this relation?
 
       _Spir._                 Care and utmost shifts
     How to secure the Lady from surprisal
     Brought to my mind a certain shepherd lad,
     Of small regard to see to, yet well skilled                      620
     In every virtuous plant and healing herb
     That spreads her verdant leaf to the morning ray.
     He loved me well, and oft would beg me sing;
     Which when I did, he on the tender grass
     Would sit, and hearken even to ecstasy,                          625
     And in requital ope his leathern scrip,
     And show me simples of a thousand names,
     Telling their strange and vigorous faculties.
     Amongst the rest a small unsightly root,
     But of divine effect, he culled me out.                          630
     The leaf was darkish, and had prickles on it,
     But in another country, as he said,
     Bore a bright golden flower, but not in this soil:
     Unknown, and like esteemed, and the dull swain
     Treads on it daily with his clouted shoon;                       635
     And yet more med'cinal is it than that Moly
     That Hermes once to wise Ulysses gave.
     He called it Haemony, and gave it me,
     And bade me keep it as of sovran use
     'Gainst all enchantments, mildew blast, or damp,                 640
     Or ghastly Furies' apparition.
     I pursed it up, but little reckoning made,
     Till now that this extremity compelled.
     But now I find it true; for by this means
     I knew the foul enchanter, though disguised,                     645
     Entered the very lime-twigs of his spells,
     And yet came off. If you have this about you
     (As I will give you when we go) you may
     Boldly assault the necromancer's hall;
     Where if he be, with dauntless hardihood                         650
     And brandished blade rush on him: break his glass,
     And shed the luscious liquor on the ground;
     But seize his wand. Though he and his curst crew
     Fierce sign of battle make, and menace high,
     Or, like the sons of Vulcan, vomit smoke,                        655
     Yet will they soon retire, if he but shrink.
 
       _Eld. Bro._ Thyrsis, lead on apace; I'll follow thee;
     And some good angel bear a shield before us!
 
 The Scene changes to a stately palace, set out with all manner of
 deliciousness: soft music, tables spread with all dainties. Comus appears
 with his rabble, and the Lady set in an enchanted chair: to whom he
 offers his glass; which she puts by, and goes about to rise.
 
       _Comus._ Nay, Lady, sit. If I but wave this wand,
     Your nerves are all chained up in alabaster,                     660
     And you a statue, or as Daphne was,
     Root-bound, that fled Apollo.
 
       _Lady._                     Fool, do not boast.
     Thou canst not touch the freedom of my mind
     With all thy charms, although this corporal rind
     Thou hast immanacled while Heaven sees good.                     665
 
       _Comus._ Why are you vexed, Lady? why do you frown?
     Here dwell no frowns, nor anger; from these gates
     Sorrow flies far. See, here be all the pleasures
     That fancy can beget on youthful thoughts,
     When the fresh blood grows lively, and returns                   670
     Brisk as the April buds in primrose season.
     And first behold this cordial julep here,
     That flames and dances in his crystal bounds,
     With spirits of balm and fragrant syrups mixed.
     Not that Nepenthes which the wife of Thone                       675
     In Egypt gave to Jove-born Helena
     Is of such power to stir up joy as this,
     To life so friendly, or so cool to thirst.
     Why should you be so cruel to yourself,
     And to those dainty limbs, which Nature lent                     680
     For gentle usage and soft delicacy?
     But you invert the covenants of her trust,
     And harshly deal, like an ill borrower,
     With that which you received on other terms,
     Scorning the unexempt condition                                  685
     By which all mortal frailty must subsist,
     Refreshment after toil, ease after pain,
     That have been tired all day without repast,
     And timely rest have wanted. But, fair virgin,
     This will restore all soon.
 
       _Lady._                 'Twill not, false traitor!             690
     'Twill not restore the truth and honesty
     That thou hast banished from thy tongue with lies.
     Was this the cottage and the safe abode
     Thou told'st me of? What grim aspects are these,
     These oughly-headed monsters? Mercy guard me!                    695
     Hence with thy brewed enchantments, foul deceiver!
     Hast thou betrayed my credulous innocence
     With vizored falsehood and base forgery?
     And wouldst thou seek again to trap me here
     With liquorish baits, fit to ensnare a brute?                    700
     Were it a draught for Juno when she banquets,
     I would not taste thy treasonous offer. None
     But such as are good men can give good things;
     And that which is not good is not delicious
     To a well-governed and wise appetite.                            705
 
       _Comus._ O foolishness of men! that lend their ears
     To those budge doctors of the stoic fur,
     And fetch their precepts from the Cynic tub,
     Praising the lean and sallow Abstinence!
     Wherefore did Nature pour her bounties forth                     710
     With such a full and unwithdrawing hand,
     Covering the earth with odors, fruits, and flocks,
     Thronging the seas with spawn innumerable,
     But all to please and sate the curious taste?
     And set to work millions of spinning worms,                      715
     That in their green shops weave the smooth-haired silk,
     To deck her sons; and, that no corner might
     Be vacant of her plenty, in her own loins
     She hutched the all-worshipped ore and precious gems,
     To store her children with. If all the world                     720
     Should, in a fit of temperance, feed on pulse,
     Drink the clear stream, and nothing wear but frieze,
     The All-giver would be unthanked, would be unpraised,
     Not half his riches known, and yet despised;
     And we should serve him as a grudging master,                    725
     As a penurious niggard of his wealth,
     And live like Nature's bastards, not her sons,
     Who would be quite surcharged with her own weight,
     And strangled with her waste fertility:
     The earth cumbered, and the winged air darked with plumes,       730
     The herds would over-multitude their lords;
     The sea o'erfraught would swell, and the unsought diamonds
     Would so emblaze the forehead of the deep,
     And so bestud with stars, that they below
     Would grow inured to light, and come at last                     735
     To gaze upon the sun with shameless brows.
     List, Lady; be not coy, and be not cozened
     With that same vaunted name, Virginity.
     Beauty is Nature's coin; must not be hoarded,
     But must be current; and the good thereof                        740
     Consists in mutual and partaken bliss,
     Unsavory in the enjoyment of itself.
     If you let slip time, like a neglected rose
     It withers on the stalk with languished head.
     Beauty is Nature's brag, and must be shown                       745
     In courts, at feasts, and high solemnities,
     Where most may wonder at the workmanship.
     It is for homely features to keep home;
     They had their name thence: coarse complexions
     And cheeks of sorry grain will serve to ply                      750
     The sampler, and to tease the huswife's wool.
     What need a vermeil-tinctured lip for that,
     Love-darting eyes, or tresses like the morn?
     There was another meaning in these gifts;
     Think what, and be advised; you are but young yet.               755
 
       _Lady._ I had not thought to have unlocked my lips
     In this unhallowed air, but that this juggler
     Would think to charm my judgment, as mine eyes,
     Obtruding false rules pranked in reason's garb.
     I hate when vice can bolt her arguments                          760
     And virtue has no tongue to check her pride.
     Impostor! do not charge most innocent Nature,
     As if she would her children should be riotous
     With her abundance. She, good cateress,
     Means her provision only to the good,                            765
     That live according to her sober laws,
     And holy dictate of spare Temperance.
     If every just man that now pines with want
     Had but a moderate and beseeming share
     Of that which lewdly-pampered Luxury                             770
     Now heaps upon some few with vast excess,
     Nature's full blessings would be well-dispensed
     In unsuperfluous even proportion,
     And she no whit encumbered with her store;
     And then the Giver would be better thanked,                      775
     His praise due paid: for swinish gluttony
     Ne'er looks to Heaven amidst his gorgeous feast,
     But with besotted base ingratitude
     Crams, and blasphemes his Feeder. Shall I go on?
     Or have I said enow? To him that dares                           780
     Arm his profane tongue with contemptuous words
     Against the sun-clad power of chastity
     Fain would I something say;--yet to what end?
     Thou hast nor ear, nor soul, to apprehend
     The sublime notion and high mystery                              785
     That must be uttered to unfold the sage
     And serious doctrine of Virginity;
     And thou art worthy that thou shouldst not know
     More happiness than this thy present lot.
     Enjoy your dear wit, and gay rhetoric,                           790
     That hath so well been taught her dazzling fence;
     Thou art not fit to hear thyself convinced.
     Yet, should I try, the uncontrolled worth
     Of this pure cause would kindle my rapt spirits
     To such a flame of sacred vehemence                              795
     That dumb things would be moved to sympathize,
     And the brute Earth would lend her nerves, and shake,
     Till all thy magic structures, reared so high,
     Were shattered into heaps o'er thy false head.
 
       _Comus._ She fables not. I feel that I do fear                 800
     Her words set off by some superior power;
     And, though not mortal, yet a cold shuddering dew
     Dips me all o'er, as when the wrath of Jove
     Speaks thunder and the chains of Erebus
     To some of Saturn's crew. I must dissemble,                      805
     And try her yet more strongly,--Come, no more!
     This is mere moral babble, and direct
     Against the canon laws of our foundation.
     I must not suffer this; yet 'tis but the lees
     And settlings of a melancholy blood.                             810
     But this will cure all straight; one sip of this
     Will bathe the drooping spirits in delight
     Beyond the bliss of dreams. Be wise, and taste....
 
 The Brothers rush in with swords drawn, wrest his glass out of his hand,
 and break it against the ground: his rout make sign of resistance, but
 are all driven in. The Attendant Spirit comes in.
 
       _Spir._ What! have you let the false enchanter scape?
     O ye mistook; ye should have snatched his wand,                  815
     And bound him fast. Without his rod reversed,
     And backward mutters of dissevering power,
     We cannot free the Lady that sits here
     In stony fetters fixed and motionless.
     Yet stay: be not disturbed; now I bethink me,                    820
     Some other means I have which may be used,
     Which once of Meliboeus old I learnt,
     The soothest shepherd that e'er piped on plains.
       There is a gentle Nymph not far from hence,
     That with moist curb sways the smooth Severn stream:             825
     Sabrina is her name: a virgin pure;
     Whilom she was the daughter of Locrine,
     That had the sceptre from his father Brute.
     She, guiltless damsel, flying the mad pursuit
     Of her enraged stepdame, Guendolen,                              830
     Commended her fair innocence to the flood
     That stayed her flight with his cross-flowing course.
     The water-nymphs, that in the bottom played,
     Held up their pearled wrists, and took her in,
     Bearing her straight to aged Nereus' hall;                       835
     Who, piteous of her woes, reared her lank head,
     And gave her to his daughters to imbathe
     In nectared lavers strewed with asphodel,
     And through the porch and inlet of each sense
     Dropt in ambrosial oils, till she revived,                       840
     And underwent a quick immortal change,
     Made Goddess of the river. Still she retains
     Her maiden gentleness, and oft at eve
     Visits the herds along the twilight meadows,
     Helping all urchin blasts, and ill-luck signs                    845
     That the shrewd meddling elf delights to make,
     Which she with precious vialed liquors heals:
     For which the shepherds, at their festivals,
     Carol her goodness loud in rustic lays,
     And throw sweet garland wreaths into her stream                  850
     Of pansies, pinks, and gaudy daffodils.
     And, as the old swain said, she can unlock
     The clasping charm, and thaw the numbing spell,
     If she be right invoked in warbled song;
     For maidenhood she loves, and will be swift                      855
     To aid a virgin, such as was herself,
     In hard-besetting need. This will I try,
     And add the power of some adjuring verse.
 
 
                                  _Song._
 
       Sabrina fair,
         Listen where thou art sitting                                860
       Under the glassy, cool, translucent wave,
         In twisted braids of lilies knitting
       The loose train of thy amber-dropping hair;
         Listen for dear honor's sake,
         Goddess of the silver lake,                                  865
             Listen and save!
 
     Listen, and appear to us,
     In name of great Oceanus,
     By the earth-shaking Neptune's mace,
     And Tethys' grave majestic pace;                                 870
     By hoary Nereus' wrinkled look,
     And the Carpathian wizard's hook;
     By scaly Triton's winding shell,
     And old soothsaying Glaucus' spell;
     By Leucothea's lovely hands,                                     875
     And her son that rules the strands;
     By Thetis' tinsel-slippered feet,
     And the songs of Sirens sweet;
     By dead Parthenope's dear tomb,
     And fair Ligea's golden comb,                                    880
     Wherewith she sits on diamond rocks
     Sleeking her soft alluring locks;
     By all the nymphs that nightly dance
     Upon thy streams with wily glance;
     Rise, rise, and heave thy rosy head                              885
     From thy coral-paven bed,
     And bridle in thy headlong wave,
     Till thou our summons answered have.
                             Listen and save!
 
            Sabrina rises, attended by Water-nymphs, and sings.
 
       By the rushy-fringed bank,                                     890
       Where grow the willow and the osier dank,
       My sliding chariot stays,
     Thick set with agate, and the azurn sheen
     Of turkis blue, and emerald green,
       That in the channel strays:                                    895
     Whilst from off the waters fleet
     Thus I set my printless feet
     O'er the cowslip's velvet head,
       That bends not as I tread.
     Gentle swain, at thy request                                     900
         I am here!
 
       _Spir._ Goddess dear,
     We implore thy powerful hand
     To undo the charmed band
     Of true virgin here distressed                                   905
     Through the force and through the wile
     Of unblessed enchanter vile.
 
       _Sabr._ Shepherd, 'tis my office best
     To help ensnared chastity.
     Brightest Lady, look on me.                                      910
     Thus I sprinkle on thy breast
     Drops that from my fountain pure
     I have kept of precious cure;
     Thrice upon thy finger's tip,
     Thrice upon thy rubied lip:                                      915
     Next this marble venomed seat,
     Smeared with gums of glutinous heat,
     I touch with chaste palms moist and cold.
     Now the spell hath lost his hold,
     And I must haste ere morning hour                                920
     To wait in Amphitrite's bower.
 
           Sabrina descends, and the Lady rises out of her seat.
 
       _Spir._ Virgin, daughter of Locrine,
     Sprung of old Anchises' line,
     May thy brimmed waves for this
     Their full tribute never miss                                    925
     From a thousand petty rills,
     That tumble down the snowy hills:
     Summer drouth or singed air
     Never scorch thy tresses fair,
     Nor wet October's torrent flood                                  930
     Thy molten crystal fill with mud;
     May thy billows roll ashore
     The beryl and the golden ore;
     May thy lofty head be crowned
     With many a tower and terrace round,                             935
     And here and there thy banks upon
     With groves of myrrh and cinnamon.
       Come, Lady; while Heaven lends us grace,
     Let us fly this cursed place,
     Lest the sorcerer us entice                                      940
     With some other new device.
     Not a waste or needless sound
     Till we come to holier ground.
     I shall be your faithful guide
     Through this gloomy covert wide;                                 945
     And not many furlongs thence
     Is your Father's residence,
     Where this night are met in state
     Many a friend to gratulate
     His wished presence, and beside                                  950
     All the swains that there abide
     With jigs and rural dance resort.
     We shall catch them at their sport,
     And our sudden coming there
     Will double all their mirth and cheer.                           955
     Come, let us haste; the stars grow high,
     But Night sits monarch yet in the mid sky.
 
 The Scene changes, presenting Ludlow Town, and the President's Castle:
 then come the Country Dancers; after them the Attendant Spirit, with the
 Two Brothers and the Lady.
 
 
                                  _Song._
 
       _Spir._ Back, shepherds, back! Enough your play
     Till next sun-shine holiday.
     Here be, without duck or nod,                                    960
     Other trippings to be trod
     Of lighter toes, and such court guise
     As Mercury did first devise
     With the mincing Dryades
     On the lawns and on the leas.                                    965
 
        This second Song presents them to their Father and Mother.
 
       Noble Lord and Lady bright,
     I have brought ye new delight.
     Here behold so goodly grown
     Three fair branches of your own.
     Heaven hath timely tried their youth,                            970
     Their faith, their patience, and their truth,
     And sent them here through hard assays
     With a crown of deathless praise,
     To triumph in victorious dance
     O'er sensual folly and intemperance.                             975
 
                 The dances ended, the Spirit epiloguizes.
 
       _Spir._ To the ocean now I fly,
     And those happy climes that lie
     Where day never shuts his eye,
     Up in the broad fields of the sky.
     There I suck the liquid air,                                     980
     All amidst the gardens fair
     Of Hesperus, and his daughters three
     That sing about the golden tree.
     Along the crisped shades and bowers
     Revels the spruce and jocund Spring;                             985
     The Graces and the rosy-bosomed Hours
     Thither all their bounties bring.
     There eternal Summer dwells,
     And west winds with musky wing
     About the cedarn alleys fling                                    990
     Nard and cassia's balmy smells.
     Iris there with humid bow
     Waters the odorous banks, that blow
     Flowers of more mingled hue
     Than her purfled scarf can shew,                                 995
     And drenches with Elysian dew
     (List, mortals, if your ears be true)
     Beds of hyacinth and roses,
     Where young Adonis oft reposes,
     Waxing well of his deep wound,                                  1000
     In slumbers soft, and on the ground
     Sadly sits the Assyrian queen.
     But far above, in spangled sheen,
     Celestial Cupid, her famed son, advanced
     Holds his dear Psyche, sweet entranced                          1005
     After her wandering labors long,
     Till free consent the gods among
     Make her his eternal bride,
     And from her fair unspotted side
     Two blissful twins are to be born,                              1010
     Youth and Joy; so Jove hath sworn.
       But now my task is smoothly done:
     I can fly, or I can run
     Quickly to the green earth's end,
     Where the bowed welkin slow doth bend,                          1015
     And from thence can soar as soon
     To the corners of the moon.
     Mortals, that would follow me,
     Love Virtue; she alone is free.
     She can teach ye how to climb                                   1020
     Higher than the sphery chime;
     Or, if Virtue feeble were,
     Heaven itself would stoop to her.
 
 
 
 
                                 LYCIDAS.
 
 
 In this Monody the Author bewails a learned Friend, unfortunately drowned
 in his passage from Chester on the Irish Seas, 1637; and, by occasion,
 foretells the ruin of our corrupted Clergy, then in their height.
 
     Yet once more, O ye laurels, and once more,
     Ye myrtles brown, with ivy never sere,
     I come to pluck your berries harsh and crude,
     And with forced fingers rude
     Shatter your leaves before the mellowing year.                     5
     Bitter constraint and sad occasion dear
     Compels me to disturb your season due;
     For Lycidas is dead, dead ere his prime,
     Young Lycidas, and hath not left his peer.
     Who would not sing for Lycidas? he knew                           10
     Himself to sing, and build the lofty rhyme.
     He must not float upon his watery bier
     Unwept, and welter to the parching wind,
     Without the meed of some melodious tear.
       Begin, then, Sisters of the sacred well                         15
     That from beneath the seat of Jove doth spring;
     Begin, and somewhat loudly sweep the string.
     Hence with denial vain and coy excuse:
     So may some gentle Muse
     With lucky words favor _my_ destined urn,                         20
     And as he passes turn,
     And bid fair peace be to my sable shroud!
       For we were nursed upon the self-same hill,
     Fed the same flock, by fountain, shade, and rill;
     Together both, ere the high lawns appeared                        25
     Under the opening eyelids of the Morn,
     We drove a-field, and both together heard
     What time the gray-fly winds her sultry horn,
     Battening our flocks with the fresh dews of night,
     Oft till the star that rose at evening bright                     30
     Toward heaven's descent had sloped his westering wheel.
     Meanwhile the rural ditties were not mute;
     Tempered to the oaten flute
     Rough Satyrs danced, and Fauns with cloven heel
     From the glad sound would not be absent long;                     35
     And old Damoetas loved to hear our song.
       But, oh! the heavy change, now thou art gone,
     Now thou art gone and never must return!
     Thee, Shepherd, thee the woods and desert caves,
     With wild thyme and the gadding vine o'ergrown,                   40
     And all their echoes, mourn.
     The willows, and the hazel copses green,
     Shall now no more be seen
     Fanning their joyous leaves to thy soft lays.
     As killing as the canker to the rose,                             45
     Or taint-worm to the weanling herds that graze,
     Or frost to flowers, that their gay wardrobe wear,
     When first the white-thorn blows;
     Such Lycidas, thy loss to shepherd's ear.
       Where were ye, Nymphs, when the remorseless deep                50
     Closed o'er the head of your loved Lycidas?
     For neither were ye playing on the steep
     Where your old bards, the famous Druids, lie,
     Nor on the shaggy top of Mona high,
     Nor yet where Deva spreads her wizard stream.                     55
     Ay me! I fondly dream
     "Had ye been there," ... for what could that have done?
     What could the Muse herself that Orpheus bore,
     The Muse herself, for her enchanting son,
     Whom universal nature did lament,                                 60
     When, by the rout that made the hideous roar,
     His gory visage down the stream was sent,
     Down the swift Hebrus to the Lesbian shore?
       Alas! what boots it with uncessant care
     To tend the homely, slighted, shepherd's trade,                   65
     And strictly meditate the thankless Muse?
     Were it not better done, as others use,
     To sport with Amaryllis in the shade,
     Or with the tangles of Neaera's hair?
     Fame is the spur that the clear spirit doth raise                 70
     (That last infirmity of noble mind)
     To scorn delights and live laborious days;
     But the fair guerdon when we hope to find,
     And think to burst out into sudden blaze,
     Comes the blind Fury with the abhorred shears,                    75
     And slits the thin-spun life. "But not the praise,"
     Phoebus replied, and touched my trembling ears:
     "Fame is no plant that grows on mortal soil,
     Nor in the glistering foil
     Set off to the world, nor in broad rumor lies,                    80
     But lives and spreads aloft by those pure eyes
     And perfect witness of all-judging Jove;
     As he pronounces lastly on each deed,
     Of so much fame in heaven expect thy meed."
       O fountain Arethuse, and thou honored flood,                    85
     Smooth-sliding Mincius, crowned with vocal reeds,
     That strain I heard was of a higher mood.
     But now my oat proceeds,
     And listens to the Herald of the Sea,
     That came in Neptune's plea.                                      90
     He asked the waves, and asked the felon winds,
     What hard mishap hath doomed this gentle swain?
     And questioned every gust of rugged wings
     That blows from off each beaked promontory.
     They knew not of his story;                                       95
     And sage Hippotades their answer brings,
     That not a blast was from his dungeon strayed:
     The air was calm, and on the level brine
     Sleek Panope with all her sisters played.
     It was that fatal and perfidious bark,                           100
     Built in the eclipse, and rigged with curses dark,
     That sunk so low that sacred head of thine.
       Next, Camus, reverend sire, went footing slow,
     His mantle hairy, and his bonnet sedge,
     Inwrought with figures dim, and on the edge                      105
     Like to that sanguine flower inscribed with woe.
     "Ah! who hath reft," quoth he, "my dearest pledge?"
     Last came, and last did go,
     The Pilot of the Galilean Lake;
     Two massy keys he bore of metals twain                           110
     (The golden opes, the iron shuts amain).
     He shook his mitred locks, and stern bespake:--
       "How well could I have spared for thee, young swain,
     Enow of such as, for their bellies' sake,
     Creep, and intrude, and climb into the fold!                     115
     Of other care they little reckoning make
     Than how to scramble at the shearers' feast,
     And shove away the worthy bidden guest.
     Blind mouths! that scarce themselves know how to hold
     A sheep-hook, or have learnt aught else the least                120
     That to the faithful herdman's art belongs!
     What recks it them? What need they? They are sped;
     And, when they list, their lean and flashy songs
     Grate on their scrannel pipes of wretched straw;
     The hungry sheep look up, and are not fed,                       125
     But swoln with wind and the rank mist they draw,
     Rot inwardly, and foul contagion spread;
     Besides what the grim wolf with privy paw
     Daily devours apace, and nothing said.
     But that two-handed engine at the door                           130
     Stands ready to smite once, and smite no more."
       Return, Alpheus; the dread voice is past
     That shrunk thy streams; return, Sicilian Muse,
     And call the vales, and bid them hither cast
     Their bells and flowerets of a thousand hues.                    135
     Ye valleys low, where the mild whispers use
     Of shades, and wanton winds, and gushing brooks,
     On whose fresh lap the swart star sparely looks,
     Throw hither all your quaint enamelled eyes,
     That on the green turf suck the honeyed showers,                 140
     And purple all the ground with vernal flowers.
     Bring the rathe primrose that forsaken dies,
     The tufted crow-toe, and pale jessamine,
     The white pink, and the pansy freaked with jet,
     The glowing violet,                                              145
     The musk-rose, and the well-attired woodbine,
     With cowslips wan that hang the pensive head,
     And every flower that sad embroidery wears;
     Bid amaranthus all his beauty shed,
     And daffadillies fill their cups with tears,                     150
     To strew the laureate hearse where Lycid lies.
     For so, to interpose a little ease,
     Let our frail thoughts dally with false surmise.
     Ay me! whilst thee the shores and sounding seas
     Wash far away, where'er thy bones are hurled;                    155
     Whether beyond the stormy Hebrides,
     Where thou perhaps under the whelming tide
     Visit'st the bottom of the monstrous world;
     Or whether thou, to our moist vows denied,
     Sleep'st by the fable of Bellerus old,                           160
     Where the great Vision of the guarded mount
     Looks toward Namancos and Bayona's hold.
     Look homeward, Angel, now, and melt with ruth:
     And, O ye dolphins, waft the hapless youth.
       Weep no more, woeful shepherds, weep no more,                  165
     For Lycidas, your sorrow, is not dead,
     Sunk though he be beneath the watery floor.
     So sinks the day-star in the ocean bed,
     And yet anon repairs his drooping head,
     And tricks his beams, and with new-spangled ore                  170
     Flames in the forehead of the morning sky:
     So Lycidas sunk low, but mounted high,
     Through the dear might of Him that walked the waves,
     Where, other groves and other streams along,
     With nectar pure his oozy locks he laves,                        175
     And hears the unexpressive nuptial song,
     In the blest kingdoms meek of joy and love.
     There entertain him all the Saints above,
     In solemn troops, and sweet societies,
     That sing, and singing in their glory move,                      180
     And wipe the tears forever from his eyes.
     Now, Lycidas, the shepherds weep no more;
     Henceforth thou art the Genius of the shore,
     In thy large recompense, and shalt be good
     To all that wander in that perilous flood.                       185
 
       Thus sang the uncouth swain to the oaks and rills,
     While the still morn went out with sandals gray:
     He touched the tender stops of various quills,
     With eager thought warbling his Doric lay:
     And now the sun had stretched out all the hills,                 190
     And now was dropt into the western bay.
     At last he rose, and twitched his mantle blue;
     To-morrow to fresh woods, and pastures new.
 
 
 
 
                                 SONNETS.
 
 
                                    I.
 
                            TO THE NIGHTINGALE.
 
     O Nightingale that on yon bloomy spray
         Warblest at eve, when all the woods are still,
         Thou with fresh hope the lover's heart dost fill,
         While the jolly Hours lead on propitious May.
     Thy liquid notes that close the eye of day,                        5
         First heard before the shallow cuckoo's bill,
         Portend success in love. O, if Jove's will
         Have linked that amorous power to thy soft lay,
     Now timely sing, ere the rude bird of hate
         Foretell my hopeless doom, in some grove nigh;                10
         As thou from year to year hast sung too late
     For my relief, yet hadst no reason why.
         Whether the Muse or Love called thee his mate,
         Both them I serve, and of their train am I.
 
 
                                    II.
 
             ON HIS HAVING ARRIVED AT THE AGE OF TWENTY-THREE.
 
     How soon hath Time, the subtle thief of youth,
         Stolen on his wing my three-and-twentieth year!
         My hasting days fly on with full career,
         But my late spring no bud or blossom shew'th.
     Perhaps my semblance might deceive the truth                       5
         That I to manhood am arrived so near;
         And inward ripeness doth much less appear,
         That some more timely-happy spirits endu'th.
     Yet, be it less or more, or soon or slow,
         It shall be still in strictest measure even                   10
         To that same lot, however mean or high,
     Toward which Time leads me, and the will of Heaven.
         All is, if I have grace to use it so,
         As ever in my great Task-Master's eye.
 
 
                                   VIII.
 
                WHEN THE ASSAULT WAS INTENDED TO THE CITY.
 
     Captain or Colonel, or Knight in Arms,
         Whose chance on these defenceless doors may seize,
         If deed of honor did thee ever please,
         Guard them, and him within protect from harms.
     He can requite thee; for he knows the charms                       5
         That call fame on such gentle acts as these,
         And he can spread thy name o'er lands and seas,
         Whatever clime the sun's bright circle warms.
     Lift not thy spear against the Muses' bower:
         The great Emathian conqueror bid spare                        10
         The house of Pindarus, when temple and tower
     Went to the ground; and the repeated air
         Of sad Electra's poet had the power
         To save the Athenian walls from ruin bare.
 
 
                                    IX.
 
                         TO A VIRTUOUS YOUNG LADY.
 
     Lady, that in the prime of earliest youth
         Wisely hast shunned the broad way and the green,
         And with those few art eminently seen
         That labor up the hill of heavenly Truth,
     The better part with Mary and with Ruth                            5
         Chosen thou hast; and they that overween,
         And at thy growing virtues fret their spleen,
         No anger find in thee, but pity and ruth.
     Thy care is fixed, and zealously attends
         To fill thy odorous lamp with deeds of light,                 10
         And hope that reaps not shame. Therefore be sure
     Thou, when the Bridegroom with his feastful friends
         Passes to bliss at the mid-hour of night,
         Hast gained thy entrance, Virgin wise, and pure.
 
 
                                    X.
 
                         TO THE LADY MARGARET LEY.
 
     Daughter to that good Earl, once President
         Of England's Council and her Treasury,
         Who lived in both unstained with gold or fee,
         And left them both, more in himself content,
     Till the sad breaking of that Parliament                           5
         Broke him, as that dishonest victory
         At Chaeronea, fatal to liberty,
         Killed with report that old man eloquent,
     Though later born than to have known the days
         Wherein your father flourished, yet by you,                   10
         Madam, methinks I see him living yet:
     So well your words his noble virtues praise
         That all both judge you to relate them true
         And to possess them, honored Margaret.
 
 
                                   XIII.
 
                       TO MR. H. LAWES ON HIS AIRS.
 
     Harry, whose tuneful and well-measured song
         First taught our English music how to span
         Words with just note and accent, not to scan
         With Midas' ears, committing short and long,
     Thy worth and skill exempts thee from the throng,                  5
         With praise enough for Envy to look wan;
         To after age thou shalt be writ the man
         That with smooth air couldst humor best our tongue.
     Thou honor'st Verse, and Verse must send her wing
         To honor thee, the priest of Phoebus' quire,                  10
         That tunest their happiest lines in hymn or story.
     Dante shall give Fame leave to set thee higher
         Than his Casella, whom he wooed to sing,
         Met in the milder shades of Purgatory.
 
 
                                    XV.
 
         ON THE LORD GENERAL FAIRFAX, AT THE SIEGE OF COLCHESTER.
 
     Fairfax, whose name in arms through Europe rings,
         Filling each mouth with envy or with praise,
         And all her jealous monarchs with amaze,
         And rumors loud that daunt remotest kings,
     Thy firm unshaken virtue ever brings                               5
         Victory home, though new rebellions raise
         Their Hydra heads, and the false North displays
         Her broken league to imp their serpent wings.
     O yet a nobler task awaits thy hand
         (For what can war but endless war still breed?)               10
         Till truth and right from violence be freed,
     And public faith cleared from the shameful brand
         Of public fraud. In vain doth Valor bleed,
         While Avarice and Rapine share the land.
 
 
                                   XVI.
 
                 TO THE LORD GENERAL CROMWELL, MAY, 1652,
 
        ON THE PROPOSALS OF CERTAIN MINISTERS AT THE COMMITTEE FOR
                        PROPAGATION OF THE GOSPEL.
 
     Cromwell, our chief of men, who through a cloud
         Not of war only, but detractions rude,
         Guided by faith and matchless fortitude,
         To peace and truth thy glorious way hast ploughed,
     And on the neck of crowned Fortune proud                           5
         Hast reared God's trophies, and his work pursued,
         While Darwen stream, with blood of Scots imbrued,
         And Dunbar field, resounds thy praises loud,
     And Worcester's laureate wreath: yet much remains
         To conquer still; Peace hath her victories                    10
         No less renowned than War: new foes arise,
     Threatening to bind our souls with secular chains.
         Help us to save free conscience from the paw
         Of hireling wolves, whose Gospel is their maw.
 
 
                                   XVII.
 
                      TO SIR HENRY VANE THE YOUNGER.
 
     Vane, young in years, but in sage counsel old,
         Than whom a better senator ne'er held
         The helm of Rome, when gowns, not arms, repelled
         The fierce Epirot and the African bold,
     Whether to settle peace, or to unfold                              5
         The drift of hollow states hard to be spelled;
         Then to advise how war may best, upheld,
         Move by her two main nerves, iron and gold,
     In all her equipage; besides, to know
         Both spiritual power and civil, what each means,              10
         What severs each, thou hast learned, which few have done.
     The bounds of either sword to thee we owe:
         Therefore on thy firm hand Religion leans
         In peace, and reckons thee her eldest son.
 
 
                                  XVIII.
 
                     ON THE LATE MASSACRE IN PIEDMONT.
 
     Avenge, O Lord, thy slaughtered saints, whose bones
         Lie scattered on the Alpine mountains cold;
         Even them who kept thy truth so pure of old,
         When all our fathers worshiped stocks and stones,
     Forget not: in thy book record their groans                        5
         Who were thy sheep, and in their ancient fold
         Slain by the bloody Piedmontese, that rolled
         Mother with infant down the rocks. Their moans
     The vales redoubled to the hills, and they
         To heaven. Their martyred blood and ashes sow                 10
         O'er all the Italian fields, where still doth sway
     The triple Tyrant; that from these may grow
         A hundredfold, who, having learnt thy way,
         Early may fly the Babylonian woe.
 
 
                                   XIX.
 
                             ON HIS BLINDNESS.
 
     When I consider how my light is spent
         Ere half my days in this dark world and wide,
         And that one talent which is death to hide
         Lodged with me useless, though my soul more bent
     To serve therewith my Maker, and present                           5
         My true account, lest He returning chide,
         "Doth God exact day-labor, light denied?"
         I fondly ask. But Patience, to prevent
     That murmur, soon replies, "God doth not need
         Either man's work or his own gifts. Who best                  10
         Bear his mild yoke, they serve him best. His state
     Is kingly; thousands at his bidding speed,
         And post o'er land and ocean without rest;
         They also serve who only stand and wait."
 
 
                                    XX.
 
                             TO MR. LAWRENCE.
 
     Lawrence, of virtuous father virtuous son,
         Now that the fields are dank, and ways are mire,
         Where shall we sometimes meet, and by the fire
         Help waste a sullen day, what may be won
     From the hard season gaining? Time will run                        5
         On smoother, till Favonius reinspire
         The frozen earth, and clothe in fresh attire
         The lily and rose, that neither sowed nor spun.
     What neat repast shall feast us, light and choice,
         Of Attic taste, with wine, whence we may rise                 10
         To hear the lute well touched, or artful voice
     Warble immortal notes and Tuscan air?
         He who of those delights can judge, and spare
         To interpose them oft, is not unwise.
 
 
                                   XXI.
 
                            TO CYRIACK SKINNER.
 
     Cyriack, whose grandsire on the royal bench
         Of British Themis, with no mean applause,
         Pronounced, and in his volumes taught, our laws,
         Which others at their bar so often wrench,
     To-day deep thoughts resolve with me to drench                     5
         In mirth that after no repenting draws;
         Let Euclid rest, and Archimedes pause,
         And what the Swede intend, and what the French.
     To measure life learn thou betimes, and know
         Toward solid good what leads the nearest way;                 10
         For other things mild Heaven a time ordains,
     And disapproves that care, though wise in show,
         That with superfluous burden loads the day,
         And, when God sends a cheerful hour, refrains.
 
 
                                   XXII.
 
                               TO THE SAME.
 
     Cyriack, this three years' day these eyes, though clear,
         To outward view, of blemish or of spot,
         Bereft of light, their seeing have forgot;
         Nor to their idle orbs doth sight appear
     Of sun, or moon, or star, throughout the year,                     5
         Or man, or woman. Yet I argue not
         Against Heaven's hand or will, nor bate a jot
         Of heart or hope, but still bear up and steer
     Right onward. What supports me, dost thou ask?
         The conscience, friend, to have lost them overplied           10
         In Liberty's defence, my noble task,
     Of which all Europe rings from side to side.
         This thought might lead me through the world's vain mask
         Content, though blind, had I no better guide.
 
 
                                  XXIII.
 
                           ON HIS DECEASED WIFE
 
     Methought I saw my late espoused saint
         Brought to me like Alcestis from the grave,
         Whom Jove's great son to her glad husband gave,
         Rescued from Death by force, though pale and faint.
     Mine, as whom washed from spot of child-bed taint                  5
         Purification in the Old Law did save,
         And such as yet once more I trust to have
         Full sight of her in Heaven without restraint,
     Came vested all in white, pure as her mind.
         Her face was veiled; yet to my fancied sight                  10
         Love, sweetness, goodness, in her person shined
     So clear as in no face with more delight.
         But, oh! as to embrace me she inclined,
         I waked, she fled, and day brought back my night.
 
 
 
 
                                  NOTES.
 
 
 
 
                   ON THE MORNING OF CHRIST'S NATIVITY.
 
 
 From his sixteenth year Milton had been wont to write freely in Latin
 verse, on miscellaneous poetic themes, sometimes expressing his thoughts
 on events of the day, and sometimes addressing letters to his friends on
 purely personal matters. From these Latin poems, which therefore in some
 sense belong to English literature, we obtain valuable insight into his
 course of life and his way of thinking. What Milton wrote in foreign
 languages is indispensable for the information it gives us about
 himself--its content is important; but as poetry implies a fusing of
 content and form into an artistic unity, if one of these elements is
 foreign, the result is nondescript and cannot be ranged under the head of
 English literature in the strict sense of the term.
 
 It is in one of Milton's own Latin pieces that we find our best
 commentary on the Hymn on the Nativity. The sixth Latin Elegy is an
 epistle to his intimate college friend, "Charles Diodati making a stay in
 the country," the last twelve lines of which may be freely translated as
 follows:--
 
 But if you shall wish to know what I am doing,--if indeed you think it
 worth your while to know whether I am doing anything at all,--we are
 singing the peace-bringing king born of heavenly seed, and the happy ages
 promised in the sacred books, and the crying of the infant God lying in a
 manger under a poor roof, who dwells with his father in the realms above;
 and the starry sky, and the squadrons singing on high, and the gods
 suddenly driven away to their own fanes. Those gifts we have indeed given
 to the birthday of Christ; that first light brought them to me at dawn.
 Thee also they await sung to our native pipes; thou shalt be to me in
 lieu of a judge for me to read them to.
 
 This means, of course, that the poet is composing a Christmas Hymn in his
 native language. We must note his age at this time,--twenty-one years: he
 is a student at Cambridge. The poem remains the great Christmas hymn in
 our literature. "The Ode on the Nativity," says Professor Saintsbury, "is
 a test of the reader's power to appreciate poetry."
 
 In four stanzas the poet speaks in his own person: he too must, with the
 wise men from the east, bring such gifts as he has, to offer to the
 Infant God. His offering is the _humble ode_ which follows. We must take
 note of the change in the metric form which marks the transition from the
 introduction to the ode. In the stanzas of the former the lines all have
 five accents, except the last, which has six; while in the latter, four
 lines have three accents each, one has four, two have five, and one has
 six. Notice also the occasional hypermetric lines, such as line 47.
 
 In connection with Milton's Hymn, read Alfred Domett's _It was the calm
 and silent night_.
 
 
 5. For so the holy sages once did sing. See Par. Lost XII 324.
 
 6. our deadly forfeit should release. Compare Par. Lost III 221, and see
 the idea of _releasing a forfeit_ otherwise expressed in the Merchant of
 Venice IV 1 24.
 
 10. he wont. This is the past tense of the verb _wont_, meaning to _be
 accustomed_. See the present, Par. Lost I 764, and the participle, I 332.
 
 15. thy sacred vein. See _vein_ in the same sense, Par. Lost VI 628.
 
 19. the Sun's team. Compare Comus 95, and read the story of Phaethon in
 Ovid's Metamorphoses II 106.
 
 24. prevent them with thy humble ode. See _prevent_ in this sense, in
 Shakespeare's Julius Caesar V 1 105, and in Psalm XXI 3.
 
 28. touched with hallowed fire. See Acts II 3. On the meaning of secret,
 compare Par. Lost X 32.
 
 41. Pollute is the participle, exactly equivalent to _polluted_.
 
 48. the turning sphere. For poetical purposes Milton everywhere adopts
 the popular astronomy of his day, which was based on the ancient, i.e.
 the Ptolemaic, or geocentric system of the universe. Copernicus had
 already taught the modern, heliocentric theory of the solar system, and
 his innovations were not unknown to Milton, who, however, consistently
 adheres to the old conceptions. In Milton, therefore, we find the earth
 the centre of the visible universe, while the sun, the planets, and the
 fixed stars revolve about it in their several _spheres_. These spheres
 are nine in number, arranged concentrically, like the coats of an onion,
 about the earth, and, if of solid matter, are to be conceived as being of
 perfectly transparent crystal. Beginning with the innermost, they present
 themselves in the following order: the Moon, Mercury, Venus, the Sun,
 Mars, Jupiter, Saturn, the Fixed Stars, the Primum Mobile. In Par. Lost
 III 481, the ninth sphere appears as "that crystalline sphere whose
 balance weighs the trepidation talked," and the Primum Mobile, or the
 first moved, becomes the tenth and outermost of the series. The last two
 spheres contain no stars.
 
 We see, then, what we must understand by the oft-recurring _spheres_ in
 Milton's poetry. In the line, _Down through the turning sphere_, however,
 the singular _sphere_ is obviously used to mean the whole aggregate of
 spheres composing the starry universe.
 
 50. With turtle wing. With the wing of a turtle-dove.
 
 56. The hooked chariot. War chariots sometimes had scythes, or hooks,
 attached to their axles. See 2 Maccabees XIII 2.
 
 60. sovran. Milton always uses this form in preference to _sovereign_.
 
 62. the Prince of Light. Note the corresponding epithet applied to Satan,
 Par. Lost X 383.
 
 64. The winds, with wonder whist. The word _whist_, originally an
 interjection, becomes an adjective, as here and in The Tempest I 2 378.
 
 66. Make three syllables of Oceaen, and make it rhyme with _began_.
 
 68. birds of calm. The birds referred to are doubtless halcyons. Dr.
 Murray defines halcyon thus: "A bird of which the ancients fabled that it
 bred about the time of the winter solstice in a nest floating on the sea,
 and that it charmed the wind and waves so that the sea was specially calm
 during the period; usually identified with a species of kingfisher, hence
 a poetic name of this bird."
 
 71. their precious influence. The word _influence_ is originally a term
 of astrology,--"a flowing in, or influent course, of the planets; their
 virtue infused into, or their course working on, inferior creatures"
 (Skeat, _Etym. Dict._).
 
 73. For all the morning light. As in Burns's "We dare be poor for a'
 that," _for_ meaning in spite of.
 
 74. Lucifer. See Par. Lost VII 131-133.
 
 81. As, for _as if_.
 
 86. Or ere the point of dawn. The two words _or ere_ mean simply
 _before_, as in Hamlet I 2 147, "A little month, or ere those shoes were
 old." _The point of dawn_ imitates the French _le point du jour_.
 
 88. Full little thought they than. _Than_ is an ancient form of _then_,
 not wholly obsolete in Milton's day.
 
 89. the mighty Pan. The poet takes the point of view of the shepherds and
 uses the name of their special deity.
 
 95. by mortal finger strook. Milton uses the three participle forms,
 _strook, struck_, and _strucken_.
 
 98. As all their souls in blissful rapture took. The verb _take_ has here
 the same meaning as in Hamlet I 1 163, "no fairy takes nor witch hath
 power to charm." Thus also we say, a vaccination takes.
 
 103. Cynthia's seat. See Penseroso 59, and Romeo and Juliet III 5 20.
 
 108. Make the line rhyme properly, giving to union three syllables.
 
 112. The helmed cherubim. See Genesis III 24.
 
 113. The sworded seraphim. See Isaiah VI 2-6.
 
 116. With unexpressive notes, meaning beyond the power of human
 expression. So in Lycidas 176; Par. Lost V 595; and in As You Like It,
 "the fair, the chaste, and inexpressive she."
 
 119. But when of old the Sons of Morning sung. See Job XXXVIII 7.
 
 124. the weltering waves. Compare Lycidas 13.
 
 125. Ring out, ye crystal spheres. See note, line 48. The elder poetry is
 full of the notion that the spheres in their revolutions made music,
 which human ears are too gross to hear. See Merchant of Venice V 1 50-65.
 
 136. speckled Vanity. The leopard that confronts Dante in Canto I of
 _Hell_ is beautiful with its dappled skin, but symbolizes vain glory.
 
 143. like glories wearing. The adjective _like_ means nothing without a
 complement, though the complement sometimes has to be supplied, as in
 this instance. Fully expressed the passage would be,--_wearing glories
 like those of Truth and Justice_. The _like_ in such a case as this must
 be spoken with a fuller tone than when its construction is completely
 expressed.
 
 155. those ychained in sleep. The poets, in order to gain a syllable,
 long continued to use the ancient participle prefix _y_. See _yclept_,
 Allegro 12.
 
 157. With such a horrid clang. See Exodus XIX.
 
 168. The Old Dragon. See Revelation XII 9.
 
 173. Stanzas XIX-XXVI announce the deposition and expulsion of the pagan
 deities, and the ruin of the ancient religions. In accordance with his
 custom of grouping selected proper names in abundance, thus giving
 vividness and concreteness to his story and sonority to his verse, the
 poet here illustrates the triumph of the new dispensation by citing the
 names of various gods from the Roman, Greek, Syrian, and Egyptian
 mythologies.
 
 176. Apollo, the great god, whose oracle was at Delphi, or Delphos.
 
 179. spell, as in Comus 853, and often.
 
 186. Genius. A Latin word, signifying a tutelary or guardian spirit
 supposed to preside over a person or place. See Lycidas 183, and
 Penseroso 154.
 
 191. The Lars and Lemures. In the Roman mythology these were the spirits
 of dead ancestors, worshipped or propitiated in families as having power
 for good or evil over the fortunes of their descendants.
 
 194. Affrights the flamens. The Roman flamens were the priests of
 particular gods.
 
 195. the chill marble seems to sweat. Many instances of this phenomenon
 are reported. Thus Cicero, in his _De Divinatione_, tells us: "It was
 reported to the senate that it had rained blood, that the river Atratus
 had even flowed with blood, and that the statues of the gods had sweat."
 
 197. Peor and Baaelim. Syrian false gods. See Numbers XXV 3.
 
 199. that twice-battered god of Palestine. See I Samuel V 2.
 
 200. mooned Ashtaroth. See I Kings XI 33.
 
 203. The Lybic Hammon. "Hammon had a famous temple in Africa, where he
 was adored under the symbolic figure of a ram."
 
 204. their wounded Thammuz. See Ezekiel VIII 14.
 
 205. sullen Moloch. See Par. Lost I 392-396.
 
 210. the furnace blue. Compare Arcades 52.
 
 212. Isis, and Orus, and the dog Anubis. Egyptian deities, the latter
 figured as having the head of a dog.
 
 213. Nor is Osiris seen. Osiris was the principal god of the Egyptians,
 brother and husband of Isis. His highest function was as god of the Nile.
 He met his death at the hands of his brother Typhon, a deity of
 sterility, by whom he was torn into fourteen pieces. Thereupon a general
 lament was raised throughout Egypt. The bull Apis was regarded as the
 visible incarnation of Osiris.--_Murray's Manual of Mythology_.
 
 215. the unshowered grass. Remember, this was in Egypt.
 
 223. his dusky eyn. This ancient plural of eye occurs several times in
 Shakespeare, as in As You Like It IV 3 50.
 
 240. Heaven's youngest-teemed star. Compare Comus 175.
 
 241. Hath fixed her polished car. _Fix_ has its proper meaning,
 _stopped_. The star "came and stood over where the young child was."
 
 
 
 
                              ON SHAKESPEARE.
 
 
 The first edition of the collected works of Shakespeare, known as the
 first folio, was published in 1623, when Milton was fifteen years old.
 The second Shakespeare folio appeared in 1632. Among the commendatory
 verses by various hands prefixed, after the fashion of the time, to the
 latter volume, was a little piece of eight couplets, in which some then
 unknown rhymer expressed his admiration of the great poet. Collecting his
 poems for publication in 1645, Milton included these couplets, gave them
 the date 1630, and the title _On Shakespeare_ which they have since borne
 in his works. The fact that he wrote the verses two years before their
 publication in the Shakespeare folio shows that he did not produce them
 to order, for the special occasion. It is interesting to note that Milton
 at twenty-two was an appreciative reader of Shakespeare. The lines
 themselves give no hint of great poetic genius; they are a fair specimen
 of the conventional, labored eulogy in vogue at the time.
 
 
 4. star-ypointing. To make the decasyllabic verse, the poet takes the
 liberty of prefixing to the present participle the _y_ which properly
 belongs only to the past.
 
 8. a livelong monument. Instead of _livelong_, the first issue of the
 lines, in the Shakespeare folio of 1632, has _lasting_. The change is
 Milton's, appearing in his revision of his poems in 1645. Does it seem to
 be an improvement?
 
 10-12. and that each heart hath ... took. The conjunction _that_ simply
 repeats the _whilst_.
 
 11. thy unvalued book. In Hamlet I 3 19 _unvalued persons_ are persons of
 no value, or of no rank. In Macbeth III 1 94 the _valued file_ is the
 file that determines values or ranks. In Milton's phrase the _unvalued
 book_ means the book whose merit is so great as to be beyond all
 valuation: a new rank must be created for it.
 
 12. Those Delphic lines: lines so crowded with meaning as to seem the
 utterances of an oracle.
 
 13. our fancy of itself bereaving: transporting us into an ecstasy, or
 making us rapt with thought.
 
 14. Dost make _us_ marble with too much conceiving. The concentrated
 attention required to penetrate Shakespeare's meaning makes statues of
 us.
 
 15. Make the word sepulchred fit metrically into the iambic verse.
 
 
 
 
                        L'ALLEGRO AND IL PENSEROSO.
 
 
 The year in which the poems were composed is uncertain. Masson regards
 1632 as the probable date.
 
 The exquisite poems to which Milton gave the Italian titles
 L'Allegro,--the mirthful, or jovial, man,--and Il Penseroso,--the
 melancholy, or saturnine, man,--should be regarded each as the pendant
 and complement of the other, and should be read as a single whole. The
 poet knew both moods, and takes both standpoints with equal grace and
 heartiness. The essential idea of thus contrasting the mirthful and the
 melancholy temperament he found ready to his hand. Robert Burton had
 prefaced his _Anatomy of Melancholy_, published in 1621, with a series of
 not unpleasing, though by no means graceful, amoebean stanzas, in which
 two speakers alternately represent Melancholy, one as sweet and divine,
 and the other as harsh, sour, and damned. Undoubtedly Milton knew his
 Burton. But if he got his main idea from this source, he made his poems
 thoroughly Miltonic by his art of visualizing in delicious pictures the
 various phases of his abstract theme. The poems are wholly poetical,
 equally free from obscurity of thought and from obscurity of expression.
 
 Each poem is prefaced with a vigorous exorcism of the spirit to which it
 is hostile. This is couched in alternate three and five accent iambics,
 preparing a delicious rhythmic effect when the metre changes, in the
 invocation, to the octosyllable, with or without anacrusis.
 
 In L'Allegro we accompany the mirthful man through an entire day of his
 pleasures, from early morning to late evening. The melancholy man moves
 through a programme less definitely and regularly planned. The scenes of
 his delights are mostly in the hours of the night: when the sun is up, he
 hides himself from day's garish eye.
 
 
                                L'Allegro.
 
 
 2. Of Cerberus and blackest Midnight born. Milton follows the example of
 the ancient poets in announcing the parentage of the principal beings
 whom he brings upon his stage. Moreover, he uses the ancient freedom in
 assigning mythical pedigrees, not only adopting no authority as a canon,
 but allowing his own fancy to invent origins as suits his purpose. He
 knew the Greek and Latin poets, and assumed for himself the privilege
 which they exercised of shaping the myths as they pleased. We are not
 therefore to seek in Milton a reproduction of any system of mythology.
 _Cerberus_ was the terrible three-headed dog of Pluto. His station was at
 the entrance to the lower world, or the _Stygian cave_.
 
 3. The Stygian cave is so called from the Styx, the infernal river, "the
 flood of deadly hate."
 
 5. some uncouth cell. _Uncouth_ may be used here in its original sense of
 _unknown_, as in Par. Lost VIII 230.
 
 10. In dark Cimmerian desert. The Cimmerians were a people fabled by the
 ancients to live in perpetual darkness.
 
 12. yclept is the participle of the obsolete verb _clepe_, with the
 ancient prefix _y_, as in ychained, Hymn on the Nativity 155.
 
 15. two sister Graces more. Hesiod names, as the three Graces,
 Euphrosyne, Aglaia, and Thalia, but he makes them the daughters of Zeus
 and Eurynome.
 
 18. The frolic wind. See _frolic_ again as an adjective, Comus 59.
 
 24. So buxom, blithe, and debonair. See Shakespeare's Pericles, I Gower
 23. All these words are interesting to look up for etymologies and
 changes of meaning.
 
 25-36. We readily accept and understand the personification of Jest,
 Jollity, Sport, Laughter, and Liberty, but the plurals, Quips, Cranks,
 Wiles, Nods, Becks, Smiles, we do not manage quite so easily, especially
 in view of the couplet 29-30.
 
 28. Smiles may be said to be wreathed because they inwreathe the face.
 See Par. Lost III 361.
 
 33. trip it, as you go. So in Shakespeare, "I'll queen it no inch
 further; Rather than fool it so; I'll go brave it at the court, lording
 it in London streets."
 
 41. With this line begins a series of illustrations of the _unreproved
 pleasures_ which L'Allegro is going to enjoy during a day of leisure. At
 first the specified pleasures or occupations are introduced by
 infinitives, _to hear, to come_; but the construction soon changes, as we
 shall see. The first pleasure is To hear the lark, etc. 41-44. L'Allegro
 begins his day with early morning. Here we must imagine him as having
 risen and gone forth where he can see the sky and can look about him to
 see what is going on in the farm-yard.
 
     45-46. Then to come, in spite of sorrow,
           And at my window bid good-morrow.
 
 It must be L'Allegro himself who comes to the window, and as he is
 outside, he comes to look in through the shrubbery and bid good morning
 to the cottage inmates, who are now up and about their work. The
 pertinency of the phrase, _in spite of sorrow_, is not intelligible.
 
 53. Oft listening how the hounds and horn. This "pleasure" and the
 next--_sometime walking_--are introduced with present participles. There
 is no interruption of grammatical consistency.
 
 57. Sometime walking, not unseen. See the counterpart of this line,
 Penseroso 65. Todd quotes the note of Bishop Hurd,--"Happy men love
 witnesses of their joy: the splenetic love solitude."
 
 59. against, _i.e._ toward.
 
 62. The clouds in thousand liveries dight. _Dight_ is the participle of
 the verb _to dight_, meaning to adorn. It is still used as an archaism.
 
 67. And every shepherd tells his tale. This undoubtedly means _counts the
 number_ of his flock. In Shakespeare we find, to _tell_ money, years,
 steps, a hundred. So _tale_ often means an enumeration, a number.
 L'Allegro finds the shepherds in the morning counting their sheep, not
 telling stories.
 
 68. With this line ends the long, loose sentence that began with line 37.
 We now come to a full stop, and with line 69 begin a new sentence.
 
 70. the landskip. A word of late origin in English, of unsettled spelling
 in Milton's day.
 
 71. Russet lawns. In Milton, _lawn_ means field or pasture. See Lycidas
 25.
 
 77. In this line the subject, _mine eye_, is resumed.
 
 80. The cynosure of neighboring eyes. In the constellation Cynosure,
 usually called the Lesser Bear, is the pole-star, to which very many eyes
 are directed.
 
 81. A new "pleasure" is introduced, with a new grammatical subject.
 
 83. Where Corydon and Thyrsis met. The proper names in lines 83-88 add to
 the poem a pleasing touch of pastoral simplicity and cheerfulness. They
 are taken from the common stock of names, which, originally devised by
 the Greek idyllists for their shepherds and shepherdesses, have by the
 pastoral poets of all subsequent ages been appropriated to their special
 use. Corydon and Thyrsis stand for farm-laborers, Phyllis and Thestylis
 for their wives or housekeepers. The day of L'Allegro has now advanced to
 dinner-time. Phyllis has been preparing the frugal meal, as we could
 surmise from the smoking chimney. As soon as the dinner is over the women
 go out to work with the men in the harvest field.
 
 87. bower means simply _dwelling_.
 
 90. In the tanned haycock we see the hay dried and browned by the sun.
 
 91. The scene changes and brings yet another "pleasure." secure delight
 is delight without care, _sine cura_. See Samson Agonistes 55.
 
 96. in the chequered shade. They danced under trees through whose foliage
 the sunlight filtered.
 
 99. Evening comes on, and a new pleasure succeeds. Story-telling is now
 in order.
 
 102. Sufficient information about Faery Mab can be got from Romeo and
 Juliet I 4 53-95.
 
 103-104. She, _i.e._ one of the maids; And he,--one of the youths. The
 Friar's lantern is the ignis fatuus, or will-o'-the-wisp, fabled to lead
 men into dangerous marshes.
 
 105. A connective is lacking to make the syntax sound: the subject of
 tells must be _he_. the drudging goblin. This is Robin Goodfellow, known
 to readers of fairy tales. Ben Jonson makes him a character in his Court
 Masque, Love Restored, where he is made to recount many of his pranks,
 and says, among other things, "I am the honest plain country spirit, and
 harmless, Robin Goodfellow, he that sweeps the hearth and the house
 clean, riddles for the country maids, and does all their other drudgery."
 
 109. could not end. Dr. Murray gives this among other quotations as an
 instance of the verb _end_ meaning _to put into the barn, to get in._ So
 in Coriolanus V 6 87.
 
 110. the lubber fiend. This goblin is loutish in shape and
 fiendish-looking, though so good to those who treat him well.
 
 115. Thus done the tales. An absolute construction, imitating the Latin
 ablative absolute.
 
 117. The country folk having gone early to bed, tired with their day's
 labor, L'Allegro hastes to the city, where the pleasures of life are
 prolonged further into the night.
 
 120. In weeds of peace, high triumphs hold. This must mean such things as
 masques and revelries among the upper classes.
 
 122. Rain influence. See note on Hymn on the Nativity 71.
 
 124. What is the antecedent of whom?
 
 125. What ceremony is here introduced?
 
 128. Do not misunderstand the word mask. Its meaning becomes plain from
 the context.
 
 131. To what pleasure does L'Allegro now betake himself?
 
 132. Among the dramatists of the Jacobean time Ben Jonson had especially
 the repute of scholarship. The sock symbolizes comedy, as the buskin does
 tragedy. Compare Il Penseroso 102.
 
     133-134. Or sweetest Shakespeare, Fancy's child,
             Warble his native wood-notes wild.
 
 The couplet seems intended to convey the idea of a counterpart or
 contrast to the _learned sock_ of Jonson. So considered, it is by no
 means an unhappy characterization.
 
 135. The last of the "unreproved pleasures" that L'Allegro wishes he may
 enjoy, seems not so much planned to follow the rest in sequence of time
 as to accompany them and be diffused through them all. Observe the ever
 in this line. The eating cares are a reminiscence of Horace's _curas
 edaces_, Ode II 11 18.
 
 136. Lap me in soft Lydian airs. The three chief modes, or moods, of
 Greek music were the _Lydian_, which was soft and pathetic; the _Dorian_,
 especially adapted to war (see Par. Lost 550); and the _Phrygian_, which
 was bold and vehement.
 
 138. the meeting soul. The soul, in its eagerness, goes forth to meet and
 welcome the music.
 
 139. The word bout seems to point at a piece of music somewhat in the
 nature of a round, or catch.
 
 145. That Orpheus' self may heave his head. Even Orpheus, who in his life
 "drew trees, stones, and floods" by the power of his music, and who now
 reposes in Elysium, would lift his head to listen to the strains that
 L'Allegro would fain hear.
 
 149. Orpheus, with _his_ music, had succeeded in obtaining from Pluto
 only a conditional release of his wife Eurydice. He was not to look back
 upon her till he was quite clear of Pluto's domains. He failed to make
 good the condition, and so again lost his Eurydice.
 
 
                               Il Penseroso.
 
 3. How little you bested. The verb _bested_ means _to avail, to be of
 service_. It is not the same word that we find in Isaiah VIII 21, "hardly
 bestead and hungry."
 
 6. fond here has its primitive meaning, _foolish_. Understand possess in
 the sense in which it is used in the Bible,--"possessed with devils."
 
 10. Make two syllables of Morpheus.
 
 12. Note that while he invoked Mirth in L'Allegro under her Greek name
 Euphrosyne, the poet finds no corresponding Greek designation for
 Melancholy. To us Melancholy seems a name unhappily chosen. But see how
 Milton applies it in line 62 below, and in Comus 546. To him the word
 evidently connotes pensive meditation rather than gloomy depression.
 
 14. To hit the sense of human sight: to be gazed at by human eyes.
 
 18. Prince Memnon was a fabled Ethiopian prince, black, and celebrated
 for his beauty. Recall Virgil's _nigri Memnonis arma_.
 
 19. that starred Ethiop queen. Cassiopeia, wife of the Ethiopian king
 Cepheus, boasted that she was more beautiful than the Nereids, for which
 act of presumption she was translated to the skies, where she became the
 beautiful constellation which we know by her name.
 
 23. bright-haired Vesta. _Vesta_--in Greek, Hestia--"was the goddess of
 the home, the guardian of family life. Her spotless purity fitted her
 peculiarly to be the guardian of virgin modesty."
 
 30. Whilst yet there was no fear of Jove, _i.e._ before Saturn was
 dethroned by Jupiter.
 
 33. All in a robe of darkest grain. In Par. Lost V 285, the third pair of
 Raphael's wings have the color of _sky-tinctured grain_; and XI 242, his
 vest is of purple livelier than "the grain of Sarra," or Tyrian purple.
 This would leave us to infer that the robe of Melancholy is of a deep
 rich color, so dark as to be almost black. Dr. Murray quotes from
 Southey's _Thalaba_, "The ebony ... with darkness feeds its boughs of
 raven grain." What objection is there to making the _grain_ in Milton's
 passage _black_?
 
 35. And sable stole of cypress lawn. Dr. Murray thus defines _cypress
 lawn_, "A light transparent material resembling cobweb lawn or crape;
 like the latter it was, when black, much used for habiliments of
 mourning."
 
 37. Come; but keep thy wonted state. Compare with this passage, L'Allegro
 33.
 
 40. Thy rapt soul sitting in thine eyes. In Cymbeline I 6 51 we find the
 present tense of the verb of which _rapt_ is the participle: "What, dear
 Sir, thus raps you?" Do not confound this word with _rap_, meaning to
 strike.
 
 42. Forget thyself to marble. With this compare On Shakespeare 14.
 
 43. With a sad leaden downward cast. So in Love's Labor's Lost IV 3 321,
 "In leaden contemplation;" Othello III 4 177, "I have this while with
 leaden thoughts been pressed." So also Gray in the Hymn to Adversity,
 "With leaden eye that loves the ground."
 
 45-55. Compare the company which Il Penseroso entreats Melancholy to
 bring along with her with that which L'Allegro wishes to see attending
 Mirth.
 
 46. Spare Fast, that oft with gods doth diet. Only the rigid ascetic has
 a spiritual ear so finely trained that he hears the celestial music.
 
 48. Aye, as their rhymes show, is always pronounced by the poets with the
 vowel sound in _day_.
 
 53. the fiery-wheeled throne. See Daniel VII 9.
 
 54. The Cherub Contemplation. Pronounce _contemplation_ with five
 syllables. It is difficult to form a distinct conception of the nature
 and office of the _cherub_ of the Scriptures. Milton in many passages of
 Par. Lost follows, with regard to the heavenly beings, the account given
 by Dionysius the Areopagite in his Celestial Hierarchy. According to
 Dionysius there were nine orders or ranks of beings in heaven,
 namely,--seraphim, cherubim, thrones, dominions, virtues, powers,
 principalities, archangels, angels. The cherubim have the special
 attribute of knowledge and contemplation of divine things.
 
 55. hist, primarily an interjection commanding silence, becomes here a
 verb.
 
 56. With the introduction of the nightingale comes the first intimation
 of the time of day at which Il Penseroso conceives the course of his
 satisfactions to begin.
 
 57. Everywhere else in Milton plight is used with its modern
 connotations.
 
 59. The moon stops to hear the nightingale's song.
 
 65. Remember L'Allegro's _not unseen_.
 
 77. Up to this point Il Penseroso has been walking in the open air.
 
 78. removed,--remote, retired.
 
 87. As the Bear never sets, to outwatch him must mean to sit up all
 night.
 
 88. With thrice great Hermes. "Hermes Trismegistos--Hermes
 thrice-greatest--is the name given by the Neo-Platonists and the devotees
 of mysticism and alchemy to the Egyptian god Thoth, regarded as more or
 less identified with the Grecian Hermes, and as the author of all
 mysterious doctrines, and especially of the secrets of alchemy." (The
 _New Eng. Dicty._) To such studies the serious mediaeval scholars devoted
 themselves. To unsphere the spirit of Plato is to call him from the
 sphere in which he abides in the other world, or, simply, to take in hand
 for study his writings on immortality.
 
 93-96. On the four classes of demons,--Salamanders, Sylphs, Nymphs,
 Gnomes,--see Pope's Rape of the Lock. These demons are in complicity with
 the planets and other heavenly bodies to influence mortals.
 
 97-102. Thebes, Pelops' line, and the tale of Troy are the staple
 subjects of the great Attic tragedians. It seems strange that the poet
 finds no occasion to name Shakespeare here, as well as in L'Allegro.
 
 104-105. Musaeus and Orpheus are semi-mythical bards, to whom is ascribed
 a greatness proportioned to their obscurity.
 
 105-108. See note on L'Allegro, 149.
 
 109-115. Or call up him that left half-told. This refers to Chaucer and
 to his Squieres Tale in the Canterbury Tales. It is left unfinished. Note
 that Milton changes not only the spelling but the accent of the chief
 character's name. Chaucer writes, "This noble king was cleped
 Cambinskan."
 
 120. Stories in which more is meant than meets the ear refer to
 allegories, like the Fairy Queen.
 
 121. Having thus filled the night with the occupations that he loves, Il
 Penseroso now greets the morning, which he hopes to find stormy with wind
 and rain.
 
 122. civil-suited Morn: _i.e._ Morn in the everyday habiliments of
 business.
 
 123-124. Eos--Aurora, the Dawn--carried off several youths distinguished
 for their beauty. the Attic boy is probably Cephalus, whom she stole from
 his wife Procris.
 
 125. kerchieft in a comely cloud. _Kerchief_ is here used in its original
 and proper sense. Look up its origin.
 
 126. The winds may be called rocking because they visibly rock the trees,
 or because they shake houses.
 
 127. Or ushered with a shower still. The shower falls gently, without
 wind.
 
 130. With minute-drops from off the eaves. After the rain has ceased, and
 while the thatch is draining, the drops fall at regular intervals for a
 time,--as it were, a drop every minute. Il Penseroso listens with
 contentment to the wind, the rustling rain-fall on the leaves, and the
 monotonous patter of the drops when the rain is over.
 
 131. The shower is past, and the sun appears, but Il Penseroso finds its
 beams flaring and distasteful. He seeks covert in the dense groves.
 
 134. Sylvan is the god of the woods.
 
 135. The monumental oak is so called from its great age and size.
 
 140. Consciously nursing his melancholy, Il Penseroso deems the wood that
 hides him a sacred place, and resents intrusion as a profanation.
 
 141. Hide me from day's garish eye. See Richard III. IV 4 89, Romeo and
 Juliet III 2 25.
 
 142. While the bee with honeyed thigh. Is this good apiology?
 
 146. Entice the dewy-feathered Sleep. Note that sleep is represented as
 having feathers. These feathers, in their soft, gentle movement and in
 their refreshing effect are likened to dew. The figure is a common one
 with the poets. In Par. Lost IX 1044, Milton has,--"till dewy sleep
 oppressed them." Cowper, Iliad II, 41, has,--"Awaking from thy dewy
 slumbers."
 
 148. his refers to the _dewy-feathered sleep_. Il Penseroso asks that a
 strange, mysterious dream, hovering close by the wings of sleep, and
 lightly pictured in a succession of vivid forms, may be laid on his
 eye-lids.
 
 155-166. The word studious in line 156 determines that the passage refers
 to college life and not to church attendance. The old English colleges
 have their cloisters, and these have much the same architectural features
 as do churches.
 
 157. embowed means vaulted, or bent like a _bow_.
 
 158. massy-proof: massive and proof against all failure to support their
 load.
 
 159. And storied windows richly dight. Compare L'Allegro, 62.
 
 170. The best possible comment on this use of the verb spell is Milton's
 own language, Par. Regained IV 382, where Satan, addressing the Son of
 God, thus speaks:--
 
         Now, contrary, if I read aught in Heaven,
         Or Heaven write aught of fate, by what the stars
         Voluminous, or single characters
         In their conjunction met, give me to spell,
         Sorrows and labors, opposition, hate,
         Attends thee; scorns, reproaches, injuries,
         Violence and stripes, and, lastly, cruel death.
 
 Il Penseroso's aspiration is that as an astrologer he may learn the
 influence of every star and that he may come to know the virtue of every
 herb.
 
 
 
 
                                 ARCADES.
 
 
 The noble persons of the family of the Countess Dowager of Derby were
 fortunate enough to obtain the services of the poet John Milton to aid in
 the composition of a mask, which they presented to her ladyship at her
 residence in the country. Arcades--the Arcadians--is Milton's
 contribution to this performance. In date the poem precedes Comus, which
 is known to have been composed in 1634.
 
 On the meaning of the term _mask_, as applied to a dramatic form, see
 introductory note on Comus.
 
 
 20. Latona (or Leto) was the mother of Apollo and Diana by Zeus.
 
 21. the towered Cybele is Virgil's Berecyntia Mater, the Phrygian mother,
 who, wearing her mural crown, drives in her chariot through the cities of
 Phrygia. She was conceived as one of the very oldest deities, and as
 mother of a hundred gods. See AEneid VI 785.
 
 28. Of famous Arcady ye are. Arcadia, in the Peloponnesus, was peculiarly
 the home of music and song, especially among the shepherds. See Virgil,
 Eclogue VII 4-5.
 
 30. Divine Alpheus. See note on Lycidas 132.
 
 46. curl the grove: bestow upon the grove dense, crisp foliage.
 
 47. With ringlets quaint and wanton windings wove. The grove is
 intersected with a maze of circling and purposeless paths.
 
 49. noisome: full of annoyance, injurious. See Par. Lost XI 478. blasting
 vapors. See note on Comus 640.
 
 51. thwarting thunder blue. Compare Julius Caesar I 3 50, "the cross blue
 lightning."
 
 52. the cross dire-looking planet. Cross means _adverse, unfavorable_.
 See note on _influence_, Hymn on the Nativity 71.
 
 54. evening gray. See note on Lycidas 187.
 
 60. murmurs. Compare Comus 526.
 
 63. the celestial Sirens' harmony. The Sirens are here advanced to a high
 function and given a new Epithet. Compare Comus 253.
 
 64. the nine infolded spheres. See note on Hymn on Nativity 48.
 
 65-66. See note on Lycidas 75.
 
 69. the daughters of Necessity: the Fates.
 
 72-73. which none can hear Of human mould with gross unpurged ear.
 Compare Merchant of Venice V 1 64.
 
 87. touch the warbled string: the string that is accompanied with the
 voice. See Il Penseroso 106.
 
 97. Ladon, a river of Arcadia, flowing into the Alpheus.
 
 98. Lycaeus and Cyllene, mountains of Arcadia.
 
 100. Erymanth. Erymanthus is a range of mountains separating Arcadia from
 Achaia and Elis.
 
 102. Maenalus, another mountain of Arcadia.
 
 106. Though Syrinx your Pan's mistress were. Syrinx was an Arcadian
 nymph, who, being pursued by Pan, threw herself into the Ladon, where she
 was metamorphosed into a reed, of which the shepherds thereafter made
 their pipes.
 
 
 
 
                            AT A SOLEMN MUSIC.
 
 
 The poet listens to what in the phrase of his time is a _solemn music_,
 but which we should name a sacred concert. The poem is unalloyed lyric,
 expressing the rapture to which the music has lifted his soul. We must
 remember that Milton was himself an amateur musician, and in his days of
 darkness found habitual diversion at his organ. Indications of a
 susceptible and appreciative ear for musical harmony are frequent
 throughout the poems.
 
 
 7. the sapphire-colored throne. See Ezekiel I 26.
 
 27. consort is the word from which we derive our _concert_.
 
 
 
 
                                  COMUS.
 
 
 During the reigns of Elizabeth, James I., and Charles I., the _mask_ was
 one of the most popular forms of dramatic entertainment. Having a
 function and a character peculiar to itself, it flourished side by side
 with the regular plays of the theatrical stage, and gave large scope to
 the genius of poets, composers, and scenic artists.
 
 The mask was usually designed to grace some important occasion, in which
 members of the upper classes of society, or even royal personages, were
 concerned. When the occasion called for particularly brilliant display,
 and had been long foreseen, the preparations for it would involve immense
 outlays for costumes, theatrical machinery, for new music, and for a
 libretto by a play-writer of the greatest note. When the mask was purely
 a private one, like Arcades and Comus, it was all the fashion for the
 gentle youths and maidens, for gentlemen and ladies of the highest rank,
 to take upon themselves the parts of the drama, to rehearse them
 assiduously, and finally to enact them on the private stage or on the
 lawn in the presence of a select audience.
 
 The mask thus differentiated itself from the stage play in that it was
 not given for the pecuniary behoof of a company of actors, but
 represented rather expenditure for the simple purpose of producing grand
 effects. To act in a mask was an honor, when common players were social
 outcasts. The mask was got up for the occasion, and was not intended to
 keep the boards and attract a paying public. When the august ceremonial
 was over, the poet had his manuscript, to increase the bulk of his works,
 and the composer had his score, to furnish airs that might be played and
 sung in drawing-rooms if they had the good fortune to be popular.
 
 Such was the origin of the poem which Milton, in all the editions
 published during his lifetime, entitled simply "A Maske presented at
 Ludlow Castle, 1634," but which editors since his day have agreed to name
 Comus.
 
 The occasion of the poem was the coming of the Earl of Bridgewater to
 Ludlow Castle, to enter upon his official residence there as Lord
 President of Wales. The person chiefly concerned in the scenic, musical,
 and histrionic preparations of the mask was Milton's esteemed friend, the
 most accomplished musical composer of the day, Henry Lawes. Lawes
 composed the music and arranged the stage business. He seems to have
 taken upon himself the part of the Attendant Spirit. Lawes knew to whom
 to apply for the all-important matter of the book, the words, or the
 poetry, of the piece, for he had learned to know Milton's qualifications
 as a mask-poet in the fragment which we have under the name _Arcades_.
 With good music even for commonplace lyric verse, and with sprightly
 declamation even of conventional dialogue, the thing, as we know from
 modern instances, might have been carried off by gorgeous costumes and
 shrewdly devised scenic effects. Most of the masks of the time fell at
 once into oblivion. But Lawes had secured for his poet John Milton; and
 the consequence thereof is that the Earl of Bridgewater is now chiefly
 heard of because at Ludlow Castle there was enacted, in the form of a
 mask written by Milton, a drama which is still read and reread by every
 English-speaking person who reads any serious poetry, though Ludlow
 Castle has long been a venerable ruin.
 
 For his plot, the poet feigned that the young children of the earl, two
 sons and a daughter, in coming to Ludlow, had to pass unattended through
 a forest, in which the boys became separated from the girl and she fell
 into the hands of the enchanter Comus. The Attendant Spirit appears to
 the youths with his magic herb, and with the further assistance of the
 water-nymph Sabrina, at last makes all right, and the children are
 restored to their parents in the midst of festive rejoicing.
 
 The poem is dramatic, because it is acted and spoken or sung in character
 by its persons. It is allegorical, because it inculcates a moral, and
 more is meant than meets the ear. In parts it is pastoral, both because
 the chief personage appears in the guise of a shepherd, and because its
 motive largely depends on the superstitions and traditions of simple,
 ignorant folk. In the longer speeches, where events are narrated with
 some fulness, it becomes epic. Lastly, in its songs, in the octosyllables
 of the magician, and in the adjuration and the thanking of Sabrina, it is
 lyric. With iambic pentameter as the basis of the dialogue, the poet
 varies his measures as Shakespeare does his, and with very similar ends
 in view.
 
 The name _Comus_ Milton found ready to his hand. As a common noun, the
 Greek word _comus_ signifies carousal,--wassail. In the later classic
 period it had become a proper name, standing for a personification of
 nocturnal revelry, and a god Comus was frequently depicted on vases and
 in mural paintings. Philostratus, in his _Ikones_,--or _Pictures_,--gives
 an interesting description of a painting of this god. See Encyclopaedia
 Britannica, article _Comus_. Ben Jonson, in his mask, _Pleasure
 Reconciled to Virtue_, played in 1619, presents a Comus as "the god of
 cheer, or the belly, riding in triumph, his head crowned with roses and
 other flowers, his hair curled." The character and the name were the
 common property of mask-writers.
 
 The great distinction of Comus is its beauty, maintained at height
 through a thousand lines of supremely perfect verse. Greatly dramatic it
 of course is not. It yields its meaning to the most cursory reading; it
 has no mystery. It is simply beautiful, with a sustained beauty elsewhere
 unparalleled.
 
 
 The following letter of Sir Henry Wotton to the Author deserves to be
 read both for its engaging style as a piece of English prose and for its
 exquisite characterization of Comus. Wotton was a versatile scholar,
 diplomat, and courtier, seventy years old at the time of this letter,
 with a reputation as a kindly and appreciative literary critic. He was
 now residing at Eton College, where he held the office of Provost.
 Milton, thirty years of age, the first edition of his Comus recently
 published anonymously, had good cause for elation over such a testimonial
 from such a source.
 
                           "From the College, this 13 of April, 1638.
 
 "Sir,
 
 "It was a special favour when you lately bestowed upon me here the first
 taste of your acquaintance, though no longer than to make me know that I
 wanted more time to value it and to enjoy it rightly; and, in truth, if I
 could then have imagined your farther stay in these parts, which I
 understood afterwards by Mr. H., I would have been bold, in our vulgar
 phrase, to mend my draught (for you left me with an extreme thirst), and
 to have begged your conversation again, jointly with your said learned
 friend, over a poor meal or two, that we might have banded together some
 good Authors of the ancient time; among which I observed you to have been
 familiar.
 
 "Since your going, you have charged me with new obligations, both for a
 very kind letter from you dated the 6th of this month, and for a dainty
 piece of entertainment which came therewith. Wherein I should much
 commend the tragical part, if the lyrical did not ravish me with a
 certain Doric delicacy in your Songs and Odes, whereunto I must plainly
 confess to have seen yet nothing parallel in our language: _Ipsa
 mollities_. But I must not omit to tell you that I now only owe you
 thanks for intimating unto me (how modestly soever) the true artificer.
 For the work itself I had viewed some good while before with singular
 delight; having received it from our common friend Mr. R., in the very
 close of the late R.'s Poems, printed at Oxford: whereunto it was added
 (as I now suppose) that the accessory might help out the principal,
 according to the art of Stationers, and to leave the reader _con la bocca
 dolce_.
 
 "Now, Sir, concerning your travels; wherein I may challenge a little more
 privilege of discourse with you. I suppose you will not blanch Paris in
 your way: therefore I have been bold to trouble you with a few lines to
 Mr. M. B., whom you shall easily find attending the young Lord S. as his
 governor; and you may surely receive from him good directions for the
 shaping of your farther journey into Italy where he did reside, by my
 choice, some time for the King, after mine own recess from Venice.
 
 "I should think that your best line will be through the whole length of
 France to Marseilles, and thence by sea to Genoa; whence the passage into
 Tuscany is as diurnal as a Gravesend barge. I hasten, as you do, to
 Florence or Siena, the rather to tell you a short story, from the
 interest you have given me in your safety.
 
 "At Siena I was tabled in the house of one Alberto Scipioni, an old Roman
 courtier in dangerous times; having been steward to the Duca di Pagliano,
 who with all his family were strangled, save this only man that escaped
 by foresight of the tempest. With him I had often much chat of those
 affairs, into which he took pleasure to look back from his native
 harbour; and at my departure toward Rome (which had been the centre of
 his experience), I had won his confidence enough to beg his advice how I
 might carry myself there without offence of others or of mine own
 conscience. '_Signor Arrigo mio_,' says he, '_I pensieri stretti ed il
 viso sciolto_ will go safely over the whole world.' Of which Delphian
 oracle (for so I have found it) your judgment doth need no commentary;
 and therefore, Sir, I will commit you, with it, to the best of all
 securities, God's dear love, remaining
 
 "Your friend, as much to command as any of longer date,
 
                                                      "Henry Wotton."
 
                               _Postscript._
 
 "Sir: I have expressly sent this my footboy to prevent your departure
 without some acknowledgment from me of the receipt of your obliging
 letter; having myself through some business, I know not how, neglected
 the ordinary conveyance. In any part where I shall understand you fixed,
 I shall be glad and diligent to entertain you with home-novelties, even
 for some fomentation of our friendship, too soon interrupted in the
 cradle."
 
 
 The Latin phrase, _ipsa mollities_, may be translated,--it is the very
 perfection of delicacy. The Italian words below mean,--My dear Henry,
 thoughts close, face open.
 
 
 1. Before the starry threshold of Jove's court. The attendant spirit not
 only announces himself as a dweller in heaven, but he specifies his
 particular function among the celestials: he is doorkeeper in the house
 of God.
 
 3. insphered. Compare Il Penseroso 88.
 
 7. Confined and pestered. _Pester_ has its primitive meaning, to clog or
 encumber. In this pinfold here. _Pinfold_ is probably not connected with
 the verb to pen, but is a shortened form of poundfold, and means,
 literally, an enclosure for stray cattle.
 
 10. After this mortal change: after this life on earth, which is subject
 to death.
 
 11. Amongst the enthroned gods. Make but two syllables of _enthroned_,
 and accent the first.
 
 The long sentence ending with line 11 is very loose in construction: the
 _and_ in line 7 is a cooerdinate conjunction, but does not connect
 cooerdinate elements.
 
 13. To lay their just hands on that golden key. Compare Lycidas 110.
 
 16. these pure ambrosial weeds. Ambrosial has its proper
 meaning,--pertaining to the immortals.
 
 20. by lot 'twixt high and nether Jove. Neptune drew lots with Jupiter
 and Pluto. To Jupiter fell the region of the upper air, to Pluto the
 lower world, and to Neptune the sea. The ancient poets sometimes spoke of
 Jupiter and Pluto as the upper and the lower Jove.
 
 25. By course commits to several government: in due order he assigns the
 islands to his tributaries, giving them an island apiece.
 
 27. But this Isle is so large that he has to divide it.
 
 29. Consider quarters to mean nothing more than divides. his blue-haired
 deities. The epithet is conventional, taken from the Greek poets, and
 probably has no special significance in this passage.
 
 31. A noble Peer. This connects the poem with actual persons and
 announces its occasion. The noble peer is the Earl of Bridgewater, and
 the event which is to be celebrated is his appointment to the
 Vice-royalty of Wales.
 
 33. The old and haughty nation are the Welsh.
 
 34. his fair offspring are two sons and a daughter, who are to play the
 parts of the Two Brothers and the Lady in the mask.
 
 37. the perplexed paths of this drear wood. Compare Par. Lost IV 176.
 
 41. sovran. See note on Hymn on the Nativity 60.
 
 45. in hall or bower. Hall and bower are conventionally coupled by the
 poets to signify the dwellings, respectively, of the gentry and the
 laboring classes.
 
 46. The transformation by Bacchus of the treacherous Tuscan sailors into
 dolphins belongs to the established myths of that god. But Milton
 exercises his right as a poet to add to the classic story whatever suits
 his purposes.
 
 48. After the Tuscan mariners transformed; a Latinism, meaning, after the
 transformation of the Tuscan mariners.
 
 50. fell: chanced to land.
 
 For the story of Circe, see the Odyssey X.
 
 58. Understand that no such distinct character as Comus belongs to the
 received mythology. Milton is a myth-maker.
 
 59. frolic is used as an adjective, as in L'Allegro 18.
 
 60. the Celtic and Iberian fields. The god traversed Gaul and Spain, on
 his way to Britain.
 
 61. ominous: abounding in mysterious signs of danger.
 
 65. His orient liquor. See line 673 of this poem.
 
 72. Note that only the countenance is changed.
 
 87. Well knows to still the wild winds. The poem moves throughout in the
 realm of romance. The swain Thyrsis is in his own character a
 practitioner of magic.
 
 88. nor of less faith. Thyrsis has just been described as a person of
 great skill.
 
 90. Likeliest: most likely to be.
 
 93. The transition from the stately mood of the Attendant Spirit's
 exordium to the noisy exhilaration of Comus is marked by appropriate
 changes in the verse. Comus speaks in a lyric strain, and his tone is
 exultant. When he comes to serious business, in line 145, he also employs
 blank-verse. The lyric lines, 93-144, rhyme in couplets, and vary in
 length, most of them having four accents, while some have five. The
 four-accent lines vary between seven and eight syllables, many of them
 dropping the initial light syllable, or anakrusis (Auftakt). These
 seven-syllable lines have a trochaic effect, but are to be scanned as
 iambic, the standard rhythm of the poem. The star that bids the shepherd
 fold. So Collins, in his ode To Evening,--"For when thy folding-star
 arising shows His paly circlet." See also Measure for Measure IV 2 218.
 
 96. doth allay: doth cool.
 
 97. The epithet steep is applied to the ocean, though really it is the
 course of the downward-moving sun that is steep.
 
 99-101. Milton uses pole, as the poets were wont to do, to mean the sky;
 and the passage means,--the sun, moving about the earth in his oblique
 course, now shines upon that part of the heavens which, when it is
 daylight to us, is in shadow.
 
 105. with rosy twine; with twined, or wreathed, roses.
 
 108-109. Advice ... Age ... Severity. For these abstract terms substitute
 their concretes.
 
 110. their grave saws. So Hamlet I 5 100, "all saws of books."
 
 116. in wavering morrice. See M. N. Dream II 1 98; All's Well II 2 25.
 
 118. the dapper elves. _Dapper_ is akin to the German _tapfer_, but with
 a very different connotation.
 
 124. Love: the Latin Amor, the Greek Eros, and our Cupid.
 
 129. Dark-veiled Cotytto was a Thracian goddess, whose worship was
 connected with licentious frivolity.
 
 133. makes one blot of all the air. Compare line 204 of this poem.
 
 135. thou ridest with Hecat'. _Hecate_ was a goddess of the lower world,
 mistress of witchcraft and the black arts.
 
 139. The nice Morn. _Nice_ is used in a disparaging sense, meaning over
 particular, minutely critical.
 
 140. From her cabined loop-hole peep. As if morn dwelt in a cabin and
 clandestinely peeped from a small window.
 
 141. descry must here mean reveal.
 
 144. In a light fantastic round. Recall L'Allegro 34. Comus and his crew
 are now dancing.
 
 147. shrouds: hiding-places. See the verb, line 316.
 
 151. my wily trains. _Trains_ are tricks, as in Macbeth IV 3 118.
 
 154. The air is spongy because it absorbs his magic dust.
 
 155. blear, usually applied to eyes, here refers to the effect of seeing
 objects with blear eyes.
 
 174. the loose unlettered hinds. The hinds are farm-servants, usually
 with an implication of rudeness and rusticity, and they are loose because
 unrestrained in speech and act by considerations of propriety.
 
 177. amiss: in wrong or unseemly ways.
 
 178. swilled is a very contemptuous word.
 
 179. wassailers. See Macbeth I 7 64. The word has an interesting
 etymology.
 
 188. the grey-hooded Even. Milton is fond of applying the epithet _gray_
 to the evening and the dawn. See Par. Lost IV 598, Lycidas 187.
 
 189. Like a sad votarist in palmer's weed. The votarist is one who has
 made a vow. In this case he goes on a pilgrimage, carrying a palm branch,
 and wearing the pilgrim garb.
 
 203. the tumult of loud mirth was rife. As to the meaning of _rife_
 compare Sam. Ag. 866 and Par. Lost I 650.
 
 204. Yet nought but single darkness do I find. The darkness is unbroken
 by any ray of light.
 
 210. may startle well, but not astound. _Astound_ is a strong word. See
 Par. Lost I 281.
 
 212. a strong siding champion: a champion who sides with the virtuous
 mind.
 
 222. her silver lining. Note Milton's avoidance of the possessive _its_.
 In all his verse he uses _its_ but three times.
 
 231. Within thy airy shell. The _airy shell_ in which Echo lives must be
 the "hollow round" of the atmosphere. Compare Hymn on the Nativity
 100-103.
 
 232. The Meander is the river of Asia Minor, famous for its windings.
 
 233-237. The mention of the nightingale and Narcissus in this passage
 suggests that it may be a reminiscence of the chorus in the Oedipus
 Coloneus,--"Of this land of goodly steeds, O stranger."
 
 237. Echo's passion for the beautiful Narcissus was not requited, and she
 pined away till she became a mere voice, which she could not utter till
 she was spoken to.
 
 241. Daughter of the Sphere: daughter of the air, which forms a hollow
 sphere about the earth.
 
 243. And give resounding grace to all Heaven's harmonies: by echoing back
 the music of the spheres.
 
 249-252. Even darkness smiled, as if acknowledging itself agreeably
 caressed by the strains of the lady's song.
 
 251. At every fall. _Fall_, as a musical term, is "a sinking down or
 lowering of the note or voice; cadence" (New Eng. Dict.).
 
 253. the Sirens dwelt on an island near Sicily, and by their sweet song
 allured mariners to destruction. See Odyssey XII.
 
 254. the Naiades were nymphs attendant on Circe and the Sirens.
 
 257. And lap it in Elysium. Compare L'Allegro 136.
 
 257-259. Scylla and Charybdis were dangerous rocks and whirlpools on
 opposite sides of the strait of Messina. They were personified as cruel
 sea-monsters.
 
 260. Yet they: Circe and the Sirens.
 
 267. Unless the goddess. Supply _thou art_.
 
 273. extreme shift: a pressing necessity of devising some expedient.
 
 289. Were they of manly prime or youthful bloom? Were they in the prime
 of adult manhood, or in the bloom of youth?
 
 277-290. These fourteen lines are an instance of "stichomythia, or
 conversation in alternate lines, which was always popular on the Attic
 stage. This scheme of versification is used chiefly in excited
 discussions, where the speakers are hurried along by the eagerness of
 their feelings."--Haigh, _The Tragic Drama of the Greeks_.
 
 292. An ox in traces would now be a rare sight.
 
 294. a green mantling vine. See Par. Lost IV 258.
 
 299. gay creatures of the element: creatures of the air,--supernatural
 beings.
 
 301. And play i' the plighted clouds. Probably the poet means the
 _plaited_, or _pleated_, clouds, conceiving the clouds as appearing
 folded together. I was awe-strook. See Hymn on the Nativity 95.
 
 316. Or shroud within these limits. _Shroud_ as a noun we saw above, line
 147.
 
 318. From her thatched pallet rouse. The lark builds on the ground,
 seeking a spot protected by overarching stems of grass or grain, which
 may be called a natural thatch; and if this protection is destroyed by
 mowers or reapers, the bird will at once take pains to build a roof or
 thatch over the nest, completely covering it, and for a door will make an
 opening on the side.
 
 325. where it first was named. The derivation of the words _courteous_
 and _courtesy_ from _court_ is obvious.
 
 327. Less warranted than this, or less secure. The lady says that she
 cannot be in any place less guaranteed than this against evil, and that
 she cannot anywhere be less free from anxiety. Her situation she
 conceives to be as bad as it can be.
 
 329. square my trial To my proportioned strength: make my trial
 proportionate to my strength.
 
 332. That wont'st to love. _Wont'st_, in the present tense, means, as we
 say, art wont.
 
 333. Stoop thy pale visage. Stoop is thus used, transitively, Richard II.
 III 1 19, "myself ... have stooped my neck."
 
 334. And disinherit Chaos, that reigns here. _Chaos_, "the formless void
 of primordial matter," is personified by Milton here and, much more
 conspicuously, in Par. Lost III.
 
 338. a rush-candle: a candle made with a rush for a wick,--the cheapest
 kind of light. from the wicker hole Of some clay habitation. Imagine a
 hut whose walls are made of wattled twigs plastered with clay. This clay
 when dry is apt to fall off in spots, leaving holes through which the
 light within can be seen from without. A wicker hole is a hole in the
 wicker-work, perhaps made intentionally, to serve as a window.
 
 341-342. The star of Arcady is the constellation of the Greater Bear, and
 the Tyrian Cynosure that of the Lesser Bear. Stars in these
 constellations served as guides to Greek and Tyrian mariners.
 
 345. Or sound of pastoral reed with oaten stops. Compare Collins's Ode to
 Evening,--_If aught of oaten stop, or pastoral song_. The shepherds of
 the Greek idylls made their musical pipes of reeds or oat-straws, and the
 oat has therefore been adopted by the pastoral poetry of all ages.
 
 349. innumerous boughs. Compare Par. Lost VII 455.
 
 358. Of savage hunger, or of savage heat: of hungry savages, or of
 lustful savages.
 
 361. grant they be so: grant that they are real evils.
 
 365. Make four syllables of delusion.
 
 366. I do not think my sister so to seek: I do not think she has her
 seeking, or learning, still to do: I do not think her so inexperienced.
 
 373-375. Is this practical doctrine?
 
 377. Make five syllables of Contemplation.
 
 380. Were all to-ruffled. The particle _to_--Anglo Saxon _to_, Modern
 German _zer_--has disappeared from Modern English. In Old English it was
 often used with the force of the Latin _dis_. So still in Chaucer,
 _to-bete, to-cleve, to-rende_, and many others.
 
 386. affects: likes, has an affection for.
 
 390. weeds, as in line 84.
 
 393. the fair Hesperian tree. See line 983.
 
 394. had need the guard. An elliptical expression. _Need_ is a noun, but
 is treated as if it were a verb.
 
 395. The dragon Ladon was not able to defend the apples of Hesperides
 against Hercules.
 
 401. will wink on Opportunity: will fail to see its chance.
 
 404. it recks me not. The verb is thus used, impersonally, also in
 Lycidas 122.
 
 407. The line has two hypermetric syllables, one after the third foot,
 and one at the end.
 
 413. squint suspicion. An epithet applicable only to a physical infirmity
 is applied to a mental act.
 
 422. quivered: bearing a quiver.
 
 423. unharbored: furnishing no shelter.
 
 424. Infamous hills. Accent _infamous_ as we do now and as Milton does
 elsewhere. Verses thus beginning with trochees are common.
 
 429. Look up the origin of the word grots.
 
 430. unblenched: unstartled.
 
 434. Blue meagre hag. The _hag_ has the livid hue of hunger.
 
 436. swart faery of the mine. A malignant demon dwelling under ground,--a
 gnome.
 
 441. the huntress Dian. The powerful goddess Diana, or Artemis, twin
 sister of Apollo, was figured bearing a bow and arrows.
 
 448. wise Minerva. Minerva, or Pallas Athene, is usually represented as
 wearing on her breast the aegis with a border of snakes and the Gorgon's
 head in the centre.
 
 460-462. Note the different modes in begin and turns, where we should
 look for similar constructions.
 
 487. The ellipsis of _we had_ is readily supplied. Draw and stand are
 infinitives.
 
 494. Thyrsis, a stock shepherd-name. The spirit henceforth appears to his
 fellow-actors in the mask as the shepherd with whom they are familiar.
 
 495-512. These lines express sudden emotion, and approximate lyric in
 character. Hence the rhyme.
 
 508. How chance she is not. Supply the ellipsis.
 
 517. Chimeras is here used vaguely in the plural to mean dangerous
 monsters.
 
 526. With many murmurs mixed. The enchanter spoke or sang forms of
 incantation over his mixing and brewing. Recall Macbeth.
 
 529. The word mintage has an interesting history. The human countenance
 is conceived as an imprint, like the characters on a coin.
 
 530. Charactered in the face. The _noun character_ Milton pronounces with
 accent on the first syllable, as does Shakespeare. Probably he also
 agrees with Shakespeare in pronouncing the _verb_ with the accent on the
 second syllable, as this verse suggests.
 
 531. crofts. The word is still in use in England, meaning a small farm.
 
 540. by then the chewing flocks: by the time when, etc.
 
 547. To meditate my rural minstrelsy: to play on my shepherd-pipe and to
 sing. To meditate the muse is a standard expression of the pastoral
 poets. See Lycidas 66.
 
 552. What do we know was the cause of this unusual stop of sudden
 silence?
 
 553-554. The cessation of the din gave to the steeds of sleep, and to
 people who were trying to sleep, relief from annoyance.
 
 557-560. Be sure you understand the figure.
 
 560. Still, in its very frequent sense, _always_.
 
 562. Under the ribs of Death: in a skeleton.
 
 575. such two; describing them.
 
 586. Shall be unsaid for me: it is not necessary for me to make any
 change in my opinion to make it harmonize with this new aspect of
 affairs.
 
 595. Gathered like scum, and settled to itself. The two metaphors thus
 combined make a rather strange mixture.
 
 598. The pillared firmament. By the _firmament_ is usually understood the
 sphere of the fixed stars. How to introduce the conception of _pillars_
 is not clear.
 
 604. Acheron. See Par. Lost II 578.
 
 605. The Harpies were monstrous birds with women's heads. Their doings
 are described AEneid III. The Hydra was a monster serpent with a hundred
 heads.
 
 607. his purchase: his acquisition.
 
 610. I love thy courage yet, though thou hast spoken most unwisely.
 
 611. can do thee little stead: can avail thee but little.
 
 617. utmost shifts: most carefully devised precautions.
 
 620. Of small regard to see to: of very insignificant appearance.
 
 621. A virtuous plant is a plant which has virtues, i.e. powers or
 qualities.
 
 624. Which when I did. The modern English has lost the power of beginning
 a sentence thus, with two relatives.
 
 626. scrip, a word in no way connected with _script_.
 
 627. And show me simples of a thousand names. Compare Hamlet IV 7 145,
 "no cataplasm so rare, Collected from all simples that have virtue Under
 the moon."
 
 634. Unknown and like esteemed: neither known nor esteemed.
 
 635. Treads on it daily with his clouted shoon. See 2 Henry VI. IV 2
 195,--"Spare none but such as go in clouted shoon," and Hamlet IV 5
 26,--"By his cockle hat and staff, And his sandal shoon."
 
 636. The story of Hermes' giving Ulysses the Moly read in Odyssey X.
 "Therewith the slayer of Argos gave me the plant that he had plucked from
 the ground, and he showed me the growth thereof. It was black at the
 root, but the flower was like to milk. Moly the gods call it, but it is
 hard for mortal men to dig; howbeit with the gods all things are
 possible."
 
 638. He called it Haemony. _Haemony_ is a nonce-word of Milton's own
 coining. He may have derived it from a Greek word meaning _skilful_ or
 from another meaning _blood_.
 
 640. mildew blast, or damp. _Blast_ is defined by Dr. Murray: "A sudden
 infection destructive to vegetable or animal life (formerly attributed to
 the blowing or breath of some malignant power, foul air, etc.)"; and
 _damp_: "An exhalation, a vapor or gas, of a noxious kind."
 
 641. Or ghastly Furies' apparition: or the appearance of terrifying
 ghosts.
 
 646. Entered the very lime-twigs of his spells. _Lime_ was a viscous
 substance, spread upon the twigs of trees and bushes to entangle the feet
 of birds. The figure is frequent in Shakespeare. See Hamlet III 3 68, "O
 limed soul, that, struggling to be free, Art more engaged."
 
 657. apace: quickly.
 
 In the stage directions, goes about means, makes a movement.
 
 661. as Daphne was, Root-bound, that fled Apollo. The great god, Apollo,
 pursuing the nymph Daphne, Diana saved her by transforming her into a
 laurel tree.
 
 672. this cordial julep. _Julep_ is a word of Persian origin, meaning
 rose-water. Note the poet's skill in culling words of delicious sound.
 
 675. Not that Nepenthes which the wife of Thone In Egypt gave to
 Jove-born Helena. See Odyssey IV: "Then Helen, daughter of Zeus, cast a
 drug into the wine whereof they drank, a drug to lull all pain and anger,
 and bring forgetfulness of every sorrow.... Medicines of such virtue and
 so helpful had the daughter of Zeus, which Polydamna, the wife of Thon,
 had given her, a woman of Egypt."
 
 685. the unexempt condition: the condition from which no one is exempt.
 
 695. These oughly-headed monsters. Perhaps by this peculiar spelling,
 _oughly_, Milton meant to add to the word _ugly_ a higher degree of
 ugliness.
 
 698. With vizored falsehood: falsehood with its vizor, or face-piece,
 down, to conceal its identity.
 
 700. With liquorish baits. _Liquorish_, now usually spelled _lickerish_,
 is allied to _lecherous_, and has no connection with _liquor_ or with
 _liquorice_.
 
 703. The goodness of the gift lies in the intention of the giver.
 
 707. those budge doctors of the stoic fur. _Budge_ is defined by Dr.
 Murray: "Solemn in demeanor, important-looking, pompous, stiff, formal."
 Cowper, in his poem Conversation, has the couplet: "The solemn fop;
 significant and budge; A fool with judges, amongst fools a judge." _A
 doctor of the Stoic fur_ is a teacher of the Stoic philosophy, who wears
 a gown of the fur to which his degree of doctor entitles him.
 
 708. fetch their precepts from the Cynic tub: teach doctrines learned
 from the Cynic Diogenes, who is reputed to have lived in a tub.
 
 719. hutched: stowed or laid away, as in a chest or hutch.
 
 721. pulse; conceived as the simplest kind of food.
 
 722. frieze; to be pronounced _freeze_.
 
 724. and yet: and what is yet more.
 
 728. Who refers back to Nature.
 
 734. they below: the people of the lower world.
 
 737. coy. See Lycidas 18. cozened. See Merchant of Venice II 9 38.
 
 744. It refers back to beauty.
 
 748. homely; in the modern disparaging sense.
 
 750. grain: color.
 
 751. To ply, or make, a sampler, as a proof of her skill with the needle,
 was, until very modern times, the duty of every young girl. The old
 samplers are now precious heirlooms in families. to tease the huswife's
 wool. To _tease wool_, or to card it, was to use the teasle, or a card,
 to prepare it for spinning. Carding and spinning were common duties of
 the huswife and her daughters.
 
 753. In what respect can tresses be said to be like the morn?
 
 760. when vice can bolt her arguments. There are two verbs, spelled
 alike, _bolt_. One means to sift, and is used often of arguments and
 reasonings. To bolt arguments is to construct them with logical care and
 precision. The other _bolt_ means to shoot forth or blurt out. We may
 take our choice of the two words.
 
 773. How is the line to be scanned?
 
 780. Or have I said enow? In the edition of Comus published in 1645 this
 passage reads, _Or have I said enough?_ In the edition of 1673, the
 latest that he revised, Milton changed _enough_ to _enow_. Grammatically,
 _enough_ is the better form, as the Elizabethan usage favored _enough_
 for the form of the adjective with singular nouns and for the adverb, and
 _enow_ as the adjective with plurals. It would seem that the poet must
 have had some motive of euphony for the change he made.
 
 788. thou art worthy that thou shouldst not know. A Latinism: _dignus es
 qui non cognoscas_.
 
 793. the uncontrolled worth Of this pure cause: the invincible power
 inherent in the cause by virtue of its nature.
 
 804. Speaks thunder and the chains of Erebus To some of Saturn's crew:
 pronounces sentence upon his foes, condemning them to the punishments
 named. _Erebus_--Darkness--is one of the numerous names of the lower
 world, the kingdom of Pluto.
 
 808. the canon laws: the fundamental laws, or the Constitution. Canon
 law, generally speaking, is ecclesiastical law, or the law governing the
 church.
 
 817. And backward mutters of dissevering power. The "many murmurs" with
 which his incantations have been mixed must be spoken backward in order
 to undo their effect. This backward repetition of the charm has the power
 to break the spell which the charm has wrought.
 
 822. Meliboeus is yet another of the stock names of pastoral poetry.
 
 823. The soothest shepherd. The ancient adjective _sooth_ means
 essentially nothing more than _true_.
 
 826. Sabrina is her name. The story of Sabrina is told by Geoffrey of
 Monmouth, whose history is included in the volume of Bohn's Antiquarian
 Library, entitled _Six Old English Chronicles_. The book is easily
 accessible.
 
 827. Whilom is derived from the dative plural _hwilum_ of the Old English
 noun _hwil_, and originally meant _at times_.
 
 831. What does Sabrina do in this line?
 
 835. aged Nereus was one of the numerous Greek deities of the water. He
 and his wife Doris had fifty or a hundred daughters, who are called
 Nereids.
 
 838. In nectared lavers strewed with asphodel. The _nectar_ of the gods,
 which we usually think of as their drink, was also applied to other
 purposes, as when Thetis anoints with it the body of Patroclus, to
 prevent decay. _Asphodel_ is a flower in our actual flora; but in the
 poets Asphodel is an immortal flower growing abundantly in the meadows of
 Elysium.
 
 840. ambrosial here means, _conferring immortality_.
 
 845. Helping all urchin blasts; _i.e._ helping the victims of the blasts
 against their baleful influence. See note on line 640. See Merry Wives of
 Windsor IV 4 49.
 
 851. The word daffodil is directly derived from asphodel, with a _d_
 unaccountably prefixed. The English daffodil is the narcissus.
 
 858. adjuring: charging or entreating solemnly and earnestly, as if under
 oath.
 
 868. Oceanus is the personified Ocean, a broad, flowing stream encircling
 the earth.
 
 869. Earth-shaking is a Homeric epithet of Neptune. The mace of Neptune
 must be his trident.
 
 870. Tethys is wife of Oceanus and mother of the Oceanids. She reared the
 great goddess Juno, wife of Jupiter. Her pace is suitable to her dignity.
 
 871. hoary Nereus. See note on line 835.
 
 872. the Carpathian wizard's hook. Proteus, son of Oceanus and Tethys,
 herded the sea-calves of Neptune on the island of Carpathus. As a
 herdsman he bore a crook, or _hook_. He had the gift of prophecy, and so
 is called a _wizard_.
 
 873. Scaly Triton's winding shell. _Triton_ was herald of Neptune and so
 carried a shell, which he was wont to _wind_ as a horn. His body was in
 part covered with scales like those of a fish.
 
 874. The soothsaying Glaucus was a prophet, and gave oracles at Delos. He
 is represented as a man whose hair and beard are dripping with water,
 with bristly eyebrows, his breast covered with sea-weeds, and the lower
 part of his body ending in the tail of a fish.
 
     875. By Leucothea's lovely hands,
         And her son that rules the strands.
 
 Ino, after she had slain herself and her son Melicertes, by leaping with
 him into the sea, became a protecting deity of mariners under the name
 Leucothea, or the white goddess. So she came to the aid of Ulysses when
 he was passing on his raft from Calypso's isle to Phaeacia. She there
 appears "with fair ankles," and when she receives back from him her veil,
 which she had lent him, she does it with "_lovely hands_."
 
 Melicertes becomes a protecting deity of shores, under the name Palaemon.
 The Romans identified him with their god Portunus.
 
 877. By Thetis' tinsel-slippered feet. Thetis was the wife of Peleus, and
 the mother of Achilles. In Homer she has the epithet _silver-footed_.
 
 878. the songs of Sirens. See note on line 253.
 
 879. By dead Parthenope's dear tomb. Parthenope was one of the Sirens. At
 Naples her tomb was shown.
 
 880. And fair Ligea's golden comb. Ligea was probably also a siren. In
 Virgil, Georgics IV 336, we find a nymph of this name, spinning wool with
 other nymphs, "their bright locks floating over their snowy necks." The
 name Ligea means shrill-voiced.
 
 887. In the reading make in an adverb.
 
 892. My sliding chariot stays. Compare this use of _stay_ with that found
 in lines 134, 577, 820.
 
 893. the azurn sheen. With _azurn_ compare _cedarn_, line 990.
 
 908-909. Be careful what inflection you give these lines in the reading.
 
 913. of precious cure: of precious power to cure.
 
 921. To wait in Amphitrite's bower. _Amphitrite_ was a daughter of
 Oceanus and Tethys. She was goddess of the sea, had the care of its
 creatures, and could stir up the waves in storm.
 
 923. Sprung of old Anchises' line. According to Geoffrey of Monmouth,
 Brutus the Trojan was the grandson of AEneas and founder of London.
 Anchises, in the Homeric story, is the father of AEneas. This fable plays
 an important part in the ancient British myth.
 
 924. thy brimmed waves. A river is happiest when full to its brim.
 
 930. Of what parts of speech are torrent and flood?
 
 933. It is very curious that our word beryl and the German _Brille_ come
 directly from the same source.
 
 937. And yet this river is the English Severn!
 
 957. Note the impressive effect of the five-foot line ending the scene.
 
 The shepherds have their dance in rustic fashion. The words describing
 this dance are the familiar peasant words, jig, duck, nod. The playful
 tone in which the spirit calls upon the swains to give place to their
 betters is charming.
 
 964. With the mincing Dryades. "The _Dryades_ were nymphs of woods and
 trees, dwelling in groves, ravines, and wooded valleys, and were fond of
 making merry with Apollo, Mercury, and Pan."
 
 980. I suck the liquid air: I inhale the upper air,--the _aether_
 _liquidus_ of the poets. So Ariel, Tempest V 1 102, "I drink the air
 before me."
 
 981. the gardens fair Of Hesperus and his daughters three. The number of
 the Hesperides and their parentage are differently given in various
 legends. The story of their garden in some mysterious place in the far
 west, where they guarded the tree that bore the golden apples, assisted
 by the dragon Ladon, is one of the best known in the classic mythology.
 
 984. Along the crisped shades and bowers. Milton applies _crisped_ to
 brooks, Par. Lost IV 237. Herrick has,--"the crisped yew," and the
 American Thoreau,--"A million crisped waves."
 
 985. spruce. A very interesting account of the origin of this word is
 given by Skeat in his Etymological Dictionary.
 
 986. The Graces and the rosy-bosomed Hours. See note on L'Allegro 15.
 "The _Graces_ were guardians of the vernal sweetness and beauty of
 nature, friends and protectors of everything graceful and beautiful." The
 _Hours_ were goddesses of the seasons, daughters of Zeus and Themis. They
 were the door-keepers of Olympus, whose cloud-gate they open and shut:
 thus they preside over the weather.
 
 990. About the cedarn alleys: about the pathways through cedar groves.
 Coleridge, in Kubla Khan, has the line, "Down the green hill athwart a
 cedarn cover"; and Tennyson, Geraint and Enid, the line,--"And moving
 toward a cedarn cabinet." So also William Barnes, in his Rural Poems,
 uses the expression, "stonen jugs."
 
 992. Iris is the messenger of the gods: her path is the rainbow.
 
 993. Dr. Murray gives other instances of blow as a transitive verb.
 
 999. Adonis was a young shepherd, the special favorite of Venus. His
 death was caused by a wild boar. The story is told in various forms.
 Observe that Milton makes him wax well of his deep wound.
 
 1002. the Assyrian queen. The worship of Aphrodite (Venus) was brought
 into Greece from Assyria.
 
 1005. Holds his dear Psyche. Psyche--the personification of the human
 soul--was a mortal maiden, beloved of Cupid. Venus, in her jealousy of
 Psyche, compelled her to pass through a long series of hardships and
 toils. Cupid at last succeeded in reconciling his mother and his beloved,
 and in having _Psyche_ advanced to the dignity of an immortal.
 
 1015. Where the bowed welkin slow doth bend: where the curvature of the
 vault of the sky seems less than higher up toward the zenith.
 
 1021. the sphery chime. See notes, Hymn on the Nativity 48 and 125.
 
 
 
 
                                 LYCIDAS.
 
 
 Lycidas is Milton's contribution to a volume of elegiac verses, in Greek,
 Latin, and English, composed by many college friends of Edward King, who
 was drowned in the wreck of the vessel in which he was crossing the Irish
 Channel.
 
 In its main intention, Lycidas is an elegy, because it professes to mourn
 one who is dead and extols his virtues. In its form it is almost wholly
 pastoral, because it feigns an environment of shepherds, allegorizing
 college life as the life of men tending flocks, and the occupations of
 earnest students as the careless diversions of rustic swains.
 
 Four times the pastoral note is rudely interrupted by the intervention of
 majestic beings who speak in awful tones from another world, and whose
 voices instantly check all familiar rustic speech, compelling it to wait
 till they have announced their messages from above. The supernal powers
 who thus descend to take their parts in the office of mourning are
 Phoebus, Apollo, Hippotades, god of the winds, Camus, god of the river
 Cam, and St. Peter. This mingling of classic, Hebrew, and Christian
 conceptions is a marked characteristic of all Milton's poetry.
 
 Thus Lycidas is neither wholly elegiac nor wholly pastoral. From the lips
 of St. Peter, typifying the church, comes a speech of violent
 denunciation, in the true later Miltonic manner. In strange contrast to
 this grim invective is the famous flower-passage, the sweetest and
 loveliest thing of its kind in our literature.
 
 
 1-5. To pluck once more the berries of the evergreens, or to gather
 laurels,--is to make a new venture as a poet,--to compose a poem. The
 berries are harsh and crude,--he shatters their leaves before the
 mellowing year, either because he is to mourn the death of a young man,
 or because he feels in himself a lack of "inward ripeness" to treat his
 theme worthily,--perhaps for both reasons. He shatters the leaves with
 forced fingers rude, in the sense that his subject is not of his own
 choosing.
 
 6-7. A sad duty is imposed upon him, forbidding further delay on any
 personal grounds.
 
 8. Lycidas is one of the stock names of pastoral poetry. The poem, though
 most serious in its main motive and intention, is to have a pastoral
 coloring throughout. Note the impressive repetitions, dead, dead, and the
 recurrences of the name Lycidas in the next two lines.
 
 11. he knew Himself to sing and build the lofty rhyme. Edward King had,
 in accordance with the college custom of his time, written verses,
 apparently all in Latin. Of these verses Masson, in his life of Milton,
 gives specimens. They seem to be commonplace.
 
 13. and welter to the parching wind. See Par. Lost II 594, I 78.
 
 15. Sisters of the sacred well. Ancient tradition connects the origin of
 the Muses with Pieria, a district of Macedonia at the foot of Olympus.
 But the springs with which we associate the Muses are Aganippe and
 Hippocrene on Mount Helicon.
 
 19. So may some gentle muse. A peculiar use of the word _muse_ as
 masculine, and meaning _poet_.
 
 23-31. We pursued the same studies, at the same college, and we studied
 from early morning sometimes till after midnight. The metaphors are all
 pastoral.
 
 32-36. We wrote merry verse, bringing in the college jollities, in wanton
 student-fashion, and the good-natured old don who was our tutor affected
 to be pleased with our work.
 
 34. Rough Satyrs danced, and Fauns with cloven heel. The _Satyrs_,
 represented as having human forms, with small goat's horns and a small
 tail, had for their occupation to play on the flute for their master,
 Bacchus, or to pour his wine. The _Fauns_ were sylvan deities, attendants
 of Pan, and are represented, like their master, with the ears, horns, and
 legs of a goat.
 
 37-49. Nature herself sympathizes with men, and mourns thy loss.
 
 50. Nymphs: deities of the forests and streams.
 
 52. on the steep Where your old bards, the famous Druids, lie. The
 shipwreck in which King was lost took place off the coast of Wales. Any
 one of the Welsh mountains will serve to make good this allusion.
 
 54. Nor on the shaggy top of Mona high. _Mona_ is the ancient and
 poetical name of the island of Anglesea.
 
 55. Nor yet where Deva spreads her wizard stream. The Dee (Deva) below
 Chester expands into a broad estuary. In his lines spoken At a Vacation
 Exercise, Milton, characterizing many rivers, mentions the "ancient
 hallowed Dee." The country about the Dee had been specially famous as the
 seat of the old Druidical religion. In the eleventh Song of his
 Polyolbion, Drayton eulogizes the medicinal virtues of the salt springs
 in the valley of the river Weever, which attract Thetis and the
 Nereids:--
 
         And Amphitrite oft this Wizard River led
         Into her secret walks (the depths profound and dread)
         Of him (supposed so wise) the hid events to know
         Of things that were to come, as things done long ago.
         In which he had been proved most exquisite to be;
         And bare his fame so far, that oft twixt him and Dee,
         Much strife there hath arose in their prophetic skill.
 
 56-63. Even the Muse Calliope could do nothing for her son Orpheus, whom
 the Thracian women tore to pieces under the excitement of their
 Bacchanalian orgies. The gory visage floated down the Hebrus and through
 the AEgean Sea to the island of Lesbos.
 
 64. what boots it: of what use is it?
 
 64-66. What good are we going to derive from this unremitting devotion to
 study?
 
 67-69. Would it not be better to abandon ourselves to social enjoyment,
 and to lives of frivolous trifling? Amaryllis and Neaera are stock names
 of shepherdesses.
 
 70-72. Understand clear, as applied to spirit, to mean "pure, guileless,
 unsophisticated." Sir Henry Wotton, in his Panegyric to King Charles,
 says of King James I.,--"I will not deny his appetite of glory, which
 generous minds do ever latest part from." Love of fame, according to the
 poet, is the motive that prompts the scholar to live as an ascetic and to
 persevere in toilsome labor. This love of fame is an infirmity, but not a
 debasing one: it leaves the mind noble. Remember, however, that the
 author of the Imitation of Christ prayed, _Da mihi nesciri_.
 
 75. the blind Fury with the abhorred shears. Milton here seems to ascribe
 to the Furies (Erinyes) the function belonging to the Fates (Parcae,
 Moirae). The three Fates were Klotho, the Spinner; Lachesis, the Assigner
 of lots; and Atropos, the Unchanging. It was the duty of Atropos to cut
 the thread of life at the appointed time.
 
 A querulous thought comes to the poet's mind. Our lives are obscure and
 laborious, sustained only by the hope of future fame; but before we
 attain our reward, comes death, and our ambition is brought to naught.
 
 76-77. But not the praise, Phoebus replied, and touched my trembling
 ears. The Fury cannot destroy the praise, which necessarily belongs to
 doing well. Praise here means the essential praise, which naturally
 inheres in excellence, and not the being talked about by men.
 
 The speaker is now Phoebus, the august god Apollo, the pure one, who
 protects law and order, and promotes whatever is good and beautiful; who
 reveals the will of Zeus, and presides over prophecy.
 
 Phoebus has now an admonition to give and he touches the poet's ears; as
 in Virgil, Eclogue IV 3,--_Cynthius aurem vellit et admonuit_, "The
 Cynthian twitched my ear and warned me."
 
 79. in the glistering foil Set off. See Shakespeare, Richard III. V 3
 250,--"A base foul stone, made precious by the foil of England's chair."
 
 85-86. O fountain Arethuse, and thou honored flood, Smooth-sliding
 Mincius. Arethusa was a fresh-water fountain at Syracuse in Sicily, and
 the Mincius is a river in north Italy, on which is situated Mantua, the
 birthplace of the poet Virgil. The great pastoral poet Theocritus is said
 to have been born at Syracuse. Thus Arethusa and the Mincius typify the
 pastoral tone in which Milton conceives and constructs his poem. But the
 intervention of the great god Apollo has frighted the bucolic muses, to
 whom therefore the poet explains it, line 87.
 
 88. Now I am on good terms again with the deities of lower rank. Oat is a
 common designation of the shepherd's pipe, or syrinx.
 
 89-90. Neptune, through his herald, Triton, pleads his freedom from all
 complicity in the drowning of Lycidas. Triton sends to AEolus, god of the
 winds, requesting him to cross-question all his subjects as to what they
 were doing on the day of the wreck.
 
 95-99. The winds prove their innocence, and AEolus himself comes to report
 to Triton that at the time of the disaster they were all at home and the
 air was perfectly calm. Even Panope and all her sisters were out playing
 on the tranquil water.
 
 96. sage Hippotades. AEolus was the son of Hippotes. See all about him in
 Odyssey, book X. Read also Ruskin, Queen of the Air, section 19.
 
 99. Panope was a Nereid, one of the numerous daughters of Nereus.
 
 103. Now comes another grand personage to make inquiry about the death of
 Lycidas. Camus, the deity of the river Cam, stands for the University of
 Cambridge.
 
 104. His mantle hairy, and his bonnet sedge. The river god is represented
 as wearing a mantle made of water-grasses and reeds.
 
 105-106. These lines refer to certain markings on the water-plants of the
 Cam, said to be correctly described here by the poet. The dimness of the
 figures may suggest the great age of the university, and the tokens of
 woe belong to the present occasion.
 
 106. that sanguine flower inscribed with woe. This is the hyacinth, the
 flower that sprang up on the spot where the youth Hyacinthus had been
 accidentally slain by Apollo. The petals of the hyacinth are said to be
 marked with the Greek letters AI AI, which form an interjection
 expressing grief.
 
 107. Lycidas was one of those collegians whose scholarship, character,
 and piety promise to make them the pride of their Alma Mater.
 
 109. The Pilot of the Galilean Lake. See Matthew XIV.
 
 110. Two massy keys he bore of metals twain. See Matthew XVI 19. See also
 Comus 13 and Par. Lost III 485. The idea of _two_ keys, one of gold and
 one of iron, is not in the Bible.
 
 112. He shook his mitred locks. St. Peter wears the mitre as bishop.
 
 113-131. St. Peter makes but little reference to Lycidas, and his words
 add almost nothing to the elegiac character of the poem. His speech is
 one of stern and bitter satire. The second period of Milton's life, which
 is to be given up to intense and uncompromising partisanship in religion
 and politics, foreshadows itself in these lines.
 
 114. Enow is here used in its proper plural sense. See note on Comus 780.
 
 115. climb into the fold. See John X 1. The metaphor of sheep and
 herdsmen is continued throughout the speech.
 
 119. Blind mouths! As the relative pronoun beginning the next clause
 refers to this exclamation, mouths must be taken as a bold metaphor
 meaning men who are all mouth, or are supremely greedy and selfish.
 Moreover, they are blind.
 
 122. What recks it them? See note on Comus 404. They are sped: they have
 succeeded in their purpose. See Antony and Cleopatra II 3 35. Note also
 the phrase of greeting, _bid God speed_, as in 2 John I 10, 11, King
 James version.
 
 123. their lean and flashy songs: their sermons.
 
 Evidently Milton can cull words of extreme disparagement and vilification
 as well as words of unapproachable poetic beauty.
 
 125-127. The congregations are not edified. The miserable preaching they
 listen to fails to keep them sound in doctrine. They grow lax in their
 faith, and heretical opinions become fashionable.
 
 128. the grim wolf with privy paw is undoubtedly the Roman church.
 
 130-131. These lines evidently denounce some terrible retribution that is
 sure ere long to overtake the corrupt clergy described in the preceding
 passage. The two-handed engine at the door, that stands ready to smite
 once and smite no more, has never been definitely explained. We naturally
 think of the headsman's axe, which, however, does not become applicable
 till the execution of Archbishop Laud, an event not to take place till
 eight years after the composition of the poem. It has been suggested that
 Milton had in mind the two houses of Parliament, or the Parliament and
 the Army, as the agency through which reform was to be effected. We must
 remember that Milton in 1637 could not foresee the Civil War. He may have
 meant to combine certain scriptural expressions into a mysteriously
 suggestive and oracular prediction, without having in view any single and
 definite possibility.
 
 132. Return, Alpheus. The Alpheus was a river of the Peloponnesus, said
 to sink underground and to flow beneath the sea to Ortygia, near
 Syracuse, where it attempted to mingle its waters with those of the
 fountain Arethusa. See note on lines 85, 86. See also Shelley's poem,
 Arethusa.
 
 The pastoral tone of lightness and simplicity could not be maintained
 while St. Peter spoke. But now the Sicilian Muse returns, all the more
 lovely for the contrast with the stern malediction that has gone before.
 
 134-151. Milton is fond of thus collecting names of persons, places, and
 things, choosing them as well for their effect on the ear as for their
 significance. The botany of this passage is of little consequence: it
 matters not whether all these flowers could, or could not, be collected
 at the same season, or whether they could be found at the time of the
 year when Lycidas died. The passage offers a picture of exquisite beauty
 to the eye, and to the ear a strain of perfect melody.
 
 136. where the mild whispers use. The verb _use_, in this intransitive
 sense, with only adverbial complement, and meaning _dwell_, is now
 obsolete.
 
 138. the swart star: the star that makes _swart_, or _swarthy; i.e._ the
 sun.
 
 139. enamelled eyes are the flowers generally, which are to be specified.
 Scattered over the turf, the flowers seem to be looking upward, like
 eyes.
 
 142. rathe is the adjective whose comparative is our _rather_.
 
 149. amaranthus, by its etymology, means _unfading_.
 
 150. Daffadil is derived from _asphodel_, with a curious, and altogether
 unusual, prefixed _d_.
 
 153. dally with false surmise. King's body was not found. There was no
 actual strewing of the laureate hearse with flowers.
 
 156. the stormy Hebrides: islands off the northwest coast of Scotland.
 
 160. Sleep'st by the fable of Bellerus old. The fable of Bellerus is the
 fabled Bellerus, or Bellerus of the fable. He was a mythical giant of
 Cornwall in old British legend. Bellerium was the name given to Land's
 End, where he was supposed to live.
 
 161. the great Vision of the guarded mount. St. Michael's Mount is a
 pyramidal rock in Mounts Bay on the coast of Cornwall. This was guarded
 by the angel, St. Michael, whose gaze was directed seaward, toward
 Namancos and Bayona, in northwestern Spain. In some unknown place between
 these widely sundered limits, the body of Lycidas is tossed.
 
 170. with new-spangled ore. _Ore_, from its original meaning of metal in
 the natural state, comes to signify metallic lustre generally. See Comus
 719, 933.
 
 173. See Matthew XIV 25.
 
 175. Compare Comus 838.
 
 176. the unexpressive nuptial song. See Hymn on the Nativity 116. See
 also Revelation XIX 7-9.
 
 181. And wipe the tears forever from his eyes. See Revelation XXI 4.
 
 183. Henceforth thou art the genius of the shore. This is the same
 promotion that was accorded to Melicertes, son of Ino, who on his death
 became the genius of the shore under the name of Palaemon.
 
 186. uncouth; a self-depreciating expression meaning _unknown_ or
 _obscure_.
 
 187. Milton applies the epithet gray both to evening and to morning.
 
 188. various quills are the tubes of the shepherd pipe.
 
 189. Doric means simply _pastoral_, because the idylls of the first
 pastoral poets were written in the Doric dialect of Greek.
 
 190. had stretched out all the hills: had caused the shadows of the hills
 to prolong themselves eastward on the plain.
 
 The poet seems to feign that he spent a day in the composition of
 Lycidas.
 
 
 
 
                                 SONNETS.
 
 
 Of poems in strict sonnet form, that is, containing neither more nor less
 than fourteen decasyllable iambic lines, interlocked by some scheme of
 symmetrical rhyme, not in couplets, Milton left twenty-three, of which
 five are in Italian. Of the three sonnets in English omitted from this
 edition, two have reference to the violent controversy occasioned by
 Milton's publications in advocacy of greater freedom of divorce, and are
 rough and polemic in style; the third is omitted on account of its
 unimportance and lack of distinction.
 
 In their dates the twenty-three sonnets range from the poet's
 twenty-third to his fiftieth year. They are the only form of verse in
 which he indulges during that middle period of his life which was
 abandoned to political partisanship on the side of the Parliament in the
 Civil War, and to the service of the government during the Commonwealth
 and the Protectorate. If, as is now widely believed, Shakespeare's
 sonnets are artificial and tell us little or nothing about their author,
 those of Milton are purely natural and subjective and tell us nothing
 else but what their writer was thinking and feeling. Their themes are his
 veritable moods and passions. The mood is now friendly, amiable, and
 serene, now bitter, strenuous, indignant, vindictive.
 
 Wordsworth, in his sonnet, _Scorn not the Sonnet_, thus refers to
 Milton's sparing use of this poetic form:--
 
                             and when a damp
         Fell round the path of Milton, in his hand
         The Thing became a trumpet; whence he blew
         Soul-animating strains,--alas too few.
 
 The Shakespearean sonnet consists of three quatrains followed by a
 couplet,--the usual English form up to the seventeenth century. Milton
 adopted the Italian, or Petrarchian model, which has continued to be the
 standard sonnet form in our modern poetry. In the Miltonic, or Italian,
 sonnet a group of eight lines, linked by two rhymes each occurring four
 times, is followed by a group of six lines linked by three rhymes each
 occurring twice. The octave and the sextet are severed from each other by
 the non-continuance of the rhymes of the former into the latter. At the
 end of the octave, or near it, is usually a pause, marking the
 culmination of the thought, and the sextet makes an inference or rounds
 out the sense to an artistic whole.
 
 Read Wordsworth's sonnets, _Happy the feeling from the bosom thrown,_ and
 _Nuns fret not at their convent's narrow room._
 
 
                                    I.
 
 The date of this sonnet is unknown. From the fact that it comes first in
 the series as arranged by the poet, it is inferred that it is the
 earliest sonnet he chose to publish.
 
 
 4. the jolly Hours. See note on Comus 986.
 
 5-6. To hear the nightingale before the cuckoo was for lovers a good
 sign. This superstition is a motive in the _Cuckoo and the Nightingale_,
 a poem formerly attributed to Chaucer, and as such "modernized" by
 Wordsworth, but now known to be the work of Sir Thomas Clanvowe. Stanza X
 of this poem is thus given by Wordsworth:--
 
         But tossing lately on a sleepless bed,
         I of a token thought which Lovers heed;
         How among them it was a common tale,
         That it was good to hear the Nightingale
         Ere the vile Cuckoo's note be uttered.
 
 9. the rude bird of hate. This gives to the cuckoo altogether too bad a
 character. The bird has on the whole a fair standing in English poetry.
 We must think of the very pleasing _Ode to the Cuckoo_,--written either
 by Michael Bruce or by John Logan,--as well as of the passage in which
 Shakespeare makes Lucrece ask (line 848),--
 
         Why should the worm intrude the maiden bud?
         Or hateful cuckoos hatch in sparrows' nests?
 
 Look up other nightingale and cuckoo songs; for example, Keats's _Ode to
 a Nightingale_, and Wordsworth's _The Cuckoo at Laverna_.
 
 
                                II (1631).
 
 This sonnet Milton appears to have sent with a prose letter to a friend
 who had remonstrated with him on the life of desultory study which he was
 so long continuing to lead. In this letter he professes the principle of
 "not taking thought of being _late_, so it gave advantage to be more
 fit." He adds, "That you may see that I am something suspicious of
 myself, and do take notice of a certain _belatedness_ in me, I am the
 bolder to send you some of my nightward thoughts some little while ago,
 because they come in not altogether unfitly, made up in a Petrarchian
 stanza, which I told you of."
 
 
 8. timely-happy: wise with the wisdom proportionate to one's years.
 Similar compounds of two adjectives in Shakespeare are very frequent; for
 example, holy-cruel, heady-rash, proper-false, devilish-holy, cold-pale.
 
 10. even: equal, adequate.
 
 
                               VIII (1642).
 
 The occasion of this sonnet was the near approach of the royalist army to
 London, early in the Civil War. The people of the city had reason to fear
 the entrance of the cavalier troops and the sacking of the houses of
 citizens obnoxious to the party of the king. Milton would have been an
 object of special animosity to victorious royalists, and for a short time
 he had grounds for the acutest anxiety. It is not easy to see how, in
 case of actual pillage of the city, he could have made use of such an
 appeal as this. The sonnet is probably to be regarded as a work of art
 constructed when the vicissitudes which it pictures were happily past,
 and when the poet's mind had regained its tranquillity.
 
 
 1. Note that Colonel has three syllables, according to the pronunciation
 prevailing in Milton's time. Look up the etymology of this word.
 
 10. The great Emathian conqueror: Alexander the Great, called Emathian
 from Emathia, a district of his kingdom of Macedonia.
 
 11. bid spare The house of Pindarus, when temple and tower Went to the
 ground. Alexander destroyed the city of Thebes in 335 B.C. Pindar, the
 famous lyric poet, a native and resident of Thebes, had then been dead
 more than a century. But Pindar's house still stood, and was left
 standing by the conqueror, who destroyed all other buildings of the city.
 
 12. the repeated air Of sad Electra's poet had the power To save the
 Athenian walls from ruin bare. To quote from Plutarch, Life of Lysander:
 "The proposal was made in the congress of the allies, that the Athenians
 should all be sold as slaves; on which occasion Erianthus, the Theban,
 gave his vote to pull down the city and turn the country into
 sheep-pasture; yet afterwards, when there was a meeting of the captains
 together, a man of Phocis singing the first chorus in Euripides' Electra,
 which begins,--
 
         "Electra, Agamemnon's child, I come
         Unto thy desert home,
 
 they were all melted with compassion, and it seemed to be a cruel deed to
 destroy and pull down a city which had been so famous, and produced such
 men."
 
 
                                IX (1644).
 
 Who the virtuous young lady was is not known.
 
 
 2. See the gospel of Matthew VII 13.
 
 5. See Luke X 40-42; Ruth I 14.
 
 8. Note the "identical" rhyme. The effect of such a rhyme is unpleasant.
 Modern poets avoid it.
 
 9-14. See Matthew XXV 1-13.
 
 
                             X (1644 or 1645).
 
 Lady Margaret's father was the Earl of Marlborough, who had been
 President of the Council under Charles I. Milton attributes his death to
 political anxiety caused by the dissolution of Charles's third Parliament
 in 1629.
 
 
 6-8. that dishonest victory at Chaeronea. The victory of Philip over the
 Greeks at Chaeronea, B.C. 338, is called by the poet _dishonest_ because
 obtained by means of intrigue and bribery. that old man eloquent is the
 orator and rhetorician Isocrates, who, in his grief over the defeat of
 his countrymen, committed suicide.
 
 9. later born than to have known: too late to have known. _Serius nata
 quam ut cognosceres_.
 
 
                               XIII (1646).
 
 "In these lines, Milton, with a musical perception not common amongst
 poets, exactly indicates the great merit of Lawes, which distinguishes
 his compositions from those of many of his contemporaries and successors.
 His careful attention to the words of the poet, the manner in which his
 music seems to grow from those words, the perfect coincidence of the
 musical with the metrical accent, all put Lawes's songs on a level with
 those of Schumann or Liszt."--_Encyclopaedia Britannica_.
 
 See introductory notes to Comus and Arcades.
 
 
 3-4. not to scan With Midas' ears. The god Apollo, during the time of his
 servitude to Laomedon, had a quarrel with Pan, who insisted that the
 flute was a better instrument than the lyre. The decision was left to
 Midas, king of Lydia, who decided in favor of Pan. To punish Midas,
 Apollo changed his ears into those of an ass.
 
 4. committing short and long: setting long syllables and short ones to
 fight against each other, and so destroying harmony.
 
 5. The subject is conceived as a single idea, and so takes the verb in
 the singular. exempts thee: singles thee out, selects thee.
 
 8. couldst humor best our tongue: couldst best adapt or accommodate
 itself to our language.
 
 10. Phoebus' quire: the poets. _Quire_ is Milton's spelling of _choir_.
 
 12-14. Read the story of Dante's meeting with his friend, the musician
 Casella, in the second canto of Purgatory.
 
 
                                XV (1648).
 
 The taking of Colchester by the parliamentary army under Fairfax, Aug.
 28, 1648, was one of the most important events of the Civil War.
 
 
 7. the false North displays Her broken league. The Scotch and the English
 accused each other of having violated the Solemn League and Covenant, to
 which the people of both countries had subscribed.
 
 8. to imp their serpent wings. To _imp_ a wing with feathers is to attach
 feathers to it so as to strengthen or improve its flight. The word is
 originally a term of falconry. See Richard II. II 1 292. See also
 Murray's _New English Dictionary_.
 
 13-14. Valor, Avarice, Rapine; personified abstracts, after the manner of
 our earlier poetry.
 
 
                                   XVI.
 
 As Secretary for Foreign Tongues to the Council of State of the
 Commonwealth, Milton saw much of Cromwell, and came under the influence
 of his voice and manner. Whether the great general had ever taken note of
 the poems written by the secretary who turned his despatches into Latin,
 or whether he gave any special heed to the man himself, with whom he must
 have come into some sort of personal relation, we have no means of
 knowing. We know, however, perfectly well what the poet thought of the
 victorious general. Though by no means always approving his state policy,
 Milton retained to the end the warm personal admiration for Cromwell
 which he expresses in this sonnet.
 
 
 7-9. Darwen stream, usually spoken of as the battle of Preston, was
 fought Aug. 17, 1648; Dunbar, Sept. 3, 1650; Worcester, Sept. 3, 1651.
 
 12. to bind our souls with secular chains: to fetter our religious
 freedom with laws made by the civil power.
 
 14. hireling wolves. Milton applies this degrading appellation to
 clergymen who received pay from the state. His appeal to Cromwell was not
 successful. Cromwell was to become the chief supporter of a church
 establishment.
 
 
                               XVII (1652).
 
 Sir Henry Vane was member of a committee of the Council of State
 appointed in 1649 to consider alliances and relations with the European
 powers. Milton, as Secretary of the Council, had abundant opportunity to
 observe Vane's skill in diplomacy, his ability to "unfold the drift of
 hollow states hard to be spelled." Both Vane and Milton held to the
 doctrine, preeminently associated with the name of Roger Williams, of
 universal toleration, based on the refusal to the civil magistrate of any
 authority in spiritual matters.
 
 
 1. Vane, young in years: Vane was born in 1613.
 
 3. gowns, not arms: civilians, not soldiers. The expression is a
 Latinism, the _gown_ standing for the _toga_.
 
 4. The fierce Epirot and the African bold: Pyrrhus and Hannibal.
 
 6. hard to be spelled. Compare Il Penseroso 170.
 
 
                               XVIII (1655).
 
 The historical event which furnishes the occasion of this sonnet is the
 persecution of the Protestant Waldenses by the Piedmontese and French
 governments, at the time of Cromwell's Protectorate. Cromwell's vigorous
 and successful intervention was the means of staying this horror, and
 gives evidence of the respect entertained for his government among the
 states of Europe.
 
 
 4. when all our fathers worshiped stocks and stones. Christianity had
 been introduced into the Waldensian country while Britain was still
 pagan.
 
 5. their groans Who were thy sheep: the groans of those who were.
 
 12. The triple Tyrant. The Pope, who wore a triple crown.
 
 14. the Babylonian woe. The puritans interpreted the _Babylon_ of
 Revelation as the church of Rome. See Revelation XVIII.
 
 
                                   XIX.
 
 The sonnet, says Masson, may have been written any time between 1652 and
 1655.
 
 
 2. Ere half my days. Milton's blindness is considered to have become
 total in 1652, when he was at the age of forty-four. How shall we
 understand these words?
 
 3. See the Parable of the Talents, Matthew XXV.
 
 8. I fondly ask. See note on Il Pens. 6.
 
 
                                    XX.
 
 Probable date, 1655. Of the Mr. Lawrence to whom the sonnet is addressed
 nothing is certainly known.
 
 
 6. Favonius is the Latin name for Zephyrus, the west wind.
 
 10. Attic: refined, delicate, poignant.
 
 13. and spare To interpose them oft: refrain from too free enjoyment of
 them.
 
 
                                   XXI.
 
 The second sonnet to Cyriac Skinner determines its own date as 1655, and
 this one is probably to be assigned to the same year.
 
 But little is known of the person to whom this sonnet and the next one
 are addressed, except what we learn from the sonnets themselves,--that he
 was an intimate and esteemed friend of Milton. He may have been one of
 Milton's pupils; and he may, when his old teacher had become blind, have
 rendered him important services as amanuensis or as reader.
 
 
 1-4. Cyriac Skinner's mother was daughter of the famous lawyer and judge,
 Sir Edward Coke.
 
 2. Themis is personified _law_, this being the meaning of the Greek word.
 
 7. Let Euclid rest, and Archimedes pause: intermit for a day your severe
 mathematical studies.
 
 8. And what the Swede intend, and what the French: and pay no heed to
 foreign news.
 
 
                               XXII (1655).
 
 
 1. this three years' day: three years ago to-day.
 
 10. Milton's duties as Latin secretary to the government were exceedingly
 arduous.
 
 
                                  XXIII.
 
 Milton's second wife died in February, 1658; her child lived but a short
 time. At the time of his second marriage Milton had been blind several
 years. Notice the reference in the sonnet to the sense of sight: in his
 dream he _saw_.
 
 
 2. like Alcestis. Read the story of the Love of Alcestis in William
 Morris's Earthly Paradise; and read in Euripides, "That strangest,
 saddest, sweetest song of his, Alkestis."
 
 6. Purification in the Old Law. See Leviticus XII.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Edward A. Malone
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   L'ALLEGRO, IL PENSEROSO, COMUS, AND LYCIDAS
 
   By
 
   John Milton
 
 
 
   L'ALLEGRO
 
 
   HENCE, loathed Melancholy,
   ............Of Cerberus and blackest Midnight born
   In Stygian cave forlorn
   ............'Mongst horrid shapes, and shrieks, and sights
   unholy!
   Find out some uncouth cell,
   ............Where brooding Darkness spreads his jealous wings,
   And the night-raven sings;
   ............There, under ebon shades and low-browed rocks,
   As ragged as thy locks,
   ............In dark Cimmerian desert ever dwell.
   But come, thou Goddess fair and free,
   In heaven yclept Euphrosyne,
   And by men heart-easing Mirth;
   Whom lovely Venus, at a birth,
   With two sister Graces more,
   To ivy-crowned Bacchus bore:
   Or whether (as some sager sing)
   The frolic wind that breathes the spring,
   Zephyr, with Aurora playing,
   As he met her once a-Maying,
   There, on beds of violets blue,
   And fresh-blown roses washed in dew,
   Filled her with thee, a daughter fair,
   So buxom, blithe, and debonair.
   Haste thee, Nymph, and bring with thee
   Jest, and youthful Jollity,
   Quips and cranks and wanton wiles,
   Nods and becks and wreathed smiles
   Such as hang on Hebe's cheek,
   And love to live in dimple sleek;
   Sport that wrinkled Care derides,
   And Laughter holding both his sides.
   Come, and trip it, as you go,
   On the light fantastic toe;
   And in thy right hand lead with thee
   The mountain-nymph, sweet Liberty;
   And, if I give thee honour due,
   Mirth, admit me of thy crew,
   To live with her, and live with thee,
   In unreproved pleasures free:
   To hear the lark begin his flight,
   And, singing, startle the dull night,
   From his watch-tower in the skies,
   Till the dappled dawn doth rise;
   Then to come, in spite of sorrow,
   And at my window bid good-morrow,
   Through the sweet-briar or the vine,
   Or the twisted eglantine;
   While the cock, with lively din,
   Scatters the rear of darkness thin,
   And to the stack, or the barn-door,
   Stoutly struts his dames before:
   Oft listening how the hounds and horn
   Cheerly rouse the slumbering morn,
   From the side of some hoar hill,
   Through the high wood echoing shrill:
   Sometime walking, not unseen,
   By hedgerow elms, on hillocks green,
   Right against the eastern gate
   Where the great Sun begins his state,
   Robed in flames and amber light,
   The clouds in thousand liveries dight;
   While the ploughman, near at hand,
   Whistles o'er the furrowed land,
   And the milkmaid singeth blithe,
   And the mower whets his scythe,
   And every shepherd tells his tale
   Under the hawthorn in the dale.
   Straight mine eye hath caught new pleasures,
   Whilst the landskip round it measures:
   Russet lawns, and fallows grey,
   Where the nibbling flocks do stray;
   Mountains on whose barren breast
   The labouring clouds do often rest;
   Meadows trim, with daisies pied;
   Shallow brooks, and rivers wide;
   Towers and battlements it sees
   Bosomed high in tufted trees,
   Where perhaps some beauty lies,
   The cynosure of neighbouring eyes.
   Hard by a cottage chimney smokes
   From betwixt two aged oaks,
   Where Corydon and Thyrsis met
   Are at their savoury dinner set
   Of herbs and other country messes,
   Which the neat-handed Phyllis dresses;
   And then in haste her bower she leaves,
   With Thestylis to bind the sheaves;
   Or, if the earlier season lead,
   To the tanned haycock in the mead.
   Sometimes, with secure delight,
   The upland hamlets will invite,
   When the merry bells ring round,
   And the jocund rebecks sound
   To many a youth and many a maid
   Dancing in the chequered shade,
   And young and old come forth to play
   On a sunshine holiday,
   Till the livelong daylight fail:
   Then to the spicy nut-brown ale,
   With stories told of many a feat,
   How Faery Mab the junkets eat.
   She was pinched and pulled, she said;
   And he, by Friar's lantern led,
   Tells how the drudging goblin sweat
   To earn his cream-bowl duly set,
   When in one night, ere glimpse of morn,
   His shadowy flail hath threshed the corn
   That ten day-labourers could not end;
   Then lies him down, the lubber fiend,
   And, stretched out all the chimney's length,
   Basks at the fire his hairy strength,
   And crop-full out of doors he flings,
   Ere the first cock his matin rings.
   Thus done the tales, to bed they creep,
   By whispering winds soon lulled asleep.
   Towered cities please us then,
   And the busy hum of men,
   Where throngs of knights and barons bold,
   In weeds of peace, high triumphs hold
   With store of ladies, whose bright eyes
   Rain influence, and judge the prize
   Of wit or arms, while both contend
   To win her grace whom all commend.
   There let Hymen oft appear
   In saffron robe, with taper clear,
   And pomp, and feast, and revelry,
   With mask and antique pageantry;
   Such sights as youthful poets dream
   On summer eves by haunted stream.
   Then to the well-trod stage anon,
   If Jonson's learned sock be on,
   Or sweetest Shakespeare, Fancy's child,
   Warble his native wood-notes wild.
   And ever, against eating cares,
   Lap me in soft Lydian airs,
   Married to immortal verse,
   Such as the meeting soul may pierce,
   In notes with many a winding bout
   Of linked sweetness long drawn out
   With wanton heed and giddy cunning,
   The melting voice through mazes running,
   Untwisting all the chains that tie
   The hidden soul of harmony;
   That Orpheus' self may heave his head
   From golden slumber on a bed
   Of heaped Elysian flowers, and hear
   Such strains as would have won the ear
   Of Pluto to have quite set free
   His half-regained Eurydice.
   These delights if thou canst give,
   Mirth, with thee I mean to live.
 
 
 
   IL PENSEROSO
 
 
   HENCE, vain deluding Joys,
   ............The brood of Folly without father bred!
   How little you bested
   ............Or fill the fixed mind with all your toys!
   Dwell in some idle brain,
   ............And fancies fond with gaudy shapes possess,
   As thick and numberless
   ............As the gay motes that people the sun-beams,
   Or likest hovering dreams,
   ............The fickle pensioners of Morpheus' train.
   But, hail! thou Goddess sage and holy!
   Hail, divinest Melancholy!
   Whose saintly visage is too bright
   To hit the sense of human sight,
   And therefore to our weaker view
   O'erlaid with black, staid Wisdom's hue;
   Black, but such as in esteem
   Prince Memnon's sister might beseem,
   Or that starred Ethiop queen that strove
   To set her beauty's praise above
   The Sea-Nymphs, and their powers offended.
   Yet thou art higher far descended:
   Thee bright-haired Vesta long of yore
   To solitary Saturn bore;
   His daughter she; in Saturn's reign
   Such mixture was not held a stain.
   Oft in glimmering bowers and glades
   He met her, and in secret shades
   Of woody Ida's inmost grove,
   Whilst yet there was no fear of Jove.
   Come, pensive Nun, devout and pure,
   Sober, steadfast, and demure,
   All in a robe of darkest grain,
   Flowing with majestic train,
   And sable stole of cypress lawn
   Over thy decent shoulders drawn.
   Come; but keep thy wonted state,
   With even step, and musing gait,
   And looks commercing with the skies,
   Thy rapt soul sitting in thine eyes:
   There, held in holy passion still,
   Forget thyself to marble, till
   With a sad leaden downward cast
   Thou fix them on the earth as fast.
   And join with thee calm Peace and Quiet,
   Spare Fast, that oft with gods doth diet,
   And hears the Muses in a ring
   Aye round about Jove's altar sing;
   And add to these retired Leisure,
   That in trim gardens takes his pleasure;
   But, first and chiefest, with thee bring
   Him that yon soars on golden wing,
   Guiding the fiery-wheeled throne,
   The Cherub Contemplation;
   And the mute Silence hist along,
   'Less Philomel will deign a song,
   In her sweetest saddest plight,
   Smoothing the rugged brow of Night,
   While Cynthia checks her dragon yoke
   Gently o'er the accustomed oak.
   Sweet bird, that shunn'st the noise of folly,
   Most musical, most melancholy!
   Thee, chauntress, oft the woods among
   I woo, to hear thy even-song;
   And, missing thee, I walk unseen
   On the dry smooth-shaven green,
   To behold the wandering moon,
   Riding near her highest noon,
   Like one that had been led astray
   Through the heaven's wide pathless way,
   And oft, as if her head she bowed,
   Stooping through a fleecy cloud.
   Oft, on a plat of rising ground,
   I hear the far-off curfew sound,
   Over some wide-watered shore,
   Swinging slow with sullen roar;
   Or, if the air will not permit,
   Some still removed place will fit,
   Where glowing embers through the room
   Teach light to counterfeit a gloom,
   Far from all resort of mirth,
   Save the cricket on the hearth,
   Or the bellman's drowsy charm
   To bless the doors from nightly harm.
   Or let my lamp, at midnight hour,
   Be seen in some high lonely tower,
   Where I may oft outwatch the Bear,
   With thrice great Hermes, or unsphere
   The spirit of Plato, to unfold
   What worlds or what vast regions hold
   The immortal mind that hath forsook
   Her mansion in this fleshly nook;
   And of those demons that are found
   In fire, air, flood, or underground,
   Whose power hath a true consent
   With planet or with element.
   Sometime let gorgeous Tragedy
   In sceptred pall come sweeping by,
   Presenting Thebes, or Pelops' line,
   Or the tale of Troy divine,
   Or what (though rare) of later age
   Ennobled hath the buskined stage.
   But, O sad Virgin! that thy power
   Might raise Musaeus from his bower;
   Or bid the soul of Orpheus sing
   Such notes as, warbled to the string,
   Drew iron tears down Pluto's cheek,
   And made Hell grant what love did seek;
   Or call up him that left half-told
   The story of Cambuscan bold,
   Of Camball, and of Algarsife,
   And who had Canace to wife,
   That owned the virtuous ring and glass,
   And of the wondrous horse of brass
   On which the Tartar king did ride;
   And if aught else great bards beside
   In sage and solemn tunes have sung,
   Of turneys, and of trophies hung,
   Of forests, and enchantments drear,
   Where more is meant than meets the ear.
   Thus, Night, oft see me in thy pale career,
   Till civil-suited Morn appear,
   Not tricked and frounced, as she was wont
   With the Attic boy to hunt,
   But kerchieft in a comely cloud
   While rocking winds are piping loud,
   Or ushered with a shower still,
   When the gust hath blown his fill,
   Ending on the rustling leaves,
   With minute-drops from off the eaves.
   And, when the sun begins to fling
   His flaring beams, me, Goddess, bring
   To arched walks of twilight groves,
   And shadows brown, that Sylvan loves,
   Of pine, or monumental oak,
   Where the rude axe with heaved stroke
   Was never heard the nymphs to daunt,
   Or fright them from their hallowed haunt.
   There, in close covert, by some brook,
   Where no profaner eye may look,
   Hide me from day's garish eye,
   While the bee with honeyed thigh,
   That at her flowery work doth sing,
   And the waters murmuring,
   With such consort as they keep,
   Entice the dewy-feathered Sleep.
   And let some strange mysterious dream
   Wave at his wings, in airy stream
   Of lively portraiture displayed,
   Softly on my eyelids laid;
   And, as I wake, sweet music breathe
   Above, about, or underneath,
   Sent by some Spirit to mortals good,
   Or the unseen Genius of the wood.
   But let my due feet never fail
   To walk the studious cloister's pale,
   And love the high embowed roof,
   With antique pillars massy proof,
   And storied windows richly dight,
   Casting a dim religious light.
   There let the pealing organ blow,
   To the full-voiced quire below,
   In service high and anthems clear,
   As may with sweetness, through mine ear,
   Dissolve me into ecstasies,
   And bring all Heaven before mine eyes.
   And may at last my weary age
   Find out the peaceful hermitage,
   The hairy gown and mossy cell,
   Where I may sit and rightly spell
   Of every star that heaven doth shew,
   And every herb that sips the dew,
   Till old experience do attain
   To something like prophetic strain.
   These pleasures, Melancholy, give;
   And I with thee will choose to live.
 
 
 
   COMUS
 
 
   A MASQUE PRESENTED AT LUDLOW CASTLE, 1634, BEFORE
 
   THE EARL OF BRIDGEWATER, THEN PRESIDENT OF WALES.
 
   The Persons
 
           The ATTENDANT SPIRIT, afterwards in the habit of THYRSIS.
   COMUS, with his Crew.
   The LADY.
   FIRST BROTHER.
   SECOND BROTHER.
   SABRINA, the Nymph.
 
   The Chief Persons which presented were:--
 
   The Lord Brackley;
   Mr. Thomas Egerton, his Brother;
   The Lady Alice Egerton.
 
 
   The first Scene discovers a wild wood.
   The ATTENDANT SPIRIT descends or enters.
 
 
   BEFORE the starry threshold of Jove's court
   My mansion is, where those immortal shapes
   Of bright aerial spirits live insphered
   In regions mild of calm and serene air,
   Above the smoke and stir of this dim spot
   Which men call Earth, and, with low-thoughted care,
   Confined and pestered in this pinfold here,
   Strive to keep up a frail and feverish being,
   Unmindful of the crown that Virtue gives,
   After this mortal change, to her true servants
   Amongst the enthroned gods on sainted seats.
   Yet some there be that by due steps aspire
   To lay their just hands on that golden key
   That opes the palace of eternity.
   To Such my errand is; and, but for such,
   I would not soil these pure ambrosial weeds
   With the rank vapours of this sin-worn mould.
            But to my task. Neptune, besides the sway
   Of every salt flood and each ebbing stream,
   Took in by lot, 'twixt high and nether Jove,
   Imperial rule of all the sea-girt isles
   That, like to rich and various gems, inlay
   The unadorned bosom of the deep;
   Which he, to grace his tributary gods,
   By course commits to several government,
   And gives them leave to wear their sapphire crowns
   And wield their little tridents. But this Isle,
   The greatest and the best of all the main,
   He quarters to his blue-haired deities;
   And all this tract that fronts the falling sun
   A noble Peer of mickle trust and power
   Has in his charge, with tempered awe to guide
   An old and haughty nation, proud in arms:
   Where his fair offspring, nursed in princely lore,
   Are coming to attend their father's state,
   And new-intrusted sceptre. But their way
   Lies through the perplexed paths of this drear wood,
   The nodding horror of whose shady brows
   Threats the forlorn and wandering passenger;
   And here their tender age might suffer peril,
   But that, by quick command from sovran Jove,
   I was despatched for their defence and guard:
   And listen why; for I will tell you now
   What never yet was heard in tale or song,
   From old or modern bard, in hall or bower.
            Bacchus, that first from out the purple grape
   Crushed the sweet poison of misused wine,
   After the Tuscan mariners transformed,
   Coasting the Tyrrhene shore, as the winds listed,
   On Circe's island fell. (Who knows not Circe,
   The daughter of the Sun, whose charmed cup
   Whoever tasted lost his upright shape,
   And downward fell into a grovelling swine?)
   This Nymph, that gazed upon his clustering locks,
   With ivy berries wreathed, and his blithe youth,
   Had by him, ere he parted thence, a son
   Much like his father, but his mother more,
   Whom therefore she brought up, and Comus named:
   Who, ripe and frolic of his full-grown age,
   Roving the Celtic and Iberian fields,
   At last betakes him to this ominous wood,
   And, in thick shelter of black shades imbowered,
   Excels his mother at her mighty art;
   Offering to every weary traveller
   His orient liquor in a crystal glass,
   To quench the drouth of Phoebus; which as they taste
   (For most do taste through fond intemperate thirst),
   Soon as the potion works, their human count'nance,
   The express resemblance of the gods, is changed
   Into some brutish form of wolf or bear,
   Or ounce or tiger, hog, or bearded goat,
   All other parts remaining as they were.
   And they, so perfect is their misery,
   Not once perceive their foul disfigurement,
   But boast themselves more comely than before,
   And all their friends and native home forget,
   To roll with pleasure in a sensual sty.
   Therefore, when any favoured of high Jove
   Chances to pass through this adventurous glade,
   Swift as the sparkle of a glancing star
   I shoot from heaven, to give him safe convoy,
   As now I do. But first I must put off
   These my sky-robes, spun out of Iris' woof,
   And take the weeds and likeness of a swain
   That to the service of this house belongs,
   Who, with his soft pipe and smooth-dittied song,
   Well knows to still the wild winds when they roar,
   And hush the waving woods; nor of less faith
   And in this office of his mountain watch
   Likeliest, and nearest to the present aid
   Of this occasion. But I hear the tread
   Of hateful steps; I must be viewless now.
 
 
   COMUS enters, with a charming-rod in one hand, his glass in the
   other: with him a rout of monsters, headed like sundry sorts of
   wild
   beasts, but otherwise like men and women, their apparel
   glistering.
   They come in making a riotous and unruly noise, with torches in
   their hands.
 
 
            COMUS. The star that bids the shepherd fold
   Now the top of heaven doth hold;
   And the gilded car of day
   His glowing axle doth allay
   In the steep Atlantic stream;
   And the slope sun his upward beam
   Shoots against the dusky pole,
   Pacing toward the other goal
   Of his chamber in the east.
   Meanwhile, welcome joy and feast,
   Midnight shout and revelry,
   Tipsy dance and jollity.
   Braid your locks with rosy twine,
   Dropping odours, dropping wine.
   Rigour now is gone to bed;
   And Advice with scrupulous head,
   Strict Age, and sour Severity,
   With their grave saws, in slumber lie.
   We, that are of purer fire,
   Imitate the starry quire,
   Who, in their nightly watchful spheres,
   Lead in swift round the months and years.
   The sounds and seas, with all their finny drove,
   Now to the moon in wavering morrice move;
   And on the tawny sands and shelves
   Trip the pert fairies and the dapper elves.
   By dimpled brook and fountain-brim,
   The wood-nymphs, decked with daisies trim,
   Their merry wakes and pastimes keep:
   What hath night to do with sleep?
   Night hath better sweets to prove;
   Venus now wakes, and wakens Love.
   Come, let us our rights begin;
   'T is only daylight that makes sin,
   Which these dun shades will ne'er report.
   Hail, goddess of nocturnal sport,
   Dark-veiled Cotytto, to whom the secret flame
   Of midnight torches burns! mysterious dame,
   That ne'er art called but when the dragon womb
   Of Stygian darkness spets her thickest gloom,
   And makes one blot of all the air!
   Stay thy cloudy ebon chair,
   Wherein thou ridest with Hecat', and befriend
   Us thy vowed priests, till utmost end
   Of all thy dues be done, and none left out,
   Ere the blabbing eastern scout,
   The nice Morn on the Indian steep,
   From her cabined loop-hole peep,
   And to the tell-tale Sun descry
   Our concealed solemnity.
   Come, knit hands, and beat the ground
   In a light fantastic round.
 
                                 The Measure.
 
            Break off, break off! I feel the different pace
   Of some chaste footing near about this ground.
   Run to your shrouds within these brakes and trees;
   Our number may affright. Some virgin sure
   (For so I can distinguish by mine art)
   Benighted in these woods! Now to my charms,
   And to my wily trains: I shall ere long
   Be well stocked with as fair a herd as grazed
   About my mother Circe. Thus I hurl
   My dazzling spells into the spongy air,
   Of power to cheat the eye with blear illusion,
   And give it false presentments, lest the place
   And my quaint habits breed astonishment,
   And put the damsel to suspicious flight;
   Which must not be, for that's against my course.
   I, under fair pretence of friendly ends,
   And well-placed words of glozing courtesy,
   Baited with reasons not unplausible,
   Wind me into the easy-hearted man,
   And hug him into snares. When once her eye
   Hath met the virtue of this magic dust,
   I shall appear some harmless villager
   Whom thrift keeps up about his country gear.
   But here she comes; I fairly step aside,
   And hearken, if I may her business hear.
 
   The LADY enters.
 
            LADY. This way the noise was, if mine ear be true,
   My best guide now. Methought it was the sound
   Of riot and ill-managed merriment,
   Such as the jocund flute or gamesome pipe
   Stirs up among the loose unlettered hinds,
   When, for their teeming flocks and granges full,
   In wanton dance they praise the bounteous Pan,
   And thank the gods amiss. I should be loth
   To meet the rudeness and swilled insolence
   Of such late wassailers; yet, oh! where else
   Shall I inform my unacquainted feet
   In the blind mazes of this tangled wood?
   My brothers, when they saw me wearied out
   With this long way, resolving here to lodge
   Under the spreading favour of these pines,
   Stepped, as they said, to the next thicket-side
   To bring me berries, or such cooling fruit
   As the kind hospitable woods provide.
   They left me then when the grey-hooded Even,
   Like a sad votarist in palmer's weed,
   Rose from the hindmost wheels of Phoebus' wain.
   But where they are, and why they came not back,
   Is now the labour of my thoughts. 'Tis likeliest
   They had engaged their wandering steps too far;
   And envious darkness, ere they could return,
   Had stole them from me. Else, O thievish Night,
   Why shouldst thou, but for some felonious end,
   In thy dark lantern thus close up the stars
   That Nature hung in heaven, and filled their lamps
   With everlasting oil to give due light
   To the misled and lonely traveller?
   This is the place, as well as I may guess,
   Whence even now the tumult of loud mirth
   Was rife, and perfect in my listening ear;
   Yet nought but single darkness do I find.
   What might this be? A thousand fantasies
   Begin to throng into my memory,
   Of calling shapes, and beckoning shadows dire,
   And airy tongues that syllable men's names
   On sands and shores and desert wildernesses.
   These thoughts may startle well, but not astound
   The virtuous mind, that ever walks attended
   By a strong siding champion, Conscience.
   O, welcome, pure-eyed Faith, white-handed Hope,
   Thou hovering angel girt with golden wings,
   And thou unblemished form of Chastity!
   I see ye visibly, and now believe
   That He, the Supreme Good, to whom all things ill
   Are but as slavish officers of vengeance,
   Would send a glistering guardian, if need were,
   To keep my life and honour unassailed. . . .
   Was I deceived, or did a sable cloud
   Turn forth her silver lining on the night?
   I did not err: there does a sable cloud
   Turn forth her silver lining on the night,
   And casts a gleam over this tufted grove.
   I cannot hallo to my brothers, but
   Such noise as I can make to be heard farthest
   I'll venture; for my new-enlivened spirits
   Prompt me, and they perhaps are not far off.
 
   Song.
 
   Sweet Echo, sweetest nymph, that liv'st unseen
                    Within thy airy shell
            By slow Meander's margent green,
   And in the violet-embroidered vale
            Where the love-lorn nightingale
   Nightly to thee her sad song mourneth well:
   Canst thou not tell me of a gentle pair
            That likest thy Narcissus are?
                     O, if thou have
            Hid them in some flowery cave,
                     Tell me but where,
            Sweet Queen of Parley, Daughter of the Sphere!
            So may'st thou be translated to the skies,
   And give resounding grace to all Heaven's harmonies!
 
 
            COMUS. Can any mortal mixture of earth's mould
   Breathe such divine enchanting ravishment?
   Sure something holy lodges in that breast,
   And with these raptures moves the vocal air
   To testify his hidden residence.
   How sweetly did they float upon the wings
   Of silence, through the empty-vaulted night,
   At every fall smoothing the raven down
   Of darkness till it smiled! I have oft heard
   My mother Circe with the Sirens three,
   Amidst the flowery-kirtled Naiades,
   Culling their potent herbs and baleful drugs,
   Who, as they sung, would take the prisoned soul,
   And lap it in Elysium: Scylla wept,
   And chid her barking waves into attention,
   And fell Charybdis murmured soft applause.
   Yet they in pleasing slumber lulled the sense,
   And in sweet madness robbed it of itself;
   But such a sacred and home-felt delight,
   Such sober certainty of waking bliss,
   I never heard till now. I'll speak to her,
   And she shall be my queen.--Hail, foreign wonder!
   Whom certain these rough shades did never breed,
   Unless the goddess that in rural shrine
   Dwell'st here with Pan or Sylvan, by blest song
   Forbidding every bleak unkindly fog
   To touch the prosperous growth of this tall wood.
            LADY. Nay, gentle shepherd, ill is lost that praise
   That is addressed to unattending ears.
   Not any boast of skill, but extreme shift
   How to regain my severed company,
   Compelled me to awake the courteous Echo
   To give me answer from her mossy couch.
            COMUS: What chance, good lady, hath bereft you thus?
            LADY. Dim darkness and this leafy labyrinth.
            COMUS. Could that divide you from near-ushering guides?
            LADY. They left me weary on a grassy turf.
            COMUS. By falsehood, or discourtesy, or why?
            LADY. To seek i' the valley some cool friendly spring.
            COMUS. And left your fair side all unguarded, Lady?
            LADY. They were but twain, and purposed quick return.
            COMUS. Perhaps forestalling night prevented them.
            LADY. How easy my misfortune is to hit!
            COMUS. Imports their loss, beside the present need?
            LADY. No less than if I should my brothers lose.
            COMUS. Were they of manly prime, or youthful bloom?
            LADY. As smooth as Hebe's their unrazored lips.
            COMUS. Two such I saw, what time the laboured ox
   In his loose traces from the furrow came,
   And the swinked hedger at his supper sat.
   I saw them under a green mantling vine,
   That crawls along the side of yon small hill,
   Plucking ripe clusters from the tender shoots;
   Their port was more than human, as they stood.
   I took it for a faery vision
   Of some gay creatures of the element,
   That in the colours of the rainbow live,
   And play i' the plighted clouds. I was awe-strook,
   And, as I passed, I worshiped. If those you seek,
   It were a journey like the path to Heaven
   To help you find them.
            LADY.                          Gentle villager,
   What readiest way would bring me to that place?
            COMUS. Due west it rises from this shrubby point.
            LADY. To find out that, good shepherd, I suppose,
   In such a scant allowance of star-light,
   Would overtask the best land-pilot's art,
   Without the sure guess of well-practised feet.
           COMUS. I know each lane, and every alley green,
   Dingle, or bushy dell, of this wild wood,
   And every bosky bourn from side to side,
   My daily walks and ancient neighbourhood;
   And, if your stray attendance be yet lodged,
   Or shroud within these limits, I shall know
   Ere morrow wake, or the low-roosted lark
   From her thatched pallet rouse. If otherwise,
   I can conduct you, Lady, to a low
   But loyal cottage, where you may be safe
   Till further quest.
            LADY.        Shepherd, I take thy word,
   And trust thy honest-offered courtesy,
   Which oft is sooner found in lowly sheds,
   With smoky rafters, than in tapestry halls
   And courts of princes, where it first was named,
   And yet is most pretended. In a place
   Less warranted than this, or less secure,
   I cannot be, that I should fear to change it.
   Eye me, blest Providence, and square my trial
   To my proportioned strength! Shepherd, lead on.
 
   The TWO BROTHERS.
 
            ELD. BRO. Unmuffle, ye faint stars; and thou, fair moon,
   That wont'st to love the traveller's benison,
   Stoop thy pale visage through an amber cloud,
   And disinherit Chaos, that reigns here
   In double night of darkness and of shades;
   Or, if your influence be quite dammed up
   With black usurping mists, some gentle taper,
   Though a rush-candle from the wicker hole
   Of some clay habitation, visit us
   With thy long levelled rule of streaming light,
   And thou shalt be our star of Arcady,
   Or Tyrian Cynosure.
            SEC. BRO.                    Or, if our eyes
   Be barred that happiness, might we but hear
   The folded flocks, penned in their wattled cotes,
   Or sound of pastoral reed with oaten stops,
   Or whistle from the lodge, or village cock
   Count the night-watches to his feathery dames,
   'T would be some solace yet, some little cheering,
   In this close dungeon of innumerous boughs.
   But, oh, that hapless virgin, our lost sister!
   Where may she wander now, whither betake her
   From the chill dew, amongst rude burs and thistles
   Perhaps some cold bank is her bolster now,
   Or 'gainst the rugged bark of some broad elm
   Leans her unpillowed head, fraught with sad fears.
   What if in wild amazement and affright,
   Or, while we speak, within the direful grasp
   Of savage hunger, or of savage heat!
            ELD. BRO. Peace, brother: be not over-exquisite
   To cast the fashion of uncertain evils;
   For, grant they be so, while they rest unknown,
   What need a man forestall his date of grief,
   And run to meet what he would most avoid?
   Or, if they be but false alarms of fear,
   How bitter is such self-delusion!
   I do not think my sister so to seek,
   Or so unprincipled in virtue's book,
   And the sweet peace that goodness bosoms ever,
   As that the single want of light and noise
   (Not being in danger, as I trust she is not)
   Could stir the constant mood of her calm thoughts,
   And put them into misbecoming plight.
   Virtue could see to do what Virtue would
   By her own radiant light, though sun and moon
   Were in the flat sea sunk. And Wisdom's self
   Oft seeks to sweet retired solitude,
   Where, with her best nurse, Contemplation,
   She plumes her feathers, and lets grow her wings,
   That, in the various bustle of resort,
   Were all to-ruffled, and sometimes impaired.
   He that has light within his own clear breast
   May sit i' the centre, and enjoy bright day:
   But he that hides a dark soul and foul thoughts
   Benighted walks under the mid-day sun;
   Himself is his own dungeon.
            SEC. BRO.                             'Tis most true
   That musing meditation most affects
   The pensive secrecy of desert cell,
   Far from the cheerful haunt of men and herds,
   And sits as safe as in a senate house
   For who would rob a hermit of his weeds,
   His few books, or his beads, or maple dish,
   Or do his grey hairs any violence?
   But Beauty, like the fair Hesperian tree
   Laden with blooming gold, had need the guard
   Of dragon-watch with unenchanted eye
   To save her blossoms, and defend her fruit,
   From the rash hand of bold Incontinence.
   You may as well spread out the unsunned heaps
   Of miser's treasure by an outlaw's den,
   And tell me it is safe, as bid me hope
   Danger will wink on Opportunity,
   And let a single helpless maiden pass
   Uninjured in this wild surrounding waste.
   Of night or loneliness it recks me not;
   I fear the dread events that dog them both,
   Lest some ill-greeting touch attempt the person
   Of our unowned sister.
            ELD. BRO.            I do not, brother,
   Infer as if I thought my sister's state
   Secure without all doubt or controversy;
   Yet, where an equal poise of hope and fear
   Does arbitrate the event, my nature is
   That I incline to hope rather than fear,
   And gladly banish squint suspicion.
   My sister is not so defenceless left
   As you imagine; she has a hidden strength,
   Which you remember not.
            SEC. BRO.                         What hidden strength,
   Unless the strength of Heaven, if you mean that?
            ELD. BRO. I mean that too, but yet a hidden strength,
   Which, if Heaven gave it, may be termed her own.
   'Tis chastity, my brother, chastity:
   She that has that is clad in complete steel,
   And, like a quivered nymph with arrows keen,
   May trace huge forests, and unharboured heaths,
   Infamous hills, and sandy perilous wilds;
   Where, through the sacred rays of chastity,
   No savage fierce, bandite, or mountaineer,
   Will dare to soil her virgin purity.
   Yea, there where very desolation dwells,
   By grots and caverns shagged with horrid shades,
   She may pass on with unblenched majesty,
   Be it not done in pride, or in presumption.
   Some say no evil thing that walks by night,
   In fog or fire, by lake or moorish fen,
   Blue meagre hag, or stubborn unlaid ghost,
   That breaks his magic chains at curfew time,
   No goblin or swart faery of the mine,
   Hath hurtful power o'er true virginity.
   Do ye believe me yet, or shall I call
   Antiquity from the old schools of Greece
   To testify the arms of chastity?
   Hence had the huntress Dian her dread bow
   Fair silver-shafted queen for ever chaste,
   Wherewith she tamed the brinded lioness
   And spotted mountain-pard, but set at nought
   The frivolous bolt of Cupid; gods and men
   Feared her stern frown, and she was queen o' the woods.
   What was that snaky-headed Gorgon shield
   That wise Minerva wore, unconquered virgin,
   Wherewith she freezed her foes to congealed stone,
   But rigid looks of chaste austerity,
   And noble grace that dashed brute violence
   With sudden adoration and blank awe?
   So dear to Heaven is saintly chastity
   That, when a soul is found sincerely so,
   A thousand liveried angels lackey her,
   Driving far off each thing of sin and guilt,
   And in clear dream and solemn vision
   Tell her of things that no gross ear can hear;
   Till oft converse with heavenly habitants
   Begin to cast a beam on the outward shape,
   The unpolluted temple of the mind,
   And turns it by degrees to the soul's essence,
   Till all be made immortal. But, when lust,
   By unchaste looks, loose gestures, and foul talk,
   But most by lewd and lavish act of sin,
   Lets in defilement to the inward parts,
   The soul grows clotted by contagion,
   Imbodies, and imbrutes, till she quite loose
   The divine property of her first being.
   Such are those thick and gloomy shadows damp
   Oft seen in charnel-vaults and sepulchres,
   Lingering and sitting by a new-made grave,
   As loth to leave the body that it loved,
   And linked itself by carnal sensualty
   To a degenerate and degraded state.
            SEC. BRO. How charming is divine Philosophy!
   Not harsh and crabbed, as dull fools suppose,
   But musical as is Apollo's lute,
   And a perpetual feast of nectared sweets,
   Where no crude surfeit reigns.
            Eld. Bro.                                        List!
   list! I hear
   Some far-off hallo break the silent air.
            SEC. BRO. Methought so too; what should it be?
            ELD. BRO.                                      For
   certain,
   Either some one, like us, night-foundered here,
   Or else some neighbour woodman, or, at worst,
   Some roving robber calling to his fellows.
   SEC. BRO. Heaven keep my sister! Again, again, and near!
   Best draw, and stand upon our guard.
            ELD. BRO.                                   I'll hallo!
   If he be friendly, he comes well: if not,
   Defence is a good cause, and Heaven be for us!
 
              The ATTENDANT SPIRIT, habited like a shepherd.
 
   That hallo I should know. What are you? speak.
   Come not too near; you fall on iron stakes else.
            SPIR. What voice is that? my young Lord? speak again.
            SEC. BRO. O brother, 't is my father's Shepherd, sure.
            ELD. BRO. Thyrsis! whose artful strains have oft delayed
   The huddling brook to hear his madrigal,
   And sweetened every musk-rose of the dale.
   How camest thou here, good swain? Hath any ram
   Slipped from the fold, or young kid lost his dam,
   Or straggling wether the pent flock forsook?
   How couldst thou find this dark sequestered nook?
            SPIR. O my loved master's heir, and his next joy,
   I came not here on such a trivial toy
   As a strayed ewe, or to pursue the stealth
   Of pilfering wolf; not all the fleecy wealth
   That doth enrich these downs is worth a thought
   To this my errand, and the care it brought.
   But, oh! my virgin Lady, where is she?
   How chance she is not in your company?
            ELD. BRO. To tell thee sadly, Shepherd, without blame
   Or our neglect, we lost her as we came.
            SPIR. Ay me unhappy! then my fears are true.
            ELD. BRO. What fears, good Thyrsis? Prithee briefly
   shew.
            SPIR. I'll tell ye. 'T is not vain or fabulous
   (Though so esteemed by shallow ignorance)
   What the sage poets, taught by the heavenly Muse,
   Storied of old in high immortal verse
   Of dire Chimeras and enchanted isles,
   And rifted rocks whose entrance leads to Hell;
   For such there be, but unbelief is blind.
            Within the navel of this hideous wood,
   Immured in cypress shades, a sorcerer dwells,
   Of Bacchus and of Circe born, great Comus,
   Deep skilled in all his mother's witcheries,
   And here to every thirsty wanderer
   By sly enticement gives his baneful cup,
   With many murmurs mixed, whose pleasing poison
   The visage quite transforms of him that drinks,
   And the inglorious likeness of a beast
   Fixes instead, unmoulding reason's mintage
   Charactered in the face. This have I learnt
   Tending my flocks hard by i' the hilly crofts
   That brow this bottom glade; whence night by night
   He and his monstrous rout are heard to howl
   Like stabled wolves, or tigers at their prey,
   Doing abhorred rites to Hecate
   In their obscured haunts of inmost bowers.
   Yet have they many baits and guileful spells
   To inveigle and invite the unwary sense
   Of them that pass unweeting by the way.
   This evening late, by then the chewing flocks
   Had ta'en their supper on the savoury herb
   Of knot-grass dew-besprent, and were in fold,
   I sat me down to watch upon a bank
   With ivy canopied, and interwove
   With flaunting honeysuckle, and began,
   Wrapt in a pleasing fit of melancholy,
   To meditate my rural minstrelsy,
   Till fancy had her fill. But ere a close
   The wonted roar was up amidst the woods,
   And filled the air with barbarous dissonance;
   At which I ceased, and listened them awhile,
   Till an unusual stop of sudden silence
   Gave respite to the drowsy-flighted steeds
   That draw the litter of close-curtained Sleep.
   At last a soft and solemn-breathing sound
   Rose like a steam of rich distilled perfumes,
   And stole upon the air, that even Silence
   Was took ere she was ware, and wished she might
   Deny her nature, and be never more,
   Still to be so displaced. I was all ear,
   And took in strains that might create a soul
   Under the ribs of Death. But, oh! ere long
   Too well I did perceive it was the voice
   Of my most honoured Lady, your dear sister.
   Amazed I stood, harrowed with grief and fear;
   And "O poor hapless nightingale," thought I,
   "How sweet thou sing'st, how near the deadly snare!"
   Then down the lawns I ran with headlong haste,
   Through paths and turnings often trod by day,
   Till, guided by mine ear, I found the place
   Where that damned wizard, hid in sly disguise
   (For so by certain signs I knew), had met
   Already, ere my best speed could prevent,
   The aidless innocent lady, his wished prey;
   Who gently asked if he had seen such two,
   Supposing him some neighbour villager.
   Longer I durst not stay, but soon I guessed
   Ye were the two she meant; with that I sprung
   Into swift flight, till I had found you here;
   But further know I not.
            SEC. BRO.                   O night and shades,
   How are ye joined with hell in triple knot
   Against the unarmed weakness of one virgin,
   Alone and helpless! Is this the confidence
   You gave me, brother?
            ELD. BRO.                   Yes, and keep it still;
   Lean on it safely; not a period
   Shall be unsaid for me. Against the threats
   Of malice or of sorcery, or that power
   Which erring men call Chance, this I hold firm:
   Virtue may be assailed, but never hurt,
   Surprised by unjust force, but not enthralled;
   Yea, even that which Mischief meant most harm
   Shall in the happy trial prove most glory.
   But evil on itself shall back recoil,
   And mix no more with goodness, when at last,
   Gathered like scum, and settled to itself,
   It shall be in eternal restless change
   Self-fed and self-consumed. If this fail,
   The pillared firmament is rottenness,
   And earth's base built on stubble. But come, let's on!
   Against the opposing will and arm of heaven
   May never this just sword be lifted up;
   But, for that damned magician, let him be girt
   With all the grisly legions that troop
   Under the sooty flag of Acheron,
   Harpies and Hydras, or all the monstrous forms
   'Twixt Africa and Ind, I'll find him out,
   And force him to return his purchase back,
   Or drag him by the curls to a foul death,
   Cursed as his life.
            SPIR.         Alas! good venturous youth,
   I love thy courage yet, and bold emprise;
   But here thy sword can do thee little stead.
   Far other arms and other weapons must
   Be those that quell the might of hellish charms.
   He with his bare wand can unthread thy joints,
   And crumble all thy sinews.
            ELD. BRO.                            Why, prithee,
   Shepherd,
   How durst thou then thyself approach so near
   As to make this relation?
            SPIR.                                   Care and utmost
   shifts
   How to secure the Lady from surprisal
   Brought to my mind a certain shepherd lad,
   Of small regard to see to, yet well skilled
   In every virtuous plant and healing herb
   That spreads her verdant leaf to the morning ray.
   He loved me well, and oft would beg me sing;
   Which when I did, he on the tender grass
   Would sit, and hearken even to ecstasy,
   And in requital ope his leathern scrip,
   And show me simples of a thousand names,
   Telling their strange and vigorous faculties.
   Amongst the rest a small unsightly root,
   But of divine effect, he culled me out.
   The leaf was darkish, and had prickles on it,
   But in another country, as he said,
   Bore a bright golden flower, but not in this soil:
   Unknown, and like esteemed, and the dull swain
   Treads on it daily with his clouted shoon;
   And yet more med'cinal is it than that Moly
   That Hermes once to wise Ulysses gave.
   He called it Haemony, and gave it me,
   And bade me keep it as of sovran use
   'Gainst all enchantments, mildew blast, or damp,
   Or ghastly Furies' apparition.
   I pursed it up, but little reckoning made,
   Till now that this extremity compelled.
   But now I find it true; for by this means
   I knew the foul enchanter, though disguised,
   Entered the very lime-twigs of his spells,
   And yet came off. If you have this about you
   (As I will give you when we go), you may
   Boldly assault the necromancer's hall;
   Where if he be, with dauntless hardihood
   And brandished blade rush on him: break his glass,
   And shed the luscious liquor on the ground;
   But seize his wand. Though he and his curst crew
   Fierce sign of battle make, and menace high,
   Or, like the sons of Vulcan, vomit smoke,
   Yet will they soon retire, if he but shrink.
            ELD. BRO. Thyrsis, lead on apace; I'll follow thee;
   And some good angel bear a shield before us!
 
   The Scene changes to a stately palace, set out with all manner of
   deliciousness: soft music, tables spread with all dainties. Comus
   appears with his rabble, and the LADY set in an enchanted chair;
   to
   whom he offers his glass; which she puts by, and goes about to
   rise.
 
            COMUS. Nay, Lady, sit. If I but wave this wand,
   Your nerves are all chained up in alabaster,
   And you a statue, or as Daphne was,
   Root-bound, that fled Apollo.
            LADY.                            Fool, do not boast.
   Thou canst not touch the freedom of my mind
   With all thy charms, although this corporal rind
   Thou hast immanacled while Heaven sees good.
            COMUS. Why are you vexed, Lady? why do you frown?
   Here dwell no frowns, nor anger; from these gates
   Sorrow flies far. See, here be all the pleasures
   That fancy can beget on youthful thoughts,
   When the fresh blood grows lively, and returns
   Brisk as the April buds in primrose season.
   And first behold this cordial julep here,
   That flames and dances in his crystal bounds,
   With spirits of balm and fragrant syrups mixed.
   Not that Nepenthes which the wife of Thone
   In Egypt gave to Jove-born Helena
   Is of such power to stir up joy as this,
   To life so friendly, or so cool to thirst.
   Why should you be so cruel to yourself,
   And to those dainty limbs, which Nature lent
   For gentle usage and soft delicacy?
   But you invert the covenants of her trust,
   And harshly deal, like an ill borrower,
   With that which you received on other terms,
   Scorning the unexempt condition
   By which all mortal frailty must subsist,
   Refreshment after toil, ease after pain,
   That have been tired all day without repast,
   And timely rest have wanted. But, fair virgin,
   This will restore all soon.
            LADY.                         'T will not, false
   traitor!
   'T will not restore the truth and honesty
   That thou hast banished from thy tongue with lies.
   Was this the cottage and the safe abode
   Thou told'st me of? What grim aspects are these,
   These oughly-headed monsters? Mercy guard me!
   Hence with thy brewed enchantments, foul deceiver!
   Hast thou betrayed my credulous innocence
   With vizored falsehood and base forgery?
   And would'st thou seek again to trap me here
   With liquorish baits, fit to ensnare a brute?
   Were it a draught for Juno when she banquets,
   I would not taste thy treasonous offer. None
   But such as are good men can give good things;
   And that which is not good is not delicious
   To a well-governed and wise appetite.
            COMUS. O foolishness of men! that lend their ears
   To those budge doctors of the Stoic fur,
   And fetch their precepts from the Cynic tub,
   Praising the lean and sallow Abstinence!
   Wherefore did Nature pour her bounties forth
   With such a full and unwithdrawing hand,
   Covering the earth with odours, fruits, and flocks,
   Thronging the seas with spawn innumerable,
   But all to please and sate the curious taste?
   And set to work millions of spinning worms,
   That in their green shops weave the smooth-haired silk,
   To deck her sons; and, that no corner might
   Be vacant of her plenty, in her own loins
   She hutched the all-worshipped ore and precious gems,
   To store her children with. If all the world
   Should, in a pet of temperance, feed on pulse,
   Drink the clear stream, and nothing wear but frieze,
   The All-giver would be unthanked, would be unpraised,
   Not half his riches known and yet despised;
   And we should serve him as a grudging master,
   As a penurious niggard of his wealth,
   And live like Nature's bastards, not her sons,
   Who would be quite surcharged with her own weight,
   And strangled with her waste fertility:
   The earth cumbered, and the winged air darked with plumes,
   The herds would over-multitude their lords;
   The sea o'erfraught would swell, and the unsought diamonds
   Would so emblaze the forehead of the deep,
   And so bestud with stars, that they below
   Would grow inured to light, and come at last
   To gaze upon the sun with shameless brows.
   List, Lady; be not coy, and be not cozened
   With that same vaunted name, Virginity.
   Beauty is Nature's coin; must not be hoarded,
   But must be current; and the good thereof
   Consists in mutual and partaken bliss,
   Unsavoury in the enjoyment of itself.
   If you let slip time, like a neglected rose
   It withers on the stalk with languished head.
   Beauty is Nature's brag, and must be shown
   In courts, at feasts, and high solemnities,
   Where most may wonder at the workmanship.
   It is for homely features to keep home;
   They had their name thence: coarse complexions
   And cheeks of sorry grain will serve to ply
   The sampler, and to tease the huswife's wool.
   What need a vermeil-tinctured lip for that,
   Love-darting eyes, or tresses like the morn?
   There was another meaning in these gifts;
   Think what, and be advised; you are but young yet.
           LADY. I had not thought to have unlocked my lips
   In this unhallowed air, but that this juggler
   Would think to charm my judgment, as mine eyes,
   Obtruding false rules pranked in reason's garb.
   I hate when vice can bolt her arguments
   And virtue has no tongue to check her pride.
   Impostor! do not charge most innocent Nature,
   As if she would her children should be riotous
   With her abundance. She, good cateress,
   Means her provision only to the good,
   That live according to her sober laws,
   And holy dictate of spare Temperance.
   If every just man that now pines with want
   Had but a moderate and beseeming share
   Of that which lewdly-pampered Luxury
   Now heaps upon some few with vast excess,
   Nature's full blessings would be well dispensed
   In unsuperfluous even proportion,
   And she no whit encumbered with her store;
   And then the Giver would be better thanked,
   His praise due paid: for swinish gluttony
   Ne'er looks to Heaven amidst his gorgeous feast,
   But with besotted base ingratitude
   Crams, and blasphemes his Feeder. Shall I go on
   Or have I said enow? To him that dares
   Arm his profane tongue with contemptuous words
   Against the sun-clad power of chastity
   Fain would I something say;--yet to what end?
   Thou hast nor ear, nor soul, to apprehend
   The sublime notion and high mystery
   That must be uttered to unfold the sage
   And serious doctrine of Virginity;
   And thou art worthy that thou shouldst not know
   More happiness than this thy present lot.
   Enjoy your dear wit, and gay rhetoric,
   That hath so well been taught her dazzling fence;
   Thou art not fit to hear thyself convinced.
   Yet, should I try, the uncontrolled worth
   Of this pure cause would kindle my rapt spirits
   To such a flame of sacred vehemence
   That dumb things would be moved to sympathise,
   And the brute Earth would lend her nerves, and shake,
   Till all thy magic structures, reared so high,
   Were shattered into heaps o'er thy false head.
           COMUS. She fables not. I feel that I do fear
   Her words set off by some superior power;
   And, though not mortal, yet a cold shuddering dew
   Dips me all o'er, as when the wrath of Jove
   Speaks thunder and the chains of Erebus
   To some of Saturn's crew. I must dissemble,
   And try her yet more strongly.--Come, no more!
   This is mere moral babble, and direct
   Against the canon laws of our foundation.
   I must not suffer this; yet 't is but the lees
   And settlings of a melancholy blood.
   But this will cure all straight; one sip of this
   Will bathe the drooping spirits in delight
   Beyond the bliss of dreams. Be wise, and taste.
 
   The BROTHERS rush in with swords drawn, wrest his glass out of
   his
   hand, and break it against the ground: his rout make sign of
   resistance, but are all driven in. The ATTENDANT SPIRIT comes in.
 
            SPIR. What! have you let the false enchanter scape?
   O ye mistook; ye should have snatched his wand,
   And bound him fast. Without his rod reversed,
   And backward mutters of dissevering power,
   We cannot free the Lady that sits here
   In stony fetters fixed and motionless.
   Yet stay: be not disturbed; now I bethink me,
   Some other means I have which may be used,
   Which once of Meliboeus old I learnt,
   The soothest shepherd that e'er piped on plains.
            There is a gentle Nymph not far from hence,
   That with moist curb sways the smooth Severn stream:
   Sabrina is her name: a virgin pure;
   Whilom she was the daughter of Locrine,
   That had the sceptre from his father Brute.
   She, guiltless damsel, flying the mad pursuit
   Of her enraged stepdame, Guendolen,
   Commended her fair innocence to the flood
   That stayed her flight with his cross-flowing course.
   The water-nymphs, that in the bottom played,
   Held up their pearled wrists, and took her in,
   Bearing her straight to aged Nereus' hall;
   Who, piteous of her woes, reared her lank head,
   And gave her to his daughters to imbathe
   In nectared lavers strewed with asphodil,
   And through the porch and inlet of each sense
   Dropt in ambrosial oils, till she revived,
   And underwent a quick immortal change,
   Made Goddess of the river. Still she retains
   Her maiden gentleness, and oft at eve
   Visits the herds along the twilight meadows,
   Helping all urchin blasts, and ill-luck signs
   That the shrewd meddling elf delights to make,
   Which she with precious vialed liquors heals:
   For which the shepherds, at their festivals,
   Carol her goodness loud in rustic lays,
   And throw sweet garland wreaths into her stream
   Of pansies, pinks, and gaudy daffodils.
   And, as the old swain said, she can unlock
   The clasping charm, and thaw the numbing spell,
   If she be right invoked in warbled song;
   For maidenhood she loves, and will be swift
   To aid a virgin, such as was herself,
   In hard-besetting need. This will I try,
   And add the power of some adjuring verse.
 
 
   SONG.
 
            Sabrina fair,
                     Listen where thou art sitting
            Under the glassy, cool, translucent wave,
                     In twisted braids of lilies knitting
            The loose train of thy amber-dropping hair;
                     Listen for dear honour's sake,
            Goddess of the silver lake,
                     Listen and save!
 
   Listen, and appear to us,
   In name of great Oceanus.
   By the earth-shaking Neptune's mace,
   And Tethys' grave majestic pace;
   By hoary Nereus' wrinkled look,
   And the Carpathian wizard's hook;
   By scaly Triton's winding shell,
   And old soothsaying Glaucus' spell;
   By Leucothea's lovely hands,
   And her son that rules the strands;
   By Thetis' tinsel-slippered feet,
   And the songs of Sirens sweet;
   By dead Parthenope's dear tomb,
   And fair Ligea's golden comb,
   Wherewith she sits on diamond rocks
   Sleeking her soft alluring locks;
   By all the Nymphs that nightly dance
   Upon thy streams with wily glance;
   Rise, rise, and heave thy rosy head
   From thy coral-paven bed,
   And bridle in thy headlong wave,
   Till thou our summons answered have.
                                   Listen and save!
 
   SABRINA rises, attended by water-nymphs, and sings.
 
   By the rushy-fringed bank,
   Where grows the willow and the osier dank,
            My sliding chariot stays,
   Thick set with agate, and the azurn sheen
   Of turkis blue, and emerald green,
            That in the channel strays;
   Whilst from off the waters fleet
   Thus I set my printless feet
   O'er the cowslip's velvet head,
            That bends not as I tread.
   Gentle swain, at thy request
            I am here!
 
            SPIR. Goddess dear,
   We implore thy powerful hand
   To undo the charmed band
   Of true virgin here distressed
   Through the force and through the wile
   Of unblessed enchanter vile.
            SABR. Shepherd, 't is my office best
   To help ensnared chastity.
   Brightest Lady, look on me.
   Thus I sprinkle on thy breast
   Drops that from my fountain pure
   I have kept of precious cure;
   Thrice upon thy finger's tip,
   Thrice upon thy rubied lip:
   Next this marble venomed seat,
   Smeared with gums of glutinous heat,
   I touch with chaste palms moist and cold.
   Now the spell hath lost his hold;
   And I must haste ere morning hour
   To wait in Amphitrite's bower.
 
   SABRINA descends, and the LADY rises out of her seat.
 
            SPIR. Virgin, daughter of Locrine,
   Sprung of old Anchises' line,
   May thy brimmed waves for this
   Their full tribute never miss
   From a thousand petty rills,
   That tumble down the snowy hills:
   Summer drouth or singed air
   Never scorch thy tresses fair,
   Nor wet October's torrent flood
   Thy molten crystal fill with mud;
   May thy billows roll ashore
   The beryl and the golden ore;
   May thy lofty head be crowned
   With many a tower and terrace round,
   And here and there thy banks upon
   With groves of myrrh and cinnamon.
            Come, Lady; while Heaven lends us grace,
   Let us fly this cursed place,
   Lest the sorcerer us entice
   With some other new device.
   Not a waste or needless sound
   Till we come to holier ground.
   I shall be your faithful guide
   Through this gloomy covert wide;
   And not many furlongs thence
   Is your Father's residence,
   Where this night are met in state
   Many a friend to gratulate
   His wished presence, and beside
   All the swains that there abide
   With jigs and rural dance resort.
   We shall catch them at their sport,
   And our sudden coming there
   Will double all their mirth and cheer.
   Come, let us haste; the stars grow high,
   But Night sits monarch yet in the mid sky.
 
   The Scene changes, presenting Ludlow Town, and the President's
   Castle: then come in Country Dancers; after them the ATTENDANT
   SPIRIT, with the two BROTHERS and the LADY.
 
                         SONG.
 
            SPIR. Back, shepherds, back! Enough your play
   Till next sun-shine holiday.
   Here be, without duck or nod,
   Other trippings to be trod
   Of lighter toes, and such court guise
   As Mercury did first devise
   With the mincing Dryades
   On the lawns and on the leas.
 
   The second Song presents them to their Father and Mother.
 
            Noble Lord and Lady bright,
   I have brought ye new delight.
   Here behold so goodly grown
   Three fair branches of your own.
   Heaven hath timely tried their youth,
   Their faith, their patience, and their truth,
   And sent them here through hard assays
   With a crown of deathless praise,
   To triumph in victorious dance
   O'er sensual folly and intemperance.
 
   The dances ended, the SPIRIT epiloguizes.
 
            SPIR. To the ocean now I fly,
   And those happy climes that lie
   Where day never shuts his eye,
   Up in the broad fields of the sky.
   There I suck the liquid air,
   All amidst the gardens fair
   Of Hesperus, and his daughters three
   That sing about the golden tree.
   Along the crisped shades and bowers
   Revels the spruce and jocund Spring;
   The Graces and the rosy-bosomed Hours
   Thither all their bounties bring.
   There eternal Summer dwells;
   And west winds with musky wing
   About the cedarn alleys fling
   Nard and cassia's balmy smells.
   Iris there with humid bow
   Waters the odorous banks, that blow
   Flowers of more mingled hue
   Than her purfled scarf can shew,
   And drenches with Elysian dew
   (List, mortals, if your ears be true)
   Beds of hyacinth and roses,
   Where young Adonis oft reposes,
   Waxing well of his deep wound,
   In slumber soft, and on the ground
   Sadly sits the Assyrian queen.
   But far above, in spangled sheen,
   Celestial Cupid, her famed son, advanced
   Holds his dear Psyche, sweet entranced
   After her wandering labours long,
   Till free consent the gods among
   Make her his eternal bride,
   And from her fair unspotted side
   Two blissful twins are to be born,
   Youth and Joy; so Jove hath sworn.
            But now my task is smoothly done:
   I can fly, or I can run,
   Quickly to the green earth's end,
   Where the bowed welkin slow doth bend,
   And from thence can soar as soon
   To the corners of the moon.
   Mortals, that would follow me,
   Love virtue; she alone is free.
   She can teach ye how to climb
   Higher than the sphery chime;
   Or, if Virtue feeble were,
   Heaven itself would stoop to her.
 
 
 
 
   LYCIDAS
 
 
   In this Monody the author bewails a learned Friend, unfortunately
   drowned  in his passage from Chester on the Irish Seas, 1637;
   and,
   by occasion, foretells the ruin of our corrupted Clergy, then in
   their height.
 
 
   YET once more, O ye laurels, and once more,
   Ye myrtles brown, with ivy never sere,
   I come to pluck your berries harsh and crude,
   And with forced fingers rude
   Shatter your leaves before the mellowing year.
   Bitter constraint and sad occasion dear
   Compels me to disturb your season due;
   For Lycidas is dead, dead ere his prime,
   Young Lycidas, and hath not left his peer.
   Who would not sing for Lycidas? he knew
   Himself to sing, and build the lofty rhyme.
   He must not float upon his watery bier
   Unwept, and welter to the parching wind,
   Without the meed of some melodious tear.
            Begin, then, Sisters of the sacred well
   That from beneath the seat of Jove doth spring;
   Begin, and somewhat loudly sweep the string.
   Hence with denial vain and coy excuse:
   So may some gentle Muse
   With lucky words favour my destined urn,
   And as he passes turn,
   And bid fair peace be to my sable shroud!
            For we were nursed upon the self-same hill,
   Fed the same flock, by fountain, shade, and rill;
   Together both, ere the high lawns appeared
   Under the opening eyelids of the Morn,
   We drove a-field, and both together heard
   What time the grey-fly winds her sultry horn,
   Battening our flocks with the fresh dews of night,
   Oft till the star that rose at evening bright
   Toward heaven's descent had sloped his westering wheel.
   Meanwhile the rural ditties were not mute;
   Tempered to the oaten flute,
   Rough Satyrs danced, and Fauns with cloven heel
   From the glad sound would not be absent long;
   And old Damoetas loved to hear our song.
            But, oh! the heavy change, now thou art gone,
   Now thou art gone and never must return!
   Thee, Shepherd, thee the woods and desert caves,
   With wild thyme and the gadding vine o'ergrown,
   And all their echoes, mourn.
   The willows, and the hazel copses green,
   Shall now no more be seen
   Fanning their joyous leaves to thy soft lays.
   As killing as the canker to the rose,
   Or taint-worm to the weanling herds that graze,
   Or frost to flowers, that their gay wardrobe wear,
   When first the white-thorn blows;
   Such, Lycidas, thy loss to shepherd's ear.
            Where were ye, Nymphs, when the remorseless deep
   Closed o'er the head of your loved Lycidas?
   For neither were ye playing on the steep
   Where your old bards, the famous Druids, lie,
   Nor on the shaggy top of Mona high,
   Nor yet where Deva spreads her wizard stream.
   Ay me! I fondly dream
   RHad ye been there, S . . . for what could that have done?
   What could the Muse herself that Orpheus bore,
   The Muse herself, for her enchanting son,
   Whom universal nature did lament,
   When, by the rout that made the hideous roar,
   His gory visage down the stream was sent,
   Down the swift Hebrus to the Lesbian shore?
            Alas! what boots it with uncessant care
   To tend the homely, slighted, shepherd's trade,
   And strictly meditate the thankless Muse?
   Were it not better done, as others use,
   To sport with Amaryllis in the shade,
   Or with the tangles of Neaera's hair?
   Fame is the spur that the clear spirit doth raise
   (That last infirmity of noble mind)
   To scorn delights and live laborious days;
   But, the fair guerdon when we hope to find,
   And think to burst out into sudden blaze,
   Comes the blind Fury with the abhorred shears,
   And slits the thin-spun life. "But not the praise,"
   Phoebus replied, and touched my trembling ears:
   "Fame is no plant that grows on mortal soil,
   Nor in the glistering foil
   Set off to the world, nor in broad rumour lies,
   But lives and spreads aloft by those pure eyes
   And perfect witness of all-judging Jove;
   As he pronounces lastly on each deed,
   Of so much fame in heaven expect thy meed."
            O fountain Arethuse, and thou honoured flood,
   Smooth-sliding Mincius, crowned with vocal reeds,
   That strain I heard was of a higher mood.
   But now my oat proceeds,
   And listens to the Herald of the Sea,
   That came in Neptune's plea.
   He asked the waves, and asked the felon winds,
   What hard mishap hath doomed this gentle swain?
   And questioned every gust of rugged wings
   That blows from off each beaked promontory.
   They knew not of his story;
   And sage Hippotades their answer brings,
   That not a blast was from his dungeon strayed:
   The air was calm, and on the level brine
   Sleek Panope with all her sisters played.
   It was that fatal and perfidious bark,
   Built in the eclipse, and rigged with curses dark,
   That sunk so low that sacred head of thine.
            Next, Camus, reverend sire, went footing slow,
   His mantle hairy, and his bonnet sedge,
   Inwrought with figures dim, and on the edge
   Like to that sanguine flower inscribed with woe.
   "Ah! who hath reft," quoth he, "my dearest pledge?"
   Last came, and last did go,
   The Pilot of the Galilean Lake;
   Two massy keys he bore of metals twain.
   (The golden opes, the iron shuts amain).
   He shook his mitred locks, and stern bespake:--
   "How well could I have spared for thee, young swain,
   Enow of such as, for their bellies' sake,
   Creep, and intrude, and climb into the fold!
   Of other care they little reckoning make
   Than how to scramble at the shearers' feast,
   And shove away the worthy bidden guest.
   Blind mouths! that scarce themselves know how to hold
    A sheep-hook, or have learnt aught else the least
   That to the faithful herdman's art belongs!
   What recks it them? What need they? They are sped:
   And, when they list, their lean and flashy songs
   Grate on their scrannel pipes of wretched straw;
   The hungry sheep look up, and are not fed,
   But, swoln with wind and the rank mist they draw,
   Rot inwardly, and foul contagion spread;
   Besides what the grim wolf with privy paw
   Daily devours apace, and nothing said.
   But that two-handed engine at the door
   Stands ready to smite once, and smite no more."
            Return, Alpheus; the dread voice is past
   That shrunk thy streams; return Sicilian Muse,
   And call the vales, and bid them hither cast
   Their bells and flowerets of a thousand hues.
   Ye valleys low, where the mild whispers use
   Of shades, and wanton winds, and gushing brooks,
   On whose fresh lap the swart star sparely looks,
   Throw hither all your quaint enamelled eyes,
   That on the green turf suck the honeyed showers,
   And purple all the ground with vernal flowers.
   Bring the rathe primrose that forsaken dies,
   The tufted crow-toe, and pale jessamine,
   The white pink, and the pansy freaked with jet,
   The glowing violet,
   The musk-rose, and the well-attired woodbine,
   With cowslips wan that hang the pensive head,
   And every flower that sad embroidery wears;
   Bid amaranthus all his beauty shed,
   And daffadillies fill their cups with tears,
   To strew the laureate hearse where Lycid lies.
   For so, to interpose a little ease,
   Let our frail thoughts dally with false surmise,
   Ay me! whilst thee the shores and sounding seas
   Wash far away, where'er thy bones are hurled;
   Whether beyond the stormy Hebrides,
   Where thou perhaps under the whelming tide
   Visit'st the bottom of the monstrous world;
   Or whether thou, to our moist vows denied,
   Sleep'st by the fable of Bellerus old,
   Where the great Vision of the guarded mount
   Looks toward Namancos and Bayona's hold.
   Look homeward, Angel, now, and melt with ruth:
   And, O ye dolphins, waft the hapless youth.
            Weep no more, woeful shepherds, weep no more,
   For Lycidas, your sorrow, is not dead,
   Sunk though he be beneath the watery floor.
   So sinks the day-star in the ocean bed,
   And yet anon repairs his drooping head,
   And tricks his beams, and with new-spangled ore
   Flames in the forehead of the morning sky:
   So Lycidas sunk low, but mounted high,
   Through the dear might of Him that walked the waves,
   Where, other groves and other streams along,
   With nectar pure his oozy locks he laves,
   And hears the unexpressive nuptial song,
   In the blest kingdoms meek of joy and love.
   There entertain him all the Saints above,
   In solemn troops, and sweet societies,
   That Sing, and singing in their glory move,
   And wipe the tears for ever from his eyes.
   Now, Lycidas, the shepherds weep no more;
   Henceforth thou art the Genius of the shore,
   In thy large recompense, and shalt be good
   To all that wander in that perilous flood.
            Thus sang the uncouth swain to the oaks and rills,
   While the still morn went out with sandals grey:
   He touched the tender stops of various quills,
   With eager thought warbling his Doric lay:
   And now the sun had stretched out all the hills,
   And now was dropt into the western bay.
   At last he rose, and twitched his mantle blue:
   Tomorrow to fresh woods, and pastures new.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of L'Allegro, Il Penseroso, Comus, and

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   PARADISE REGAINED
 
 
   by
 
   John Milton
 
 
 
 
   THE FIRST BOOK
 
   I, WHO erewhile the happy Garden sung
   By one man's disobedience lost, now sing
   Recovered Paradise to all mankind,
   By one man's firm obedience fully tried
   Through all temptation, and the Tempter foiled
   In all his wiles, defeated and repulsed,
   And Eden raised in the waste Wilderness.
     Thou Spirit, who led'st this glorious Eremite
   Into the desert, his victorious field
   Against the spiritual foe, and brought'st him thence        10
   By proof the undoubted Son of God, inspire,
   As thou art wont, my prompted song, else mute,
   And bear through highth or depth of Nature's bounds,
   With prosperous wing full summed, to tell of deeds
   Above heroic, though in secret done,
   And unrecorded left through many an age:
   Worthy to have not remained so long unsung.
     Now had the great Proclaimer, with a voice
   More awful than the sound of trumpet, cried
   Repentance, and Heaven's kingdom nigh at hand               20
   To all baptized.  To his great baptism flocked
   With awe the regions round, and with them came
   From Nazareth the son of Joseph deemed
   To the flood Jordan--came as then obscure,
   Unmarked, unknown.  But him the Baptist soon
   Descried, divinely warned, and witness bore
   As to his worthier, and would have resigned
   To him his heavenly office.  Nor was long
   His witness unconfirmed: on him baptized
   Heaven opened, and in likeness of a Dove                    30
   The Spirit descended, while the Father's voice
   From Heaven pronounced him his beloved Son.
   That heard the Adversary, who, roving still
   About the world, at that assembly famed
   Would not be last, and, with the voice divine
   Nigh thunder-struck, the exalted man to whom
   Such high attest was given a while surveyed
   With wonder; then, with envy fraught and rage,
   Flies to his place, nor rests, but in mid air
   To council summons all his mighty Peers,                    40
   Within thick clouds and dark tenfold involved,
   A gloomy consistory; and them amidst,
   With looks aghast and sad, he thus bespake:--
     "O ancient Powers of Air and this wide World
   (For much more willingly I mention Air,
   This our old conquest, than remember Hell,
   Our hated habitation), well ye know
   How many ages, as the years of men,
   This Universe we have possessed, and ruled
   In manner at our will the affairs of Earth,                 50
   Since Adam and his facile consort Eve
   Lost Paradise, deceived by me, though since
   With dread attending when that fatal wound
   Shall be inflicted by the seed of Eve
   Upon my head.  Long the decrees of Heaven
   Delay, for longest time to Him is short;
   And now, too soon for us, the circling hours
   This dreaded time have compassed, wherein we
   Must bide the stroke of that long-threatened wound
   (At least, if so we can, and by the head                    60
   Broken be not intended all our power
   To be infringed, our freedom and our being
   In this fair empire won of Earth and Air)--
   For this ill news I bring: The Woman's Seed,
   Destined to this, is late of woman born.
   His birth to our just fear gave no small cause;
   But his growth now to youth's full flower, displaying
   All virtue, grace and wisdom to achieve
   Things highest, greatest, multiplies my fear.
   Before him a great Prophet, to proclaim                     70
   His coming, is sent harbinger, who all
   Invites, and in the consecrated stream
   Pretends to wash off sin, and fit them so
   Purified to receive him pure, or rather
   To do him honour as their King.  All come,
   And he himself among them was baptized--
   Not thence to be more pure, but to receive
   The testimony of Heaven, that who he is
   Thenceforth the nations may not doubt.  I saw
   The Prophet do him reverence; on him, rising                80
   Out of the water, Heaven above the clouds
   Unfold her crystal doors; thence on his head
   A perfet Dove descend (whate'er it meant);
   And out of Heaven the sovraign voice I heard,
   'This is my Son beloved,--in him am pleased.'
   His mother, than, is mortal, but his Sire
   He who obtains the monarchy of Heaven;
   And what will He not do to advance his Son?
   His first-begot we know, and sore have felt,
   When his fierce thunder drove us to the Deep;               90
   Who this is we must learn, for Man he seems
   In all his lineaments, though in his face
   The glimpses of his Father's glory shine.
   Ye see our danger on the utmost edge
   Of hazard, which admits no long debate,
   But must with something sudden be opposed
   (Not force, but well-couched fraud, well-woven snares),
   Ere in the head of nations he appear,
   Their king, their leader, and supreme on Earth.
   I, when no other durst, sole undertook                      100
   The dismal expedition to find out
   And ruin Adam, and the exploit performed
   Successfully: a calmer voyage now
   Will waft me; and the way found prosperous once
   Induces best to hope of like success."
     He ended, and his words impression left
   Of much amazement to the infernal crew,
   Distracted and surprised with deep dismay
   At these sad tidings.  But no time was then
   For long indulgence to their fears or grief:                110
   Unanimous they all commit the care
   And management of this man enterprise
   To him, their great Dictator, whose attempt
   At first against mankind so well had thrived
   In Adam's overthrow, and led their march
   From Hell's deep-vaulted den to dwell in light,
   Regents, and potentates, and kings, yea gods,
   Of many a pleasant realm and province wide.
   So to the coast of Jordan he directs
   His easy steps, girded with snaky wiles,                    120
   Where he might likeliest find this new-declared,
   This man of men, attested Son of God,
   Temptation and all guile on him to try--
   So to subvert whom he suspected raised
   To end his reign on Earth so long enjoyed:
   But, contrary, unweeting he fulfilled
   The purposed counsel, pre-ordained and fixed,
   Of the Most High, who, in full frequence bright
   Of Angels, thus to Gabriel smiling spake:--
     "Gabriel, this day, by proof, thou shalt behold,          130
   Thou and all Angels conversant on Earth
   With Man or men's affairs, how I begin
   To verify that solemn message late,
   On which I sent thee to the Virgin pure
   In Galilee, that she should bear a son,
   Great in renown, and called the Son of God.
   Then told'st her, doubting how these things could be
   To her a virgin, that on her should come
   The Holy Ghost, and the power of the Highest
   O'ershadow her.  This Man, born and now upgrown,            140
   To shew him worthy of his birth divine
   And high prediction, henceforth I expose
   To Satan; let him tempt, and now assay
   His utmost subtlety, because he boasts
   And vaunts of his great cunning to the throng
   Of his Apostasy.  He might have learnt
   Less overweening, since he failed in Job,
   Whose constant perseverance overcame
   Whate'er his cruel malice could invent.
   He now shall know I can produce a man,                      150
   Of female seed, far abler to resist
   All his solicitations, and at length
   All his vast force, and drive him back to Hell--
   Winning by conquest what the first man lost
   By fallacy surprised.  But first I mean
   To exercise him in the Wilderness;
   There he shall first lay down the rudiments
   Of his great warfare, ere I send him forth
   To conquer Sin and Death, the two grand foes.
   By humiliation and strong sufferance                        160
   His weakness shall o'ercome Satanic strength,
   And all the world, and mass of sinful flesh;
   That all the Angels and aethereal Powers--
   They now, and men hereafter--may discern
   From what consummate virtue I have chose
   This perfet man, by merit called my Son,
   To earn salvation for the sons of men."
     So spake the Eternal Father, and all Heaven
   Admiring stood a space; then into hymns
   Burst forth, and in celestial measures moved,               170
   Circling the throne and singing, while the hand
   Sung with the voice, and this the argument:--
     "Victory and triumph to the Son of God,
   Now entering his great duel, not of arms,
   But to vanquish by wisdom hellish wiles!
   The Father knows the Son; therefore secure
   Ventures his filial virtue, though untried,
   Against whate'er may tempt, whate'er seduce,
   Allure, or terrify, or undermine.
   Be frustrate, all ye stratagems of Hell,                    180
   And, devilish machinations, come to nought!"
     So they in Heaven their odes and vigils tuned.
   Meanwhile the Son of God, who yet some days
   Lodged in Bethabara, where John baptized,
   Musing and much revolving in his breast
   How best the mighty work he might begin
   Of Saviour to mankind, and which way first
   Publish his godlike office now mature,
   One day forth walked alone, the Spirit leading
   And his deep thoughts, the better to converse               190
   With solitude, till, far from track of men,
   Thought following thought, and step by step led on,
   He entered now the bordering Desert wild,
   And, with dark shades and rocks environed round,
   His holy meditations thus pursued:--
     "O what a multitude of thoughts at once
   Awakened in me swarm, while I consider
   What from within I feel myself, and hear
   What from without comes often to my ears,
   Ill sorting with my present state compared!                 200
   When I was yet a child, no childish play
   To me was pleasing; all my mind was set
   Serious to learn and know, and thence to do,
   What might be public good; myself I thought
   Born to that end, born to promote all truth,
   All righteous things.  Therefore, above my years,
   The Law of God I read, and found it sweet;
   Made it my whole delight, and in it grew
   To such perfection that, ere yet my age
   Had measured twice six years, at our great Feast            210
   I went into the Temple, there to hear
   The teachers of our Law, and to propose
   What might improve my knowledge or their own,
   And was admired by all.  Yet this not all
   To which my spirit aspired.  Victorious deeds
   Flamed in my heart, heroic acts--one while
   To rescue Israel from the Roman yoke;
   Then to subdue and quell, o'er all the earth,
   Brute violence and proud tyrannic power,
   Till truth were freed, and equity restored:                 220
   Yet held it more humane, more heavenly, first
   By winning words to conquer willing hearts,
   And make persuasion do the work of fear;
   At least to try, and teach the erring soul,
   Not wilfully misdoing, but unware
   Misled; the stubborn only to subdue.
   These growing thoughts my mother soon perceiving,
   By words at times cast forth, inly rejoiced,
   And said to me apart, 'High are thy thoughts,
   O Son! but nourish them, and let them soar                  230
   To what highth sacred virtue and true worth
   Can raise them, though above example high;
   By matchless deeds express thy matchless Sire.
   For know, thou art no son of mortal man;
   Though men esteem thee low of parentage,
   Thy Father is the Eternal King who rules
   All Heaven and Earth, Angels and sons of men.
   A messenger from God foretold thy birth
   Conceived in me a virgin; he foretold
   Thou shouldst be great, and sit on David's throne,          240
   And of thy kingdom there should be no end.
   At thy nativity a glorious quire
   Of Angels, in the fields of Bethlehem, sung
   To shepherds, watching at their folds by night,
   And told them the Messiah now was born,
   Where they might see him; and to thee they came,
   Directed to the manger where thou lay'st;
   For in the inn was left no better room.
   A Star, not seen before, in heaven appearing,
   Guided the Wise Men thither from the East,                  250
   To honour thee with incense, myrrh, and gold;
   By whose bright course led on they found the place,
   Affirming it thy star, new-graven in heaven,
   By which they knew thee King of Israel born.
   Just Simeon and prophetic Anna, warned
   By vision, found thee in the Temple, and spake,
   Before the altar and the vested priest,
   Like things of thee to all that present stood.'
   This having heart, straight I again revolved
   The Law and Prophets, searching what was writ               260
   Concerning the Messiah, to our scribes
   Known partly, and soon found of whom they spake
   I am--this chiefly, that my way must lie
   Through many a hard assay, even to the death,
   Ere I the promised kingdom can attain,
   Or work redemption for mankind, whose sins'
   Full weight must be transferred upon my head.
   Yet, neither thus disheartened or dismayed,
   The time prefixed I waited; when behold
   The Baptist (of whose birth I oft had heard,                270
   Not knew by sight) now come, who was to come
   Before Messiah, and his way prepare!
   I, as all others, to his baptism came,
   Which I believed was from above; but he
   Straight knew me, and with loudest voice proclaimed
   Me him (for it was shewn him so from Heaven)--
   Me him whose harbinger he was; and first
   Refused on me his baptism to confer,
   As much his greater, and was hardly won.
   But, as I rose out of the laving stream,                    280
   Heaven opened her eternal doors, from whence
   The Spirit descended on me like a Dove;
   And last, the sum of all, my Father's voice,
   Audibly heard from Heaven, pronounced me his,
   Me his beloved Son, in whom alone
   He was well pleased: by which I knew the time
   Now full, that I no more should live obscure,
   But openly begin, as best becomes
   The authority which I derived from Heaven.
   And now by some strong motion I am led                      290
   Into this wilderness; to what intent
   I learn not yet.  Perhaps I need not know;
   For what concerns my knowledge God reveals."
     So spake our Morning Star, then in his rise,
   And, looking round, on every side beheld
   A pathless desert, dusk with horrid shades.
   The way he came, not having marked return,
   Was difficult, by human steps untrod;
   And he still on was led, but with such thoughts
   Accompanied of things past and to come                      300
   Lodged in his breast as well might recommend
   Such solitude before choicest society.
     Full forty days he passed--whether on hill
   Sometimes, anon in shady vale, each night
   Under the covert of some ancient oak
   Or cedar to defend him from the dew,
   Or harboured in one cave, is not revealed;
   Nor tasted human food, nor hunger felt,
   Till those days ended; hungered then at last
   Among wild beasts.  They at his sight grew mild,            310
   Nor sleeping him nor waking harmed; his walk
   The fiery serpent fled and noxious worm;
   The lion and fierce tiger glared aloof.
   But now an aged man in rural weeds,
   Following, as seemed, the quest of some stray eye,
   Or withered sticks to gather, which might serve
   Against a winter's day, when winds blow keen,
   To warm him wet returned from field at eve,
   He saw approach; who first with curious eye
   Perused him, then with words thus uttered spake:--          320
     "Sir, what ill chance hath brought thee to this place,
   So far from path or road of men, who pass
   In troop or caravan? for single none
   Durst ever, who returned, and dropt not here
   His carcass, pined with hunger and with droughth.
   I ask the rather, and the more admire,
   For that to me thou seem'st the man whom late
   Our new baptizing Prophet at the ford
   Of Jordan honoured so, and called thee Son
   Of God.  I saw and heard, for we sometimes                  330
   Who dwell this wild, constrained by want, come forth
   To town or village nigh (nighest is far),
   Where aught we hear, and curious are to hear,
   What happens new; fame also finds us out."
     To whom the Son of God:--"Who brought me hither
   Will bring me hence; no other guide I seek."
     "By miracle he may," replied the swain;
   "What other way I see not; for we here
   Live on tough roots and stubs, to thirst inured
   More than the camel, and to drink go far--                  340
   Men to much misery and hardship born.
   But, if thou be the Son of God, command
   That out of these hard stones be made thee bread;
   So shalt thou save thyself, and us relieve
   With food, whereof we wretched seldom taste."
     He ended, and the Son of God replied:--
   "Think'st thou such force in bread?  Is it not written
   (For I discern thee other than thou seem'st),
   Man lives not by bread only, but each word
   Proceeding from the mouth of God, who fed                   350
   Our fathers here with manna?  In the Mount
   Moses was forty days, nor eat nor drank;
   And forty days Eliah without food
   Wandered this barren waste; the same I now.
   Why dost thou, then, suggest to me distrust
   Knowing who I am, as I know who thou art?"
     Whom thus answered the Arch-Fiend, now undisguised:--
   "'Tis true, I am that Spirit unfortunate
   Who, leagued with millions more in rash revolt,
   Kept not my happy station, but was driven                   360
   With them from bliss to the bottomless Deep--
   Yet to that hideous place not so confined
   By rigour unconniving but that oft,
   Leaving my dolorous prison, I enjoy
   Large liberty to round this globe of Earth,
   Or range in the Air; nor from the Heaven of Heavens
   Hath he excluded my resort sometimes.
   I came, among the Sons of God, when he
   Gave up into my hands Uzzean Job,
   To prove him, and illustrate his high worth;                370
   And, when to all his Angels he proposed
   To draw the proud king Ahab into fraud,
   That he might fall in Ramoth, they demurring,
   I undertook that office, and the tongues
   Of all his flattering prophets glibbed with lies
   To his destruction, as I had in charge:
   For what he bids I do.  Though I have lost
   Much lustre of my native brightness, lost
   To be beloved of God, I have not lost
   To love, at least contemplate and admire,                   380
   What I see excellent in good, or fair,
   Or virtuous; I should so have lost all sense.
   What can be then less in me than desire
   To see thee and approach thee, whom I know
   Declared the Son of God, to hear attent
   Thy wisdom, and behold thy godlike deeds?
   Men generally think me much a foe
   To all mankind.  Why should I? they to me
   Never did wrong or violence.  By them
   I lost not what I lost; rather by them                      390
   I gained what I have gained, and with them dwell
   Copartner in these regions of the World,
   If not disposer--lend them oft my aid,
   Oft my advice by presages and signs,
   And answers, oracles, portents, and dreams,
   Whereby they may direct their future life.
   Envy, they say, excites me, thus to gain
   Companions of my misery and woe!
   At first it may be; but, long since with woe
   Nearer acquainted, now I feel by proof                      400
   That fellowship in pain divides not smart,
   Nor lightens aught each man's peculiar load;
   Small consolation, then, were Man adjoined.
   This wounds me most (what can it less?) that Man,
   Man fallen, shall be restored, I never more."
     To whom our Saviour sternly thus replied:--
   "Deservedly thou griev'st, composed of lies
   From the beginning, and in lies wilt end,
   Who boast'st release from Hell, and leave to come
   Into the Heaven of Heavens.  Thou com'st, indeed,           410
   As a poor miserable captive thrall
   Comes to the place where he before had sat
   Among the prime in splendour, now deposed,
   Ejected, emptied, gazed, unpitied, shunned,
   A spectacle of ruin, or of scorn,
   To all the host of Heaven.  The happy place
   Imparts to thee no happiness, no joy--
   Rather inflames thy torment, representing
   Lost bliss, to thee no more communicable;
   So never more in Hell than when in Heaven.                  420
   But thou art serviceable to Heaven's King!
   Wilt thou impute to obedience what thy fear
   Extorts, or pleasure to do ill excites?
   What but thy malice moved thee to misdeem
   Of righteous Job, then cruelly to afflict him
   With all inflictions? but his patience won.
   The other service was thy chosen task,
   To be a liar in four hundred mouths;
   For lying is thy sustenance, thy food.
   Yet thou pretend'st to truth! all oracles                   430
   By thee are given, and what confessed more true
   Among the nations?  That hath been thy craft,
   By mixing somewhat true to vent more lies.
   But what have been thy answers? what but dark,
   Ambiguous, and with double sense deluding,
   Which they who asked have seldom understood,
   And, not well understood, as good not known?
   Who ever, by consulting at thy shrine,
   Returned the wiser, or the more instruct
   To fly or follow what concerned him most,                   440
   And run not sooner to his fatal snare?
   For God hath justly given the nations up
   To thy delusions; justly, since they fell
   Idolatrous.  But, when his purpose is
   Among them to declare his providence,
   To thee not known, whence hast thou then thy truth,
   But from him, or his Angels president
   In every province, who, themselves disdaining
   To approach thy temples, give thee in command
   What, to the smallest tittle, thou shalt say                450
   To thy adorers?  Thou, with trembling fear,
   Or like a fawning parasite, obey'st;
   Then to thyself ascrib'st the truth foretold.
   But this thy glory shall be soon retrenched;
   No more shalt thou by oracling abuse
   The Gentiles; henceforth oracles are ceased,
   And thou no more with pomp and sacrifice
   Shalt be enquired at Delphos or elsewhere--
   At least in vain, for they shall find thee mute.
   God hath now sent his living Oracle                         460
   Into the world to teach his final will,
   And sends his Spirit of Truth henceforth to dwell
   In pious hearts, an inward oracle
   To all truth requisite for men to know."
     So spake our Saviour; but the subtle Fiend,
   Though inly stung with anger and disdain,
   Dissembled, and this answer smooth returned:--
     "Sharply thou hast insisted on rebuke,
   And urged me hard with doings which not will,
   But misery, hath wrested from me.  Where                    470
   Easily canst thou find one miserable,
   And not inforced oft-times to part from truth,
   If it may stand him more in stead to lie,
   Say and unsay, feign, flatter, or abjure?
   But thou art placed above me; thou art Lord;
   From thee I can, and must, submiss, endure
   Cheek or reproof, and glad to scape so quit.
   Hard are the ways of truth, and rough to walk,
   Smooth on the tongue discoursed, pleasing to the ear,
   And tunable as sylvan pipe or song;                         480
   What wonder, then, if I delight to hear
   Her dictates from thy mouth? most men admire
   Virtue who follow not her lore.  Permit me
   To hear thee when I come (since no man comes),
   And talk at least, though I despair to attain.
   Thy Father, who is holy, wise, and pure,
   Suffers the hypocrite or atheous priest
   To tread his sacred courts, and minister
   About his altar, handling holy things,
   Praying or vowing, and voutsafed his voice                  490
   To Balaam reprobate, a prophet yet
   Inspired: disdain not such access to me."
     To whom our Saviour, with unaltered brow:--
   "Thy coming hither, though I know thy scope,
   I bid not, or forbid.  Do as thou find'st
   Permission from above; thou canst not more."
     He added not; and Satan, bowling low
   His gray dissimulation, disappeared,
   Into thin air diffused: for now began
   Night with her sullen wing to double-shade                  500
   The desert; fowls in their clay nests were couched;
   And now wild beasts came forth the woods to roam.
 
 
   THE SECOND BOOK
 
   MEANWHILE the new-baptized, who yet remained
   At Jordan with the Baptist, and had seen
   Him whom they heard so late expressly called
   Jesus Messiah, Son of God, declared,
   And on that high authority had believed,
   And with him talked, and with him lodged--I mean
   Andrew and Simon, famous after known,
   With others, though in Holy Writ not named--
   Now missing him, their joy so lately found,
   So lately found and so abruptly gone,                       10
   Began to doubt, and doubted many days,
   And, as the days increased, increased their doubt.
   Sometimes they thought he might be only shewn,
   And for a time caught up to God, as once
   Moses was in the Mount and missing long,
   And the great Thisbite, who on fiery wheels
   Rode up to Heaven, yet once again to come.
   Therefore, as those young prophets then with care
   Sought lost Eliah, so in each place these
   Nigh to Bethabara--in Jericho                               20
   The city of palms, AEnon, and Salem old,
   Machaerus, and each town or city walled
   On this side the broad lake Genezaret,
   Or in Peraea--but returned in vain.
   Then on the bank of Jordan, by a creek,
   Where winds with reeds and osiers whispering play,
   Plain fishermen (no greater men them call),
   Close in a cottage low together got,
   Their unexpected loss and plaints outbreathed:--
     "Alas, from what high hope to what relapse                30
   Unlooked for are we fallen!  Our eyes beheld
   Messiah certainly now come, so long
   Expected of our fathers; we have heard
   His words, his wisdom full of grace and truth.
   'Now, now, for sure, deliverance is at hand;
   The kingdom shall to Israel be restored:'
   Thus we rejoiced, but soon our joy is turned
   Into perplexity and new amaze.
   For whither is he gone? what accident
   Hath rapt him from us? will he now retire                   40
   After appearance, and again prolong
   Our expectation?  God of Israel,
   Send thy Messiah forth; the time is come.
   Behold the kings of the earth, how they oppress
   Thy Chosen, to what highth their power unjust
   They have exalted, and behind them cast
   All fear of Thee; arise, and vindicate
   Thy glory; free thy people from their yoke!
   But let us wait; thus far He hath performed--
   Sent his Anointed, and to us revealed him                   50
   By his great Prophet pointed at and shown
   In public, and with him we have conversed.
   Let us be glad of this, and all our fears
   Lay on his providence; He will not fail,
   Nor will withdraw him now, nor will recall--
   Mock us with his blest sight, then snatch him hence:
   Soon we shall see our hope, our joy, return."
     Thus they out of their plaints new hope resume
   To find whom at the first they found unsought.
   But to his mother Mary, when she saw                        60
   Others returned from baptism, not her Son,
   Nor left at Jordan tidings of him none,
   Within her breast though calm, her breast though pure,
   Motherly cares and fears got head, and raised
   Some troubled thoughts, which she in sighs thus clad:--
     "Oh, what avails me now that honour high,
   To have conceived of God, or that salute,
   'Hail, highly favoured, among women blest!'
   While I to sorrows am no less advanced,
   And fears as eminent above the lot                          70
   Of other women, by the birth I bore:
   In such a season born, when scarce a shed
   Could be obtained to shelter him or me
   From the bleak air?  A stable was our warmth,
   A manger his; yet soon enforced to fly
   Thence into Egypt, till the murderous king
   Were dead, who sought his life, and, missing, filled
   With infant blood the streets of Bethlehem.
   From Egypt home returned, in Nazareth
   Hath been our dwelling many years; his life                 80
   Private, unactive, calm, contemplative,
   Little suspicious to any king.  But now,
   Full grown to man, acknowledged, as I hear,
   By John the Baptist, and in public shewn,
   Son owned from Heaven by his Father's voice,
   I looked for some great change.  To honour? no;
   But trouble, as old Simeon plain foretold,
   That to the fall and rising he should be
   Of many in Israel, and to a sign
   Spoken against--that through my very soul                   90
   A sword shall pierce.  This is my favoured lot,
   My exaltation to afflictions high!
   Afflicted I may be, it seems, and blest!
   I will not argue that, nor will repine.
   But where delays he now?  Some great intent
   Conceals him.  When twelve years he scarce had seen,
   I lost him, but so found as well I saw
   He could not lose himself, but went about
   His Father's business.  What he meant I mused--
   Since understand; much more his absence now                 100
   Thus long to some great purpose he obscures.
   But I to wait with patience am inured;
   My heart hath been a storehouse long of things
   And sayings laid up, pretending strange events."
     Thus Mary, pondering oft, and oft to mind
   Recalling what remarkably had passed
   Since first her Salutation heard, with thoughts
   Meekly composed awaited the fulfilling:
   The while her Son, tracing the desert wild,
   Sole, but with holiest meditations fed,                     110
   Into himself descended, and at once
   All his great work to come before him set--
   How to begin, how to accomplish best
   His end of being on Earth, and mission high.
   For Satan, with sly preface to return,
   Had left him vacant, and with speed was gone
   Up to the middle region of thick air,
   Where all his Potentates in council sate.
   There, without sign of boast, or sign of joy,
   Solicitous and blank, he thus began:--                      120
     "Princes, Heaven's ancient Sons, AEthereal Thrones--
   Daemonian Spirits now, from the element
   Each of his reign allotted, rightlier called
   Powers of Fire, Air, Water, and Earth beneath
   (So may we hold our place and these mild seats
   Without new trouble!)--such an enemy
   Is risen to invade us, who no less
   Threatens than our expulsion down to Hell.
   I, as I undertook, and with the vote
   Consenting in full frequence was impowered,                 130
   Have found him, viewed him, tasted him; but find
   Far other labour to be undergone
   Than when I dealt with Adam, first of men,
   Though Adam by his wife's allurement fell,
   However to this Man inferior far--
   If he be Man by mother's side, at least
   With more than human gifts from Heaven adorned,
   Perfections absolute, graces divine,
   And amplitude of mind to greatest deeds.
   Therefore I am returned, lest confidence                    140
   Of my success with Eve in Paradise
   Deceive ye to persuasion over-sure
   Of like succeeding here.  I summon all
   Rather to be in readiness with hand
   Or counsel to assist, lest I, who erst
   Thought none my equal, now be overmatched."
     So spake the old Serpent, doubting, and from all
   With clamour was assured their utmost aid
   At his command; when from amidst them rose
   Belial, the dissolutest Spirit that fell,                   150
   The sensualest, and, after Asmodai,
   The fleshliest Incubus, and thus advised:--
     "Set women in his eye and in his walk,
   Among daughters of men the fairest found.
   Many are in each region passing fair
   As the noon sky, more like to goddesses
   Than mortal creatures, graceful and discreet,
   Expert in amorous arts, enchanting tongues
   Persuasive, virgin majesty with mild
   And sweet allayed, yet terrible to approach,                160
   Skilled to retire, and in retiring draw
   Hearts after them tangled in amorous nets.
   Such object hath the power to soften and tame
   Severest temper, smooth the rugged'st brow,
   Enerve, and with voluptuous hope dissolve,
   Draw out with credulous desire, and lead
   At will the manliest, resolutest breast,
   As the magnetic hardest iron draws.
   Women, when nothing else, beguiled the heart
   Of wisest Solomon, and made him build,                      170
   And made him bow, to the gods of his wives."
     To whom quick answer Satan thus returned:--
   "Belial, in much uneven scale thou weigh'st
   All others by thyself.  Because of old
   Thou thyself doat'st on womankind, admiring
   Their shape, their colour, and attractive grace,
   None are, thou think'st, but taken with such toys.
   Before the Flood, thou, with thy lusty crew,
   False titled Sons of God, roaming the Earth,
   Cast wanton eyes on the daughters of men,                   180
   And coupled with them, and begot a race.
   Have we not seen, or by relation heard,
   In courts and regal chambers how thou lurk'st,
   In wood or grove, by mossy fountain-side,
   In valley or green meadow, to waylay
   Some beauty rare, Calisto, Clymene,
   Daphne, or Semele, Antiopa,
   Or Amymone, Syrinx, many more
   Too long--then lay'st thy scapes on names adored,
   Apollo, Neptune, Jupiter, or Pan,                           190
   Satyr, or Faun, or Silvan?  But these haunts
   Delight not all.  Among the sons of men
   How many have with a smile made small account
   Of beauty and her lures, easily scorned
   All her assaults, on worthier things intent!
   Remember that Pellean conqueror,
   A youth, how all the beauties of the East
   He slightly viewed, and slightly overpassed;
   How he surnamed of Africa dismissed,
   In his prime youth, the fair Iberian maid.                  200
   For Solomon, he lived at ease, and, full
   Of honour, wealth, high fare, aimed not beyond
   Higher design than to enjoy his state;
   Thence to the bait of women lay exposed.
   But he whom we attempt is wiser far
   Than Solomon, of more exalted mind,
   Made and set wholly on the accomplishment
   Of greatest things.  What woman will you find,
   Though of this age the wonder and the fame,
   On whom his leisure will voutsafe an eye                    210
   Of fond desire?  Or should she, confident,
   As sitting queen adored on Beauty's throne,
   Descend with all her winning charms begirt
   To enamour, as the zone of Venus once
   Wrought that effect on Jove (so fables tell),
   How would one look from his majestic brow,
   Seated as on the top of Virtue's hill,
   Discountenance her despised, and put to rout
   All her array, her female pride deject,
   Or turn to reverent awe!  For Beauty stands                 220
   In the admiration only of weak minds
   Led captive; cease to admire, and all her plumes
   Fall flat, and shrink into a trivial toy,
   At every sudden slighting quite abashed.
   Therefore with manlier objects we must try
   His constancy--with such as have more shew
   Of worth, of honour, glory, and popular praise
   (Rocks whereon greatest men have oftest wrecked);
   Or that which only seems to satisfy
   Lawful desires of nature, not beyond.                       230
   And now I know he hungers, where no food
   Is to be found, in the wide Wilderness:
   The rest commit to me; I shall let pass
   No advantage, and his strength as oft assay."
     He ceased, and heard their grant in loud acclaim;
   Then forthwith to him takes a chosen band
   Of Spirits likest to himself in guile,
   To be at hand and at his beck appear,
   If cause were to unfold some active scene
   Of various persons, each to know his part;                  240
   Then to the desert takes with these his flight,
   Where still, from shade to shade, the Son of God,
   After forty days' fasting, had remained,
   Now hungering first, and to himself thus said:--
     "Where will this end?  Four times ten days I have passed
   Wandering this woody maze, and human food
   Nor tasted, nor had appetite.  That fast
   To virtue I impute not, or count part
   Of what I suffer here.  If nature need not,
   Or God support nature without repast,                       250
   Though needing, what praise is it to endure?
   But now I feel I hunger; which declares
   Nature hath need of what she asks.  Yet God
   Can satisfy that need some other way,
   Though hunger still remain.  So it remain
   Without this body's wasting, I content me,
   And from the sting of famine fear no harm;
   Nor mind it, fed with better thoughts, that feed
   Me hungering more to do my Father's will."
     It was the hour of night, when thus the Son               260
   Communed in silent walk, then laid him down
   Under the hospitable covert nigh
   Of trees thick interwoven.  There he slept,
   And dreamed, as appetite is wont to dream,
   Of meats and drinks, nature's refreshment sweet.
   Him thought he by the brook of Cherith stood,
   And saw the ravens with their horny beaks
   Food to Elijah bringing even and morn--
   Though ravenous, taught to abstain from what they brought;
   He saw the Prophet also, how he fled                        270
   Into the desert, and how there he slept
   Under a juniper--then how, awaked,
   He found his supper on the coals prepared,
   And by the Angel was bid rise and eat,
   And eat the second time after repose,
   The strength whereof sufficed him forty days:
   Sometimes that with Elijah he partook,
   Or as a guest with Daniel at his pulse.
   Thus wore out night; and now the harald Lark
   Left his ground-nest, high towering to descry               280
   The Morn's approach, and greet her with his song.
   As lightly from his grassy couch up rose
   Our Saviour, and found all was but a dream;
   Fasting he went to sleep, and fasting waked.
   Up to a hill anon his steps he reared,
   From whose high top to ken the prospect round,
   If cottage were in view, sheep-cote, or herd;
   But cottage, herd, or sheep-cote, none he saw--
   Only in a bottom saw a pleasant grove,
   With chaunt of tuneful birds resounding loud.               290
   Thither he bent his way, determined there
   To rest at noon, and entered soon the shade
   High-roofed, and walks beneath, and alleys brown,
   That opened in the midst a woody scene;
   Nature's own work it seemed (Nature taught Art),
   And, to a superstitious eye, the haunt
   Of wood-gods and wood-nymphs.  He viewed it round;
   When suddenly a man before him stood,
   Not rustic as before, but seemlier clad,
   As one in city or court or palace bred,                     300
   And with fair speech these words to him addressed:--
     "With granted leave officious I return,
   But much more wonder that the Son of God
   In this wild solitude so long should bide,
   Of all things destitute, and, well I know,
   Not without hunger.  Others of some note,
   As story tells, have trod this wilderness:
   The fugitive Bond-woman, with her son,
   Outcast Nebaioth, yet found here relief
   By a providing Angel; all the race                          310
   Of Israel here had famished, had not God
   Rained from heaven manna; and that Prophet bold,
   Native of Thebez, wandering here, was fed
   Twice by a voice inviting him to eat.
   Of thee those forty days none hath regard,
   Forty and more deserted here indeed."
     To whom thus Jesus:--"What conclud'st thou hence?
   They all had need; I, as thou seest, have none."
     "How hast thou hunger then?" Satan replied.
   "Tell me, if food were now before thee set,                 320
   Wouldst thou not eat?"  "Thereafter as I like
   the giver," answered Jesus.  "Why should that
   Cause thy refusal?" said the subtle Fiend.
   "Hast thou not right to all created things?
   Owe not all creatures, by just right, to thee
   Duty and service, nor to stay till bid,
   But tender all their power?  Nor mention I
   Meats by the law unclean, or offered first
   To idols--those young Daniel could refuse;
   Nor proffered by an enemy--though who                       330
   Would scruple that, with want oppressed?  Behold,
   Nature ashamed, or, better to express,
   Troubled, that thou shouldst hunger, hath purveyed
   From all the elements her choicest store,
   To treat thee as beseems, and as her Lord
   With honour.  Only deign to sit and eat."
     He spake no dream; for, as his words had end,
   Our Saviour, lifting up his eyes, beheld,
   In ample space under the broadest shade,
   A table richly spread in regal mode,                        340
   With dishes piled and meats of noblest sort
   And savour--beasts of chase, or fowl of game,
   In pastry built, or from the spit, or boiled,
   Grisamber-steamed; all fish, from sea or shore,
   Freshet or purling brook, of shell or fin,
   And exquisitest name, for which was drained
   Pontus, and Lucrine bay, and Afric coast.
   Alas! how simple, to these cates compared,
   Was that crude Apple that diverted Eve!
   And at a stately sideboard, by the wine,                    350
   That fragrant smell diffused, in order stood
   Tall stripling youths rich-clad, of fairer hue
   Than Ganymed or Hylas; distant more,
   Under the trees now tripped, now solemn stood,
   Nymphs of Diana's train, and Naiades
   With fruits and flowers from Amalthea's horn,
   And ladies of the Hesperides, that seemed
   Fairer than feigned of old, or fabled since
   Of faery damsels met in forest wide
   By knights of Logres, or of Lyones,                         360
   Lancelot, or Pelleas, or Pellenore.
   And all the while harmonious airs were heard
   Of chiming strings or charming pipes; and winds
   Of gentlest gale Arabian odours fanned
   From their soft wings, and Flora's earliest smells.
   Such was the splendour; and the Tempter now
   His invitation earnestly renewed:--
     "What doubts the Son of God to sit and eat?
   These are not fruits forbidden; no interdict
   Defends the touching of these viands pure;                  370
   Their taste no knowledge works, at least of evil,
   But life preserves, destroys life's enemy,
   Hunger, with sweet restorative delight.
   All these are Spirits of air, and woods, and springs,
   Thy gentle ministers, who come to pay
   Thee homage, and acknowledge thee their Lord.
   What doubt'st thou, Son of God?  Sit down and eat."
     To whom thus Jesus temperately replied:--
   "Said'st thou not that to all things I had right?
   And who withholds my power that right to use?               380
   Shall I receive by gift what of my own,
   When and where likes me best, I can command?
   I can at will, doubt not, as soon as thou,
   Command a table in this wilderness,
   And call swift flights of Angels ministrant,
   Arrayed in glory, on my cup to attend:
   Why shouldst thou, then, obtrude this diligence
   In vain, where no acceptance it can find?
   And with my hunger what hast thou to do?
   Thy pompous delicacies I contemn,                           390
   And count thy specious gifts no gifts, but guiles."
     To whom thus answered Satan, male-content:--
   "That I have also power to give thou seest;
   If of that power I bring thee voluntary
   What I might have bestowed on whom I pleased,
   And rather opportunely in this place
   Chose to impart to thy apparent need,
   Why shouldst thou not accept it?  But I see
   What I can do or offer is suspect.
   Of these things others quickly will dispose,                400
   Whose pains have earned the far-fet spoil."  With that
   Both table and provision vanished quite,
   With sound of harpies' wings and talons heard;
   Only the importune Tempter still remained,
   And with these words his temptation pursued:--
     "By hunger, that each other creature tames,
   Thou art not to be harmed, therefore not moved;
   Thy temperance, invincible besides,
   For no allurement yields to appetite;
   And all thy heart is set on high designs,                   410
   High actions.  But wherewith to be achieved?
   Great acts require great means of enterprise;
   Thou art unknown, unfriended, low of birth,
   A carpenter thy father known, thyself
   Bred up in poverty and straits at home,
   Lost in a desert here and hunger-bit.
   Which way, or from what hope, dost thou aspire
   To greatness? whence authority deriv'st?
   What followers, what retinue canst thou gain,
   Or at thy heels the dizzy multitude,                        420
   Longer than thou canst feed them on thy cost?
   Money brings honour, friends, conquest, and realms.
   What raised Antipater the Edomite,
   And his son Herod placed on Juda's throne,
   Thy throne, but gold, that got him puissant friends?
   Therefore, if at great things thou wouldst arrive,
   Get riches first, get wealth, and treasure heap--
   Not difficult, if thou hearken to me.
   Riches are mine, fortune is in my hand;
   They whom I favour thrive in wealth amain,                  430
   While virtue, valour, wisdom, sit in want."
     To whom thus Jesus patiently replied:--
   "Yet wealth without these three is impotent
   To gain dominion, or to keep it gained--
   Witness those ancient empires of the earth,
   In highth of all their flowing wealth dissolved;
   But men endued with these have oft attained,
   In lowest poverty, to highest deeds--
   Gideon, and Jephtha, and the shepherd lad
   Whose offspring on the throne of Juda sate                  440
   So many ages, and shall yet regain
   That seat, and reign in Israel without end.
   Among the Heathen (for throughout the world
   To me is not unknown what hath been done
   Worthy of memorial) canst thou not remember
   Quintius, Fabricius, Curius, Regulus?
   For I esteem those names of men so poor,
   Who could do mighty things, and could contemn
   Riches, though offered from the hand of kings.
   And what in me seems wanting but that I                     450
   May also in this poverty as soon
   Accomplish what they did, perhaps and more?
   Extol not riches, then, the toil of fools,
   The wise man's cumbrance, if not snare; more apt
   To slacken virtue and abate her edge
   Than prompt her to do aught may merit praise.
   What if with like aversion I reject
   Riches and realms!  Yet not for that a crown,
   Golden in shew, is but a wreath of thorns,
   Brings dangers, troubles, cares, and sleepless nights,      460
   To him who wears the regal diadem,
   When on his shoulders each man's burden lies;
   For therein stands the office of a king,
   His honour, virtue, merit, and chief praise,
   That for the public all this weight he bears.
   Yet he who reigns within himself, and rules
   Passions, desires, and fears, is more a king--
   Which every wise and virtuous man attains;
   And who attains not, ill aspires to rule
   Cities of men, or headstrong multitudes,                    470
   Subject himself to anarchy within,
   Or lawless passions in him, which he serves.
   But to guide nations in the way of truth
   By saving doctrine, and from error lead
   To know, and, knowing, worship God aright,
   Is yet more kingly.  This attracts the soul,
   Governs the inner man, the nobler part;
   That other o'er the body only reigns,
   And oft by force--which to a generous mind
   So reigning can be no sincere delight.                      480
   Besides, to give a kingdom hath been thought
   Greater and nobler done, and to lay down
   Far more magnanimous, than to assume.
   Riches are needless, then, both for themselves,
   And for thy reason why they should be sought--
   To gain a sceptre, oftest better missed."
 
 
   THE THIRD BOOK
 
   SO spake the Son of God; and Satan stood
   A while as mute, confounded what to say,
   What to reply, confuted and convinced
   Of his weak arguing and fallacious drift;
   At length, collecting all his serpent wiles,
   With soothing words renewed, him thus accosts:--
     "I see thou know'st what is of use to know,
   What best to say canst say, to do canst do;
   Thy actions to thy words accord; thy words
   To thy large heart give utterance due; thy heart            10
   Contains of good, wise, just, the perfet shape.
   Should kings and nations from thy mouth consult,
   Thy counsel would be as the oracle
   Urim and Thummim, those oraculous gems
   On Aaron's breast, or tongue of Seers old
   Infallible; or, wert thou sought to deeds
   That might require the array of war, thy skill
   Of conduct would be such that all the world
   Could not sustain thy prowess, or subsist
   In battle, though against thy few in arms.                  20
   These godlike virtues wherefore dost thou hide?
   Affecting private life, or more obscure
   In savage wilderness, wherefore deprive
   All Earth her wonder at thy acts, thyself
   The fame and glory--glory, the reward
   That sole excites to high attempts the flame
   Of most erected spirits, most tempered pure
   AEthereal, who all pleasures else despise,
   All treasures and all gain esteem as dross,
   And dignities and powers, all but the highest?              30
   Thy years are ripe, and over-ripe.  The son
   Of Macedonian Philip had ere these
   Won Asia, and the throne of Cyrus held
   At his dispose; young Scipio had brought down
   The Carthaginian pride; young Pompey quelled
   The Pontic king, and in triumph had rode.
   Yet years, and to ripe years judgment mature,
   Quench not the thirst of glory, but augment.
   Great Julius, whom now all the world admires,
   The more he grew in years, the more inflamed                40
   With glory, wept that he had lived so long
   Ingloroious.  But thou yet art not too late."
     To whom our Saviour calmly thus replied:--
   "Thou neither dost persuade me to seek wealth
   For empire's sake, nor empire to affect
   For glory's sake, by all thy argument.
   For what is glory but the blaze of fame,
   The people's praise, if always praise unmixed?
   And what the people but a herd confused,
   A miscellaneous rabble, who extol                           50
   Things vulgar, and, well weighed, scarce worth the praise?
   They praise and they admire they know not what,
   And know not whom, but as one leads the other;
   And what delight to be by such extolled,
   To live upon their tongues, and be their talk?
   Of whom to be dispraised were no small praise--
   His lot who dares be singularly good.
   The intelligent among them and the wise
   Are few, and glory scarce of few is raised.
   This is true glory and renown--when God,                    60
   Looking on the Earth, with approbation marks
   The just man, and divulges him through Heaven
   To all his Angels, who with true applause
   Recount his praises.  Thus he did to Job,
   When, to extend his fame through Heaven and Earth,
   As thou to thy reproach may'st well remember,
   He asked thee, 'Hast thou seen my servant Job?'
   Famous he was in Heaven; on Earth less known,
   Where glory is false glory, attributed
   To things not glorious, men not worthy of fame.             70
   They err who count it glorious to subdue
   By conquest far and wide, to overrun
   Large countries, and in field great battles win,
   Great cities by assault.  What do these worthies
   But rob and spoil, burn, slaughter, and enslave
   Peaceable nations, neighbouring or remote,
   Made captive, yet deserving freedom more
   Than those their conquerors, who leave behind
   Nothing but ruin wheresoe'er they rove,
   And all the flourishing works of peace destroy;             80
   Then swell with pride, and must be titled Gods,
   Great benefactors of mankind, Deliverers,
   Worshipped with temple, priest, and sacrifice?
   One is the son of Jove, of Mars the other;
   Till conqueror Death discover them scarce men,
   Rowling in brutish vices, and deformed,
   Violent or shameful death their due reward.
   But, if there be in glory aught of good;
   It may be means far different be attained,
   Without ambition, war, or violence--                        90
   By deeds of peace, by wisdom eminent,
   By patience, temperance.  I mention still
   Him whom thy wrongs, with saintly patience borne,
   Made famous in a land and times obscure;
   Who names not now with honour patient Job?
   Poor Socrates, (who next more memorable?)
   By what he taught and suffered for so doing,
   For truth's sake suffering death unjust, lives now
   Equal in fame to proudest conquerors.
   Yet, if for fame and glory aught be done,                   100
   Aught suffered--if young African for fame
   His wasted country freed from Punic rage--
   The deed becomes unpraised, the man at least,
   And loses, though but verbal, his reward.
   Shall I seek glory, then, as vain men seek,
   Oft not deserved?  I seek not mine, but His
   Who sent me, and thereby witness whence I am."
     To whom the Tempter, murmuring, thus replied:--
   "Think not so slight of glory, therein least
   Resembling thy great Father.  He seeks glory,               110
   And for his glory all things made, all things
   Orders and governs; nor content in Heaven,
   By all his Angels glorified, requires
   Glory from men, from all men, good or bad,
   Wise or unwise, no difference, no exemption.
   Above all sacrifice, or hallowed gift,
   Glory he requires, and glory he receives,
   Promiscuous from all nations, Jew, or Greek,
   Or Barbarous, nor exception hath declared;
   From us, his foes pronounced, glory he exacts."             120
     To whom our Saviour fervently replied:
   "And reason; since his Word all things produced,
   Though chiefly not for glory as prime end,
   But to shew forth his goodness, and impart
   His good communicable to every soul
   Freely; of whom what could He less expect
   Than glory and benediction--that is, thanks--
   The slightest, easiest, readiest recompense
   From them who could return him nothing else,
   And, not returning that, would likeliest render             130
   Contempt instead, dishonour, obloquy?
   Hard recompense, unsuitable return
   For so much good, so much beneficience!
   But why should man seek glory, who of his own
   Hath nothing, and to whom nothing belongs
   But condemnation, ignominy, and shame--
   Who, for so many benefits received,
   Turned recreant to God, ingrate and false,
   And so of all true good himself despoiled;
   Yet, sacrilegious, to himself would take                    140
   That which to God alone of right belongs?
   Yet so much bounty is in God, such grace,
   That who advances his glory, not their own,
   Them he himself to glory will advance."
     So spake the Son of God; and here again
   Satan had not to answer, but stood struck
   With guilt of his own sin--for he himself,
   Insatiable of glory, had lost all;
   Yet of another plea bethought him soon:--
     "Of glory, as thou wilt," said he, "so deem;              150
   Worth or not worth the seeking, let it pass.
   But to a Kingdom thou art born--ordained
   To sit upon thy father David's throne,
   By mother's side thy father, though thy right
   Be now in powerful hands, that will not part
   Easily from possession won with arms.
   Judaea now and all the Promised Land,
   Reduced a province under Roman yoke,
   Obeys Tiberius, nor is always ruled
   With temperate sway: oft have they violated                 160
   The Temple, oft the Law, with foul affronts,
   Abominations rather, as did once
   Antiochus.  And think'st thou to regain
   Thy right by sitting still, or thus retiring?
   So did not Machabeus.  He indeed
   Retired unto the Desert, but with arms;
   And o'er a mighty king so oft prevailed
   That by strong hand his family obtained,
   Though priests, the crown, and David's throne usurped,
   With Modin and her suburbs once content.                    170
   If kingdom move thee not, let move thee zeal
   And duty--zeal and duty are not slow,
   But on Occasion's forelock watchful wait:
   They themselves rather are occasion best--
   Zeal of thy Father's house, duty to free
   Thy country from her heathen servitude.
   So shalt thou best fulfil, best verify,
   The Prophets old, who sung thy endless reign--
   The happier reign the sooner it begins.
   Rein then; what canst thou better do the while?"            180
     To whom our Saviour answer thus returned:--
   "All things are best fulfilled in their due time;
   And time there is for all things, Truth hath said.
   If of my reign Prophetic Writ hath told
   That it shall never end, so, when begin
   The Father in his purpose hath decreed--
   He in whose hand all times and seasons rowl.
   What if he hath decreed that I shall first
   Be tried in humble state, and things adverse,
   By tribulations, injuries, insults,                         190
   Contempts, and scorns, and snares, and violence,
   Suffering, abstaining, quietly expecting
   Without distrust or doubt, that He may know
   What I can suffer, how obey?  Who best
   Can suffer best can do, best reign who first
   Well hath obeyed--just trial ere I merit
   My exaltation without change or end.
   But what concerns it thee when I begin
   My everlasting Kingdom?  Why art thou
   Solicitous?  What moves thy inquisition?                    200
   Know'st thou not that my rising is thy fall,
   And my promotion will be thy destruction?"
     To whom the Tempter, inly racked, replied:--
   "Let that come when it comes.  All hope is lost
   Of my reception into grace; what worse?
   For where no hope is left is left no fear.
   If there be worse, the expectation more
   Of worse torments me than the feeling can.
   I would be at the worst; worst is my port,
   My harbour, and my ultimate repose,                         210
   The end I would attain, my final good.
   My error was my error, and my crime
   My crime; whatever, for itself condemned,
   And will alike be punished, whether thou
   Reign or reign not--though to that gentle brow
   Willingly I could fly, and hope thy reign,
   From that placid aspect and meek regard,
   Rather than aggravate my evil state,
   Would stand between me and thy Father's ire
   (Whose ire I dread more than the fire of Hell)              220
   A shelter and a kind of shading cool
   Interposition, as a summer's cloud.
   If I, then, to the worst that can be haste,
   Why move thy feet so slow to what is best?
   Happiest, both to thyself and all the world,
   That thou, who worthiest art, shouldst be their King!
   Perhaps thou linger'st in deep thoughts detained
   Of the enterprise so hazardous and high!
   No wonder; for, though in thee be united
   What of perfection can in Man be found,                     230
   Or human nature can receive, consider
   Thy life hath yet been private, most part spent
   At home, scarce viewed the Galilean towns,
   And once a year Jerusalem, few days'
   Short sojourn; and what thence couldst thou observe?
   The world thou hast not seen, much less her glory,
   Empires, and monarchs, and their radiant courts--
   Best school of best experience, quickest in sight
   In all things that to greatest actions lead.
   The wisest, unexperienced, will be ever                     240
   Timorous, and loth, with novice modesty
   (As he who, seeking asses, found a kingdom)
   Irresolute, unhardy, unadventrous.
   But I will bring thee where thou soon shalt quit
   Those rudiments, and see before thine eyes
   The monarchies of the Earth, their pomp and state--
   Sufficient introduction to inform
   Thee, of thyself so apt, in regal arts,
   And regal mysteries; that thou may'st know
   How best their opposition to withstand."                    250
     With that (such power was given him then), he took
   The Son of God up to a mountain high.
   It was a mountain at whose verdant feet
   A spacious plain outstretched in circuit wide
   Lay pleasant; from his side two rivers flowed,
   The one winding, the other straight, and left between
   Fair champaign, with less rivers interveined,
   Then meeting joined their tribute to the sea.
   Fertil of corn the glebe, of oil, and wine;
   With herds the pasture thronged, with flocks the hills;     260
   Huge cities and high-towered, that well might seem
   The seats of mightiest monarchs; and so large
   The prospect was that here and there was room
   For barren desert, fountainless and dry.
   To this high mountain-top the Tempter brought
   Our Saviour, and new train of words began:--
     "Well have we speeded, and o'er hill and dale,
   Forest, and field, and flood, temples and towers,
   Cut shorter many a league.  Here thou behold'st
   Assyria, and her empire's ancient bounds,                   270
   Araxes and the Caspian lake; thence on
   As far as Indus east, Euphrates west,
   And oft beyond; to south the Persian bay,
   And, inaccessible, the Arabian drouth:
   Here, Nineveh, of length within her wall
   Several days' journey, built by Ninus old,
   Of that first golden monarchy the seat,
   And seat of Salmanassar, whose success
   Israel in long captivity still mourns;
   There Babylon, the wonder of all tongues,                   280
   As ancient, but rebuilt by him who twice
   Judah and all thy father David's house
   Led captive, and Jerusalem laid waste,
   Till Cyrus set them free; Persepolis,
   His city, there thou seest, and Bactra there;
   Ecbatana her structure vast there shews,
   And Hecatompylos her hunderd gates;
   There Susa by Choaspes, amber stream,
   The drink of none but kings; of later fame,
   Built by Emathian or by Parthian hands,                     290
   The great Seleucia, Nisibis, and there
   Artaxata, Teredon, Ctesiphon,
   Turning with easy eye, thou may'st behold.
   All these the Parthian (now some ages past
   By great Arsaces led, who founded first
   That empire) under his dominion holds,
   From the luxurious kings of Antioch won.
   And just in time thou com'st to have a view
   Of his great power; for now the Parthian king
   In Ctesiphon hath gathered all his host                     300
   Against the Scythian, whose incursions wild
   Have wasted Sogdiana; to her aid
   He marches now in haste.  See, though from far,
   His thousands, in what martial equipage
   They issue forth, steel bows and shafts their arms,
   Of equal dread in flight or in pursuit--
   All horsemen, in which fight they most excel;
   See how in warlike muster they appear,
   In rhombs, and wedges, and half-moons, and wings."
     He looked, and saw what numbers numberless                310
   The city gates outpoured, light-armed troops
   In coats of mail and military pride.
   In mail their horses clad, yet fleet and strong,
   Prauncing their riders bore, the flower and choice
   Of many provinces from bound to bound--
   From Arachosia, from Candaor east,
   And Margiana, to the Hyrcanian cliffs
   Of Caucasus, and dark Iberian dales;
   From Atropatia, and the neighbouring plains
   Of Adiabene, Media, and the south                           320
   Of Susiana, to Balsara's haven.
   He saw them in their forms of battle ranged,
   How quick they wheeled, and flying behind them shot
   Sharp sleet of arrowy showers against the face
   Of their pursuers, and overcame by flight;
   The field all iron cast a gleaming brown.
   Nor wanted clouds of foot, nor, on each horn,
   Cuirassiers all in steel for standing fight,
   Chariots, or elephants indorsed with towers
   Of archers; nor of labouring pioners                        330
   A multitude, with spades and axes armed,
   To lay hills plain, fell woods, or valleys fill,
   Or where plain was raise hill, or overlay
   With bridges rivers proud, as with a yoke:
   Mules after these, camels and dromedaries,
   And waggons fraught with utensils of war.
   Such forces met not, nor so wide a camp,
   When Agrican, with all his northern powers,
   Besieged Albracea, as romances tell,
   The city of Gallaphrone, from thence to win                 340
   The fairest of her sex, Angelica,
   His daughter, sought by many prowest knights,
   Both Paynim and the peers of Charlemane.
   Such and so numerous was their chivalry;
   At sight whereof the Fiend yet more presumed,
   And to our Saviour thus his words renewed:--
     "That thou may'st know I seek not to engage
   Thy virtue, and not every way secure
   On no slight grounds thy safety, hear and mark
   To what end I have brought thee hither, and shew            350
   All this fair sight.  Thy kingdom, though foretold
   By Prophet or by Angel, unless thou
   Endeavour, as thy father David did,
   Thou never shalt obtain: prediction still
   In all things, and all men, supposes means;
   Without means used, what it predicts revokes.
   But say thou wert possessed of David's throne
   By free consent of all, none opposite,
   Samaritan or Jew; how couldst thou hope
   Long to enjoy it quiet and secure                           360
   Between two such enclosing enemies,
   Roman and Parthian?  Therefore one of these
   Thou must make sure thy own: the Parthian first,
   By my advice, as nearer, and of late
   Found able by invasion to annoy
   Thy country, and captive lead away her kings,
   Antigonus and old Hyrcanus, bound,
   Maugre the Roman.  It shall be my task
   To render thee the Parthian at dispose,
   Choose which thou wilt, by conquest or by league.           370
   By him thou shalt regain, without him not,
   That which alone can truly reinstall thee
   In David's royal seat, his true successor--
   Deliverance of thy brethren, those Ten Tribes
   Whose offspring in his territory yet serve
   In Habor, and among the Medes dispersed:
   The sons of Jacob, two of Joseph, lost
   Thus long from Israel, serving, as of old
   Their fathers in the land of Egypt served,
   This offer sets before thee to deliver.                     380
   These if from servitude thou shalt restore
   To their inheritance, then, nor till then,
   Thou on the throne of David in full glory,
   From Egypt to Euphrates and beyond,
   Shalt reign, and Rome or Caesar not need fear."
     To whom our Saviour answered thus, unmoved:--
   "Much ostentation vain of fleshly arm
   And fragile arms, much instrument of war,
   Long in preparing, soon to nothing brought,
   Before mine eyes thou hast set, and in my ear               390
   Vented much policy, and projects deep
   Of enemies, of aids, battles, and leagues,
   Plausible to the world, to me worth naught.
   Means I must use, thou say'st; prediction else
   Will unpredict, and fail me of the throne!
   My time, I told thee (and that time for thee
   Were better farthest off), is not yet come.
   When that comes, think not thou to find me slack
   On my part aught endeavouring, or to need
   Thy politic maxims, or that cumbersome                      400
   Luggage of war there shewn me--argument
   Of human weakness rather than of strength.
   My brethren, as thou call'st them, those Ten Tribes,
   I must deliver, if I mean to reign
   David's true heir, and his full sceptre sway
   To just extent over all Israel's sons!
   But whence to thee this zeal?  Where was it then
   For Israel, or for David, or his throne,
   When thou stood'st up his tempter to the pride
   Of numbering Israel--which cost the lives                   410
   of threescore and ten thousand Israelites
   By three days' pestilence?  Such was thy zeal
   To Israel then, the same that now to me.
   As for those captive tribes, themselves were they
   Who wrought their own captivity, fell off
   From God to worship calves, the deities
   Of Egypt, Baal next and Ashtaroth,
   And all the idolatries of heathen round,
   Besides their other worse than heathenish crimes;
   Nor in the land of their captivity                          420
   Humbled themselves, or penitent besought
   The God of their forefathers, but so died
   Impenitent, and left a race behind
   Like to themselves, distinguishable scarce
   From Gentiles, but by circumcision vain,
   And God with idols in their worship joined.
   Should I of these the liberty regard,
   Who, freed, as to their ancient patrimony,
   Unhumbled, unrepentant, unreformed,
   Headlong would follow, and to their gods perhaps            430
   Of Bethel and of Dan?  No; let them serve
   Their enemies who serve idols with God.
   Yet He at length, time to himself best known,
   Remembering Abraham, by some wondrous call
   May bring them back, repentant and sincere,
   And at their passing cleave the Assyrian flood,
   While to their native land with joy they haste,
   As the Red Sea and Jordan once he cleft,
   When to the Promised Land their fathers passed.
   To his due time and providence I leave them."               440
     So spake Israel's true King, and to the Fiend
   Made answer meet, that made void all his wiles.
   So fares it when with truth falsehood contends.
 
 
   THE FOURTH BOOK
 
   Perplexed and troubled at his bad success
   The Tempter stood, nor had what to reply,
   Discovered in his fraud, thrown from his hope
   So oft, and the persuasive rhetoric
   That sleeked his tongue, and won so much on Eve,
   So little here, nay lost.  But Eve was Eve;
   This far his over-match, who, self-deceived
   And rash, beforehand had no better weighed
   The strength he was to cope with, or his own.
   But--as a man who had been matchless held                   10
   In cunning, over-reached where least he thought,
   To salve his credit, and for very spite,
   Still will be tempting him who foils him still,
   And never cease, though to his shame the more;
   Or as a swarm of flies in vintage-time,
   About the wine-press where sweet must is poured,
   Beat off, returns as oft with humming sound;
   Or surging waves against a solid rock,
   Though all to shivers dashed, the assault renew,
   (Vain battery!) and in froth or bubbles end--               20
   So Satan, whom repulse upon repulse
   Met ever, and to shameful silence brought,
   Yet gives not o'er, though desperate of success,
   And his vain importunity pursues.
   He brought our Saviour to the western side
   Of that high mountain, whence he might behold
   Another plain, long, but in breadth not wide,
   Washed by the southern sea, and on the north
   To equal length backed with a ridge of hills
   That screened the fruits of the earth and seats of men      30
   From cold Septentrion blasts; thence in the midst
   Divided by a river, off whose banks
   On each side an Imperial City stood,
   With towers and temples proudly elevate
   On seven small hills, with palaces adorned,
   Porches and theatres, baths, aqueducts,
   Statues and trophies, and triumphal arcs,
   Gardens and groves, presented to his eyes
   Above the highth of mountains interposed--
   By what strange parallax, or optic skill                    40
   Of vision, multiplied through air, or glass
   Of telescope, were curious to enquire.
   And now the Tempter thus his silence broke:--
     "The city which thou seest no other deem
   Than great and glorious Rome, Queen of the Earth
   So far renowned, and with the spoils enriched
   Of nations.  There the Capitol thou seest,
   Above the rest lifting his stately head
   On the Tarpeian rock, her citadel
   Impregnable; and there Mount Palatine,                      50
   The imperial palace, compass huge, and high
   The structure, skill of noblest architects,
   With gilded battlements, conspicuous far,
   Turrets, and terraces, and glittering spires.
   Many a fair edifice besides, more like
   Houses of gods--so well I have disposed
   My aerie microscope--thou may'st behold,
   Outside and inside both, pillars and roofs
   Carved work, the hand of famed artificers
   In cedar, marble, ivory, or gold.                           60
   Thence to the gates cast round thine eye, and see
   What conflux issuing forth, or entering in:
   Praetors, proconsuls to their provinces
   Hasting, or on return, in robes of state;
   Lictors and rods, the ensigns of their power;
   Legions and cohorts, turms of horse and wings;
   Or embassies from regions far remote,
   In various habits, on the Appian road,
   Or on the AEmilian--some from farthest south,
   Syene, and where the shadow both way falls,                 70
   Meroe, Nilotic isle, and, more to west,
   The realm of Bocchus to the Blackmoor sea;
   From the Asian kings (and Parthian among these),
   From India and the Golden Chersoness,
   And utmost Indian isle Taprobane,
   Dusk faces with white silken turbants wreathed;
   From Gallia, Gades, and the British west;
   Germans, and Scythians, and Sarmatians north
   Beyond Danubius to the Tauric pool.
   All nations now to Rome obedience pay--                     80
   To Rome's great Emperor, whose wide domain,
   In ample territory, wealth and power,
   Civility of manners, arts and arms,
   And long renown, thou justly may'st prefer
   Before the Parthian.  These two thrones except,
   The rest are barbarous, and scarce worth the sight,
   Shared among petty kings too far removed;
   These having shewn thee, I have shewn thee all
   The kingdoms of the world, and all their glory.
   This Emperor hath no son, and now is old,                   90
   Old and lascivious, and from Rome retired
   To Capreae, an island small but strong
   On the Campanian shore, with purpose there
   His horrid lusts in private to enjoy;
   Committing to a wicked favourite
   All public cares, and yet of him suspicious;
   Hated of all, and hating.  With what ease,
   Endued with regal virtues as thou art,
   Appearing, and beginning noble deeds,
   Might'st thou expel this monster from his throne,           100
   Now made a sty, and, in his place ascending,
   A victor-people free from servile yoke!
   And with my help thou may'st; to me the power
   Is given, and by that right I give it thee.
   Aim, therefore, at no less than all the world;
   Aim at the highest; without the highest attained,
   Will be for thee no sitting, or not long,
   On David's throne, be prophesied what will."
     To whom the Son of God, unmoved, replied:--
   "Nor doth this grandeur and majestic shew                   110
   Of luxury, though called magnificence,
   More than of arms before, allure mine eye,
   Much less my mind; though thou should'st add to tell
   Their sumptuous gluttonies, and gorgeous feasts
   On citron tables or Atlantic stone
   (For I have also heard, perhaps have read),
   Their wines of Setia, Cales, and Falerne,
   Chios and Crete, and how they quaff in gold,
   Crystal, and myrrhine cups, imbossed with gems
   And studs of pearl--to me should'st tell, who thirst        120
   And hunger still.  Then embassies thou shew'st
   From nations far and nigh!  What honour that,
   But tedious waste of time, to sit and hear
   So many hollow compliments and lies,
   Outlandish flatteries?  Then proceed'st to talk
   Of the Emperor, how easily subdued,
   How gloriously.  I shall, thou say'st, expel
   A brutish monster: what if I withal
   Expel a Devil who first made him such?
   Let his tormentor, Conscience, find him out;                130
   For him I was not sent, nor yet to free
   That people, victor once, now vile and base,
   Deservedly made vassal--who, once just,
   Frugal, and mild, and temperate, conquered well,
   But govern ill the nations under yoke,
   Peeling their provinces, exhausted all
   By lust and rapine; first ambitious grown
   Of triumph, that insulting vanity;
   Then cruel, by their sports to blood inured
   Of fighting beasts, and men to beasts exposed;              140
   Luxurious by their wealth, and greedier still,
   And from the daily Scene effeminate.
   What wise and valiant man would seek to free
   These, thus degenerate, by themselves enslaved,
   Or could of inward slaves make outward free?
   Know, therefore, when my season comes to sit
   On David's throne, it shall be like a tree
   Spreading and overshadowing all the earth,
   Or as a stone that shall to pieces dash
   All monarchies besides throughout the world;                150
   And of my Kingdom there shall be no end.
   Means there shall be to this; but what the means
   Is not for thee to know, nor me to tell."
     To whom the Tempter, impudent, replied:--
   "I see all offers made by me how slight
   Thou valuest, because offered, and reject'st.
   Nothing will please the difficult and nice,
   Or nothing more than still to contradict.
   On the other side know also thou that I
   On what I offer set as high esteem,                         160
   Nor what I part with mean to give for naught,
   All these, which in a moment thou behold'st,
   The kingdoms of the world, to thee I give
   (For, given to me, I give to whom I please),
   No trifle; yet with this reserve, not else--
   On this condition, if thou wilt fall down,
   And worship me as thy superior Lord
   (Easily done), and hold them all of me;
   For what can less so great a gift deserve?"
     Whom thus our Saviour answered with disdain:--            170
   "I never liked thy talk, thy offers less;
   Now both abhor, since thou hast dared to utter
   The abominable terms, impious condition.
   But I endure the time, till which expired
   Thou hast permission on me.  It is written,
   The first of all commandments, 'Thou shalt worship
   The Lord thy God, and only Him shalt serve.'
   And dar'st thou to the Son of God propound
   To worship thee, accursed? now more accursed
   For this attempt, bolder than that on Eve,                  180
   And more blasphemous; which expect to rue.
   The kingdoms of the world to thee were given!
   Permitted rather, and by thee usurped;
   Other donation none thou canst produce.
   If given, by whom but by the King of kings,
   God over all supreme?  If given to thee,
   By thee how fairly is the Giver now
   Repaid!  But gratitude in thee is lost
   Long since.  Wert thou so void of fear or shame
   As offer them to me, the Son of God--                       190
   To me my own, on such abhorred pact,
   That I fall down and worship thee as God?
   Get thee behind me!  Plain thou now appear'st
   That Evil One, Satan for ever damned."
     To whom the Fiend, with fear abashed, replied:--
   "Be not so sore offended, Son of God--
   Though Sons of God both Angels are and Men--
   If I, to try whether in higher sort
   Than these thou bear'st that title, have proposed
   What both from Men and Angels I receive,                    200
   Tetrarchs of Fire, Air, Flood, and on the Earth
   Nations besides from all the quartered winds--
   God of this World invoked, and World beneath.
   Who then thou art, whose coming is foretold
   To me most fatal, me it most concerns.
   The trial hath indamaged thee no way,
   Rather more honour left and more esteem;
   Me naught advantaged, missing what I aimed.
   Therefore let pass, as they are transitory,
   The kingdoms of this world; I shall no more                 210
   Advise thee; gain them as thou canst, or not.
   And thou thyself seem'st otherwise inclined
   Than to a worldly crown, addicted more
   To contemplation and profound dispute;
   As by that early action may be judged,
   When, slipping from thy mother's eye, thou went'st
   Alone into the Temple, there wast found
   Among the gravest Rabbies, disputant
   On points and questions fitting Moses' chair,
   Teaching, not taught.  The childhood shews the man,         220
   As morning shews the day.  Be famous, then,
   By wisdom; as thy empire must extend,
   So let extend thy mind o'er all the world
   In knowledge; all things in it comprehend.
   All knowledge is not couched in Moses' law,
   The Pentateuch, or what the Prophets wrote;
   The Gentiles also know, and write, and teach
   To admiration, led by Nature's light;
   And with the Gentiles much thou must converse,
   Ruling them by persuasion, as thou mean'st.                 230
   Without their learning, how wilt thou with them,
   Or they with thee, hold conversation meet?
   How wilt thou reason with them, how refute
   Their idolisms, traditions, paradoxes?
   Error by his own arms is best evinced.
   Look once more, ere we leave this specular mount,
   Westward, much nearer by south-west; behold
   Where on the AEgean shore a city stands,
   Built nobly, pure the air and light the soil--
   Athens, the eye of Greece, mother of arts                   240
   And Eloquence, native to famous wits
   Or hospitable, in her sweet recess,
   City or suburban, studious walks and shades.
   See there the olive-grove of Academe,
   Plato's retirement, where the Attic bird
   Trills her thick-warbled notes the summer long;
   There, flowery hill, Hymettus, with the sound
   Of bees' industrious murmur, oft invites
   To studious musing; there Ilissus rowls
   His whispering stream.  Within the walls then view          250
   The schools of ancient sages--his who bred
   Great Alexander to subdue the world,
   Lyceum there; and painted Stoa next.
   There thou shalt hear and learn the secret power
   Of harmony, in tones and numbers hit
   By voice or hand, and various-measured verse,
   AEolian charms and Dorian lyric odes,
   And his who gave them breath, but higher sung,
   Blind Melesigenes, thence Homer called,
   Whose poem Phoebus challenged for his own.                  260
   Thence what the lofty grave Tragedians taught
   In chorus or iambic, teachers best
   Of moral prudence, with delight received
   In brief sententious precepts, while they treat
   Of fate, and chance, and change in human life,
   High actions and high passions best describing.
   Thence to the famous Orators repair,
   Those ancient whose resistless eloquence
   Wielded at will that fierce democraty,
   Shook the Arsenal, and fulmined over Greece                 270
   To Macedon and Artaxerxes' throne.
   To sage Philosophy next lend thine ear,
   From heaven descended to the low-roofed house
   Of Socrates--see there his tenement--
   Whom, well inspired, the Oracle pronounced
   Wisest of men; from whose mouth issued forth
   Mellifluous streams, that watered all the schools
   Of Academics old and new, with those
   Surnamed Peripatetics, and the sect
   Epicurean, and the Stoic severe.                            280
   These here revolve, or, as thou likest, at home,
   Till time mature thee to a kingdom's weight;
   These rules will render thee a king complete
   Within thyself, much more with empire joined."
     To whom our Saviour sagely thus replied:--
   "Think not but that I know these things; or, think
   I know them not, not therefore am I short
   Of knowing what I ought.  He who receives
   Light from above, from the Fountain of Light,
   No other doctrine needs, though granted true;               290
   But these are false, or little else but dreams,
   Conjectures, fancies, built on nothing firm.
   The first and wisest of them all professed
   To know this only, that he nothing knew;
   The next to fabling fell and smooth conceits;
   A third sort doubted all things, though plain sense;
   Others in virtue placed felicity,
   But virtue joined with riches and long life;
   In corporal pleasure he, and careless ease;
   The Stoic last in philosophic pride,                        300
   By him called virtue, and his virtuous man,
   Wise, perfect in himself, and all possessing,
   Equal to God, oft shames not to prefer,
   As fearing God nor man, contemning all
   Wealth, pleasure, pain or torment, death and life--
   Which, when he lists, he leaves, or boasts he can;
   For all his tedious talk is but vain boast,
   Or subtle shifts conviction to evade.
   Alas! what can they teach, and not mislead,
   Ignorant of themselves, of God much more,                   310
   And how the World began, and how Man fell,
   Degraded by himself, on grace depending?
   Much of the Soul they talk, but all awry;
   And in themselves seek virtue; and to themselves
   All glory arrogate, to God give none;
   Rather accuse him under usual names,
   Fortune and Fate, as one regardless quite
   Of mortal things.  Who, therefore, seeks in these
   True wisdom finds her not, or, by delusion
   Far worse, her false resemblance only meets,                320
   An empty cloud.  However, many books,
   Wise men have said, are wearisome; who reads
   Incessantly, and to his reading brings not
   A spirit and judgment equal or superior,
   (And what he brings what needs he elsewhere seek?)
   Uncertain and unsettled still remains,
   Deep-versed in books and shallow in himself,
   Crude or intoxicate, collecting toys
   And trifles for choice matters, worth a sponge,
   As children gathering pebbles on the shore.                 330
   Or, if I would delight my private hours
   With music or with poem, where so soon
   As in our native language can I find
   That solace?  All our Law and Story strewed
   With hymns, our Psalms with artful terms inscribed,
   Our Hebrew songs and harps, in Babylon
   That pleased so well our victor's ear, declare
   That rather Greece from us these arts derived--
   Ill imitated while they loudest sing
   The vices of their deities, and their own,                  340
   In fable, hymn, or song, so personating
   Their gods ridiculous, and themselves past shame.
   Remove their swelling epithetes, thick-laid
   As varnish on a harlot's cheek, the rest,
   Thin-sown with aught of profit or delight,
   Will far be found unworthy to compare
   With Sion's songs, to all true tastes excelling,
   Where God is praised aright and godlike men,
   The Holiest of Holies and his Saints
   (Such are from God inspired, not such from thee);           350
   Unless where moral virtue is expressed
   By light of Nature, not in all quite lost.
   Their orators thou then extoll'st as those
   The top of eloquence--statists indeed,
   And lovers of their country, as may seem;
   But herein to our Prophets far beneath,
   As men divinely taught, and better teaching
   The solid rules of civil government,
   In their majestic, unaffected style,
   Than all the oratory of Greece and Rome.                    360
   In them is plainest taught, and easiest learnt,
   What makes a nation happy, and keeps it so,
   What ruins kingdoms, and lays cities flat;
   These only, with our Law, best form a king."
     So spake the Son of God; but Satan, now
   Quite at a loss (for all his darts were spent),
   Thus to our Saviour, with stern brow, replied:--
     "Since neither wealth nor honour, arms nor arts,
   Kingdom nor empire, pleases thee, nor aught
   By me proposed in life contemplative                        370
   Or active, tended on by glory or fame,
   What dost thou in this world?  The Wilderness
   For thee is fittest place: I found thee there,
   And thither will return thee.  Yet remember
   What I foretell thee; soon thou shalt have cause
   To wish thou never hadst rejected, thus
   Nicely or cautiously, my offered aid,
   Which would have set thee in short time with ease
   On David's throne, or throne of all the world,
   Now at full age, fulness of time, thy season,               380
   When prophecies of thee are best fulfilled.
   Now, contrary--if I read aught in heaven,
   Or heaven write aught of fate--by what the stars
   Voluminous, or single characters
   In their conjunction met, give me to spell,
   Sorrows and labours, opposition, hate,
   Attends thee; scorns, reproaches, injuries,
   Violence and stripes, and, lastly, cruel death.
   A kingdom they portend thee, but what kingdom,
   Real or allegoric, I discern not;                           390
   Nor when: eternal sure--as without end,
   Without beginning; for no date prefixed
   Directs me in the starry rubric set."
     So saying, he took (for still he knew his power
   Not yet expired), and to the Wilderness
   Brought back, the Son of God, and left him there,
   Feigning to disappear.  Darkness now rose,
   As daylight sunk, and brought in louring Night,
   Her shadowy offspring, unsubstantial both,
   Privation mere of light and absent day.                     400
   Our Saviour, meek, and with untroubled mind
   After hisaerie jaunt, though hurried sore,
   Hungry and cold, betook him to his rest,
   Wherever, under some concourse of shades,
   Whose branching arms thick intertwined might shield
   From dews and damps of night his sheltered head;
   But, sheltered, slept in vain; for at his head
   The Tempter watched, and soon with ugly dreams
   Disturbed his sleep.  And either tropic now
   'Gan thunder, and both ends of heaven; the clouds           410
   From many a horrid rift abortive poured
   Fierce rain with lightning mixed, water with fire,
   In ruin reconciled; nor slept the winds
   Within their stony caves, but rushed abroad
   From the four hinges of the world, and fell
   On the vexed wilderness, whose tallest pines,
   Though rooted deep as high, and sturdiest oaks,
   Bowed their stiff necks, loaden with stormy blasts,
   Or torn up sheer.  Ill wast thou shrouded then,
   O patient Son of God, yet only stood'st                     420
   Unshaken!  Nor yet staid the terror there:
   Infernal ghosts and hellish furies round
   Environed thee; some howled, some yelled, some shrieked,
   Some bent at thee their fiery darts, while thou
   Sat'st unappalled in calm and sinless peace.
   Thus passed the night so foul, till Morning fair
   Came forth with pilgrim steps, in amice grey,
   Who with her radiant finger stilled the roar
   Of thunder, chased the clouds, and laid the winds,
   And griesly spectres, which the Fiend had raised            430
   To tempt the Son of God with terrors dire.
   And now the sun with more effectual beams
   Had cheered the face of earth, and dried the wet
   From drooping plant, or dropping tree; the birds,
   Who all things now behold more fresh and green,
   After a night of storm so ruinous,
   Cleared up their choicest notes in bush and spray,
   To gratulate the sweet return of morn.
   Nor yet, amidst this joy and brightest morn,
   Was absent, after all his mischief done,                    440
   The Prince of Darkness; glad would also seem
   Of this fair change, and to our Saviour came;
   Yet with no new device (they all were spent),
   Rather by this his last affront resolved,
   Desperate of better course, to vent his rage
   And mad despite to be so oft repelled.
   Him walking on a sunny hill he found,
   Backed on the north and west by a thick wood;
   Out of the wood he starts in wonted shape,
   And in a careless mood thus to him said:--                  450
     "Fair morning yet betides thee, Son of God,
   After a dismal night.  I heard the wrack,
   As earth and sky would mingle; but myself
   Was distant; and these flaws, though mortals fear them,
   As dangerous to the pillared frame of Heaven,
   Or to the Earth's dark basis underneath,
   Are to the main as inconsiderable
   And harmless, if not wholesome, as a sneeze
   To man's less universe, and soon are gone.
   Yet, as being ofttimes noxious where they light             460
   On man, beast, plant, wasteful and turbulent,
   Like turbulencies in the affairs of men,
   Over whose heads they roar, and seem to point,
   They oft fore-signify and threaten ill.
   This tempest at this desert most was bent;
   Of men at thee, for only thou here dwell'st.
   Did I not tell thee, if thou didst reject
   The perfect season offered with my aid
   To win thy destined seat, but wilt prolong
   All to the push of fate, pursue thy way                     470
   Of gaining David's throne no man knows when
   (For both the when and how is nowhere told),
   Thou shalt be what thou art ordained, no doubt;
   For Angels have proclaimed it, but concealing
   The time and means?  Each act is rightliest done
   Not when it must, but when it may be best.
   If thou observe not this, be sure to find
   What I foretold thee--many a hard assay
   Of dangers, and adversities, and pains,
   Ere thou of Israel's sceptre get fast hold;                 480
   Whereof this ominous night that closed thee round,
   So many terrors, voices, prodigies,
   May warn thee, as a sure foregoing sign."
     So talked he, while the Son of God went on,
   And staid not, but in brief him answered thus:--
     "Me worse than wet thou find'st not; other harm
   Those terrors which thou speak'st of did me none.
   I never feared they could, though noising loud
   And threatening nigh: what they can do as signs
   Betokening or ill-boding I contemn                          490
   As false portents, not sent from God, but thee;
   Who, knowing I shall reign past thy preventing,
   Obtrud'st thy offered aid, that I, accepting,
   At least might seem to hold all power of thee,
   Ambitious Spirit! and would'st be thought my God;
   And storm'st, refused, thinking to terrify
   Me to thy will!  Desist (thou art discerned,
   And toil'st in vain), nor me in vain molest."
     To whom the Fiend, now swoln with rage, replied:--
   "Then hear, O Son of David, virgin-born!                    500
   For Son of God to me is yet in doubt.
   Of the Messiah I have heard foretold
   By all the Prophets; of thy birth, at length
   Announced by Gabriel, with the first I knew,
   And of the angelic song in Bethlehem field,
   On thy birth-night, that sung thee Saviour born.
   From that time seldom have I ceased to eye
   Thy infancy, thy childhood, and thy youth,
   Thy manhood last, though yet in private bred;
   Till, at the ford of Jordan, whither all                    510
   Flocked to the Baptist, I among the rest
   (Though not to be baptized), by voice from Heaven
   Heard thee pronounced the Son of God beloved.
   Thenceforth I thought thee worth my nearer view
   And narrower scrutiny, that I might learn
   In what degree or meaning thou art called
   The Son of God, which bears no single sense.
   The Son of God I also am, or was;
   And, if I was, I am; relation stands:
   All men are Sons of God; yet thee I thought                 520
   In some respect far higher so declared.
   Therefore I watched thy footsteps from that hour,
   And followed thee still on to this waste wild,
   Where, by all best conjectures, I collect
   Thou art to be my fatal enemy.
   Good reason, then, if I beforehand seek
   To understand my adversary, who
   And what he is; his wisdom, power, intent;
   By parle or composition, truce or league,
   To win him, or win from him what I can.                     530
   And opportunity I here have had
   To try thee, sift thee, and confess have found thee
   Proof against all temptation, as a rock
   Of adamant and as a centre, firm
   To the utmost of mere man both wise and good,
   Not more; for honours, riches, kingdoms, glory,
   Have been before contemned, and may again.
   Therefore, to know what more thou art than man,
   Worth naming the Son of God by voice from Heaven,
   Another method I must now begin."                           540
     So saying, he caught him up, and, without wing
   Of hippogrif, bore through the air sublime,
   Over the wilderness and o'er the plain,
   Till underneath them fair Jerusalem,
   The Holy City, lifted high her towers,
   And higher yet the glorious Temple reared
   Her pile, far off appearing like a mount
   Of alablaster, topt with golden spires:
   There, on the highest pinnacle, he set
   The Son of God, and added thus in scorn:--                  550
     "There stand, if thou wilt stand; to stand upright
   Will ask thee skill.  I to thy Father's house
   Have brought thee, and highest placed: highest is best.
   Now shew thy progeny; if not to stand,
   Cast thyself down.  Safely, if Son of God;
   For it is written, 'He will give command
   Concerning thee to his Angels; in their hands
   They shall uplift thee, lest at any time
   Thou chance to dash thy foot against a stone.'"
     To whom thus Jesus: "Also it is written,                  560
   'Tempt not the Lord thy God.'"  He said, and stood;
   But Satan, smitten with amazement, fell.
   As when Earth's son, Antaeus (to compare
   Small things with greatest), in Irassa strove
   With Jove's Alcides, and, oft foiled, still rose,
   Receiving from his mother Earth new strength,
   Fresh from his fall, and fiercer grapple joined,
   Throttled at length in the air expired and fell,
   So, after many a foil, the Tempter proud,
   Renewing fresh assaults, amidst his pride                   570
   Fell whence he stood to see his victor fall;
   And, as that Theban monster that proposed
   Her riddle, and him who solved it not devoured,
   That once found out and solved, for grief and spite
   Cast herself headlong from the Ismenian steep,
   So, strook with dread and anguish, fell the Fiend,
   And to his crew, that sat consulting, brought
   Joyless triumphals of his hoped success,
   Ruin, and desperation, and dismay,
   Who durst so proudly tempt the Son of God.                  580
   So Satan fell; and straight a fiery globe
   Of Angels on full sail of wing flew nigh,
   Who on their plumy vans received Him soft
   From his uneasy station, and upbore,
   As on a floating couch, through the blithe air;
   Then, in a flowery valley, set him down
   On a green bank, and set before him spread
   A table of celestial food, divine
   Ambrosial fruits fetched from the Tree of Life,
   And from the Fount of Life ambrosial drink,                 590
   That soon refreshed him wearied, and repaired
   What hunger, if aught hunger, had impaired,
   Or thirst; and, as he fed, Angelic quires
   Sung heavenly anthems of his victory
   Over temptation and the Tempter proud:--
     "True Image of the Father, whether throned
   In the bosom of bliss, and light of light
   Conceiving, or, remote from Heaven, enshrined
   In fleshly tabernacle and human form,
   Wandering the wilderness--whatever place,                   600
   Habit, or state, or motion, still expressing
   The Son of God, with Godlike force endued
   Against the attempter of thy Father's throne
   And thief of Paradise!  Him long of old
   Thou didst debel, and down from Heaven cast
   With all his army; now thou hast avenged
   Supplanted Adam, and, by vanquishing
   Temptation, hast regained lost Paradise,
   And frustrated the conquest fraudulent.
   He never more henceforth will dare set foot                 610
   In paradise to tempt; his snares are broke.
   For, though that seat of earthly bliss be failed,
   A fairer Paradise is founded now
   For Adam and his chosen sons, whom thou,
   A Saviour, art come down to reinstall;
   Where they shall dwell secure, when time shall be,
   Of tempter and temptation without fear.
   But thou, Infernal Serpent! shalt not long
   Rule in the clouds.  Like an autumnal star,
   Or lightning, thou shalt fall from Heaven, trod down        620
   Under his feet.  For proof, ere this thou feel'st
   Thy wound (yet not thy last and deadliest wound)
   By this repulse received, and hold'st in Hell
   No triumph; in all her gates Abaddon rues
   Thy bold attempt.  Hereafter learn with awe
   To dread the Son of God.  He, all unarmed,
   Shall chase thee, with the terror of his voice,
   From thy demoniac holds, possession foul--
   Thee and thy legions; yelling they shall fly,
   And beg to hide them in a herd of swine,                    630
   Lest he command them down into the Deep,
   Bound, and to torment sent before their time.
   Hail, Son of the Most High, heir of both Worlds,
   Queller of Satan!  On thy glorious work
   Now enter, and begin to save Mankind."
     Thus they the Son of God, our Saviour meek,
   Sung victor, and, from heavenly feast refreshed,
   Brought on his way with joy.  He, unobserved,
   Home to his mother's house private returned.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Judith Boss and David Widger
 
 
 
 
 
 AREOPAGITICA
 
 
 A SPEECH FOR THE LIBERTY OF UNLICENSED PRINTING TO THE PARLIAMENT OF
 ENGLAND
 
      This is true liberty, when free-born men,
      Having to advise the public, may speak free,
      Which he who can, and will, deserves high praise;
      Who neither can, nor will, may hold his peace:
      What can be juster in a state than this?
 
      Euripid.  Hicetid.
 
 
 They, who to states and governors of the Commonwealth direct their
 speech, High Court of Parliament, or, wanting such access in a private
 condition, write that which they foresee may advance the public good;
 I suppose them, as at the beginning of no mean endeavour, not a little
 altered and moved inwardly in their minds: some with doubt of what will
 be the success, others with fear of what will be the censure; some with
 hope, others with confidence of what they have to speak. And me perhaps
 each of these dispositions, as the subject was whereon I entered,
 may have at other times variously affected; and likely might in these
 foremost expressions now also disclose which of them swayed most, but
 that the very attempt of this address thus made, and the thought of whom
 it hath recourse to, hath got the power within me to a passion, far more
 welcome than incidental to a preface.
 
 Which though I stay not to confess ere any ask, I shall be blameless, if
 it be no other than the joy and gratulation which it brings to all who
 wish and promote their country's liberty; whereof this whole discourse
 proposed will be a certain testimony, if not a trophy. For this is not
 the liberty which we can hope, that no grievance ever should arise
 in the Commonwealth--that let no man in this world expect; but when
 complaints are freely heard, deeply considered and speedily reformed,
 then is the utmost bound of civil liberty attained that wise men look
 for. To which if I now manifest by the very sound of this which I shall
 utter, that we are already in good part arrived, and yet from such
 a steep disadvantage of tyranny and superstition grounded into our
 principles as was beyond the manhood of a Roman recovery, it will be
 attributed first, as is most due, to the strong assistance of God our
 deliverer, next to your faithful guidance and undaunted wisdom, Lords
 and Commons of England. Neither is it in God's esteem the diminution
 of his glory, when honourable things are spoken of good men and worthy
 magistrates; which if I now first should begin to do, after so fair a
 progress of your laudable deeds, and such a long obligement upon the
 whole realm to your indefatigable virtues, I might be justly reckoned
 among the tardiest, and the unwillingest of them that praise ye.
 
 Nevertheless there being three principal things, without which all
 praising is but courtship and flattery: First, when that only is praised
 which is solidly worth praise: next, when greatest likelihoods are
 brought that such things are truly and really in those persons to whom
 they are ascribed: the other, when he who praises, by showing that such
 his actual persuasion is of whom he writes, can demonstrate that he
 flatters not; the former two of these I have heretofore endeavoured,
 rescuing the employment from him who went about to impair your merits
 with a trivial and malignant encomium; the latter as belonging chiefly
 to mine own acquittal, that whom I so extolled I did not flatter, hath
 been reserved opportunely to this occasion.
 
 For he who freely magnifies what hath been nobly done, and fears not to
 declare as freely what might be done better, gives ye the best covenant
 of his fidelity; and that his loyalest affection and his hope waits on
 your proceedings. His highest praising is not flattery, and his plainest
 advice is a kind of praising. For though I should affirm and hold by
 argument, that it would fare better with truth, with learning and the
 Commonwealth, if one of your published Orders, which I should name, were
 called in; yet at the same time it could not but much redound to the
 lustre of your mild and equal government, whenas private persons are
 hereby animated to think ye better pleased with public advice, than
 other statists have been delighted heretofore with public flattery. And
 men will then see what difference there is between the magnanimity of a
 triennial Parliament, and that jealous haughtiness of prelates and cabin
 counsellors that usurped of late, whenas they shall observe ye in the
 midst of your victories and successes more gently brooking written
 exceptions against a voted Order than other courts, which had produced
 nothing worth memory but the weak ostentation of wealth, would have
 endured the least signified dislike at any sudden proclamation.
 
 If I should thus far presume upon the meek demeanour of your civil and
 gentle greatness, Lords and Commons, as what your published Order hath
 directly said, that to gainsay, I might defend myself with ease, if any
 should accuse me of being new or insolent, did they but know how much
 better I find ye esteem it to imitate the old and elegant humanity of
 Greece, than the barbaric pride of a Hunnish and Norwegian stateliness.
 And out of those ages, to whose polite wisdom and letters we owe that we
 are not yet Goths and Jutlanders, I could name him who from his private
 house wrote that discourse to the Parliament of Athens, that persuades
 them to change the form of democracy which was then established. Such
 honour was done in those days to men who professed the study of wisdom
 and eloquence, not only in their own country, but in other lands, that
 cities and signiories heard them gladly, and with great respect, if they
 had aught in public to admonish the state. Thus did Dion Prusaeus, a
 stranger and a private orator, counsel the Rhodians against a former
 edict; and I abound with other like examples, which to set here would be
 superfluous.
 
 But if from the industry of a life wholly dedicated to studious labours,
 and those natural endowments haply not the worst for two and fifty
 degrees of northern latitude, so much must be derogated, as to count me
 not equal to any of those who had this privilege, I would obtain to be
 thought not so inferior, as yourselves are superior to the most of them
 who received their counsel: and how far you excel them, be assured,
 Lords and Commons, there can no greater testimony appear, than when
 your prudent spirit acknowledges and obeys the voice of reason from what
 quarter soever it be heard speaking; and renders ye as willing to
 repeal any Act of your own setting forth, as any set forth by your
 predecessors.
 
 If ye be thus resolved, as it were injury to think ye were not, I know
 not what should withhold me from presenting ye with a fit instance
 wherein to show both that love of truth which ye eminently profess, and
 that uprightness of your judgment which is not wont to be partial to
 yourselves; by judging over again that Order which ye have ordained to
 regulate printing:--that no book, pamphlet, or paper shall be henceforth
 printed, unless the same be first approved and licensed by such, or at
 least one of such, as shall be thereto appointed. For that part which
 preserves justly every man's copy to himself, or provides for the poor,
 I touch not, only wish they be not made pretences to abuse and persecute
 honest and painful men, who offend not in either of these particulars.
 But that other clause of licensing books, which we thought had died with
 his brother quadragesimal and matrimonial when the prelates expired, I
 shall now attend with such a homily, as shall lay before ye, first the
 inventors of it to be those whom ye will be loath to own; next what is
 to be thought in general of reading, whatever sort the books be;
 and that this Order avails nothing to the suppressing of scandalous,
 seditious, and libellous books, which were mainly intended to be
 suppressed. Last, that it will be primely to the discouragement of all
 learning, and the stop of truth, not only by disexercising and blunting
 our abilities in what we know already, but by hindering and cropping
 the discovery that might be yet further made both in religious and civil
 wisdom.
 
 I deny not, but that it is of greatest concernment in the Church and
 Commonwealth, to have a vigilant eye how books demean themselves as well
 as men; and thereafter to confine, imprison, and do sharpest justice on
 them as malefactors. For books are not absolutely dead things, but do
 contain a potency of life in them to be as active as that soul was whose
 progeny they are; nay, they do preserve as in a vial the purest efficacy
 and extraction of that living intellect that bred them. I know they
 are as lively, and as vigorously productive, as those fabulous dragon's
 teeth; and being sown up and down, may chance to spring up armed men.
 And yet, on the other hand, unless wariness be used, as good almost kill
 a man as kill a good book. Who kills a man kills a reasonable creature,
 God's image; but he who destroys a good book, kills reason itself, kills
 the image of God, as it were in the eye. Many a man lives a burden
 to the earth; but a good book is the precious life-blood of a master
 spirit, embalmed and treasured up on purpose to a life beyond life. 'Tis
 true, no age can restore a life, whereof perhaps there is no great loss;
 and revolutions of ages do not oft recover the loss of a rejected truth,
 for the want of which whole nations fare the worse.
 
 We should be wary therefore what persecution we raise against the living
 labours of public men, how we spill that seasoned life of man, preserved
 and stored up in books; since we see a kind of homicide may be thus
 committed, sometimes a martyrdom, and if it extend to the whole
 impression, a kind of massacre; whereof the execution ends not in the
 slaying of an elemental life, but strikes at that ethereal and fifth
 essence, the breath of reason itself, slays an immortality rather than
 a life. But lest I should be condemned of introducing license, while I
 oppose licensing, I refuse not the pains to be so much historical,
 as will serve to show what hath been done by ancient and famous
 commonwealths against this disorder, till the very time that this
 project of licensing crept out of the Inquisition, was catched up by our
 prelates, and hath caught some of our presbyters.
 
 In Athens, where books and wits were ever busier than in any other part
 of Greece, I find but only two sorts of writings which the magistrate
 cared to take notice of; those either blasphemous and atheistical, or
 libellous. Thus the books of Protagoras were by the judges of Areopagus
 commanded to be burnt, and himself banished the territory for a
 discourse begun with his confessing not to know WHETHER THERE WERE GODS,
 OR WHETHER NOT. And against defaming, it was decreed that none should
 be traduced by name, as was the manner of Vetus Comoedia, whereby we may
 guess how they censured libelling. And this course was quick enough, as
 Cicero writes, to quell both the desperate wits of other atheists,
 and the open way of defaming, as the event showed. Of other sects and
 opinions, though tending to voluptuousness, and the denying of divine
 Providence, they took no heed.
 
 Therefore we do not read that either Epicurus, or that libertine school
 of Cyrene, or what the Cynic impudence uttered, was ever questioned
 by the laws. Neither is it recorded that the writings of those old
 comedians were suppressed, though the acting of them were forbid; and
 that Plato commended the reading of Aristophanes, the loosest of them
 all, to his royal scholar Dionysius, is commonly known, and may be
 excused, if holy Chrysostom, as is reported, nightly studied so much the
 same author and had the art to cleanse a scurrilous vehemence into the
 style of a rousing sermon.
 
 That other leading city of Greece, Lacedaemon, considering that Lycurgus
 their lawgiver was so addicted to elegant learning, as to have been the
 first that brought out of Ionia the scattered works of Homer, and sent
 the poet Thales from Crete to prepare and mollify the Spartan surliness
 with his smooth songs and odes, the better to plant among them law and
 civility, it is to be wondered how museless and unbookish they were,
 minding nought but the feats of war. There needed no licensing of books
 among them, for they disliked all but their own laconic apophthegms, and
 took a slight occasion to chase Archilochus out of their city, perhaps
 for composing in a higher strain than their own soldierly ballads and
 roundels could reach to. Or if it were for his broad verses, they were
 not therein so cautious but they were as dissolute in their promiscuous
 conversing; whence Euripides affirms in Andromache, that their women
 were all unchaste. Thus much may give us light after what sort of books
 were prohibited among the Greeks.
 
 The Romans also, for many ages trained up only to a military roughness
 resembling most the Lacedaemonian guise, knew of learning little but
 what their twelve Tables, and the Pontific College with their augurs
 and flamens taught them in religion and law; so unacquainted with other
 learning, that when Carneades and Critolaus, with the Stoic Diogenes,
 coming ambassadors to Rome, took thereby occasion to give the city a
 taste of their philosophy, they were suspected for seducers by no less
 a man than Cato the Censor, who moved it in the Senate to dismiss them
 speedily, and to banish all such Attic babblers out of Italy. But Scipio
 and others of the noblest senators withstood him and his old Sabine
 austerity; honoured and admired the men; and the censor himself at
 last, in his old age, fell to the study of that whereof before he was
 so scrupulous. And yet at the same time Naevius and Plautus, the first
 Latin comedians, had filled the city with all the borrowed scenes of
 Menander and Philemon. Then began to be considered there also what was
 to be done to libellous books and authors; for Naevius was quickly cast
 into prison for his unbridled pen, and released by the tribunes upon
 his recantation; we read also that libels were burnt, and the makers
 punished by Augustus. The like severity, no doubt, was used, if aught
 were impiously written against their esteemed gods. Except in these two
 points, how the world went in books, the magistrate kept no reckoning.
 
 And therefore Lucretius without impeachment versifies his Epicurism to
 Memmius, and had the honour to be set forth the second time by Cicero,
 so great a father of the Commonwealth; although himself disputes against
 that opinion in his own writings. Nor was the satirical sharpness or
 naked plainness of Lucilius, or Catullus, or Flaccus, by any order
 prohibited. And for matters of state, the story of Titus Livius, though
 it extolled that part which Pompey held, was not therefore suppressed by
 Octavius Caesar of the other faction. But that Naso was by him banished
 in his old age, for the wanton poems of his youth, was but a mere covert
 of state over some secret cause: and besides, the books were neither
 banished nor called in. From hence we shall meet with little else but
 tyranny in the Roman empire, that we may not marvel, if not so often bad
 as good books were silenced. I shall therefore deem to have been large
 enough, in producing what among the ancients was punishable to write;
 save only which, all other arguments were free to treat on.
 
 By this time the emperors were become Christians, whose discipline in
 this point I do not find to have been more severe than what was formerly
 in practice. The books of those whom they took to be grand heretics were
 examined, refuted, and condemned in the general Councils; and not till
 then were prohibited, or burnt, by authority of the emperor. As for the
 writings of heathen authors, unless they were plain invectives against
 Christianity, as those of Porphyrius and Proclus, they met with no
 interdict that can be cited, till about the year 400, in a Carthaginian
 Council, wherein bishops themselves were forbid to read the books of
 Gentiles, but heresies they might read: while others long before them,
 on the contrary, scrupled more the books of heretics than of Gentiles.
 And that the primitive Councils and bishops were wont only to declare
 what books were not commendable, passing no further, but leaving it to
 each one's conscience to read or to lay by, till after the year 800,
 is observed already by Padre Paolo, the great unmasker of the Trentine
 Council.
 
 After which time the Popes of Rome, engrossing what they pleased of
 political rule into their own hands, extended their dominion over men's
 eyes, as they had before over their judgments, burning and prohibiting
 to be read what they fancied not; yet sparing in their censures, and the
 books not many which they so dealt with: till Martin V., by his bull,
 not only prohibited, but was the first that excommunicated the reading
 of heretical books; for about that time Wickliffe and Huss, growing
 terrible, were they who first drove the Papal Court to a stricter policy
 of prohibiting. Which course Leo X. and his successors followed, until
 the Council of Trent and the Spanish Inquisition engendering together
 brought forth, or perfected, those Catalogues and expurging Indexes,
 that rake through the entrails of many an old good author, with a
 violation worse than any could be offered to his tomb. Nor did they stay
 in matters heretical, but any subject that was not to their palate,
 they either condemned in a Prohibition, or had it straight into the new
 purgatory of an index.
 
 To fill up the measure of encroachment, their last invention was to
 ordain that no book, pamphlet, or paper should be printed (as if St.
 Peter had bequeathed them the keys of the press also out of Paradise)
 unless it were approved and licensed under the hands of two or three
 glutton friars. For example:
 
      Let the Chancellor Cini be pleased to see if in this present
      work be contained aught that may withstand the printing.
 
      VINCENT RABBATTA,  Vicar of Florence.
 
 
      I have seen this present work, and find nothing athwart the
      Catholic faith and good manners: in witness whereof I
      have given, etc.
 
      NICOLO GINI,  Chancellor of Florence.
 
 
      Attending the precedent relation, it is allowed that this
      present work of Davanzati may be printed.
 
      VINCENT RABBATTA,  etc.
 
 
      It may be printed, July 15.
 
      FRIAR SIMON MOMPEI D'AMELIA,
      Chancellor of the Holy Office in Florence.
 
 Sure they have a conceit, if he of the bottomless pit had not long since
 broke prison, that this quadruple exorcism would bar him down. I fear
 their next design will be to get into their custody the licensing
 of that which they say Claudius intended, but went not through with.
 Vouchsafe to see another of their forms, the Roman stamp:
 
      Imprimatur, If it seem good to the reverend Master of the
      Holy Palace.
 
      BELCASTRO,  Vicegerent.
 
 
      Imprimatur, Friar Nicolo Rodolphi, Master of the Holy Palace.
 
 Sometimes five Imprimaturs are seen together dialogue-wise in the piazza
 of one title-page, complimenting and ducking each to other with their
 shaven reverences, whether the author, who stands by in perplexity at
 the foot of his epistle, shall to the press or to the sponge. These
 are the pretty responsories, these are the dear antiphonies, that so
 bewitched of late our prelates and their chaplains with the goodly echo
 they made; and besotted us to the gay imitation of a lordly Imprimatur,
 one from Lambeth House, another from the west end of Paul's; so apishly
 Romanizing, that the word of command still was set down in Latin; as
 if the learned grammatical pen that wrote it would cast no ink without
 Latin; or perhaps, as they thought, because no vulgar tongue was worthy
 to express the pure conceit of an Imprimatur, but rather, as I hope, for
 that our English, the language of men ever famous and foremost in the
 achievements of liberty, will not easily find servile letters enow to
 spell such a dictatory presumption English.
 
 And thus ye have the inventors and the original of book-licensing ripped
 up and drawn as lineally as any pedigree. We have it not, that can
 be heard of, from any ancient state, or polity or church; nor by any
 statute left us by our ancestors elder or later; nor from the modern
 custom of any reformed city or church abroad, but from the most
 anti-christian council and the most tyrannous inquisition that ever
 inquired. Till then books were ever as freely admitted into the world
 as any other birth; the issue of the brain was no more stifled than the
 issue of the womb: no envious Juno sat cross-legged over the nativity
 of any man's intellectual offspring; but if it proved a monster, who
 denies, but that it was justly burnt, or sunk into the sea? But that a
 book, in worse condition than a peccant soul, should be to stand before
 a jury ere it be born to the world, and undergo yet in darkness the
 judgment of Radamanth and his colleagues, ere it can pass the ferry
 backward into light, was never heard before, till that mysterious
 iniquity, provoked and troubled at the first entrance of Reformation,
 sought out new limbos and new hells wherein they might include our books
 also within the number of their damned. And this was the rare morsel
 so officiously snatched up, and so ill-favouredly imitated by our
 inquisiturient bishops, and the attendant minorites their chaplains.
 That ye like not now these most certain authors of this licensing order,
 and that all sinister intention was far distant from your thoughts, when
 ye were importuned the passing it, all men who know the integrity of
 your actions, and how ye honour truth, will clear ye readily.
 
 But some will say, what though the inventors were bad, the thing for
 all that may be good? It may so; yet if that thing be no such deep
 invention, but obvious, and easy for any man to light on, and yet best
 and wisest commonwealths through all ages and occasions have forborne
 to use it, and falsest seducers and oppressors of men were the first who
 took it up, and to no other purpose but to obstruct and hinder the first
 approach of Reformation; I am of those who believe it will be a harder
 alchemy than Lullius ever knew, to sublimate any good use out of such
 an invention. Yet this only is what I request to gain from this reason,
 that it may be held a dangerous and suspicious fruit, as certainly it
 deserves, for the tree that bore it, until I can dissect one by one the
 properties it has. But I have first to finish, as was propounded, what
 is to be thought in general of reading books, whatever sort they be, and
 whether be more the benefit or the harm that thence proceeds.
 
 Not to insist upon the examples of Moses, Daniel, and Paul, who were
 skilful in all the learning of the Egyptians, Chaldeans, and Greeks,
 which could not probably be without reading their books of all sorts;
 in Paul especially, who thought it no defilement to insert into
 Holy Scripture the sentences of three Greek poets, and one of them a
 tragedian; the question was notwithstanding sometimes controverted among
 the primitive doctors, but with great odds on that side which affirmed
 it both lawful and profitable; as was then evidently perceived, when
 Julian the Apostate and subtlest enemy to our faith made a decree
 forbidding Christians the study of heathen learning: for, said he, they
 wound us with our own weapons, and with our own arts and sciences they
 overcome us. And indeed the Christians were put so to their shifts by
 this crafty means, and so much in danger to decline into all ignorance,
 that the two Apollinarii were fain, as a man may say, to coin all the
 seven liberal sciences out of the Bible, reducing it into divers
 forms of orations, poems, dialogues, even to the calculating of a new
 Christian grammar. But, saith the historian Socrates, the providence of
 God provided better than the industry of Apollinarius and his son, by
 taking away that illiterate law with the life of him who devised it. So
 great an injury they then held it to be deprived of Hellenic learning;
 and thought it a persecution more undermining, and secretly decaying the
 Church, than the open cruelty of Decius or Diocletian.
 
 And perhaps it was the same politic drift that the devil whipped St.
 Jerome in a lenten dream, for reading Cicero; or else it was a phantasm
 bred by the fever which had then seized him. For had an angel been his
 discipliner, unless it were for dwelling too much upon Ciceronianisms,
 and had chastised the reading, not the vanity, it had been plainly
 partial; first to correct him for grave Cicero, and not for scurril
 Plautus, whom he confesses to have been reading, not long before; next
 to correct him only, and let so many more ancient fathers wax old in
 those pleasant and florid studies without the lash of such a tutoring
 apparition; insomuch that Basil teaches how some good use may be made
 of Margites, a sportful poem, not now extant, writ by Homer; and why not
 then of Morgante, an Italian romance much to the same purpose?
 
 But if it be agreed we shall be tried by visions, there is a vision
 recorded by Eusebius, far ancienter than this tale of Jerome, to the
 nun Eustochium, and, besides, has nothing of a fever in it. Dionysius
 Alexandrinus was about the year 240 a person of great name in the Church
 for piety and learning, who had wont to avail himself much against
 heretics by being conversant in their books; until a certain presbyter
 laid it scrupulously to his conscience, how he durst venture himself
 among those defiling volumes. The worthy man, loath to give offence,
 fell into a new debate with himself what was to be thought; when
 suddenly a vision sent from God (it is his own epistle that so avers it)
 confirmed him in these words: READ ANY BOOKS WHATEVER COME TO THY HANDS,
 FOR THOU ART SUFFICIENT BOTH TO JUDGE ARIGHT AND TO EXAMINE EACH MATTER.
 To this revelation he assented the sooner, as he confesses, because it
 was answerable to that of the Apostle to the Thessalonians, PROVE ALL
 THINGS, HOLD FAST THAT WHICH IS GOOD. And he might have added another
 remarkable saying of the same author: TO THE PURE, ALL THINGS ARE PURE;
 not only meats and drinks, but all kind of knowledge whether of good or
 evil; the knowledge cannot defile, nor consequently the books, if the
 will and conscience be not defiled.
 
 For books are as meats and viands are; some of good, some of evil
 substance; and yet God, in that unapocryphal vision, said without
 exception, RISE, PETER, KILL AND EAT, leaving the choice to each man's
 discretion. Wholesome meats to a vitiated stomach differ little or
 nothing from unwholesome; and best books to a naughty mind are not
 unappliable to occasions of evil. Bad meats will scarce breed good
 nourishment in the healthiest concoction; but herein the difference is
 of bad books, that they to a discreet and judicious reader serve in
 many respects to discover, to confute, to forewarn, and to illustrate.
 Whereof what better witness can ye expect I should produce, than one of
 your own now sitting in Parliament, the chief of learned men reputed in
 this land, Mr. Selden; whose volume of natural and national laws proves,
 not only by great authorities brought together, but by exquisite reasons
 and theorems almost mathematically demonstrative, that all opinions, yea
 errors, known, read, and collated, are of main service and assistance
 toward the speedy attainment of what is truest. I conceive, therefore,
 that when God did enlarge the universal diet of man's body, saving ever
 the rules of temperance, he then also, as before, left arbitrary the
 dieting and repasting of our minds; as wherein every mature man might
 have to exercise his own leading capacity.
 
 How great a virtue is temperance, how much of moment through the whole
 life of man! Yet God commits the managing so great a trust, without
 particular law or prescription, wholly to the demeanour of every grown
 man. And therefore when he himself tabled the Jews from heaven, that
 omer, which was every man's daily portion of manna, is computed to have
 been more than might have well sufficed the heartiest feeder thrice as
 many meals. For those actions which enter into a man, rather than issue
 out of him, and therefore defile not, God uses not to captivate under
 a perpetual childhood of prescription, but trusts him with the gift
 of reason to be his own chooser; there were but little work left for
 preaching, if law and compulsion should grow so fast upon those things
 which heretofore were governed only by exhortation. Solomon informs us,
 that much reading is a weariness to the flesh; but neither he nor other
 inspired author tells us that such or such reading is unlawful: yet
 certainly had God thought good to limit us herein, it had been much more
 expedient to have told us what was unlawful than what was wearisome.
 As for the burning of those Ephesian books by St. Paul's converts;
 'tis replied the books were magic, the Syriac so renders them. It was
 a private act, a voluntary act, and leaves us to a voluntary imitation:
 the men in remorse burnt those books which were their own; the
 magistrate by this example is not appointed; these men practised the
 books, another might perhaps have read them in some sort usefully.
 
 Good and evil we know in the field of this world grow up together almost
 inseparably; and the knowledge of good is so involved and interwoven
 with the knowledge of evil, and in so many cunning resemblances hardly
 to be discerned, that those confused seeds which were imposed upon
 Psyche as an incessant labour to cull out, and sort asunder, were not
 more intermixed. It was from out the rind of one apple tasted, that the
 knowledge of good and evil, as two twins cleaving together, leaped forth
 into the world. And perhaps this is that doom which Adam fell into
 of knowing good and evil, that is to say of knowing good by evil. As
 therefore the state of man now is; what wisdom can there be to choose,
 what continence to forbear without the knowledge of evil? He that can
 apprehend and consider vice with all her baits and seeming pleasures,
 and yet abstain, and yet distinguish, and yet prefer that which is truly
 better, he is the true warfaring Christian.
 
 I cannot praise a fugitive and cloistered virtue, unexercised and
 unbreathed, that never sallies out and sees her adversary but slinks out
 of the race, where that immortal garland is to be run for, not without
 dust and heat. Assuredly we bring not innocence into the world, we bring
 impurity much rather; that which purifies us is trial, and trial is by
 what is contrary. That virtue therefore which is but a youngling in the
 contemplation of evil, and knows not the utmost that vice promises to
 her followers, and rejects it, is but a blank virtue, not a pure; her
 whiteness is but an excremental whiteness. Which was the reason why our
 sage and serious poet Spenser, whom I dare be known to think a better
 teacher than Scotus or Aquinas, describing true temperance under the
 person of Guion, brings him in with his palmer through the cave of
 Mammon, and the bower of earthly bliss, that he might see and know, and
 yet abstain. Since therefore the knowledge and survey of vice is in this
 world so necessary to the constituting of human virtue, and the scanning
 of error to the confirmation of truth, how can we more safely, and with
 less danger, scout into the regions of sin and falsity than by reading
 all manner of tractates and hearing all manner of reason? And this is
 the benefit which may be had of books promiscuously read.
 
 But of the harm that may result hence three kinds are usually reckoned.
 First, is feared the infection that may spread; but then all human learning
 and controversy in religious points must remove out of the world, yea the
 Bible itself; for that ofttimes relates blasphemy not nicely, it describes
 the carnal sense of wicked men not unelegantly, it brings in holiest men
 passionately murmuring against Providence through all the arguments of
 Epicurus: in other great disputes it answers dubiously and darkly to the
 common reader. And ask a Talmudist what ails the modesty of his marginal
 Keri, that Moses and all the prophets cannot persuade him to pronounce the
 textual Chetiv. For these causes we all know the Bible itself put by the
 Papist put by the Papist into the first rank of prohibited books. The
 ancientest Fathers must be next removed, as Clement of Alexandria, and that
 Eusebian book of Evangelic preparation, transmitting our ears through a
 hoard of heathenish obscenities to receive the Gospel. Who finds not that
 Irenaeus, Epiphanius, Jerome, and others discover more heresies than they
 well confute, and that oft for heresy which is the truer opinion?
 
 Nor boots it to say for these, and all the heathen writers of greatest
 infection, if it must be thought so, with whom is bound up the life of
 human learning, that they writ in an unknown tongue, so long as we are
 sure those languages are known as well to the worst of men, who are both
 most able and most diligent to instil the poison they suck, first into
 the courts of princes, acquainting them with the choicest delights and
 criticisms of sin. As perhaps did that Petronius whom Nero called his
 Arbiter, the master of his revels; and the notorious ribald of Arezzo,
 dreaded and yet dear to the Italian courtiers. I name not him for
 posterity's sake, whom Henry VIII. named in merriment his vicar of hell.
 By which compendious way all the contagion that foreign books can infuse
 will find a passage to the people far easier and shorter than an
 Indian voyage, though it could be sailed either by the north of Cataio
 eastward, or of Canada westward, while our Spanish licensing gags the
 English press never so severely.
 
 But on the other side that infection which is from books of controversy
 in religion is more doubtful and dangerous to the learned than to
 the ignorant; and yet those books must be permitted untouched by the
 licenser. It will be hard to instance where any ignorant man hath been
 ever seduced by papistical book in English, unless it were commended and
 expounded to him by some of that clergy: and indeed all such tractates,
 whether false or true, are as the prophecy of Isaiah was to the eunuch,
 not to be UNDERSTOOD WITHOUT A GUIDE. But of our priests and doctors
 how many have been corrupted by studying the comments of Jesuits and
 Sorbonists, and how fast they could transfuse that corruption into the
 people, our experience is both late and sad. It is not forgot, since the
 acute and distinct Arminius was perverted merely by the perusing of a
 nameless discourse written at Delft, which at first he took in hand to
 confute.
 
 Seeing, therefore, that those books, and those in great abundance, which
 are likeliest to taint both life and doctrine, cannot be suppressed
 without the fall of learning and of all ability in disputation, and that
 these books of either sort are most and soonest catching to the learned,
 from whom to the common people whatever is heretical or dissolute may
 quickly be conveyed, and that evil manners are as perfectly learnt
 without books a thousand other ways which cannot be stopped, and evil
 doctrine not with books can propagate, except a teacher guide, which he
 might also do without writing, and so beyond prohibiting, I am not able
 to unfold, how this cautelous enterprise of licensing can be exempted
 from the number of vain and impossible attempts. And he who were
 pleasantly disposed could not well avoid to liken it to the exploit of
 that gallant man who thought to pound up the crows by shutting his park
 gate.
 
 Besides another inconvenience, if learned men be the first receivers out
 of books and dispreaders both of vice and error, how shall the licensers
 themselves be confided in, unless we can confer upon them, or they
 assume to themselves above all others in the land, the grace of
 infallibility and uncorruptedness? And again, if it be true that a wise
 man, like a good refiner, can gather gold out of the drossiest volume,
 and that a fool will be a fool with the best book, yea or without book;
 there is no reason that we should deprive a wise man of any advantage
 to his wisdom, while we seek to restrain from a fool, that which being
 restrained will be no hindrance to his folly. For if there should be so
 much exactness always used to keep that from him which is unfit for his
 reading, we should in the judgment of Aristotle not only, but of Solomon
 and of our Saviour, not vouchsafe him good precepts, and by consequence
 not willingly admit him to good books; as being certain that a wise man
 will make better use of an idle pamphlet, than a fool will do of sacred
 Scripture.
 
 'Tis next alleged we must not expose ourselves to temptations without
 necessity, and next to that, not employ our time in vain things. To both
 these objections one answer will serve, out of the grounds already laid,
 that to all men such books are not temptations, nor vanities, but useful
 drugs and materials wherewith to temper and compose effective and strong
 medicines, which man's life cannot want. The rest, as children and
 childish men, who have not the art to qualify and prepare these working
 minerals, well may be exhorted to forbear, but hindered forcibly they
 cannot be by all the licensing that Sainted Inquisition could ever yet
 contrive. Which is what I promised to deliver next: that this order of
 licensing conduces nothing to the end for which it was framed; and hath
 almost prevented me by being clear already while thus much hath been
 explaining. See the ingenuity of Truth, who, when she gets a free and
 willing hand, opens herself faster than the pace of method and discourse
 can overtake her.
 
 It was the task which I began with, to show that no nation, or
 well-instituted state, if they valued books at all, did ever use this
 way of licensing; and it might be answered, that this is a piece of
 prudence lately discovered. To which I return, that as it was a thing
 slight and obvious to think on, so if it had been difficult to find
 out, there wanted not among them long since who suggested such a course;
 which they not following, leave us a pattern of their judgment that it
 was not the rest knowing, but the not approving, which was the cause of
 their not using it.
 
 Plato, a man of high authority, indeed, but least of all for his
 Commonwealth, in the book of his Laws, which no city ever yet received,
 fed his fancy by making many edicts to his airy burgomasters, which they
 who otherwise admire him wish had been rather buried and excused in
 the genial cups of an Academic night sitting. By which laws he seems to
 tolerate no kind of learning but by unalterable decree, consisting most
 of practical traditions, to the attainment whereof a library of smaller
 bulk than his own Dialogues would be abundant. And there also enacts,
 that no poet should so much as read to any private man what he had
 written, until the judges and law-keepers had seen it, and allowed it.
 But that Plato meant this law peculiarly to that commonwealth which
 he had imagined, and to no other, is evident. Why was he not else a
 lawgiver to himself, but a transgressor, and to be expelled by his own
 magistrates; both for the wanton epigrams and dialogues which he made,
 and his perpetual reading of Sophron Mimus and Aristophanes, books of
 grossest infamy, and also for commending the latter of them, though
 he were the malicious libeller of his chief friends, to be read by the
 tyrant Dionysius, who had little need of such trash to spend his
 time on? But that he knew this licensing of poems had reference
 and dependence to many other provisos there set down in his fancied
 republic, which in this world could have no place: and so neither he
 himself, nor any magistrate or city, ever imitated that course, which,
 taken apart from those other collateral injunctions, must needs be vain
 and fruitless. For if they fell upon one kind of strictness, unless
 their care were equal to regulate all other things of like aptness to
 corrupt the mind, that single endeavour they knew would be but a
 fond labour; to shut and fortify one gate against corruption, and be
 necessitated to leave others round about wide open.
 
 If we think to regulate printing, thereby to rectify manners, we must
 regulate all recreation and pastimes, all that is delightful to man.
 No music must be heard, no song be set or sung, but what is grave and
 Doric. There must be licensing dancers, that no gesture, motion, or
 deportment be taught our youth but what by their allowance shall be
 thought honest; for such Plato was provided of. It will ask more than
 the work of twenty licensers to examine all the lutes, the violins, and
 the guitars in every house; they must not be suffered to prattle as they
 do, but must be licensed what they may say. And who shall silence all
 the airs and madrigals that whisper softness in chambers? The windows
 also, and the balconies must be thought on; there are shrewd books, with
 dangerous frontispieces, set to sale; who shall prohibit them, shall
 twenty licensers? The villages also must have their visitors to inquire
 what lectures the bagpipe and the rebeck reads, even to the ballatry
 and the gamut of every municipal fiddler, for these are the countryman's
 Arcadias, and his Monte Mayors.
 
 Next, what more national corruption, for which England hears ill abroad,
 than household gluttony: who shall be the rectors of our daily rioting?
 And what shall be done to inhibit the multitudes that frequent those
 houses where drunkenness is sold and harboured? Our garments also should
 be referred to the licensing of some more sober workmasters to see
 them cut into a less wanton garb. Who shall regulate all the mixed
 conversation of our youth, male and female together, as is the fashion
 of this country? Who shall still appoint what shall be discoursed, what
 presumed, and no further? Lastly, who shall forbid and separate all idle
 resort, all evil company? These things will be, and must be; but how
 they shall be least hurtful, how least enticing, herein consists the
 grave and governing wisdom of a state.
 
 To sequester out of the world into Atlantic and Utopian polities, which
 never can be drawn into use, will not mend our condition; but to ordain
 wisely as in this world of evil, in the midst whereof God hath placed
 us unavoidably. Nor is it Plato's licensing of books will do this, which
 necessarily pulls along with it so many other kinds of licensing, as
 will make us all both ridiculous and weary, and yet frustrate; but
 those unwritten, or at least unconstraining, laws of virtuous education,
 religious and civil nurture, which Plato there mentions as the bonds and
 ligaments of the commonwealth, the pillars and the sustainers of every
 written statute; these they be which will bear chief sway in such
 matters as these, when all licensing will be easily eluded. Impunity and
 remissness, for certain, are the bane of a commonwealth; but here the
 great art lies, to discern in what the law is to bid restraint and
 punishment, and in what things persuasion only is to work.
 
 If every action, which is good or evil in man at ripe years, were to be
 under pittance and prescription and compulsion, what were virtue but a
 name, what praise could be then due to well-doing, what gramercy to
 be sober, just, or continent? Many there be that complain of divine
 Providence for suffering Adam to transgress; foolish tongues! When
 God gave him reason, he gave him freedom to choose, for reason is but
 choosing; he had been else a mere artificial Adam, such an Adam as he is
 in the motions. We ourselves esteem not of that obedience, or love, or
 gift, which is of force: God therefore left him free, set before him a
 provoking object, ever almost in his eyes; herein consisted his merit,
 herein the right of his reward, the praise of his abstinence. Wherefore
 did he create passions within us, pleasures round about us, but that
 these rightly tempered are the very ingredients of virtue?
 
 They are not skilful considerers of human things, who imagine to remove
 sin by removing the matter of sin; for, besides that it is a huge heap
 increasing under the very act of diminishing, though some part of it may
 for a time be withdrawn from some persons, it cannot from all, in such a
 universal thing as books are; and when this is done, yet the sin remains
 entire. Though ye take from a covetous man all his treasure, he has yet
 one jewel left, ye cannot bereave him of his covetousness. Banish all
 objects of lust, shut up all youth into the severest discipline that can
 be exercised in any hermitage, ye cannot make them chaste, that came not
 hither so; such great care and wisdom is required to the right managing
 of this point. Suppose we could expel sin by this means; look how much
 we thus expel of sin, so much we expel of virtue: for the matter of them
 both is the same; remove that, and ye remove them both alike.
 
 This justifies the high providence of God, who, though he command us
 temperance, justice, continence, yet pours out before us, even to a
 profuseness, all desirable things, and gives us minds that can wander
 beyond all limit and satiety. Why should we then affect a rigour
 contrary to the manner of God and of nature, by abridging or scanting
 those means, which books freely permitted are, both to the trial of
 virtue and the exercise of truth? It would be better done, to learn
 that the law must needs be frivolous, which goes to restrain things,
 uncertainly and yet equally working to good and to evil. And were I the
 chooser, a dream of well-doing should be preferred before many times
 as much the forcible hindrance of evil-doing. For God sure esteems the
 growth and completing of one virtuous person more than the restraint of
 ten vicious.
 
 And albeit whatever thing we hear or see, sitting, walking, travelling,
 or conversing, may be fitly called our book, and is of the same effect
 that writings are, yet grant the thing to be prohibited were only books,
 it appears that this Order hitherto is far insufficient to the end
 which it intends. Do we not see, not once or oftener, but weekly, that
 continued court-libel against the Parliament and City, printed, as the
 wet sheets can witness, and dispersed among us, for all that licensing
 can do? Yet this is the prime service a man would think, wherein this
 Order should give proof of itself. If it were executed, you'll say.
 But certain, if execution be remiss or blindfold now, and in this
 particular, what will it be hereafter and in other books? If then the
 Order shall not be vain and frustrate, behold a new labour, Lords and
 Commons, ye must repeal and proscribe all scandalous and unlicensed
 books already printed and divulged; after ye have drawn them up into a
 list, that all may know which are condemned, and which not; and ordain
 that no foreign books be delivered out of custody, till they have
 been read over. This office will require the whole time of not a few
 overseers, and those no vulgar men. There be also books which are partly
 useful and excellent, partly culpable and pernicious; this work will ask
 as many more officials, to make expurgations and expunctions, that the
 commonwealth of learning be not damnified. In fine, when the multitude
 of books increase upon their hands, ye must be fain to catalogue all
 those printers who are found frequently offending, and forbid the
 importation of their whole suspected typography. In a word, that this
 your Order may be exact and not deficient, ye must reform it perfectly
 according to the model of Trent and Seville, which I know ye abhor to
 do.
 
 Yet though ye should condescend to this, which God forbid, the Order
 still would be but fruitless and defective to that end whereto ye meant
 it. If to prevent sects and schisms, who is so unread or so uncatechized
 in story, that hath not heard of many sects refusing books as a
 hindrance, and preserving their doctrine unmixed for many ages, only by
 unwritten traditions? The Christian faith, for that was once a schism,
 is not unknown to have spread all over Asia, ere any Gospel or Epistle
 was seen in writing. If the amendment of manners be aimed at, look into
 Italy and Spain, whether those places be one scruple the better, the
 honester, the wiser, the chaster, since all the inquisitional rigour
 that hath been executed upon books.
 
 Another reason, whereby to make it plain that this Order will miss
 the end it seeks, consider by the quality which ought to be in every
 licenser. It cannot be denied but that he who is made judge to sit upon
 the birth or death of books, whether they may be wafted into this world
 or not, had need to be a man above the common measure, both studious,
 learned, and judicious; there may be else no mean mistakes in the
 censure of what is passable or not; which is also no mean injury. If
 he be of such worth as behooves him, there cannot be a more tedious and
 unpleasing journey-work, a greater loss of time levied upon his head,
 than to be made the perpetual reader of unchosen books and pamphlets,
 ofttimes huge volumes. There is no book that is acceptable unless at
 certain seasons; but to be enjoined the reading of that at all times,
 and in a hand scarce legible, whereof three pages would not down at any
 time in the fairest print, is an imposition which I cannot believe
 how he that values time and his own studies, or is but of a sensible
 nostril, should be able to endure. In this one thing I crave leave of
 the present licensers to be pardoned for so thinking; who doubtless took
 this office up, looking on it through their obedience to the Parliament,
 whose command perhaps made all things seem easy and unlaborious to
 them; but that this short trial hath wearied them out already, their
 own expressions and excuses to them who make so many journeys to solicit
 their licence are testimony enough. Seeing therefore those who now
 possess the employment by all evident signs wish themselves well rid of
 it; and that no man of worth, none that is not a plain unthrift of his
 own hours, is ever likely to succeed them, except he mean to put himself
 to the salary of a press corrector; we may easily foresee what kind of
 licensers we are to expect hereafter, either ignorant, imperious, and
 remiss, or basely pecuniary. This is what I had to show, wherein this
 Order cannot conduce to that end whereof it bears the intention.
 
 I lastly proceed from the no good it can do, to the manifest hurt it
 causes, in being first the greatest discouragement and affront that can
 be offered to learning, and to learned men.
 
 It was the complaint and lamentation of prelates, upon every least
 breath of a motion to remove pluralities, and distribute more equally
 Church revenues, that then all learning would be for ever dashed and
 discouraged. But as for that opinion, I never found cause to think that
 the tenth part of learning stood or fell with the clergy: nor could I
 ever but hold it for a sordid and unworthy speech of any churchman
 who had a competency left him. If therefore ye be loath to dishearten
 utterly and discontent, not the mercenary crew of false pretenders to
 learning, but the free and ingenuous sort of such as evidently were born
 to study, and love learning for itself, not for lucre or any other end
 but the service of God and of truth, and perhaps that lasting fame and
 perpetuity of praise which God and good men have consented shall be the
 reward of those whose published labours advance the good of mankind;
 then know that, so far to distrust the judgment and the honesty of one
 who hath but a common repute in learning, and never yet offended, as not
 to count him fit to print his mind without a tutor and examiner, lest
 he should drop a schism, or something of corruption, is the greatest
 displeasure and indignity to a free and knowing spirit that can be put
 upon him.
 
 What advantage is it to be a man, over it is to be a boy at school,
 if we have only escaped the ferula to come under the fescue of an
 Imprimatur; if serious and elaborate writings, as if they were no more
 than the theme of a grammar-lad under his pedagogue, must not be uttered
 without the cursory eyes of a temporizing and extemporizing licenser? He
 who is not trusted with his own actions, his drift not being known to
 be evil, and standing to the hazard of law and penalty, has no great
 argument to think himself reputed in the Commonwealth wherein he was
 born for other than a fool or a foreigner. When a man writes to the
 world, he summons up all his reason and deliberation to assist him; he
 searches, meditates, is industrious, and likely consults and confers
 with his judicious friends; after all which done he takes himself to be
 informed in what he writes, as well as any that writ before him. If, in
 this the most consummate act of his fidelity and ripeness, no years, no
 industry, no former proof of his abilities can bring him to that state
 of maturity, as not to be still mistrusted and suspected, unless he
 carry all his considerate diligence, all his midnight watchings and
 expense of Palladian oil, to the hasty view of an unleisured licenser,
 perhaps much his younger, perhaps his inferior in judgment, perhaps one
 who never knew the labour of bookwriting, and if he be not repulsed or
 slighted, must appear in print like a puny with his guardian, and his
 censor's hand on the back of his title to be his bail and surety that he
 is no idiot or seducer, it cannot be but a dishonour and derogation to
 the author, to the book, to the privilege and dignity of learning.
 
 And what if the author shall be one so copious of fancy, as to have many
 things well worth the adding come into his mind after licensing, while
 the book is yet under the press, which not seldom happens to the best
 and diligentest writers; and that perhaps a dozen times in one book? The
 printer dares not go beyond his licensed copy; so often then must the
 author trudge to his leave-giver, that those his new insertions may be
 viewed; and many a jaunt will be made, ere that licenser, for it must be
 the same man, can either be found, or found at leisure; meanwhile either
 the press must stand still, which is no small damage, or the author lose
 his accuratest thoughts, and send the book forth worse than he had made
 it, which to a diligent writer is the greatest melancholy and vexation
 that can befall.
 
 And how can a man teach with authority, which is the life of teaching;
 how can he be a doctor in his book as he ought to be, or else had better
 be silent, whenas all he teaches, all he delivers, is but under the
 tuition, under the correction of his patriarchal licenser to blot or
 alter what precisely accords not with the hidebound humour which he
 calls his judgment? When every acute reader, upon the first sight of a
 pedantic licence, will be ready with these like words to ding the book
 a quoit's distance from him: I hate a pupil teacher, I endure not an
 instructor that comes to me under the wardship of an overseeing fist. I
 know nothing of the licenser, but that I have his own hand here for his
 arrogance; who shall warrant me his judgment? The State, sir, replies
 the stationer, but has a quick return: The State shall be my governors,
 but not my critics; they may be mistaken in the choice of a licenser,
 as easily as this licenser may be mistaken in an author; this is
 some common stuff; and he might add from Sir Francis Bacon, THAT
 SUCH AUTHORIZED BOOKS ARE BUT THE LANGUAGE OF THE TIMES. For though a
 licenser should happen to be judicious more than ordinary, which will
 be a great jeopardy of the next succession, yet his very office and his
 commission enjoins him to let pass nothing but what is vulgarly received
 already.
 
 Nay, which is more lamentable, if the work of any deceased author,
 though never so famous in his lifetime and even to this day, come to
 their hands for licence to be printed, or reprinted, if there be found
 in his book one sentence of a venturous edge, uttered in the height
 of zeal (and who knows whether it might not be the dictate of a divine
 spirit?) yet not suiting with every low decrepit humour of their own,
 though it were Knox himself, the reformer of a kingdom, that spake it,
 they will not pardon him their dash: the sense of that great man shall
 to all posterity be lost, for the fearfulness or the presumptuous
 rashness of a perfunctory licenser. And to what an author this violence
 hath been lately done, and in what book of greatest consequence to be
 faithfully published, I could now instance, but shall forbear till a
 more convenient season.
 
 Yet if these things be not resented seriously and timely by them who
 have the remedy in their power, but that such iron-moulds as these shall
 have authority to gnaw out the choicest periods of exquisitest books,
 and to commit such a treacherous fraud against the orphan remainders of
 worthiest men after death, the more sorrow will belong to that hapless
 race of men, whose misfortune it is to have understanding. Henceforth
 let no man care to learn, or care to be more than worldly-wise; for
 certainly in higher matters to be ignorant and slothful, to be a common
 steadfast dunce, will be the only pleasant life, and only in request.
 
 And it is a particular disesteem of every knowing person alive, and most
 injurious to the written labours and monuments of the dead, so to me it
 seems an undervaluing and vilifying of the whole nation. I cannot set
 so light by all the invention, the art, the wit, the grave and solid
 judgment which is in England, as that it can be comprehended in any
 twenty capacities how good soever, much less that it should not pass
 except their superintendence be over it, except it be sifted and
 strained with their strainers, that it should be uncurrent without
 their manual stamp. Truth and understanding are not such wares as to be
 monopolized and traded in by tickets and statutes and standards. We must
 not think to make a staple commodity of all the knowledge in the land,
 to mark and licence it like our broadcloth and our woolpacks. What is it
 but a servitude like that imposed by the Philistines, not to be allowed
 the sharpening of our own axes and coulters, but we must repair from
 all quarters to twenty licensing forges? Had anyone written and divulged
 erroneous things and scandalous to honest life, misusing and forfeiting
 the esteem had of his reason among men, if after conviction this only
 censure were adjudged him that he should never henceforth write but
 what were first examined by an appointed officer, whose hand should be
 annexed to pass his credit for him that now he might be safely read; it
 could not be apprehended less than a disgraceful punishment. Whence to
 include the whole nation, and those that never yet thus offended, under
 such a diffident and suspectful prohibition, may plainly be understood
 what a disparagement it is. So much the more, whenas debtors and
 delinquents may walk abroad without a keeper, but unoffensive books must
 not stir forth without a visible jailer in their title.
 
 Nor is it to the common people less than a reproach; for if we be
 so jealous over them, as that we dare not trust them with an English
 pamphlet, what do we but censure them for a giddy, vicious, and
 ungrounded people; in such a sick and weak state of faith and
 discretion, as to be able to take nothing down but through the pipe of a
 licenser? That this is care or love of them, we cannot pretend, whenas,
 in those popish places where the laity are most hated and despised, the
 same strictness is used over them. Wisdom we cannot call it, because
 it stops but one breach of licence, nor that neither: whenas those
 corruptions, which it seeks to prevent, break in faster at other doors
 which cannot be shut.
 
 And in conclusion it reflects to the disrepute of our ministers also, of
 whose labours we should hope better, and of the proficiency which their
 flock reaps by them, than that after all this light of the Gospel which
 is, and is to be, and all this continual preaching, they should still be
 frequented with such an unprincipled, unedified and laic rabble, as
 that the whiff of every new pamphlet should stagger them out of their
 catechism and Christian walking. This may have much reason to discourage
 the ministers when such a low conceit is had of all their exhortations,
 and the benefiting of their hearers, as that they are not thought fit
 to be turned loose to three sheets of paper without a licenser; that all
 the sermons, all the lectures preached, printed, vented in such numbers,
 and such volumes, as have now well nigh made all other books unsaleable,
 should not be armour enough against one single Enchiridion, without the
 castle of St. Angelo of an Imprimatur.
 
 And lest some should persuade ye, Lords and Commons, that these
 arguments of learned men's discouragement at this your Order are mere
 flourishes, and not real, I could recount what I have seen and heard in
 other countries, where this kind of inquisition tyrannizes; when I have
 sat among their learned men, for that honour I had, and been counted
 happy to be born in such a place of philosophic freedom, as they
 supposed England was, while themselves did nothing but bemoan the
 servile condition into which learning amongst them was brought; that
 this was it which had damped the glory of Italian wits; that nothing had
 been there written now these many years but flattery and fustian.
 There it was that I found and visited the famous Galileo, grown old, a
 prisoner to the Inquisition, for thinking in astronomy otherwise than
 the Franciscan and Dominican licensers thought. And though I knew
 that England then was groaning loudest under the prelatical yoke,
 nevertheless I took it as a pledge of future happiness, that other
 nations were so persuaded of her liberty. Yet was it beyond my hope that
 those worthies were then breathing in her air, who should be her leaders
 to such a deliverance, as shall never be forgotten by any revolution of
 time that this world hath to finish. When that was once begun, it was as
 little in my fear that what words of complaint I heard among learned men
 of other parts uttered against the Inquisition, the same I should hear
 by as learned men at home, uttered in time of Parliament against an
 order of licensing; and that so generally that, when I had disclosed
 myself a companion of their discontent, I might say, if without envy,
 that he whom an honest quaestorship had endeared to the Sicilians was
 not more by them importuned against Verres, than the favourable opinion
 which I had among many who honour ye, and are known and respected by ye,
 loaded me with entreaties and persuasions, that I would not despair to
 lay together that which just reason should bring into my mind, toward
 the removal of an undeserved thraldom upon learning. That this is
 not therefore the disburdening of a particular fancy, but the common
 grievance of all those who had prepared their minds and studies
 above the vulgar pitch to advance truth in others, and from others to
 entertain it, thus much may satisfy.
 
 And in their name I shall for neither friend nor foe conceal what
 the general murmur is; that if it come to inquisitioning again and
 licensing, and that we are so timorous of ourselves, and so suspicious
 of all men, as to fear each book and the shaking of every leaf, before
 we know what the contents are; if some who but of late were little
 better than silenced from preaching shall come now to silence us from
 reading, except what they please, it cannot be guessed what is intended
 by some but a second tyranny over learning: and will soon put it out of
 controversy, that bishops and presbyters are the same to us, both name
 and thing. That those evils of prelaty, which before from five or six
 and twenty sees were distributively charged upon the whole people, will
 now light wholly upon learning, is not obscure to us: whenas now the
 pastor of a small unlearned parish on the sudden shall be exalted
 archbishop over a large diocese of books, and yet not remove, but keep
 his other cure too, a mystical pluralist. He who but of late cried down
 the sole ordination of every novice Bachelor of Art, and denied sole
 jurisdiction over the simplest parishioner, shall now at home in his
 private chair assume both these over worthiest and excellentest books
 and ablest authors that write them.
 
 This is not, ye Covenants and Protestations that we have made! this is
 not to put down prelaty; this is but to chop an episcopacy; this is
 but to translate the Palace Metropolitan from one kind of dominion into
 another; this is but an old canonical sleight of commuting our penance.
 To startle thus betimes at a mere unlicensed pamphlet will after a
 while be afraid of every conventicle, and a while after will make a
 conventicle of every Christian meeting. But I am certain that a State
 governed by the rules of justice and fortitude, or a Church built
 and founded upon the rock of faith and true knowledge, cannot be so
 pusillanimous. While things are yet not constituted in religion, that
 freedom of writing should be restrained by a discipline imitated from
 the prelates and learnt by them from the Inquisition, to shut us up all
 again into the breast of a licenser, must needs give cause of doubt and
 discouragement to all learned and religious men.
 
 Who cannot but discern the fineness of this politic drift, and who are
 the contrivers; that while bishops were to be baited down, then all
 presses might be open; it was the people's birthright and privilege in
 time of Parliament, it was the breaking forth of light. But now, the
 bishops abrogated and voided out of the Church, as if our Reformation
 sought no more but to make room for others into their seats under
 another name, the episcopal arts begin to bud again, the cruse of truth
 must run no more oil, liberty of printing must be enthralled again
 under a prelatical commission of twenty, the privilege of the people
 nullified, and, which is worse, the freedom of learning must groan
 again, and to her old fetters: all this the Parliament yet sitting.
 Although their own late arguments and defences against the prelates
 might remember them, that this obstructing violence meets for the most
 part with an event utterly opposite to the end which it drives at:
 instead of suppressing sects and schisms, it raises them and invests
 them with a reputation. The punishing of wits enhances their authority,
 saith the Viscount St. Albans; and a forbidden writing is thought to be
 a certain spark of truth that flies up in the faces of them who seek
 to tread it out. This Order, therefore, may prove a nursing-mother to
 sects, but I shall easily show how it will be a step-dame to Truth: and
 first by disenabling us to the maintenance of what is known already.
 
 Well knows he who uses to consider, that our faith and knowledge thrives
 by exercise, as well as our limbs and complexion. Truth is compared in
 Scripture to a streaming fountain; if her waters flow not in a perpetual
 progression, they sicken into a muddy pool of conformity and tradition.
 A man may be a heretic in the truth; and if he believe things only
 because his pastor says so, or the Assembly so determines, without
 knowing other reason, though his belief be true, yet the very truth he
 holds becomes his heresy.
 
 There is not any burden that some would gladlier post off to another
 than the charge and care of their religion. There be--who knows not that
 there be?--of Protestants and professors who live and die in as arrant
 an implicit faith as any lay Papist of Loretto. A wealthy man, addicted
 to his pleasure and to his profits, finds religion to be a traffic so
 entangled, and of so many piddling accounts, that of all mysteries he
 cannot skill to keep a stock going upon that trade. What should he do?
 fain he would have the name to be religious, fain he would bear up with
 his neighbours in that. What does he therefore, but resolves to give
 over toiling, and to find himself out some factor, to whose care and
 credit he may commit the whole managing of his religious affairs; some
 divine of note and estimation that must be. To him he adheres, resigns
 the whole warehouse of his religion, with all the locks and keys, into
 his custody; and indeed makes the very person of that man his religion;
 esteems his associating with him a sufficient evidence and commendatory
 of his own piety. So that a man may say his religion is now no more
 within himself, but is become a dividual movable, and goes and comes
 near him, according as that good man frequents the house. He entertains
 him, gives him gifts, feasts him, lodges him; his religion comes home at
 night, prays, is liberally supped, and sumptuously laid to sleep; rises,
 is saluted, and after the malmsey, or some well-spiced brewage, and
 better breakfasted than he whose morning appetite would have gladly fed
 on green figs between Bethany and Jerusalem, his religion walks abroad
 at eight, and leaves his kind entertainer in the shop trading all day
 without his religion.
 
 Another sort there be who, when they hear that all things shall be
 ordered, all things regulated and settled, nothing written but what
 passes through the custom-house of certain publicans that have the
 tonnaging and poundaging of all free-spoken truth, will straight give
 themselves up into your hands, make 'em and cut 'em out what religion ye
 please: there be delights, there be recreations and jolly pastimes that
 will fetch the day about from sun to sun, and rock the tedious year
 as in a delightful dream. What need they torture their heads with that
 which others have taken so strictly and so unalterably into their own
 purveying? These are the fruits which a dull ease and cessation of our
 knowledge will bring forth among the people. How goodly and how to be
 wished were such an obedient unanimity as this, what a fine conformity
 would it starch us all into! Doubtless a staunch and solid piece of
 framework, as any January could freeze together.
 
 Nor much better will be the consequence even among the clergy
 themselves. It is no new thing never heard of before, for a parochial
 minister, who has his reward and is at his Hercules' pillars in a warm
 benefice, to be easily inclinable, if he have nothing else that may
 rouse up his studies, to finish his circuit in an English Concordance
 and a topic folio, the gatherings and savings of a sober graduateship,
 a Harmony and a Catena; treading the constant round of certain common
 doctrinal heads, attended with their uses, motives, marks, and
 means, out of which, as out of an alphabet, or sol-fa, by forming and
 transforming, joining and disjoining variously, a little bookcraft, and
 two hours' meditation, might furnish him unspeakably to the performance
 of more than a weekly charge of sermoning: not to reckon up the infinite
 helps of interlinearies, breviaries, synopses, and other loitering gear.
 But as for the multitude of sermons ready printed and piled up, on every
 text that is not difficult, our London trading St. Thomas in his vestry,
 and add to boot St. Martin and St. Hugh, have not within their hallowed
 limits more vendible ware of all sorts ready made: so that penury he
 never need fear of pulpit provision, having where so plenteously to
 refresh his magazine. But if his rear and flanks be not impaled, if his
 back door be not secured by the rigid licenser, but that a bold book
 may now and then issue forth and give the assault to some of his old
 collections in their trenches, it will concern him then to keep waking,
 to stand in watch, to set good guards and sentinels about his
 received opinions, to walk the round and counter-round with his fellow
 inspectors, fearing lest any of his flock be seduced, who also then
 would be better instructed, better exercised and disciplined. And God
 send that the fear of this diligence, which must then be used, do not
 make us affect the laziness of a licensing Church.
 
 For if we be sure we are in the right, and do not hold the truth
 guiltily, which becomes not, if we ourselves condemn not our own weak
 and frivolous teaching, and the people for an untaught and irreligious
 gadding rout, what can be more fair than when a man judicious, learned,
 and of a conscience, for aught we know, as good as theirs that taught
 us what we know, shall not privily from house to house, which is more
 dangerous, but openly by writing publish to the world what his opinion
 is, what his reasons, and wherefore that which is now thought cannot be
 sound? Christ urged it as wherewith to justify himself, that he preached
 in public; yet writing is more public than preaching; and more easy
 to refutation, if need be, there being so many whose business and
 profession merely it is to be the champions of truth; which if they
 neglect, what can be imputed but their sloth, or unability?
 
 Thus much we are hindered and disinured by this course of licensing,
 toward the true knowledge of what we seem to know. For how much it hurts
 and hinders the licensers themselves in the calling of their ministry,
 more than any secular employment, if they will discharge that office as
 they ought, so that of necessity they must neglect either the one duty
 or the other, I insist not, because it is a particular, but leave it to
 their own conscience, how they will decide it there.
 
 There is yet behind of what I purposed to lay open, the incredible loss
 and detriment that this plot of licensing puts us to; more than if some
 enemy at sea should stop up all our havens and ports and creeks, it
 hinders and retards the importation of our richest merchandise, truth;
 nay, it was first established and put in practice by Antichristian
 malice and mystery on set purpose to extinguish, if it were possible,
 the light of Reformation, and to settle falsehood; little differing from
 that policy wherewith the Turk upholds his Alcoran, by the prohibition
 of printing. 'Tis not denied, but gladly confessed, we are to send our
 thanks and vows to Heaven louder than most of nations, for that great
 measure of truth which we enjoy, especially in those main points between
 us and the Pope, with his appurtenances the prelates: but he who thinks
 we are to pitch our tent here, and have attained the utmost prospect of
 reformation that the mortal glass wherein we contemplate can show us,
 till we come to beatific vision, that man by this very opinion declares
 that he is yet far short of truth.
 
 Truth indeed came once into the world with her divine Master, and was
 a perfect shape most glorious to look on: but when he ascended, and his
 Apostles after him were laid asleep, then straight arose a wicked race
 of deceivers, who, as that story goes of the Egyptian Typhon with his
 conspirators, how they dealt with the good Osiris, took the virgin
 Truth, hewed her lovely form into a thousand pieces, and scattered them
 to the four winds. From that time ever since, the sad friends of Truth,
 such as durst appear, imitating the careful search that Isis made for
 the mangled body of Osiris, went up and down gathering up limb by limb,
 still as they could find them. We have not yet found them all, Lords and
 Commons, nor ever shall do, till her Master's second coming; he shall
 bring together every joint and member, and shall mould them into
 an immortal feature of loveliness and perfection. Suffer not these
 licensing prohibitions to stand at every place of opportunity,
 forbidding and disturbing them that continue seeking, that continue to
 do our obsequies to the torn body of our martyred saint.
 
 We boast our light; but if we look not wisely on the sun itself, it
 smites us into darkness. Who can discern those planets that are oft
 combust, and those stars of brightest magnitude that rise and set with
 the sun, until the opposite motion of their orbs bring them to such a
 place in the firmament, where they may be seen evening or morning? The
 light which we have gained was given us, not to be ever staring on, but
 by it to discover onward things more remote from our knowledge. It
 is not the unfrocking of a priest, the unmitring of a bishop, and the
 removing him from off the presbyterian shoulders, that will make us a
 happy nation. No, if other things as great in the Church, and in the
 rule of life both economical and political, be not looked into and
 reformed, we have looked so long upon the blaze that Zuinglius and
 Calvin hath beaconed up to us, that we are stark blind. There be who
 perpetually complain of schisms and sects, and make it such a calamity
 that any man dissents from their maxims. 'Tis their own pride and
 ignorance which causes the disturbing, who neither will hear with
 meekness, nor can convince; yet all must be suppressed which is not
 found in their Syntagma. They are the troublers, they are the dividers
 of unity, who neglect and permit not others to unite those dissevered
 pieces which are yet wanting to the body of Truth. To be still searching
 what we know not by what we know, still closing up truth to truth as we
 find it (for all her body is homogeneal and proportional), this is the
 golden rule in theology as well as in arithmetic, and makes up the
 best harmony in a Church; not the forced and outward union of cold, and
 neutral, and inwardly divided minds.
 
 Lords and Commons of England! consider what nation it is whereof ye are,
 and whereof ye are the governors: a nation not slow and dull, but of a
 quick, ingenious and piercing spirit, acute to invent, subtle and sinewy
 to discourse, not beneath the reach of any point the highest that human
 capacity can soar to. Therefore the studies of learning in her deepest
 sciences have been so ancient and so eminent among us, that writers of
 good antiquity and ablest judgment have been persuaded that even the
 school of Pythagoras and the Persian wisdom took beginning from the
 old philosophy of this island. And that wise and civil Roman, Julius
 Agricola, who governed once here for Caesar, preferred the natural wits
 of Britain before the laboured studies of the French. Nor is it for
 nothing that the grave and frugal Transylvanian sends out yearly from
 as far as the mountainous borders of Russia, and beyond the Hercynian
 wilderness, not their youth, but their staid men, to learn our language
 and our theologic arts.
 
 Yet that which is above all this, the favour and the love of Heaven,
 we have great argument to think in a peculiar manner propitious and
 propending towards us. Why else was this nation chosen before any other,
 that out of her, as out of Sion, should be proclaimed and sounded forth
 the first tidings and trumpet of Reformation to all Europe? And had it
 not been the obstinate perverseness of our prelates against the divine
 and admirable spirit of Wickliff, to suppress him as a schismatic and
 innovator, perhaps neither the Bohemian Huns and Jerome, no nor the name
 of Luther or of Calvin, had been ever known: the glory of reforming all
 our neighbours had been completely ours. But now, as our obdurate clergy
 have with violence demeaned the matter, we are become hitherto the
 latest and the backwardest scholars, of whom God offered to have made
 us the teachers. Now once again by all concurrence of signs, and by
 the general instinct of holy and devout men, as they daily and solemnly
 express their thoughts, God is decreeing to begin some new and great
 period in his Church, even to the reforming of Reformation itself: what
 does he then but reveal himself to his servants, and as his manner is,
 first to his Englishmen? I say, as his manner is, first to us, though we
 mark not the method of his counsels, and are unworthy.
 
 Behold now this vast city: a city of refuge, the mansion house of
 liberty, encompassed and surrounded with his protection; the shop of war
 hath not there more anvils and hammers waking, to fashion out the plates
 and instruments of armed justice in defence of beleaguered truth, than
 there be pens and heads there, sitting by their studious lamps, musing,
 searching, revolving new notions and ideas wherewith to present, as with
 their homage and their fealty, the approaching Reformation: others as
 fast reading, trying all things, assenting to the force of reason and
 convincement. What could a man require more from a nation so pliant and
 so prone to seek after knowledge? What wants there to such a towardly
 and pregnant soil, but wise and faithful labourers, to make a knowing
 people, a nation of prophets, of sages, and of worthies? We reckon more
 than five months yet to harvest; there need not be five weeks; had we
 but eyes to lift up, the fields are white already.
 
 Where there is much desire to learn, there of necessity will be much
 arguing, much writing, many opinions; for opinion in good men is but
 knowledge in the making. Under these fantastic terrors of sect and
 schism, we wrong the earnest and zealous thirst after knowledge and
 understanding which God hath stirred up in this city. What some lament
 of, we rather should rejoice at, should rather praise this pious
 forwardness among men, to reassume the ill-deputed care of their
 religion into their own hands again. A little generous prudence, a
 little forbearance of one another, and some grain of charity might win
 all these diligences to join, and unite in one general and brotherly
 search after truth; could we but forgo this prelatical tradition of
 crowding free consciences and Christian liberties into canons and
 precepts of men. I doubt not, if some great and worthy stranger should
 come among us, wise to discern the mould and temper of a people, and how
 to govern it, observing the high hopes and aims, the diligent alacrity
 of our extended thoughts and reasonings in the pursuance of truth and
 freedom, but that he would cry out as Pyrrhus did, admiring the Roman
 docility and courage: If such were my Epirots, I would not despair the
 greatest design that could be attempted, to make a Church or kingdom
 happy.
 
 Yet these are the men cried out against for schismatics and sectaries;
 as if, while the temple of the Lord was building, some cutting, some
 squaring the marble, others hewing the cedars, there should be a sort
 of irrational men who could not consider there must be many schisms and
 many dissections made in the quarry and in the timber, ere the house
 of God can be built. And when every stone is laid artfully together,
 it cannot be united into a continuity, it can but be contiguous in
 this world; neither can every piece of the building be of one form;
 nay rather the perfection consists in this, that, out of many
 moderate varieties and brotherly dissimilitudes that are not vastly
 disproportional, arises the goodly and the graceful symmetry that
 commends the whole pile and structure.
 
 Let us therefore be more considerate builders, more wise in spiritual
 architecture, when great reformation is expected. For now the time seems
 come, wherein Moses the great prophet may sit in heaven rejoicing to
 see that memorable and glorious wish of his fulfilled, when not only
 our seventy elders, but all the Lord's people, are become prophets. No
 marvel then though some men, and some good men too perhaps, but young in
 goodness, as Joshua then was, envy them. They fret, and out of their own
 weakness are in agony, lest these divisions and subdivisions will undo
 us. The adversary again applauds, and waits the hour: when they have
 branched themselves out, saith he, small enough into parties and
 partitions, then will be our time. Fool! he sees not the firm root, out
 of which we all grow, though into branches: nor will beware until he
 see our small divided maniples cutting through at every angle of his
 ill-united and unwieldy brigade. And that we are to hope better of
 all these supposed sects and schisms, and that we shall not need that
 solicitude, honest perhaps, though over-timorous, of them that vex in
 this behalf, but shall laugh in the end at those malicious applauders of
 our differences, I have these reasons to persuade me.
 
 First, when a city shall be as it were besieged and blocked about, her
 navigable river infested, inroads and incursions round, defiance and
 battle oft rumoured to be marching up even to her walls and suburb
 trenches, that then the people, or the greater part, more than at other
 times, wholly taken up with the study of highest and most important
 matters to be reformed, should be disputing, reasoning, reading,
 inventing, discoursing, even to a rarity and admiration, things not
 before discoursed or written of, argues first a singular goodwill,
 contentedness and confidence in your prudent foresight and safe
 government, Lords and Commons; and from thence derives itself to a
 gallant bravery and well-grounded contempt of their enemies, as if there
 were no small number of as great spirits among us, as his was, who when
 Rome was nigh besieged by Hannibal, being in the city, bought that piece
 of ground at no cheap rate, whereon Hannibal himself encamped his own
 regiment.
 
 Next, it is a lively and cheerful presage of our happy success and
 victory. For as in a body, when the blood is fresh, the spirits pure and
 vigorous, not only to vital but to rational faculties, and those in the
 acutest and the pertest operations of wit and subtlety, it argues in
 what good plight and constitution the body is; so when the cheerfulness
 of the people is so sprightly up, as that it has not only wherewith to
 guard well its own freedom and safety, but to spare, and to bestow upon
 the solidest and sublimest points of controversy and new invention, it
 betokens us not degenerated, nor drooping to a fatal decay, but casting
 off the old and wrinkled skin of corruption to outlive these pangs and
 wax young again, entering the glorious ways of truth and prosperous
 virtue, destined to become great and honourable in these latter ages.
 Methinks I see in my mind a noble and puissant nation rousing herself
 like a strong man after sleep, and shaking her invincible locks:
 methinks I see her as an eagle mewing her mighty youth, and kindling
 her undazzled eyes at the full midday beam; purging and unscaling her
 long-abused sight at the fountain itself of heavenly radiance; while the
 whole noise of timorous and flocking birds, with those also that love
 the twilight, flutter about, amazed at what she means, and in their
 envious gabble would prognosticate a year of sects and schisms.
 
 What would ye do then? should ye suppress all this flowery crop of
 knowledge and new light sprung up and yet springing daily in this city?
 Should ye set an oligarchy of twenty engrossers over it, to bring a
 famine upon our minds again, when we shall know nothing but what is
 measured to us by their bushel? Believe it, Lords and Commons, they
 who counsel ye to such a suppressing do as good as bid ye suppress
 yourselves; and I will soon show how. If it be desired to know the
 immediate cause of all this free writing and free speaking, there cannot
 be assigned a truer than your own mild and free and humane government.
 It is the liberty, Lords and Commons, which your own valorous and happy
 counsels have purchased us, liberty which is the nurse of all great
 wits; this is that which hath rarefied and enlightened our spirits like
 the influence of heaven; this is that which hath enfranchised, enlarged
 and lifted up our apprehensions, degrees above themselves.
 
 Ye cannot make us now less capable, less knowing, less eagerly pursuing
 of the truth, unless ye first make yourselves, that made us so, less
 the lovers, less the founders of our true liberty. We can grow ignorant
 again, brutish, formal and slavish, as ye found us; but you then
 must first become that which ye cannot be, oppressive, arbitrary and
 tyrannous, as they were from whom ye have freed us. That our hearts
 are now more capacious, our thoughts more erected to the search and
 expectation of greatest and exactest things, is the issue of your own
 virtue propagated in us; ye cannot suppress that, unless ye reinforce an
 abrogated and merciless law, that fathers may dispatch at will their own
 children. And who shall then stick closest to ye, and excite others?
 not he who takes up arms for coat and conduct, and his four nobles of
 Danegelt. Although I dispraise not the defence of just immunities, yet
 love my peace better, if that were all. Give me the liberty to know, to
 utter, and to argue freely according to conscience, above all liberties.
 
 What would be best advised, then, if it be found so hurtful and so
 unequal to suppress opinions for the newness or the unsuitableness to
 a customary acceptance, will not be my task to say. I only shall repeat
 what I have learned from one of your own honourable number, a right
 noble and pious lord, who, had he not sacrificed his life and fortunes
 to the Church and Commonwealth, we had not now missed and bewailed a
 worthy and undoubted patron of this argument. Ye know him, I am sure;
 yet I for honour's sake, and may it be eternal to him, shall name him,
 the Lord Brook. He writing of episcopacy, and by the way treating of
 sects and schisms, left ye his vote, or rather now the last words of his
 dying charge, which I know will ever be of dear and honoured regard with
 ye, so full of meekness and breathing charity, that next to his last
 testament, who bequeathed love and peace to his disciples, I cannot
 call to mind where I have read or heard words more mild and peaceful. He
 there exhorts us to hear with patience and humility those, however
 they be miscalled, that desire to live purely, in such a use of God's
 ordinances, as the best guidance of their conscience gives them, and
 to tolerate them, though in some disconformity to ourselves. The book
 itself will tell us more at large, being published to the world, and
 dedicated to the Parliament by him who, both for his life and for his
 death, deserves that what advice he left be not laid by without perusal.
 
 And now the time in special is, by privilege to write and speak what may
 help to the further discussing of matters in agitation. The temple of
 Janus with his two controversial faces might now not unsignificantly be
 set open. And though all the winds of doctrine were let loose to
 play upon the earth, so Truth be in the field, we do injuriously,
 by licensing and prohibiting, to misdoubt her strength. Let her and
 Falsehood grapple; who ever knew Truth put to the worse, in a free and
 open encounter? Her confuting is the best and surest suppressing. He who
 hears what praying there is for light and clearer knowledge to be sent
 down among us, would think of other matters to be constituted beyond
 the discipline of Geneva, framed and fabricked already to our hands. Yet
 when the new light which we beg for shines in upon us, there be who envy
 and oppose, if it come not first in at their casements. What a collusion
 is this, whenas we are exhorted by the wise man to use diligence, to
 seek for wisdom as for hidden treasures early and late, that another
 order shall enjoin us to know nothing but by statute? When a man hath
 been labouring the hardest labour in the deep mines of knowledge,
 hath furnished out his findings in all their equipage: drawn forth
 his reasons as it were a battle ranged: scattered and defeated all
 objections in his way; calls out his adversary into the plain, offers
 him the advantage of wind and sun, if he please, only that he may try
 the matter by dint of argument: for his opponents then to skulk, to lay
 ambushments, to keep a narrow bridge of licensing where the challenger
 should pass, though it be valour enough in soldiership, is but weakness
 and cowardice in the wars of Truth.
 
 For who knows not that Truth is strong, next to the Almighty? She needs
 no policies, nor stratagems, nor licensings to make her victorious;
 those are the shifts and the defences that error uses against her power.
 Give her but room, and do not bind her when she sleeps, for then she
 speaks not true, as the old Proteus did, who spake oracles only when he
 was caught and bound, but then rather she turns herself into all shapes,
 except her own, and perhaps tunes her voice according to the time, as
 Micaiah did before Ahab, until she be adjured into her own likeness. Yet
 is it not impossible that she may have more shapes than one. What else
 is all that rank of things indifferent, wherein Truth may be on this
 side or on the other, without being unlike herself? What but a vain
 shadow else is the abolition of those ordinances, that hand-writing
 nailed to the cross? What great purchase is this Christian liberty which
 Paul so often boasts of? His doctrine is, that he who eats or eats not,
 regards a day or regards it not, may do either to the Lord. How many
 other things might be tolerated in peace, and left to conscience, had we
 but charity, and were it not the chief stronghold of our hypocrisy to be
 ever judging one another?
 
 I fear yet this iron yoke of outward conformity hath left a slavish
 print upon our necks; the ghost of a linen decency yet haunts us.
 We stumble and are impatient at the least dividing of one visible
 congregation from another, though it be not in fundamentals; and
 through our forwardness to suppress, and our backwardness to recover
 any enthralled piece of truth out of the gripe of custom, we care not to
 keep truth separated from truth, which is the fiercest rent and disunion
 of all. We do not see that, while we still affect by all means a rigid
 external formality, we may as soon fall again into a gross conforming
 stupidity, a stark and dead congealment of wood and hay and stubble,
 forced and frozen together, which is more to the sudden degenerating of
 a Church than many subdichotomies of petty schisms.
 
 Not that I can think well of every light separation, or that all in a
 Church is to be expected gold and silver and precious stones: it is not
 possible for man to sever the wheat from the tares, the good fish from
 the other fry; that must be the Angels' ministry at the end of mortal
 things. Yet if all cannot be of one mind--as who looks they should
 be?--this doubtless is more wholesome, more prudent, and more Christian,
 that many be tolerated, rather than all compelled. I mean not tolerated
 popery, and open superstition, which, as it extirpates all religions and
 civil supremacies, so itself should be extirpate, provided first that
 all charitable and compassionate means be used to win and regain the
 weak and the misled: that also which is impious or evil absolutely
 either against faith or manners no law can possibly permit, that intends
 not to unlaw itself: but those neighbouring differences, or rather
 indifferences, are what I speak of, whether in some point of doctrine
 or of discipline, which, though they may be many, yet need not interrupt
 THE UNITY OF SPIRIT, if we could but find among us THE BOND OF PEACE.
 
 In the meanwhile if any one would write, and bring his helpful hand to
 the slow-moving Reformation which we labour under, if Truth have spoken
 to him before others, or but seemed at least to speak, who hath so
 bejesuited us that we should trouble that man with asking license to do
 so worthy a deed? and not consider this, that if it come to prohibiting,
 there is not aught more likely to be prohibited than truth itself; whose
 first appearance to our eyes, bleared and dimmed with prejudice and
 custom, is more unsightly and unplausible than many errors, even as the
 person is of many a great man slight and contemptuous to see to. And
 what do they tell us vainly of new opinions, when this very opinion of
 theirs, that none must be heard but whom they like, is the worst and
 newest opinion of all others; and is the chief cause why sects and
 schisms do so much abound, and true knowledge is kept at distance from
 us; besides yet a greater danger which is in it.
 
 For when God shakes a kingdom with strong and healthful commotions to
 a general reforming, 'tis not untrue that many sectaries and false
 teachers are then busiest in seducing; but yet more true it is, that God
 then raises to his own work men of rare abilities, and more than
 common industry, not only to look back and revise what hath been taught
 heretofore, but to gain further and go on some new enlightened steps in
 the discovery of truth. For such is the order of God's enlightening his
 Church, to dispense and deal out by degrees his beam, so as our earthly
 eyes may best sustain it.
 
 Neither is God appointed and confined, where and out of what place these
 his chosen shall be first heard to speak; for he sees not as man sees,
 chooses not as man chooses, lest we should devote ourselves again to set
 places, and assemblies, and outward callings of men; planting our faith
 one while in the old Convocation house, and another while in the Chapel
 at Westminster; when all the faith and religion that shall be there
 canonized is not sufficient without plain convincement, and the charity
 of patient instruction to supple the least bruise of conscience, to
 edify the meanest Christian, who desires to walk in the Spirit, and not
 in the letter of human trust, for all the number of voices that can be
 there made; no, though Harry VII himself there, with all his liege tombs
 about him, should lend them voices from the dead, to swell their number.
 
 And if the men be erroneous who appear to be the leading schismatics,
 what withholds us but our sloth, our self-will, and distrust in the
 right cause, that we do not give them gentle meetings and gentle
 dismissions, that we debate not and examine the matter thoroughly with
 liberal and frequent audience; if not for their sakes, yet for our own?
 seeing no man who hath tasted learning, but will confess the many ways
 of profiting by those who, not contented with stale receipts, are able
 to manage and set forth new positions to the world. And were they but as
 the dust and cinders of our feet, so long as in that notion they may yet
 serve to polish and brighten the armoury of Truth, even for that respect
 they were not utterly to be cast away. But if they be of those whom God
 hath fitted for the special use of these times with eminent and ample
 gifts, and those perhaps neither among the priests nor among the
 Pharisees, and we in the haste of a precipitant zeal shall make no
 distinction, but resolve to stop their mouths, because we fear they come
 with new and dangerous opinions, as we commonly forejudge them ere we
 understand them; no less than woe to us, while, thinking thus to defend
 the Gospel, we are found the persecutors.
 
 There have been not a few since the beginning of this Parliament, both
 of the presbytery and others, who by their unlicensed books, to the
 contempt of an Imprimatur, first broke that triple ice clung about our
 hearts, and taught the people to see day: I hope that none of those were
 the persuaders to renew upon us this bondage which they themselves have
 wrought so much good by contemning. But if neither the check that Moses
 gave to young Joshua, nor the countermand which our Saviour gave
 to young John, who was so ready to prohibit those whom he thought
 unlicensed, be not enough to admonish our elders how unacceptable to
 God their testy mood of prohibiting is; if neither their own remembrance
 what evil hath abounded in the Church by this set of licensing, and what
 good they themselves have begun by transgressing it, be not enough,
 but that they will persuade and execute the most Dominican part of the
 Inquisition over us, and are already with one foot in the stirrup so
 active at suppressing, it would be no unequal distribution in the first
 place to suppress the suppressors themselves: whom the change of their
 condition hath puffed up, more than their late experience of harder
 times hath made wise.
 
 And as for regulating the press, let no man think to have the honour
 of advising ye better than yourselves have done in that Order published
 next before this, "that no book be printed, unless the printer's and the
 author's name, or at least the printer's, be registered." Those which
 otherwise come forth, if they be found mischievous and libellous, the
 fire and the executioner will be the timeliest and the most effectual
 remedy that man's prevention can use. For this authentic Spanish policy
 of licensing books, if I have said aught, will prove the most unlicensed
 book itself within a short while; and was the immediate image of a Star
 Chamber decree to that purpose made in those very times when that Court
 did the rest of those her pious works, for which she is now fallen
 from the stars with Lucifer. Whereby ye may guess what kind of state
 prudence, what love of the people, what care of religion or good
 manners there was at the contriving, although with singular hypocrisy
 it pretended to bind books to their good behaviour. And how it got the
 upper hand of your precedent Order so well constituted before, if we may
 believe those men whose profession gives them cause to inquire most,
 it may be doubted there was in it the fraud of some old patentees and
 monopolizers in the trade of bookselling; who under pretence of the poor
 in their Company not to be defrauded, and the just retaining of each man
 his several copy, which God forbid should be gainsaid, brought divers
 glossing colours to the House, which were indeed but colours, and
 serving to no end except it be to exercise a superiority over their
 neighbours; men who do not therefore labour in an honest profession
 to which learning is indebted, that they should be made other men's
 vassals. Another end is thought was aimed at by some of them in
 procuring by petition this Order, that, having power in their hands,
 malignant books might the easier scape abroad, as the event shows.
 
 But of these sophisms and elenchs of merchandise I skill not. This I
 know, that errors in a good government and in a bad are equally almost
 incident; for what magistrate may not be misinformed, and much the
 sooner, if liberty of printing be reduced into the power of a few? But
 to redress willingly and speedily what hath been erred, and in highest
 authority to esteem a plain advertisement more than others have done a
 sumptuous bride, is a virtue (honoured Lords and Commons) answerable to
 your highest actions, and whereof none can participate but greatest and
 wisest men.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 This eBook was produced by Eaon Walkker.
 
 
 
 POEMATA: LATIN, GREEK AND ITALIAN POEMS BY JOHN MILTON
          (Translated by William Cowper).
 
 Digraphs, accents and italics have been omitted.
 Spelling has been modernized. Some notes and Titles
 have been slightly edited without comment. Notes follow
 the poem to which they refer.
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 Complimentary Pieces Addressed to the Author.
 
 1. Elegies
 
    Elegy I  -To Charles Diodati.
    Elegy II -On the Death of the University Beadle at
              Cambridge.
    Elegy III-On the Death of the Bishop of Winchester.
    Elegy IV -To My Tutor, Thomas Young.
    Elegy V  -On the Approach of Spring.
    Elegy VI -To Charles Diodati.
    Elegy VII
    On the Gunpowder Plot.
    Another on the Same.
    Another on the Same.
    Another on the Same.
    On the Invention of Gunpowder.
    To Leonora, Singing in Rome.
    Another to the Same.
    Another to the Same.
    The Fable of the Peasant and his Landlord.
 
 2. Poems in Various Metres.
 
    On the Death of the Vice-Chancellor, a Physician.
    On the Fifth of November.
    On the Death of the Bishop of Ely.
    That Nature is Not Subject to Decay.
    On the Platonic Ideal as Understood by Aristotle.
    To My Father.
    Psalm CXIV.
    The Philosopher and the King.
    On the Engraver of his Portrait.
    To Giovanni Salzilli.
    To Giovanni Battista Manso.
    The Death of Damon.
    To John Rouse.
 
 3. Translations of the Italian Poems.
 
 Appendix: To Christina, Queen of Sweden.
 Appendix: Translations of Poems in the Latin Prose Works.
 Appendix: Translation of a Latin Letter.
 Appendix: Translations of the Italian Poems by George
           MacDonald (I876).
 
 
 
 
        Complimentary Pieces Addressed to the Author.
 
 
 1Well as the author knows that the following testimonies are not
 so much about as above him, and that men of great ingenuity, as
 well as our friends, are apt, through abundant zeal, so to praise
 us as rather to draw their own likeness than ours, he was yet
 unwilling that the world should remain always ignorant of
 compositions that do him so much honour; and especially because he
 has other friends, who have, with much importunity, solicited
 their publication. Aware that excessive commendation awakens envy,
 he would with both hands thrust it from him, preferring just so
 much of that dangerous tribute as may of right belong to him; but
 at the same time he cannot deny that he sets the highest value on
 the suffrages of judicious and distinguished persons.
 
 1 Milton's Preface, Translated.
 
 1 These complimentary pieces have been sufficiently censured
 by a great authority, but no very candid judge either of Milton
 or his panegyrists. He, however, must have a heart sadly
 indifferent to the glory of his country, who is not gratified by
 the thought that she may exult in a son whom, young as he was,
 the Learned of Italy thus contended to honour.--W.C.
 
 
 
 The Neapolitan, Giovanni Battista Manso, Marquis of Villa,
          to the Englishman, John Milton.
 
 What features, form, mien, manners, with a mind
 Oh how intelligent, and how refined!
 Were but thy piety from fault as free,
 Thou wouldst no Angle1 but an Angel be.
 
 1 The reader will perceive that the word "Angle" (i.e. Anglo-
 Saxon) is essential, because the epigram turns upon it.--W.C.
 
 
 An Epigram Addressed to the Englishman, John Milton, a Poet
 Worthy of the Three Laurels of Poesy, the Grecian, Latin, and
 Etruscan, by Giovanni Salzilli of Rome
 
 Meles1 and Mincio both your urns depress!
 Sebetus, boast henceforth thy Tasso less!
 But let the Thames o'erpeer all floods, since he,
 For Milton famed, shall, single, match the three.
 
 1 Meles is a river of Ionia, in the neighborhood of Smyrna, whence
 Homer is called Melesigenes.
   The Mincio watered the city of Mantua famous as the birthplace
 of Virgil.
   Sebetus is now called the Fiume della Maddalena--it runs through
 Naples.--W.C.
 
 
               To John Milton.
 
 Greece sound thy Homer's, Rome thy Virgil's name,
 But England's Milton equals both in fame.
                                        --Selvaggi.
 
 
      To John Milton, English Gentleman.
 
                    An Ode.
 
      Exalt Me, Clio,1 to the skies,
      That I may form a starry crown,
      Beyond what Helicon supplies
      In laureate garlands of renown;
 To nobler worth be brighter glory given,
 And to a heavenly mind a recompense from heaven.
 
      Time's wasteful hunger cannot prey
      On everlasting high desert,
      Nor can Oblivion steal away
      Its record graven on the heart;
 Lodge but an arrow, Virtue, on the bow
 That binds my lyre, and death shall be a vanquished foe.
 
      In Ocean's blazing flood enshrined.
      Whose vassal tide around her swells,
      Albion. from other realms disjoined,
      The prowess of the world excels;
 She teems with heroes that to glory rise,
 With more than human force in our astonished eyes.
 
      To Virtue, driven from other lands,
      Their bosoms yield a safe retreat;
      Her law alone their deed commands,
      Her smiles they feel divinely sweet;
 Confirm my record, Milton, generous youth!
 And by true virtue prove thy virtue's praise a truth.
 
      Zeuxis, all energy and flaine,
      Set ardent forth in his career,
      Urged to his task by Helen's fame,
      Resounding ever in his ear;
 To make his image to her beauty true,
 From the collected fair each sovereign charm he drew.2
 
      The bee, with subtlest skill endued,
      Thus toils to earn her precious juice,
      From all the flowery myriads strewed
      O'er meadow and parterre profuse;
 Confederate voices one sweet air compound,
 And various chords consent in one harmonious sound.
 
      An artist of celestial aim,
      Thy genius, caught by moral grace,
      With ardent emulation's flame
      The steps of Virtue toiled to trace,
 Observed in everv land who brightest shone,
 And blending all their best, make perfect good thy own.
 
      Front all in Florence born, or taught
      Our country's sweetest accent there,
      Whose works, with learned labor wrought,
      Immortal honors justly share,
 Then hast such treasure drawn of purest ore,
 That not even Tuscan bards can boast a richer store.
 
      Babel, confused, and with her towers
      Unfinished spreading wide and plain,
      Has served but to evince thy powers,
      With all hot, tongues confused in vain,
 Since not alone thy England's purest phrase,
 But every polished realm thy various speech displays.
 
      The secret things of heaven and earth,
      By nature, too reserved. concealed
      From other minds of highest worth,
      To thee ate copiously revealed;
 Thou knowest them clearly, and thy views attain
 The utmost bounds prescribed to moral truth's domain.
 
      Let Time no snore his wing display,
      And boast his ruinous career,
      For Virtue, rescued front his sway.
      His injuries may cease to fear;
 Since all events that claim remembrance find
 A chronicle exact in thy capacious mind.
 
      Give me, that I may praise thy song,
      Thy lyre, by which alone I can,
      Which, placing thee the stars among,
      Already proves thee more than man;
 And Thames shall seem Permessus,3 while his stream
 Graced with a swan like thee. shall be my favorite theme.
 
      I, who beside the Arno, strain
      To match thy merit with my lays,
      Learn, after many an effort vain,
      To admure thee rather than to praise;
 And that by mute astonishment alone,
 Not by the fathering tongue, thy worth may best be shown.
 
         --Signor Antonio Francini, Gentleman, of Florence.
 
 1 The muse of History.
 
 2 The portrait of Helen was painted at the request of the people
 of Crotna, who sent to the artist all their lovliest girls for
 models. Zeuxis selected five, and united their separate beauties
 in his picture.
 
 3 A river in Boeotia which took its rise in Helicon. See Virgil
 Ecl. vi.64
 
 
            To Mr. John Milton of London
 
 A youth eminent from his country and his virtues,
 
 Who in his travels has made himself acquainted with many
 nations, and in his studies, with all, that, life another
 Ulysses, lie might learn all that all could teach him;
 
 Skilful in many tongues, on whose lips languages now mute so
 live again, that the idioms of all are insufficient to his
 praise; happy acquisition by which he understands the
 universal admiration and applause his talents trace excited;
 
 Whose endowments of mind and person move us to wonder, but at the same time fix
 us immovable: whose works prompt us to
 extol him, but by their beauty strike us mute;
 
 In whose memory the whole world is treasured; in whose
 intellect, wisdom; in whose heart, the ardent desire for
 glory; and in whose mouth, eloquence. Who with Astronomy for
 his conductor, hears the music of the spheres; with
 Philosophy for the teacher, deciphers the hand-writing of
 God, in those wonders of creation which proclaim His
 greatness; and with the most unwearied literary industry for
 his associate, examines, restores, penetrates with case the
 obscurities of antiquity, the desolations of ages, and the
 labyrinths of learning;
 
      "But wherefore toil to reach these arduous heights?"
 
 To him, in short, whose virtues the mouths of Fame are too few to celebrate, and
 whom astonishment forbids us to praise
 a he deserves, this tribute due to his merits, and the
 offering of reverence and affection, is paid by Carlo Dati, a
 patrician Florentine.
       This great man's servant, and this good man's friend.
 
 
               In Miltonum.1
 
 Tres tria, sed longe distantia, saecula vates
 Ostentant tribus e gentibus eximios.
 Graecia sublimem, cum majestate disertum
 Roma tulit, felix Anglia utrique parem.
 Partubus ex binis Natura exhausta, coacta est,
 Tertis ut fieret, consociare duos.
                              --Joannem Dridenum.
 
 1 Translation of Dryden's Lines Printed Under the
 Engraved Portrait of Milton in Tonson's Folio Edition
 of "Paradise Lost," I688.
 
 
 Stanzas on the Late Indecent Liberties Taken with
 the Remains of the Great Milton, by Wm. Cowper, Esq.1
 
 Me too, perchance, in future days,
    The sculptur'd stone shall show,
 With Paphian myrtle, or with bays
    Parnessian, on my brow.
 
 But I, before that season come,
    Escap'd from ev'ry care,
 Shall reach my refuge in the tomb,
    And sleep securely there.
 
 So sang in Roman tone and style
    The youthful bard, ere long
 Ordain'd to grace his native isle
    With her sublimest song.
 
 Who then but must conceive disdain,
    Hearing the deed unblest
 Of wretches who have dar'd profane
    His dread sepulchral rest?
 
 Ill fare the hands that heav'd the stones
    Where Milton's ashes lay!
 That trembled not to grasp his bones.
    And steal his dust away!
 
 Oh! ill-requited bard! Neglect
    Thy living worth repaid,
 And blind idolatrous respect
    As much affronts thee dead.
 
 1 This shocking outrage took place in I790 whilst the Church of St. Giles,
 Cripplegate, was repairing. The overseers (for the sake of gain) opened a coffin
 supposed to be Milton's, found a body, extracted its teeth, cut off its hair,
 and left the remains to the grave-diggers, who exhibited them for money to the
 public.
 
      Forsitan & nostros ducat de marmore vultus,
      Nectens aut Paphia myrti aut Parnasside lauri
      Fronde comas, at ego secura pace quiescam.
                    --Milton. "Mansus" ("Manso")
 
      Cowper's translation :
 
      To honour me, and with the graceful wreath
      Or of Parnassus or the Paphian isle
      Shall bind my brows--but I shall rest the while."
 
 
 
 
 
 POEMATA
 
 
 1. ELEGIES
 
                  ELEGY I
 
               To Charles Diodati.1
 
 At length, my friend, the far-sent letters come,
 Charged with thy kindness, to their destin'd home,
 They come, at length, from Deva's2 Western side,
 Where prone she seeks the salt Vergivian tide.3
 Trust me, my joy is great that thou shouldst be,
 Though born of foreign race, yet born for me,
 And that my sprightly friend, now free to roam,
 Must seek again so soon his wonted home.
 I well content, where Thames with refluent tide
 My native city laves, meantime reside,              10
 Nor zeal nor duty, now, my steps impell
 To reedy Cam,4 and my forbidden cell.5
 Nor aught of pleasure in those fields have I,
 That, to the musing bard, all shade deny.
 Tis time, that I, a pedant's threats6 disdain,
 And fly from wrongs, my soul will ne'er sustain.
 If peaceful days, in letter'd leisure spent
 Beneath my father's roof, be banishment,
 Then call me banish'd, I will ne'er refuse
 A name expressive of the lot I chuse.               20
 I would that exiled to the Pontic shore,
 Rome's hapless bard7 had suffer'd nothing more!
 He then had equall'd even Homer's lays,
 And, Virgil! thou hadst won but second praise.
 For here I woo the Muse with no control,
 And here my books--my life--absorb me whole.
 Here too I visit, or to smile, or weep,
 The winding theatre's majestic sweep;
 The grave or gay colloquial scene recruits
 My spirits spent in Learning's long pursuits.       30
 Whether some Senior shrewd, or spendthrift heir,
 Wooer, or soldier, now unarm'd, be there,
 Or some coif'd brooder o'er a ten years' cause
 Thunder the Norman gibb'rish of the laws.
 The lacquey, there, oft dupes the wary sire,
 And, artful, speeds th'enamour'd son's desire.
 There, virgins oft, unconscious what they prove,
 What love is, know not, yet, unknowing, love.
 Or, if impassion'd Tragedy wield high
 The bloody sceptre, give her locks to fly           40
 Wild as the winds, and roll her haggard eye,
 I gaze, and grieve, still cherishing my grief.
 At times, e'en bitter tears! yield sweet relief.
 As when from bliss untasted torn away,
 Some youth dies, hapless, on his bridal day,
 Or when the ghost, sent back from shades below,
 Fills the assassin's heart with vengeful woe,
 When Troy, or Argos, the dire scene affords,
 Or Creon's hall8 laments its guilty lords.
 Nor always city-pent or pent at home                50
 I dwell, but when Spring calls me forth to roam
 Expatiate in our proud suburban shades
 Of branching elm that never sun pervades.
 Here many a virgin troop I may descry,
 Like stars of mildest influence, gliding by,
 Oh forms divine!  Oh looks that might inspire
 E'en Jove himself, grown old, with young desire!
 Oft have I gazed on gem-surpassing eyes,
 Outsparkling every star that gilds the skies.
 Necks whiter than the iv'ry arm bestow'd            60
 By Jove on Pelops, or the Milky Road!
 Bright locks, Love's golden snares, these falling low,
 Those playing wanton o'er the graceful brow!
 Cheeks too, more winning sweet than after show'r,
 Adonis turn'd to Flora's fav'rite flow'r!
 Yield, Heroines, yield, and ye who shar'd th'embrace
 Of Jupiter in ancient times, give place;
 Give place ye turban'd Fair of Persia's coast,
 And ye, not less renown'd, Assyria's boast!
 Submit, ye nymphs of Greece! Ye once the bloom      70
 Of Ilion,9 and all ye of haughty Rome,
 Who swept of old her theatres with trains
 Redundant, and still live in classic strains!
 To British damsels beauty's palm is due,
 Aliens! to follow them is fame for you.
 Oh city,10 founded by Dardanian hands,
 Whose towering front the circling realm commands,
 Too blest abode! no loveliness we see
 In all the earth, but it abounds in thee.
 The virgin multitude that daily meets,              80
 Radiant with gold and beauty, in thy streets,
 Outnumbers all her train of starry fires
 With which Diana gilds thy lofty spires.
 Fame says, that wafted hither by her doves,
 With all her host of quiver-bearing Loves,
 Venus, prefering Paphian scenes no more,
 Has fix'd her empire on thy nobler shore.
 But lest the sightless boy inforce my stay,
 I leave these happy walls, while yet I may.
 Immortal Moly11 shall secure my heart               90
 From all the sorc'ry of Circaean art,
 And I will e'en repass Cam's reedy pools
 To face once more the warfare of the Schools.
 Meantime accept this trifle; Rhymes, though few,
 Yet such as prove thy friend's remembrance true.
 
 1 Diodati was a schoolfellow of Milton at St. Paul's, of Italian
 extraction, nephew of Giovanni Diodati, the translator of the
 Bible into Italian, and son of Theodore Diodati, a physician of
 eminence, who married and settled in England. charles Diodati's
 early death formed the subject of The "Epitaphium Damonis" ("The
 Death of Damon").
 
 2 The Dee of Chester.
 
 3 The Vergivian Sea, so called by Ptolemy, was the Irish Sea
 between England and Ireland.
 
 4 Cambridge.
 
 5 Milton had been rusticated (suspended) on account of a quarrel with his tutor,
 Chappell.
 
 6 Chappell.
 
 7 Ovid.
 
 8 In Thebes--the guilty lords are Eteocles and Polynices the
 brothers-sons of Oedipus and Jocasta, who fell in their unnatural
 strife.
 
 9 Troy.
 
 10 London. The Dardanian (i.e. Trojan) hands are those of Brutus,
 the legendary founder of London.
 
 11 The magical plant by which Odysseus was enabled to escape from
 Circe. See Homer (Odyssey, x. 370-375).
 
 
                  ELEGY II
 
 On the Death of the University Beadle at Cambridge.1
 
 Thee, whose refulgent staff and summons clear,
    Minerva's flock longtime was wont t'obey,
 Although thyself an herald, famous here,
    The last of heralds, Death, has snatch'd away.
 He calls on all alike, nor even deigns
 To spare the office that himself sustains.
 
 Thy locks were whiter than the plumes display'd
    By Leda's paramour2 in ancient time,
 But thou wast worthy ne'er to have decay'd,
    Or, Aeson-like,3 to know a second prime,          10
 Worthy for whom some Goddess should have won
 New life, oft kneeling to Apollo's son.4
 
 Commission'd to convene with hasty call
    The gowned tribes, how graceful wouldst thou stand!
 So stood Cyllenius5 erst in Priam's hall,
    Wing-footed messenger of Jove's command,
 And so, Eurybates6 when he address'd
 To Peleus' son Atrides' proud behest.
 
 Dread Queen of sepulchres! whose rig'rous laws
    And watchful eyes, run through the realms below, 20
 Oh, oft too adverse to Minerva's cause,
    Too often to the Muse not less a foe,
 Chose meaner marks, and with more equal aim
 Pierce useless drones, earth's burthen and its shame!
 
 Flow, therefore, tears for Him from ev'ry eye,
    All ye disciples of the Muses, weep!
 Assembling, all, in robes of sable dye,
    Around his bier, lament his endless sleep,
 And let complaining Elegy rehearse
 In every School her sweetest saddest verse.         30
 
 1 Richard Redding of St. John's College, M.A. He died in October,
 I626.
 
 2 The Swan--Jove had turned himself into that bird.
 
 3 i.e. Jason, who was restored to youth by his daughter Medea.
 
 4 Esculapius, the god of medicine.
 
 5 Hermes.
 
 6 One of the heralds sent to Achilles by Agamemnon.
 
 
                  ELEGY III
               Anno Aetates 17.1
 
     On the Death of the Bishop of Winchester.2
 
 Silent I sat, dejected, and alone,
 Making in thought the public woes my own,
 When, first, arose the image in my breast
 Of England's sufferings by that scourge, the pest.3
 How death, his fun'ral torch and scythe in hand,
 Ent'ring the lordliest mansions of the land,
 Has laid the gem-illumin'd palace low,
 And level'd tribes of Nobles at a blow.
 I, next, deplor'd the famed fraternal pair4
 Too soon to ashes turn'd and empty air,             10
 The Heroes next, whom snatch'd into the skies
 All Belgia saw, and follow'd with her sighs;
 But Thee far most I mourn'd, regretted most,
 Winton's chief shepherd and her worthiest boast;
 Pour'd out in tears I thus complaining said--
 Death, next in pow'r to Him who rules the Dead!
 Is't not enough that all the woodlands yield
 To thy fell force, and ev'ry verdant field,
 That lilies, at one noisome blast of thine,
 And ev'n the Cyprian Queen's own roses, pine,       20
 That oaks themselves, although the running rill
 Suckle their roots, must wither at thy will,
 That all the winged nations, even those
 Whose heav'n-directed flight the Future shows,
 And all the beasts that in dark forests stray,
 And all the herds of Proteus5 are thy prey?
 Ah envious! arm'd with pow'rs so unconfined
 Why stain thy hands with blood of Human kind?
 Why take delight, with darts that never roam,
 To chase a heav'n-born spirit from her home?        30
    While thus I mourn'd, the star of evening stood,
 Now newly ris'n, above the western flood,
 And Phoebus from his morning-goal again
 Had reach'd the gulphs of the Iberian main.
 I wish'd repose, and, on my couch reclined
 Took early rest, to night and sleep resign'd,
 When--Oh for words to paint what I beheld!
 I seem'd to wander in a spacious field,
 Where all the champain glow'd with purple light
 Like that of sun-rise on the mountain height;       40
 Flow'rs over all the field, of ev'ry hue
 That ever Iris wore, luxuriant grew,
 Nor Chloris,6 with whom amtrous Zephyrs play,
 E'er dress'd Alcinous' gardens7 half so gay.
 A silver current, like the Tagus, roll'd
 O'er golden sands, but sands of purer gold,
 With dewy airs Favonius fann'd the flow'rs,
 With airs awaken'd under rosy bow'rs.
 Such poets feign, irradiated all o'er
 The sun's abode on India's utmost shore.            50
    While I, that splendour and the mingled shade
 Of fruitful vines, with wonder fixt survey'd,
 At once, with looks that beam'd celestial grace,
 The Seer of Winton stood before my face.
 His snowy vesture's hem descending low
 His golden sandals swept, and pure as snow
 New-fallen shone the mitre on his brow.
 Where'er he trod, a tremulous sweet sound
 Of gladness shook the flow'ry scene around:
 Attendant angels clap their starry wings,           60
 The trumpet shakes the sky, all aether rings,
 Each chaunts his welcome, folds him to his breast,
 And thus a sweeter voice than all the rest.
 "Ascend, my son! thy Father's kingdom share,
 My son! henceforth be free'd from ev'ry care."
    So spake the voice, and at its tender close
 With psaltry's sound th'Angelic band arose.
 Then night retired, and chased by dawning day
 The visionary bliss pass'd all away.
 I mourn'd my banish'd sleep with fond concern,       70
 Frequent, to me may dreams like this return.
 
 1 i.e. "In my seventeeth year," meaning at the age of sixteen.
 
 2 Lancelot Andrewes, Fuller's "peerless prelate."
 
 3 The plague which ravaged England in I626.
 
 4 Prince Christian of Brunswick, and Count Mansfelt. They were
 brothers in arms and the Protestant champions. They both died in
 I626.
 
 5 Marine creatures. Proteus was the shepherd of the seas.
 
 6 Flora.
 
 7 See the account of his gardens in the Odyssey.
 
 
                  ELEGY IV.
               Anno Aetates 18.
 
          To My Tutor, Thomas Young,1
 Chaplain of the English Merchants Resident at Hamburg.
 
 Hence, my epistle--skim the Deep--fly o'er
 Yon smooth expanse to the Teutonic shore!
 Haste--lest a friend should grieve for thy delay--
 And the Gods grant that nothing thwart thy way!
 I will myself invoke the King2 who binds
 In his Sicanian ecchoing vault the winds,
 With Doris3 and her Nymphs, and all the throng
 Of azure Gods, to speed thee safe along.
 But rather, to insure thy happier haste,
 Ascend Medea's chariot,4 if thou may'st,             10
 Or that whence young Triptolemus5 of yore
 Descended welcome on the Scythian shore.
 The sands that line the German coast descried,
 To opulent Hamburg turn aside,
 So call'd, if legendary fame be true,
 From Hama,6 whom a club-arm'd Cimbrian slew.
 There lives, deep-learn'd and primitively just,
 A faithful steward of his Christian trust,
 My friend, and favorite inmate of my heart--
 That now is forced to want its better part!         20
 What mountains now, and seas, alas! how wide!
 From me this other, dearer self divide,
 Dear, as the sage7 renown'd for moral truth
 To the prime spirit of the Attic youth!
 Dear, as the Stagyrite8 to Ammon's son,9
 His pupil, who disdain'd the world he won!
 Nor so did Chiron, or so Phoenix shine10
 In young Achilles' eyes, as He in mine.
 First led by him thro' sweet Aonian11 shade
 Each sacred haunt of Pindus I survey'd;             30
 And favor'd by the muse, whom I implor'd,
 Thrice on my lip the hallow'd stream I pour'd.
 But thrice the Sun's resplendent chariot roll'd
 To Aries, has new ting'd his fleece with gold,
 And Chloris twice has dress'd the meadows gay,
 And twice has Summer parch'd their bloom away,
 Since last delighted on his looks I hung,
 Or my ear drank the music of his tongue.
 Fly, therefore, and surpass the tempest's speed!
 Aware thyself that there is urgent need.            40
 Him, ent'ring, thou shalt haply seated see
 Beside his spouse, his infants on his knee,
 Or turning page by page with studious look
 Some bulky Father, or God's Holy Book,
 Or minist'ring (which is his weightiest care)
 To Christ's assembled flock their heav'nly fare.
 Give him, whatever his employment be,
 Such gratulation as he claims from me,
 And with a down-cast eye and carriage meek
 Addressing him, forget not thus to speak.           50
    If, compass'd round with arms, thou canst attend
 To verse, verse greets thee from a distant friend,
 Long due and late I left the English shore,
 But make me welcome for that cause the more.
 Such from Ulysses, his chaste wife to cheer,
 The slow epistle came, tho' late, sincere.
 But wherefore This? why palliate I a deed,
 For which the culprit's self could hardly plead?
 Self-charged and self-condemn'd, his proper part
 He feels neglected, with an aching heart;           60
 But Thou forgive--Delinquents who confess,
 And pray forgiveness, merit anger less;
 From timid foes the lion turns away,
 Nor yawns upon or rends a crouching prey,
 Even pike-wielding Thracians learn to spare,
 Won by soft influence of a suppliant's prayer;
 And heav'n's dread thunderbolt arrested stands
 By a cheap victim and uplifted hands.
 Long had he wish'd to write, but was witheld,
 And writes at last, by love alone compell'd,        70
 For Fame, too often true when she alarms,
 Reports thy neighbouring-fields a scene of arms;12
 Thy city against fierce besiegers barr'd,
 And all the Saxon Chiefs for fight prepar'd.
 Enyo13 wastes thy country wide around,
 And saturates with blood the tainted ground;
 Mars rests contented in his Thrace no more,
 But goads his steeds to fields of German gore,
 The ever-verdant olive fades and dies,
 And peace, the trumpet-hating goddess, flies,       80
 Flies from that earth which justice long had left,
 And leaves the world of its last guard bereft.
    Thus horror girds thee round. Meantime alone
 Thou dwell'st, and helpless in a soil unknown,
 Poor, and receiving from a foreign hand
 The aid denied thee in thy native land.
 Oh, ruthless country, and unfeeling more
 Than thy own billow-beaten chalky shore!
 Leav'st Thou to foreign Care the Worthies giv'n
 By providence, to guide thy steps to Heav'n?       90
 His ministers, commission'd to proclaim
 Eternal blessings in a Saviour's name?
 Ah then most worthy! with a soul unfed
 In Stygian night to lie for ever dead.
 So once the venerable Tishbite stray'd
 An exil'd fugitive from shade to shade,
 When, flying Ahab and his Fury wife,
 In lone Arabian wilds he shelter'd life;
 So, from Philippi wander'd forth forlorn
 Cilician Paul, with sounding scourges torn;        100
 And Christ himself so left and trod no more
 The thankless Gergesenes' forbidden shore.
    But thou take courage, strive against despair,
 Quake not with dread, nor nourish anxious care.
 Grim war indeed on ev'ry side appears,
 And thou art menac'd by a thousand spears,
 Yet none shall drink thy blood, or shall offend
 Ev'n the defenceless bosom of my friend;
 For thee the Aegis of thy God shall hide,
 Jehova's self shall combat on thy side,            110
 The same, who vanquish'd under Sion's tow'rs
 At silent midnight all Assyria's pow'rs,
 The same who overthrew in ages past,
 Damascus' sons that lay'd Samaria waste;
 Their King he fill'd and them with fatal fears
 By mimic sounds of clarions in their ears,
 Of hoofs and wheels and neighings from afar
 Of clanging armour and the din of war.
    Thou therefore, (as the most affiicted may)
 Still hope, and triumph o'er thy evil day,         120
 Look forth, expecting happier times to come,
 And to enjoy once more thy native home!
 
 1 Young was private tutor to Milton before he went to St. Paul's. (Milton's
 prose letter to Young is included in an appendix below.)
 
 2 Aeolus, god of the east wind. Sicania was a name for Sicily.
 
 3 Mother of the Nereids (sea-nymphs).
 
 4 Drawn by winged dragons.
 
 5 Triptolemus was presented by Ceres with a winged chariot.
 
 6 A Saxon warrior slain by a giant.
 
 7 Socrates. 8 Aristotle. 9 Alexander.
 
 10 Chiron and Phoenix were the tutors of Achilles.
 
 11 Helicon.
 
 12 Alluding to the war between the Protestant League and the
 Imperialists.
 
 13 The goddess of war.
 
 
                  ELEGY V.
               Anno Aetates 20.
 
          On the Approach of Spring.
 
 Time, never wand'ring from his annual round,
 Bids Zephyr breathe the Spring, and thaw the ground;
 Bleak Winter flies, new verdure clothes the plain,
 And earth assumes her transient youth again.
 Dream I, or also to the Spring belong
 Increase of Genius, and new pow'rs of song?
 Spring gives them, and, how strange soere it seem,
 Impels me now to some harmonious theme.
 Castalia's fountain and the forked hill1
 By day, by night, my raptur'd fancy fill,           10
 My bosom burns and heaves, I hear within
 A sacred sound that prompts me to begin,
 Lo! Phoebus comes, with his bright hair he blends
 The radiant laurel wreath; Phoebus descends;
 I mount, and, undepress'd by cumb'rous clay,
 Through cloudy regions win my easy way;
 Rapt through poetic shadowy haunts I fly:
 The shrines all open to my dauntless eye,
 My spirit searches all the realms of light,
 And no Tartarean gulphs elude my sight.             20
 But this ecstatic trance--this glorious storm
 Of inspiration--what will it perform?
 Spring claims the verse that with his influence glows,
 And shall be paid with what himself bestows.
    Thou, veil'd with op'ning foliage, lead'st the throng
 Of feather'd minstrels, Philomel! in song;
 Let us, in concert, to the season sing,
 Civic, and sylvan heralds of the spring!
    With notes triumphant spring's approach declare!
 To spring, ye Muses, annual tribute bear!           30
 The Orient left and Aethiopia's plains
 The Sun now northward turns his golden reins,
 Night creeps not now, yet rules with gentle sway,
 And drives her dusky horrors swift away;
 Now less fatigued on his aetherial plain
 Bootes2 follows his celestial wain;
 And now the radiant centinels above
 Less num'rous watch around the courts of Jove,
 For, with the night, Force, Ambush, Slaughter fly,
 And no gigantic guilt alarms the sky.               40
 Now haply says some shepherd, while he views,
 Recumbent on a rock, the redd'ning dews,
 This night, this surely, Phoebus miss'd the fair,
 Who stops his chariot by her am'rous care.
 Cynthia,3 delighted by the morning's glow,
 Speeds to the woodland, and resumes her bow;
 Resigns her beams, and, glad to disappear,
 Blesses his aid who shortens her career.
 Come--Phoebus cries--Aurora come--too late
 Thou linger'st slumb'ring with thy wither'd mate,4  50
 Leave Him, and to Hymettus' top repair,
 Thy darling Cephalus expects thee there.
 The goddess, with a blush, her love betrays,
 But mounts, and driving rapidly obeys.
 Earth now desires thee, Phoebus! and, t'engage
 Thy warm embrace, casts off the guise of age.
 Desires thee, and deserves; for who so sweet,
 When her rich bosom courts thy genial heat?
 Her breath imparts to ev'ry breeze that blows
 Arabia's harvest and the Paphian rose.              60
 Her lofty front she diadems around
 With sacred pines, like Ops on Ida crown'd,
 Her dewy locks with various flow'rs new-blown,
 She interweaves, various, and all her own,
 For Proserpine in such a wreath attired
 Taenarian Dis5 himself with love inspired.
 Fear not, lest, cold and coy, the Nymph refuse,
 Herself, with all her sighing Zephyrs sues,
 Each courts thee fanning soft his scented wing,
 And all her groves with warbled wishes ring.        70
 Nor, unendow'd and indigent, aspires
 Th'am'rous Earth to engage thy warm desires,
 But, rich in balmy drugs, assists thy claim
 Divine Physician! to that glorious name.
 If splendid recompense, if gifts can move
 Desire in thee (gifts often purchase love),
 She offers all the wealth, her mountains hide,
 And all that rests beneath the boundless tide.
 How oft, when headlong from the heav'nly steep
 She sees thee plunging in the Western Deep          80
 How oft she cries--Ah Phoebus! why repair
 Thy wasted force, why seek refreshment there?
 Can Tethys6 win thee? wherefore should'st thou lave
 A face so fair in her unpleasant wave?
 Come, seek my green retreats, and rather chuse
 To cool thy tresses in my chrystal dews,
 The grassy turf shall yield thee sweeter rest,
 Come, lay thy evening glories on my breast,
 And breathing fresh through many a humid rose,
 Soft whisp'ring airs shall lull thee to repose.     90
 No fears I feel like Semele7 to die,
 Nor lest thy burning wheels8 approach too nigh,
 For thou can'st govern them. Here therefore rest,
 And lay thy evening glories on my breast.
     Thus breathes the wanton Earth her am'rous flame,
 And all her countless offspring feel the same;
 For Cupid now through every region strays
 Bright'ning his faded fires with solar rays,
 His new-strung bow sends forth a deadlier sound,
 And his new-pointed shafts more deeply wound,      100
 Nor Dian's self escapes him now untried,
 Nor even Vesta9 at her altar-side;
 His mother too repairs her beauty's wane,
 And seems sprung newly from the Deep again.
 Exulting youths the Hymenaeal10 sing,
 With Hymen's name roofs, rocks, and valleys ring;
 He, new attired and by the season dress'd
 Proceeds all fragrant in his saffron vest.
 Now, many a golden-cinctur'd virgin roves
 To taste the pleasures of the fields and groves,   110
 All wish, and each alike, some fav'rite youth
 Hers in the bonds of Hymenaeal truth.
 Now pipes the shepherd through his reeds again,
 Nor Phyllis wants a song that suits the strain,
 With songs the seaman hails the starry sphere,
 And dolphins rise from the abyss to hear,
 Jove feels, himself, the season, sports again
 With his fair spouse, and banquets all his train.
 Now too the Satyrs in the dusk of Eve
 Their mazy dance through flow'ry meadows weave,    120
 And neither God nor goat, but both in kind,
 Sylvanus,11 wreath'd with cypress, skips behind.
 The Dryads leave the hollow sylvan cells
 To roam the banks, and solitary dells;
 Pan riots now; and from his amorous chafe
 Ceres12 and Cybele seem hardly safe,
 And Faunus,13 all on fire to reach the prize,
 In chase of some enticing Oread14 flies;
 She bounds before, but fears too swift a bound,
 And hidden lies, but wishes to be found.           130
 Our shades entice th'Immortals from above,
 And some kind Pow'r presides oter ev'ry grove,
 And long ye Pow'rs o'er ev'ry grove preside,
 For all is safe and blest where ye abide!
 Return O Jove! the age of gold restore--
 Why chose to dwell where storms and thunders roar?
 At least, thou, Phoebus! moderate thy speed,
 Let not the vernal hours too swift proceed,
 Command rough Winter back, nor yield the pole
 Too soon to Night's encroaching, long control.     140
 
 1 Helicon.
 
 2 The Great Bear, called also Charles's Wain (wagon). "Bootes" is
 the constellation called "The Waggoner," who is said to be "less
 fatigued" because he drives the wain higher in the sky.
 
 3 Diana (the Moon).
 
 4 Tithonus, mortal husband to Aurora (the dawn), granted
 immortality without eternal youth. See Homer's Hymn to Aphrodite
 (lines 218-238). Cephalus was her lover, unwillingly taken by her
 from his beloved wife Procris. See Ovid (Met. vii, 700-708).
 
 5 Hades (Pluto).
 
 6 A water goddess--mother of the river gods and wife of Oceanus.
 
 7 The mother of Dionysus. Juno persuaded her to ask to see Jove in
 all his divine glory, the vision of which struck her dead. See
 Ovid (Met. iii, 308-309.)
 
 8 The wheels of Apollo's chariot. See Ovid (Met. ii, I9-328.)
 
 9 The goddess of chastity.
 
 10 Hymn to Hymen, the goddess of marriage. 11 The wood god.
 
 12 The goddess of agriculture. Cybele (Rhea) was called the mother
 of the gods and of men. See Virgil (Aen. x, 252-253.)
 
 13 The god of shepherds. 14 A wood nymph.
 
 
                  ELEGY VI
 
             To Charles Diodati,
     When He Was Visiting in the Country
 
 Who sent the Author a poetical epistle, in which he requested that
 his verses, if not so good as usual, might be excused on account
 of the many feasts to which his friends invited him, and which
 would not allow him leisure to finish them as he wished.
 
 With no rich viands overcharg'd, I send
 Health, which perchance you want, my pamper'd friend;
 But wherefore should thy Muse tempt mine away
 From what she loves, from darkness into day?
 Art thou desirous to be told how well
 I love thee, and in verse? Verse cannot tell.
 For verse has bounds, and must in measure move;
 But neither bounds nor measure knows my love.
 How pleasant in thy lines described appear
 December's harmless sports and rural cheer!         10
 French spirits kindling with caerulean fires,
 And all such gambols as the time inspires!
    Think not that Wine against good verse offends;
 The Muse and Bacchus have been always friends,
 Nor Phoebus blushes sometimes to be found
 With Ivy, rather than with Laurel, crown'd.
 The Nine themselves oftimes have join'd the song
 And revels of the Bacchanalian throng.
 Not even Ovid could in Scythian air
 Sing sweetly--why? no vine would flourish there.    20
 What in brief numbers sang Anacreon's1 muse?
 Wine, and the rose, that sparkling wine bedews.
 Pindar with Bacchus glows--his every line
 Breathes the rich fragrance of inspiring wine,
 While, with loud crash o'erturn'd, the chariot lies
 And brown with dust the fiery courser flies.
 The Roman lyrist steep'd in wine his lays
 So sweet in Glycera's, and Chloe's praise.2
 Now too the plenteous feast, and mantling bowl
 Nourish the vigour of thy sprightly soul;           30
 The flowing goblet makes thy numbers flow,
 And casks not wine alone, but verse, bestow.
 Thus Phoebus favours, and the arts attend
 Whom Bacchus, and whom Ceres, both befriend.
 What wonder then, thy verses are so sweet,
 In which these triple powers so kindly meet.
 The lute now also sounds, with gold inwrought,
 And touch'd with flying Fingers nicely taught,
 In tap'stried halls high-roof'd the sprightly lyre
 Directs the dancers of the virgin choir.            40
 If dull repletion fright the Muse away,
 Sights, gay as these, may more invite her stay;
 And, trust me, while the iv'ry keys resound,
 Fair damsels sport, and perfumes steam around,
 Apollo's influence, like ethereal flame
 Shall animate at once thy glowing frame,
 And all the Muse shall rush into thy breast,
 By love and music's blended pow'rs possest.
 For num'rous pow'rs light Elegy befriend,
 Hear her sweet voice, and at her call attend;              50
 Her, Bacchus, Ceres, Venus, all approve,
 And with his blushing Mother, gentle Love.
 Hence, to such bards we grant the copious use
 Of banquets, and the vine's delicious juice.
 But they who Demigods and Heroes praise
 And feats perform'd in Jove's more youthful days,
 Who now the counsels of high heav'n explore,
 Now shades, that echo the Cerberean roar,3
 Simply let these, like him of Samos4 live,
 Let herbs to them a bloodless banquet give;         60
 In beechen goblets let their bev'rage shine,
 Cool from the chrystal spring, their sober wine!
 Their youth should pass, in innocence, secure
 From stain licentious, and in manners pure,
 Pure as the priest's, when robed in white he stands
 The fresh lustration ready in his hands.
 Thus Linus5 liv'd, and thus, as poets write,
 Tiresias, wiser for his loss of sight,6
 Thus exil'd Chalcas,7 thus the bard of Thrace,8
 Melodious tamer of the savage race!                 70
 Thus train'd by temp'rance, Homer led, of yore,
 His chief of Ithaca9 from shore to shore,
 Through magic Circe's monster-peopled reign,
 And shoals insidious with the siren train;
 And through the realms, where griesly spectres dwell,
 Whose tribes he fetter'd in a gory spell;
 For these are sacred bards, and, from above,
 Drink large infusions from the mind of Jove.
    Would'st thou (perhaps 'tis hardly worth thine ear)
 Would'st thou be told my occupation here?           80
 The promised King of peace employs my pen,
 Th'eternal cov'nant made for guilty men,
 The new-born Deity with infant cries
 Filling the sordid hovel, where he lies;
 The hymning Angels, and the herald star
 That led the Wise who sought him from afar,
 And idols on their own unhallow'd floor
 Dash'd at his birth, to be revered no more!
    This theme10 on reeds of Albion I rehearse;
 The dawn of that blest day inspired the verse;      90
 Verse that, reserv'd in secret, shall attend
 Thy candid voice, my Critic and my Friend!
 
 1 A poet native to Teios in Ionia.
 
 2 See Horace's Odes (i, 19-23).
 
 3 Cerberus, the guardian of Hades.
 
 4 Pythagoras. 5 A son of Apollo.
 
 6 Tiresias was gifted by Pallas with the power of understanding
 the language of birds to atone for his loss of sight.
 
 7 The Grecian soothsayer at the siege of Troy. 8 Orpheus.
 
 9 Odysseus.
 
 10 "The Hymn" from "On the Morning of Christ's Nativity."
 
 
                  Elegy VI.
          Anno Aetates undevigesimo.1
 
 As yet a stranger to the gentle fires
 That Amathusia's smiling Queen2 inspires,
 Not seldom I derided Cupid's darts,
 And scorn'd his claim to rule all human hearts.
 Go, child, I said, transfix the tim'rous dove,
 An easy conquest suits an infant Love;
 Enslave the sparrow, for such prize shall be
 Sufficient triumph to a Chief like thee;
 Why aim thy idle arms at human kind?
 Thy shafts prevail not 'gainst the noble mind.      10
    The Cyprian3 heard, and, kindling into ire,
 (None kindles sooner) burn'd with double fire.
    It was the Spring, and newly risen day
 Peep'd o'er the hamlets on the First of May;
 My eyes too tender for the blaze of light,
 Still sought the shelter of retiring night,
 When Love approach'd, in painted plumes arrayed;
 Th'insidious god his rattling darts betray'd,
 Nor less his infant features, and the sly
 Sweet intimations of his threat'ning eye.           20
    Such the Sigeian boy4 is seen above,
 Filling the goblet for imperial Jove;
 Such he, on whom the nymphs bestow'd their charms,
 Hylas,5 who perish'd in a Naiad's arms.
 Angry he seem'd, yet graceful in his ire,
 And added threats, not destitute of fire.
 "My power," he said, "by others pain alone,
 'Twere best to learn; now learn it by thy own!
 With those, who feel my power, that pow'r attest!
 And in thy anguish be my sway confest!              30
 I vanquish'd Phoebus, though returning vain
 From his new triumph o'er the Python slain,
 And, when he thinks on Daphne,6 even He
 Will yield the prize of archery to me.
 A dart less true the Parthian horseman7 sped,
 Behind him kill'd, and conquer'd as he fled,
 Less true th'expert Cydonian, and less true
 The youth, whose shaft his latent Procris slew.8
 Vanquish'd by me see huge Orion bend,
 By me Alcides,9 and Alcides's friend.10                 40
 At me should Jove himself a bolt design,
 His bosom first should bleed transfix'd by mine.
 But all thy doubts this shaft will best explain,
 Nor shall it teach thee with a trivial pain,
 Thy Muse, vain youth! shall not thy peace ensure,
 Nor Phoebus' serpent yield thy wound a cure.11
    He spoke, and, waving a bright shaft in air,
 Sought the warm bosom of the Cyprian fair.
    That thus a child should bluster in my ear
 Provok'd my laughter more than mov'd my fear.       50
 I shun'd not, therefore, public haunts, but stray'd
 Careless in city, or suburban shade,
 And passing and repassing nymphs that mov'd
 With grace divine, beheld where'er I rov'd.
 Bright shone the vernal day, with double blaze,
 As beauty gave new force to Phoebus' rays.
 By no grave scruples check'd I freely eyed
 The dang'rous show, rash youth my only guide,
 And many a look of many a Fair unknown
 Met full, unable to control my own.                 60
 But one I mark'd (then peace forsook my breast)
 One--Oh how far superior to the rest!
 What lovely features! Such the Cyprian Queen
 Herself might wish, and Juno wish her mien.
 The very nymph was she, whom when I dar'd
 His arrows, Love had even then prepar'd.
 Nor was himself remote, nor unsupplied
 With torch well-trimm'd and quiver at his side;
 Now to her lips he clung, her eye-lids now,
 Then settled on her cheeks or on her brow.          70
 And with a thousand wounds from ev'ry part
 Pierced and transpierced my undefended heart.
 A fever, new to me, of fierce desire
 Now seiz'd my soul, and I was all on fire,
 But she, the while, whom only I adore,
 Was gone, and vanish'd to appear no more.
 In silent sadness I pursue my way,
 I pause, I turn, proceed, yet wish to stay,
 And while I follow her in thought, bemoan
 With tears my soul's delight so quickly flown.      80
 When Jove had hurl'd him to the Lemnian coast12
 So Vulcan sorrow'd for Olympus lost,
 And so Oeclides, sinking into night,
 From the deep gulph look'd up to distant light.13
    Wretch that I am, what hopes for me remain
 Who cannot cease to love, yet love in vain?
 Oh could I once, once more, behold the Fair,
 Speak to her, tell her of the pangs I bear,
 Perhaps she is not adamant, would show
 Perhaps some pity at my tale of woe.                90
 Oh inauspicious flame--'tis mine to prove
 A matchless instance of disastrous love.
 Ah spare me, gentle Pow'r!--If such thou be
 Let not thy deeds, and nature disagree.
 Now I revere thy fires, thy bow, thy darts:
 Now own thee sov'reign of all human hearts.
 Spare me, and I will worship at no shrine
 With vow and sacrifice, save only thine.
 Remove! no--grant me still this raging woe!
 Sweet is the wretchedness, that lovers know:       100
 But pierce hereafter (should I chance to see
 One destined mine) at once both her and me.
 ___________________________________________________________14
 
 Such were the trophies, that in earlier days,
 By vanity seduced I toil'd to raise,
 Studious yet indolent, and urg'd by youth,
 That worst of teachers, from the ways of Truth;
 Till learning taught me, in his shady bow'r,
 To quit love's servile yoke, and spurn his pow'r.
 Then, on a sudden, the fierce flame supprest,
 A frost continual settled on my breast,            110
 Whence Cupid fears his flames extinct to see,
 And Venus dreads a Diomede15 in me.
 
 1 i.e. "In my nineteenth year."
 
 2 Venus (Aphrodite), so called from Amethus in Cyprus, where she
 had a temple.
 
 3 Cupid, called after his mother's title.
 
 4 Ganymede, whom Jove, in the form of an eagle, spirited away to
 serve as his cup-bearer. See Ovid (Met. x, 155-161)
 
 5 The friend of Hercules, stolen by nymphs who had fallen in love
 with him.
 
 6 She fled from Apollo, and was transformed into a laurel.
 
 7 The Roman Crassus was defeated in 53 B.C. by the Parthian
 cavalry when they fired backwards with devastating effect. The Cydonians were
 also famed for their skill in archery.
 
 8 Cephalus, who shot his wife Procris by mistake.
 
 9 Hercules. 10 Telemon.
 
 11 Esculapius, who came to Rome in the form of a snake.
 
 12 Vulcan (Hephaestus) was cast down from Olympus to the isle of
 Lemnos.
 
 13 One of the Argonauts. He was swallowed up by the sea.
 
 14 A later retraction by Milton. The line appears in the original to separate it
 from what came before it.
 
 15 Diomedes wounded Venus (Aphrodite) at Troy. See Homer (Il. v,
 335-343)
 
          On the Gunpowder Plot.1
 
 Cum simul in regem nuper satrapasque Britannos
    Ausus es infandum perfide Fauxe nefas,
 Fallor? an & mitis voluisti ex parte videri,
    Et pensare mala cum pietate scelus;
 Scilicet hos alti missurus ad atria caeli,
    Sulphureo curru flammivolisque rotis.
 Qualiter ille feris caput inviolabile Parcis
    Liquit Jordanios turbine raptus agros.
 
 1 The Poems on the subject of the Gunpowder Treason2 I have not
 translated, both because the matter of them is unpleasant, and
 because they are written with an asperity, which, however it might
 be warranted in Milton's day, would be extremely unseasonable
 now.--W.C.
 
 2 This includes "On the Fifth of November" below.
 
 
          Another on the Same.
 
 Siccine tentasti caelo donasse Jacobum
    Quae septemgemino Bellua monte lates?
 Ni meliora tuum poterit dare munera numen,
    Parce precor donis insidiosa tuis.
 Ille quidem sine te consortia serus adivit
    Astra, nec inferni pulveris usus ope.
 Sic potius foedus in caelum pelle cucullos,
    Et quot habet brutos Roma profana Deos,
 Namque hac aut alia quemque adjuveris arte,
    Crede mihi, caeli vix bene scandet iter.          10
 
 
          Another on the Same.
 
 Purgatorem animae derisit Jacobus ignem,
    Et sine quo superum non adeunda domus.
 Frenduit hoc trina monstrum Latiale corona
    Movit & horrificum cornua dena minax.
 Et nec inultus ait temnes mea sacra Britanne,
    Supplicium spreta relligione dabis.
 Et si stelligeras unquam penetraveris arces,
    Non nisi per flammas triste patebit iter.
 O quam funesto cecinisti proxima vero,
    Verbaque ponderibus vix caritura suis!           10
 Nam prope Tartareo sublime rotatus ab igni
    Ibat ad aethereas umbra perusta plagas.
 
 
          Another on the Same.
 
 Quem modo Roma suis devoverat impia diris,
    Et Styge damnarat Taenarioque sinu,
 Hunc vice mutata jam tollere gestit ad astra,
    Et cupit ad superos evehere usque Deos.
 
 
     On the Inventor of Gunpowder.
 
 Praise in old time the sage Prometheus won,
    Who stole ethereal radiance from the sun;
 But greater he, whose bold invention strove
    To emulate the fiery bolts of Jove.
 
 
          To Leonora,1 Singing in Rome.2
 
 Angelus unicuique suus (sic credite gentes)
    Obtigit aethereis ales ab ordinibus.
 Quid mirum? Leonora tibi si gloria major,
    Nam tua praesentem vox sonat ipsa Deum.
 Aut Deus, aut vacui certe mens tertia coeli
    Pertua secreto guttura serpit agens;
 Serpit agens, facilisque docet mortalia corda
    Sensim immortali assuescere posse sono.
 Quod si cuncta quidem Deus est, per cunctaque fusus,
    In te una loquitur, caetera mutus habet.          10
 
 1 Leonora Baroni, celebrated Neapolitan singer. Milton heard her perform at the
 palace of Cardinal Barberini in I638.
 
 2 I have translated only two of the three poetical compliments
 addressed to Leonora, as they appear to me far superior to what
 I have omitted.--W.C.
 
 
          Another to the Same.
 
 Another Leonora1 once inspir'd
    Tasso, with fatal love to frenzy fir'd,
 But how much happier, liv'd he now, were he,
    Pierced with whatever pangs for love of Thee!
 Since could he hear that heavenly voice of thine,
    With Adriana's lute2 of sound divine,
 Fiercer than Pentheus'3 tho' his eye might roll,
    Or idiot apathy benumb his soul,
 You still, with medicinal sounds, might cheer
    His senses wandering in a blind career;          10
 And sweetly breathing thro' his wounded breast,
    Charm, with soul-soothing song, his thoughts to rest.
 
 1 Leonora d'Este, supposed lover of Torquato Tasso.
 
 2 Adriana Baroni, who accompanied her daughter on the lute.
 
 3 A mad Theban king.
 
 
          Another to the Same.
 
 Naples, too credulous, ah! boast no more
    The sweet-voiced Siren buried on thy shore,
 That, when Parthenope1 deceas'd, she gave
    Her sacred dust to a Chalcidic2 grave,
 For still she lives, but has exchanged the hoarse
    Pausilipo for Tiber's placid course,
 Where, idol of all Rome, she now in chains,
    Of magic song both Gods and Men detains.
 
 1 One of the Sirens.
 
 2 From Chalcis, whence the Greek colonies of South Italy came.
 
 
 The Fable of the Peasant and his Landlord.1
 
 A Peasant to his lord yearly court,
    Presenting pippins of so rich a sort
 That he, displeased to have a part alone,
    Removed the tree, that all might be his own.
 The tree, too old to travel, though before
    So fruitful, withered, and would yield no more.
 The squire, perceiving all his labour void,
    Cursed his own pains, so foolishly employed,
 And "Oh," he cried, "that I had lived content
    With tribute, small indeed, but kindly meant!    10
 My avarice has expensive proved to me,
    Has cost me both my pippins and my tree."
 
 1 Added to the Elegies in the I673 edition.
 
 
 
 2. POEMS IN VARIOUS METRES
 
 
 On the Death of the Vice-Chancellor,
          A Physician.1
 
 Learn ye nations of the earth
 The condition of your birth,
 Now be taught your feeble state,
 Know, that all must yield to Fate!
 
 If the mournful Rover, Death,
 Say but once-resign your breath-
 Vainly of escape you dream,
 You must pass the Stygian stream.
 
 Could the stoutest overcome
 Death's assault, and baffle Doom,                   10
 Hercules had both withstood
 Undiseas'd by Nessus' blood.2
 
 Ne'er had Hector press'd the plain
 By a trick of Pallas slain,
 Nor the Chief to Jove allied3
 By Achilles' phantom died.
 
 Could enchantments life prolong,
 Circe, saved by magic song,
 Still had liv'd, and equal skill
 Had preserv'd Medea still.4                         20
 
 Dwelt in herbs and drugs a pow'r
 To avert Man's destin'd hour,
 Learn'd Machaon5 should have known
 Doubtless to avert his own.
 
 Chiron had survived the smart
 Of the Hydra-tainted dart,6
 And Jove's bolt had been with ease
 Foil'd by Asclepiades.7
 
 Thou too, Sage! of whom forlorn
 Helicon and Cirrha mourn,                           30
 Still had'st filled thy princely place,
 Regent of the gowned race,
 
 Had'st advanc'd to higher fame
 Still, thy much-ennobled name,
 Nor in Charon's skiff explored
 The Tartarean gulph abhorr'd.
 
 But resentful Proserpine,
 Jealous of thy skill divine,
 Snapping short thy vital thread
 Thee too number'd with the Dead.                    40
 
 Wise and good! untroubled be
 The green turf that covers thee,
 Thence in gay profusion grow
 All the sweetest flow'rs that blow!
 
 Pluto's Consort bid thee rest!
 Oeacus pronounce thee blest!
 To her home thy shade consign,
 Make Elysium ever thine!
 
 1 Dr. John Goslyn, Regius Professor of Medicine at Cambridge. He
 died on the 21st October, I626.
 
 2 A centaur whom Hercules shot with a poisoned arrow. Hercules was
 later poisoned by the centaur's blood-stained robe, which he was
 induced to put on.
 
 3 Sarpedon. See Homer (Il. xvi, 477-491).
 
 4 Circe and Medea were enchantresses.
 
 5 Son of Esculapius. He was a healer to the Greeks during the
 siege of Troy. See Homer (Il. xi, 514).
 
 6 The centaur Chiron was killed by Hercules's poisoned arrows.
 
 7 Esculapius. He was killed by Jove's lightning for having saved
 too many from death.
 
 
          On the Fifth of November.
               Anno Aetates 17.
 
 Am pius extrema veniens Jacobus ab arcto
 Teucrigenas populos, lateque patentia regna
 Albionum tenuit, jamque inviolabile foedus
 Sceptra Caledoniis conjunxerat Anglica Scotis:
 Pacificusque novo felix divesque sedebat
 In solio, occultique doli securus & hostis:
 Cum ferus ignifluo regnans Acheronte tyrannus,
 Eumenidum pater, aethereo vagus exul Olympo,
 Forte per immensum terrarum erraverat orbem,
 Dinumerans sceleris socios, vernasque fideles,      10
 Participes regni post funera moesta futuros;
 Hic tempestates medio ciet aere diras,
 Illic unanimes odium struit inter amicos,
 Armat & invictas in mutua viscera gentes;
 Regnaque olivifera vertit florentia pace,
 Et quoscunque videt purae virtutis amantes,
 Hos cupit adjicere imperio, fraudumque magister
 Tentat inaccessum sceleri corrumpere pectus,
 Insidiasque locat tacitas, cassesque latentes
 Tendit, ut incautos rapiat, seu Caspia Tigris       20
 Insequitur trepidam deserta per avia praedam
 Nocte sub illuni, & somno nictantibus astris.
 Talibus infestat populos Summanus & urbes
 Cinctus caeruleae fumanti turbine flammae.
 Jamque fluentisonis albentia rupibus arva
 Apparent, & terra Deo dilecta marino,
 Cui nomen dederat quondam Neptunia proles
 Amphitryoniaden qui non dubitavit atrocem
 Aequore tranato furiali poscere bello,
 Ante expugnatae crudelia saecula Troiae.            30
    At simul hanc opibusque & festa pace beatam
 Aspicit, & pingues donis Cerealibus agros,
 Quodque magis doluit, venerantem numina veri
 Sancta Dei populum, tandem suspiria rupit
 Tartareos ignes & luridum olentia sulphur.
 Qualia Trinacria trux ab Jove clausus in Aetna
 Efflat tabifico monstrosus ab ore Tiphoeus.
 Ignescunt oculi, stridetque adamantinus ordo
 Dentis, ut armorum fragor, ictaque cuspide cuspis.
 Atque pererrato solum hoc lacrymabile mundo         40
 Inveni, dixit, gens haec mihi sola rebellis,
 Contemtrixque jugi, nostraque potentior arte.
 Illa tamen, mea si quicquam tentamina possunt,
 Non feret hoc impune diu, non ibit inulta,
 Hactenus; & piceis liquido natat aere pennis;
 Qua volat, adversi praecursant agmine venti,
 Densantur nubes, & crebra tonitrua fulgent.
    Jamque pruinosas velox superaverat alpes,
 Et tenet Ausoniae fines, a parte sinistra
 Nimbifer Appenninus erat, priscique Sabini,         50
 Dextra veneficiis infamis Hetruria, nec non
 Te furtiva Tibris Thetidi videt oscula dantem;
 Hinc Mavortigenae consistit in arce Quirini.
 Reddiderant dubiam jam sera crepuscula lucem,
 Cum circumgreditur totam Tricoronifer urbem,
 Panificosque Deos portat, scapulisque virorum
 Evehitur, praeeunt summisso poplite reges,
 Et mendicantum series longissima fratrum;
 Cereaque in manibus gestant funalia caeci,
 Cimmeriis nati in tenebris, vitamque trahentes.     60
 Templa dein multis subeunt lucentia taedis
 (Vesper erat sacer iste Petro) fremitoesque canentum
 Saepe tholos implet vacuos, & inane locorum.
 Qualiter exululat Bromius, Bromiique caterva,
 Orgia cantantes in Echionio Aracyntho,
 Dum tremit attonitus vitreis Asopus in undis,
 Et procul ipse cava responsat rupe Cithaeron.
    His igitur tandem solenni more peractis,
 Nox senis amplexus Erebi taciturna reliquit,
 Praecipitesque impellit equos stimulante flagello,  70
 Captum oculis Typhlonta, Melanchaetemque ferocem,
 Atque Acherontaeo prognatam patre Siopen
 Torpidam, & hirsutis horrentem Phrica capillis.
 Interea regum domitor, Phlegetontius haeres
 Ingreditur thalamos (neque enim secretus adulter
 Producit steriles molli sine pellice noctes)
 At vix compositos somnus claudebat ocellos,
 Cum niger umbrarum dominus, rectorque silentum,
 Praedatorque hominum falsa sub imagine tectus
 Astitit, assumptis micuerunt tempora canis,         80
 Barba sinus promissa tegit, cineracea longo
 Syrmate verrit humum vestis, pendetque cucullus
 Vertice de raso, & ne quicquam desit ad artes,
 Cannabeo lumbos constrinxit fune salaces,
 Tarda fenestratis figens vestigia calceis.
 Talis uti fama est, vasta Franciscus eremo
 Tetra vagabatur solus per lustra ferarum,
 Sylvestrique tulit genti pia verba salutis
 Impius, atque lupos domuit, Lybicosque leones.
    Subdolus at tali Serpens velatus amictu          90
 Solvit in has fallax ora execrantia voces;
 Dormis nate? Etiamne tuos sopor opprimit artus?
 Immemor O fidei, pecorumque oblite tuorum,
 Dum cathedram venerande tuam, diadmaque triplex
 Ridet Hyperboreo gens barbara nata sub axe,
 Dumque pharetrati spernunt tua jura Britanni;
 Surge, age, surge piger, Latius quem Caesar adorat,
 Cui reserata patet convexi janua caeli,
 Turgentes animos, & fastus frange procaces,
 Sacrilegique sciant, tua quid maledictio possit,   100
 Et quid Apostolicae possit custodia clavis;
 Et memor Hesperiae disjectam ulciscere classem,
 Mersaque Iberorum lato vexilla profundo,
 Sanctorumque cruci tot corpora fixa probrosae,
 Thermodoontea nuper regnante puella.
 At tu si tenero mavis torpescere lecto
 Crescentesque negas hosti contundere vires,
 Tyrrhenum implebit numeroso milite Pontum,
 Signaque Aventino ponet fulgentia colle:
 Relliquias veterum franget, flammisque cremabit,   110
 Sacraque calcabit pedibus tua colla profanis,
 Cujus gaudebant soleis dare basia reges.
 Nec tamen hunc bellis & aperto Marte lacesses,
 Irritus ille labor, tu callidus utere fraude,
 Quaelibet haereticis disponere retia fas est;
 Jamque ad consilium extremis rex magnus ab oris
 Patricios vocat, & procerum de stirpe creatos,
 Grandaevosque patres trabea, canisque verendos;
 Hos tu membratim poteris conspergere in auras,
 Atque dare in cineres, nitrati pulveris igne       120
 Aedibus injecto, qua convenere, sub imis.
 Protinus ipse igitur quoscumque habet Anglia fidos
 Propositi, factique mone, quisquamne tuorum
 Audebit summi non jussa facessere Papae.
 Perculsosque metu subito, casmque stupentes
 Invadat vel Gallus atrox, vel saevus Iberus
 Saecula sic illic tandem Mariana redibunt,
 Tuque in belligeros iterum dominaberis Anglos.
 Et nequid timeas, divos divasque secundas
 Accipe, quotque tuis celebrantur numina fastis.    130
 Dixit & adscitos ponens malefidus amictus
 Fugit ad infandam, regnum illaetabile, Lethen.
    Jam rosea Eoas pandens Tithonia portas
 Vestit inauratas redeunti lumine terras;
 Maestaque adhuc nigri deplorans funera nati
 Irrigat ambrosiis montana cacumina guttis;
 Cum somnos pepulit stellatae janitor aulae
 Nocturnos visus, & somnia grata revolvens.
    Est locus aeterna septus caligine noctis
 Vasta ruinosi quondam fundamina tecti,             140
 Nunc torvi spelunca Phoni, Prodotaeque bilinguis
 Effera quos uno peperit Discordia partu.
 Hic inter caementa jacent praeruptaque saxa,
 Ossa inhumata virum, & trajecta cadavera ferro;
 Hic Dolus intortis semper sedet ater ocellis,
 Jurgiaque, & stimulis armata Calumnia fauces,
 Et Furor, atque viae moriendi mille videntur
 Et Timor, exanguisque locum circumvolat Horror,
 Perpetuoque leves per muta silentia Manes
 Exululant, tellus & sanguine conscia stagnat.      150
 Ipsi etiam pavidi latitant penetralibus antri
 Et Phonos, & Prodotes, nulloque sequente per antrum
 Antrum horrens, scopulosum, atrum feralibus umbris
 Diffugiunt sontes, & retro lumina vortunt,
 Hos pugiles Romae per saecula longa fideles
 Evocat antistes Babylonius, atque ita fatur.
 Finibus occiduis circumfusum incolit aequor
 Gens exosa mihi, prudens natura negavit
 Indignam penitus nostro conjungere mundo;
 Illuc, sic jubeo, celeri contendite gressu,        160
 Tartareoque leves difflentur pulvere in auras
 Et rex & pariter satrapae, scelerata propago
 Et quotquot fidei caluere cupidine verae
 Consilii socios adhibete, operisque ministros.
 Finierat, rigidi cupide paruere gemelli.
    Interea longo flectens curvamine caelos
 Despicit aetherea dominus qui fulgurat arce,
 Vanaque perversae ridet conamina turbae,
 Atque sui causam populi volet ipse tueri.
    Esse ferunt spatium, qua distat ab Aside terra  170
 Fertilis Europe, & spectat Mareotidas undas;
 Hic turris posita est Titanidos ardua Famae
 Aerea, lata, sonans, rutilis vicinior astris
 Quam superimpositum vel Athos vel Pelion Ossae
 Mille fores aditusque patent, totidemque fenestrae,
 Amplaque per tenues translucent atria muros;
 Excitat hic varios plebs agglomerata susurros;
 Qualiter instrepitant circum mulctralia bombis
 Agmina muscarum, aut texto per ovilia junco,
 Dum Canis aestivum coeli petit ardua culmen        180
 Ipsa quidem summa sedet ultrix matris in arce,
 Auribus innumeris cinctum caput eminet olli,
 Queis sonitum exiguum trahit, atque levissima captat
 Murmura, ab extremis patuli confinibus orbis.
 Nec tot Aristoride servator inique juvencae
 Isidos, immiti volvebas lumina vultu,
 Lumina non unquam tacito nutantia somno,
 Lumina subjectas late spectantia terras.
 Istis illa solet loca luce carentia saepe
 Perlustrare, etiam radianti impervia soli.         190
 Millenisque loquax auditaque visaque linguis
 Cuilibet effundit temeraria, veraque mendax
 Nunc minuit, modo confictis sermonibus auget.
 Sed tamen a nostro meruisti carmine laudes
 Fama, bonum quo non aliud veracius ullum,
 Nobis digna cani, nec te memorasse pigebit
 Carmine tam longo, servati scilicet Angli
 Officiis vaga diva tuis, tibi reddimus aequa.
 Te Deus aeternos motu qui temperat ignes,
 Fulmine praemisso alloquitur, terraque tremente:   200
 Fama siles? an te latet impia Papistarum
 Conjurata cohors in meque meosque Britannos,
 Et nova sceptrigero caedes meditata Jacobo:
 Nec plura, illa statim sensit mandata Tonantis,
 Et satis ante fugax stridentes induit alas,
 Induit & variis exilia corpora plumis;
 Dextra tubam gestat Temesaeo ex aere sonoram.
 Nec mora jam pennis cedentes remigat auras,
 Atque parum est cursu celeres praevertere nubes,
 Jam ventos, jam solis equos post terga reliquit:   210
 Et primo Angliacas solito de more per urbes
 Ambiguas voces, incertaque murmura spargit,
 Mox arguta dolos, & detestabile vulgat
 Proditionis opus, nec non facta horrida dictu,
 Authoresque addit sceleris, nec garrula caecis
 Insidiis loca structa silet; stupuere relatis,
 Et pariter juvenes, pariter tremuere puellae,
 Effaetique senes pariter, tanteaeque ruinae
 Sensus ad aetatem subito penetraverat omnem
 Attamen interea populi miserescit ab alto          220
 Aethereus pater, & crudelibus obstitit ausis
 Papicolum; capti poenas raptantur ad acres;
 At pia thura Deo, & grati solvuntur honores;
 Compita laeta focis genialibus omnia fumant;
 Turba choros juvenilis agit: Quintoque Novembris
 Null Dies toto occurrit celebratior anno.
 
 
     On the Death of the Bishop of Ely.1
               Anno Aetates 17.
 
 My lids with grief were tumid yet,
 And still my sullied cheek was wet
 With briny dews profusely shed
 For venerable Winton dead,2
 When Fame, whose tales of saddest sound
 Alas! are ever truest found,
 The news through all our cities spread
 Of yet another mitred head
 By ruthless Fate to Death consign'd,
 Ely, the honour of his kind.                        10
 At once, a storm of passion heav'd
 My boiling bosom, much I grieved
 But more I raged, at ev'ry breath
 Devoting Death himself to death.
 With less revenge did Naso3 teem
 When hated Ibis was his theme;
 With less, Archilochus,4 denied
 The lovely Greek, his promis'd bride.
 But lo! while thus I execrate,
 Incens'd, the Minister of Fate,                     20
 Wondrous accents, soft, yet clear,
 Wafted on the gale I hear.
 Ah, much deluded! lay aside
 Thy threats and anger misapplied.
 Art not afraid with sounds like these
 T'offend whom thou canst not appease?
 Death is not (wherefore dream'st thou thus?)
 The son of Night and Erebus,
 Nor was of fel1 Erynnis born5
 In gulphs, where Chaos rules forlorn,               30
 But sent from God, his presence leaves,
 To gather home his ripen'd sheaves,
 To call encumber'd souls away
 From fleshly bonds to boundless day,
  (As when the winged Hours excite,
 And summon forth the Morning-light)
 And each to convoy to her place
 Before th'Eternal Father's face.
 But not the wicked-Them, severe
 Yet just, from all their pleasures here             40
 He hurries to the realms below,
 Terrific realms of penal woe!
 Myself no sooner heard his call
 Than, scaping through my prison-wall,
 I bade adieu to bolts and bars,
 And soar'd with angels to the stars,
 Like Him of old, to whom 'twas giv'n
 To mount, on fiery wheels, to heav'n.
 Bootes' wagon,6 slow with cold
 Appall'd me not, nor to behold                      50
 The sword that vast Orion draws,
 Or ev'n the Scorpion's horrid claws.7
 Beyond the Sun's bright orb I fly,
 And far beneath my feet descry
 Night's dread goddess, seen with awe,
 Whom her winged dragons draw.
 Thus, ever wond'ring at my speed
 Augmented still as I proceed,
 I pass the Planetary sphere,
 The Milky Way--and now appear                       60
 Heav'ns crystal battlements, her door
 Of massy pearl, and em'rald floor.
 But here I cease. For never can
 The tongue of once a mortal man
 In suitable description trace
 The pleasures of that happy place,
 Suffice it that those joys divine
 Are all, and all for ever, mine.
 
 1 Nicholas Felton.
 
 2 Dr. Felton died a few days after Andrewes, Bishop of Winchester.
 See Milton's Third Elegy.
 
 3 Ovid.
 
 4 A Greek poet. He was refused by Lycambes as a suitor to his daughters, and in
 revenge lampooned the entire family. Lycambes's daughters hanged themselves.
 
 5 Erebus and Erynnis are Furies.
 
 6 See Milton's Fifth Elegy, line 6, and the note thereto.
 
 7 The constellation Scorpio.
 
 
 
     That Nature is Not Subject to Decay.
 
 Ah, how the Human Mind wearies herself
 With her own wand'rings, and, involved in gloom
 Impenetrable, speculates amiss!
 Measuring, in her folly, things divine
 By human, laws inscrib'd on adamant
 By laws of Man's device, and counsels fix'd
 For ever, by the hours, that pass, and die.
 How?--shall the face of Nature then be plow'd
 Into deep wrinkles, and shall years at last
 On the great Parent fix a sterile curse?            10
 Shall even she confess old age, and halt
 And, palsy-smitten, shake her starry brows?
 Shall foul Antiquity with rust and drought
 And famine vex the radiant worlds above?
 Shall Time's unsated maw crave and engulf
 The very heav'ns that regulate his flight?
 And was the Sire of all able to fence
 His works, and to uphold the circling worlds,
 But through improvident and heedless haste
 Let slip th'occasion?--So then--All is lost--       20
 And in some future evil hour, yon arch
 Shall crumble and come thund'ring down, the poles
 Jar in collision, the Olympian King
 Fall with his throne, and Pallas, holding forth
 The terrors of her Gorgon shield in vain,1
 Shall rush to the abyss, like Vulcan hurl'd
 Down into Lemnos through the gate of heav'n.
 Thou also, with precipitated wheels
 Phoebus! thy own son's fall shalt imitate,
 With hideous ruin shalt impress the Deep            30
 Suddenly, and the flood shall reek and hiss
 At the extinction of the Lamp of Day.
 Then too, shall Haemus cloven to his base
 Be shattered, and the huge Ceraunian hills,2
 Once weapons of Tartarean Dis, immersed
 In Erebus, shall fill Himself with fear.
     No. The Almighty Father surer lay'd
 His deep foundations, and providing well
 For the event of all, the scales of Fate
 Suspended, in just equipoise, and bade              40
 His universal works from age to age
 One tenour hold, perpetual, undisturb'd.
     Hence the Prime Mover wheels itself about
 Continual, day by day, and with it bears
 In social measure swift the heav'ns around.
 Not tardier now is Saturn than of old,
 Nor radiant less the burning casque of Mars.
 Phoebus, his vigour unimpair'd, still shows
 Th'effulgence of his youth, nor needs the God
 A downward course that he may warm the vales;       50
 But, ever rich in influence, runs his road,
 Sign after sign, through all the heav'nly zone.
 Beautiful as at first ascends the star3
 From odorif'rous Ind, whose office is
 To gather home betimes th'ethereal flock,
 To pour them o'er the skies again at Eve,
 And to discriminate the Night and Day.
 Still Cynthia's changeful horn waxes and wanes
 Alternate, and with arms extended still
 She welcomes to her breast her brother's beams.     60
 Nor have the elements deserted yet
 Their functions, thunder with as loud a stroke
 As erst, smites through the rocks and scatters them,
 The East still howls, still the relentless North
 Invades the shudd'ring Scythian, still he breathes
 The Winter, and still rolls the storms along.
 The King of Ocean with his wonted force
 Beats on Pelorus,4 o'er the Deep is heard
 The hoarse alarm of Triton's sounding shell,
 Nor swim the monsters of th'Aegean sea              70
 In shallows, or beneath diminish'd waves.
 Thou too, thy antient vegetative pow'r
 Enjoy'st, O Earth! Narcissus still is sweet,
 And, Phoebus! still thy Favourite, and still
 Thy Fav'rite, Cytherea!5 both retain
 Their beauty, nor the mountains, ore-enrich'd
 For punishment of Man, with purer gold
 Teem'd ever, or with brighter gems the Deep.
     Thus, in unbroken series all proceeds
 And shall, till, wide involving either pole,        80
 And the immensity of yonder heav'n,
 The final flames of destiny absorb
 The world, consum'd in one enormous pyre!
 
 1 Pallas Athena (Minerva) had the head of the Gorgon Medusa in her shield; it
 turned all who looked upon it into stone.
 
 2 Phaeton, who fled from the chariot of the Sun while driving it.
 
 3 Venus.
 
 4 The North-east promontory of Sicily.
 
 5 The Hyacinth, favorite of Apollo. The Anemone, favorite of Venus.
 
 
 On the Platonic 'Ideal' as it was Understood by Aristotle.
 
 Ye sister Pow'rs who o'er the sacred groves
 Preside, and, Thou, fair mother of them all
 Mnemosyne,1 and thou, who in thy grot
 Immense reclined at leisure, hast in charge
 The Archives and the ord'nances of Jove,
 And dost record the festivals of heav'n,
 Eternity!--Inform us who is He,
 That great Original by Nature chos'n
 To be the Archetype of Human-kind,
 Unchangeable, Immortal, with the poles              10
 Themselves coaeval, One, yet ev'rywhere,
 An image of the god, who gave him Being?
 Twin-brother of the Goddess born from Jove,2
 He dwells not in his Father's mind, but, though
 Of common nature with ourselves, exists
 Apart, and occupies a local home.
 Whether, companion of the stars, he spend
 Eternal ages, roaming at his will
 From sphere to sphere the tenfold heav'ns, or dwell
 On the moon's side that nearest neighbours Earth,
 Or torpid on the banks of Lethe3 sit                20
 Among the multitude of souls ordair'd
 To flesh and blood, or whether (as may chance)
 That vast and giant model of our kind
 In some far-distant region of this globe
 Sequester'd stalk, with lifted head on high
 O'ertow'ring Atlas, on whose shoulders rest
 The stars, terrific even to the Gods.
 Never the Theban Seer,4 whose blindness proved
 His best illumination, Him beheld                   30
 In secret vision; never him the son
 Of Pleione,5 amid the noiseless night
 Descending, to the prophet-choir reveal'd;
 Him never knew th'Assyrian priest,6 who yet
 The ancestry of Ninus7 chronicles,
 And Belus, and Osiris far-renown'd;
 Nor even Thrice-great Hermes,7 although skill'd
 So deep in myst'ry, to the worshippers
 Of Isis show'd a prodigy like Him.
     And thou,8 who hast immortalized the shades     40
 Of Academus, if the school received
 This monster of the Fancy first from Thee,
 Either recall at once the banish'd bards
 To thy Republic, or, thyself evinc'd
 A wilder Fabulist, go also forth.
 
 1 Goddess of Memory and mother of the Muses.
 
 2 Pallas Athena.
 
 3 Waters of oblivion and forgetfulness.
 
 4 Tiresins. See Milton's Sixth Elegy, line 68.
 
 5 Hermes (Mercury).
 
 6 Perhaps the legendary Phoenician sage, Sanchuniathon.
 
 7 A legendary Assyrian king. Belus is the Assyrian god Bel.
 
 7 Hermes Trismegistus, author of Neo-Platonic works must esteemed.
 
 8 Plato.
 
 
               To My Father.
 
 Oh that Pieria's spring1 would thro' my breast
 Pour its inspiring influence, and rush
 No rill, but rather an o'erflowing flood!
 That, for my venerable Father's sake
 All meaner themes renounced, my Muse, on wings
 Of Duty borne, might reach a loftier strain.
 For thee, my Father! howsoe'er it please,
 She frames this slender work, nor know I aught,
 That may thy gifts more suitably requite;
 Though to requite them suitably would ask           10
 Returns much nobler, and surpassing far
 The meagre stores of verbal gratitude.
 But, such as I possess, I send thee all.
 This page presents thee in their full amount
 With thy son's treasures, and the sum is nought;
 Naught, save the riches that from airy dreams
 In secret grottos and in laurel bow'rs,
 I have, by golden Clio's2 gift, acquir'd.
     Verse is a work divine; despise not thou
 Verse therefore, which evinces (nothing more)       20
 Man's heav'nly source, and which, retaining still
 Some scintillations of Promethean fire,
 Bespeaks him animated from above.
 The Gods love verse; the infernal Pow'rs themselves
 Confess the influence of verse, which stirs
 The lowest Deep, and binds in triple chains
 Of adamant both Pluto and the shades.
 In verse the Delphic priestess, and the pale
 Tremulous Sybil make the Future known,
 And He who sacrifices, on the shrine                30
 Hangs verse, both when he smites the threat'ning bull,
 And when he spreads his reeking entrails wide
 To scrutinize the Fates envelop'd there.
 We too, ourselves, what time we seek again
 Our native skies, and one eternal Now
 Shall be the only measure of our Being,
 Crown'd all with gold, and chanting to the lyre
 Harmonious verse, shall range the courts above,
 And make the starry firmament resound.
 And, even now, the fiery Spirit pure                40
 That wheels yon circling orbs, directs, himself,
 Their mazy dance with melody of verse
 Unutt'rable, immortal, hearing which
 Huge Ophiuchus3 holds his hiss suppress'd,
 Orion, soften'd, drops his ardent blade,
 And Atlas stands unconscious of his load.
 Verse graced of old the feasts of kings, ere yet
 Luxurious dainties destin'd to the gulph
 Immense of gluttony were known, and ere
 Lyaeus4 deluged yet the temp'rate board.            50
 Then sat the bard a customary guest
 To share the banquet, and, his length of locks
 With beechen honours bound, proposed in verse
 The characters of Heroes and their deeds
 To imitation, sang of Chaos old,
 Of Nature's birth, of Gods that crept in search
 Of acorns fall'n, and of the thunderbolt
 Not yet produc'd from Aetna's fiery cave.
 And what avails, at last, tune without voice,
 Devoid of matter? Such may suit perhaps             60
 The rural dance, but such was ne'er the song
 Of Orpheus, whom the streams stood still to hear
 And the oaks follow'd. Not by chords alone
 Well-touch'd, but by resistless accents more
 To sympathetic tears the Ghosts themselves
 He mov'd: these praises to his verse he owes.
     Nor Thou persist, I pray thee, still to slight
 The sacred Nine, and to imagine vain
 And useless, Pow'rs by whom inspir'd, thyself
 Art skillfill to associate verse with airs          70
 Harmonious, and to give the human voice
 A thousand modulations, heir by right
 Indisputable of Arion's fame.5
 Now say, what wonder is it, if a son
 Of thine delight in verse, if so conjoin'd
 In close affinity, we sympathize
 In social arts and kindred studies sweet?
 Such distribution of himself to us
 Was Phoebus' choice; thou hast thy gift, and I
 Mine also, and between us we receive,               80
 Father and son, the whole inspiring God.
     No. Howsoe'er the semblance thou assume
 Of hate, thou hatest not the gentle Muse,
 My Father! for thou never bad'st me tread
 The beaten path and broad that leads right on
 To opulence, nor did'st condemn thy son
 To the insipid clamours of the bar,
 To laws voluminous and ill observ'd,
 But, wishing to enrich me more, to fill
 My mind with treasure, led'st me far away           90
 From city-din to deep retreats, to banks
 And streams Aonian,6 and, with free consent
 Didst place me happy at Apollo's side.
 I speak not now, on more important themes
 Intent, of common benefits, and such
 As Nature bids, but of thy larger gifts
 My Father! who, when I had open'd once
 The stores of Roman rhetoric, and learn'd
 The full-ton'd language, of the eloquent Greeks,
 Whose lofty music grac'd the lips of Jove,         100
 Thyself did'st counsel me to add the flow'rs
 That Gallia7 boasts, those too with which the smooth
 Italian his degentrate speech adorns,
 That witnesses his mixture with the Goth,
 And Palestine's prophetic songs divine.8
 To sum the whole, whate'er the Heav'n contains,
 The Earth beneath it, and the Air between,
 The Rivers and the restless deep, may all
 Prove intellectual gain to me, my wish
 Concurring with thy will; Science herself,         110
 All cloud removed, inclines her beauteous head
 And offers me the lip, if, dull of heart,
 I shrink not and decline her gracious boon.
     Go now, and gather dross, ye sordid minds
 That covet it; what could my Father more,
 What more could Jove himself, unless he gave
 His own abode, the heav'n in which he reigns?
 More eligible gifts than these were not
 Apollo's to his son, had they been safe
 As they were insecure, who made the boy            120
 The world's vice-luminary, bade him rule
 The radiant chariot of the day, and bind
 To his young brows his own all dazzling-wreath.
 I therefore, although last and least, my place
 Among the Learned in the laurel-grove
 Will hold, and where the conqu'ror's ivy twines,
 Henceforth exempt from th'unletter'd throng
 Profane, nor even to be seen by such.
 Away then, sleepless Care, Complaint away,
 And Envy, with thy "jealous leer malign"           130
 Nor let the monster Calumny shoot forth
 Her venom'd tongue at me. Detested foes!
 Ye all are impotent against my peace,
 For I am privileged, and bear my breast
 Safe, and too high, for your viperean wound.
     But thou my Father! since to render thanks
 Equivalent, and to requite by deeds
 Thy liberality, exceeds my power,
 Sufffice it, that I thus record thy gifts,
 And bear them treasur'd in a grateful mind!        140
 Ye too, the favourite pastime of my youth,
 My voluntary numbers, if ye dare
 To hope longevity, and to survive
 Your master's funeral pile, not soon absorb'd
 In the oblivious Lethaean gulph
 Shall to Futurity perhaps convey
 This theme, and by these praises of my sire
 Improve the Fathers of a distant age.
 
 1 A fount sacred to the Muses. 2 The Muse of History.
 
 3 The Serpent, a constellation.
 
 4 Bacchus, or Wine.
 
 5 John Milton Sr. was a fine musician. Arion was a lyric poet of
 Methymna, in Lesbos, who was saved from drowning by dolphins which
 he charmed with his song.
 
 6 Aonia is a plain in Boeotia. 7 France.
 
 8 The Old Testament Scriptures.
 
 
           Psalm CXIV 1
 
 When Israel by Jehovah call'd
    From Egypt's hostile plain,
 Pour'd forth in numbers as the Sand
    And sought the adjacent main:
 Then God descended from on high
    To lead the favour'd Race
 To rule o'er Jacob, & his Name
    In Judah's Tribe to place.
 The Sea at their approach alarm'd
    In wild amazement fled                           10
 And Jordan's flood was driven back
    Within it's fountainhead.
 The Mountains from their basis shook
    Confess'd the Parent God!
 With sudden throws like Rams they skipp'd
    And broken, fell abroad.
 The little Hills by the same power
    Were from their Center torn
 Like Lambs resistless they gave way
    In Tumult wild, upborn.                          20
 Ye Waves what strange amazement, say,
    Seiz'd on you that you fled?
 Thou Jordan too! On Israel's march,
    Why driven to thy Head?
 Ye Mountains whence this sudden fright
    That shook you from your base?
 And whence, ye little Hills, your flight
    From Israel's chosen Race?
 Tremble thou Earth! Jehovah leads,
    And guards the might Host!                       30
 That God, who by his awful Word,
    Commands the Stream to flow2
 From flinty Rocks; & pouring thence,
    To form the Lake below.
 
 1 Translated from the Latin, and not Milton's Greek poem. Milton's
 own English version, presented below, was done, he tells us, "at
 fifteen years old."
 
 2 See Exodus, chapter I7.
 
 
               Psalm CXIV
 
 When the blest seed of Terah's faithful Son,1
 After long toil their liberty had won,
 And past from Pharian2 fields to Canaan Land,
 Led by the strength of the Almighty's hand,
 Jehovah's wonders were in Israel shown,
 His praise and glory was in Israel known.
 That saw the troubl'd Sea, and shivering fled,
 And sought to hide his froth-becurled head
 Low in the earth, Jordan's clear streams recoil,
 As a faint host that hath receiv'd the foil.        10
 The high, huge-bellied Mountains skip like Rams
 Amongst their Ewes, the little Hills like Lambs.
 Why fled the Ocean? And why skip'd the Mountains?
 Why turned Jordan toward his Crystal Fountains?
 Shake earth, and at the presence be aghast
 Of him that ever was, and ay shall last,
 That glassy floods from rugged rocks can crush,
 And make soft rills from the fiery flint-stones gush.
 
 1 Abraham. 2 Egyptian.
 
 
          The Philosopher and the King.
 
 A Philosopher, included in the same sentence of condemnation with
 several guilty persons among whom he had been apprehended, sent
 the following lines, composed suddenly in the moment when he was
 going to death, to a certain King whom had ignorantly condemned
 him.
 
 Know this, O King! that if thou shalt destroy
 Me, no man's enemy and who have liv'd
 Obedient to the Laws, thou may'st with ease
 Strike off a wise man's head, but, taught the truth
 Hereafter, shalt with vain regret deplore
 Thy city's loss of One, her chief support.
 
 
          On the Engraver of his Portrait.1
 
 Survey my Features--you will own it clear
 That little skill has been exerted here.
 My Friends, who know me not here smile to see
 How ill the model and the work agree.
 
 1 Greek lines placed by Milton beneath the engraved portrait of
 himself by William Marshall in the I645 edition of his poems. The
 handsome Milton disliked Marshall's picture and took revenge with
 this epigram, which Marshall, ignorant of Greek, engraved beneath
 the portrait.
 
          Another Translation of the Same.2
 
 Look on myself--you will own at once
 This Copy of me, taken by a Dunce.
 My Friends, who gaze and guess not whom ye see,
 Laugh! Would ye think it? He intended me!
 
 
 
 To Giovanni Salzilli, a Roman Poet, in his Illness.
                    Scazons.1
 
 My halting Muse, that dragg'st by choice along
 Thy slow, slow step, in melancholy song!
 And lik'st that pace expressive of thy cares
 Not less than Diopeia's2 sprightlier airs
 When in the dance she beats with measur'd tread
 Heav'n's floor in front of Juno's golden bed,
 Salute Salsillus, who to verse divine
 Prefers, with partial love, such lays as mine.
 Thus writes that Milton then, who wafted o'er
 From his own nest on Albion's stormy shore          10
 Where Eurus, fiercest of th'Aeolian band,
 Sweeps with ungovern'd rage the blasted land,
 Of late to more serene Ausonia came
 To view her cities of illustrious name,
 To prove, himself a witness of the truth,
 How wise her elders, and how learn'd her Youth.
 Much good, Salsillus! and a body free
 From all disease, that Milton asks for thee,
 Who now endur'st the languor, and the pains
 That bile inflicts diffus'd through all thy veins,  20
 Relentless malady! not mov'd to spare
 By thy sweet Roman voice, and Lesbian air!
     Health, Hebe's sister, sent us from the skies,
 And thou, Apollo, whom all sickness flies,
 Pythius, or Paean, or what name divine
 Soe'er thou chuse, haste, heal a priest of thine!
 Ye groves of Faunus, and ye hills that melt
 With vinous dews, where meek Evander3 dwelt!
 If aught salubrious in your confines grow,
 Strive which shall soonest heal your poet's woe,    30
 That, render'd to the Muse he loves, again
 He may enchant the meadows with his strain.
 Numa, reclin'd in everlasting ease
 Amid the shade of dark embow'ring trees,
 Viewing with eyes of unabated fire
 His loved Aegeria, shall that strain admire:
 So sooth'd, the tumid Tiber shall revere
 The tombs of kings, nor desolate the year,
 Shall curb his waters with a friendly rein,
 And guide them harmless till they meet the main.    40
 
 1 The original is written in a measure called Scazon, which
 signifies limping, and the measure is so denominated,
 because, though in other respects Iambic, it terminates with
 a Spondee, and has consequently a more tardy movement.
    The reader will immediately see that this property of the
 Latin verse cannot be imitated in English.--W.C.
 
 2 Diopeia was one of Juno's nymphs.
 
 3 The Aventine hill. Evander, great-grandson of Pallas, King of
 Arcadia, migrated to Italy about sixty years before the Trojan
 War.
 
 
                    To Giovanni Battista Manso,
                         Marquis of Villa.
 
 1Giovanni Battista Manso, Marquis of Villa, is an Italian
 Nobleman of the highest estimation among his countrymen, for
 Genius, Literature,and military accomplishments. To Him
 Torquato Tasso addressed his "Dialogue on Friendship," for he
 was much the friend of Tasso, who has also celebrated him
 among the other princes of his country, in his poem entitled
 "Jerusalem Conquered" (Book XX).
 
          Among cavaliers magnanimous and courteous
          --Manso is resplendent.
 
 During the Author's stay at Naples he received at the hands
 of the Marquis a thousand kind offices and civilities, and,
 desirous not to appear ungrateful, sent him this poem a short
 time before his departure from that city.
 
 
 These verses also to thy praise the Nine2
 Oh Manso! happy in that theme design,
 For, Gallus and Maecenas3 gone, they see
 None such besides, or whom they love as Thee,
 And, if my verse may give the meed of fame,
 Thine too shall prove an everlasting name.
 Already such, it shines in Tasso's page
 (For thou wast Tasso's friend) from age to age,
 And, next, the Muse consign'd, not unaware
 How high the charge, Marini4 to thy care,           10
 Who, singing, to the nymphs, Adonis' praise,
 Boasts thee the patron of his copious lays.
 To thee alone the Poet would entrust
 His latest vows, to thee alone his dust,
 And Thou with punctual piety hast paid
 In labour'd brass thy tribute to his shade.
 Nor this contented thee-but lest the grave
 Should aught absorb of their's, which thou could'st save,
 All future ages thou has deign'd to teach
 The life, lot, genius, character of each,           20
 Eloquent as the Carian sage,5 who, true
 To his great theme, the Life of Homer drew.
     I, therefore, though a stranger youth, who come
 Chill'd by rude blasts that freeze my Northern home,
 Thee dear to Clio confident proclaim,
 And Thine, for Phoebus' sake, a deathless name.
 Nor Thou, so kind, wilt view with scornful eye
 A Muse scarce rear'd beneath our sullen sky,
 Who fears not, indiscrete as she is young,
 To seek in Latium hearers of her song.              30
 We too, where Thames with his unsullied waves
 The tresses of the blue-hair'd Ocean laves,
 Hear oft by night, or, slumb'ring, seem to hear
 O'er his wide stream, the swan's voice warbling clear,
 And we could boast a Tityrus6 of yore,
 Who trod, a welcome guest, your happy shore.
     Yes, dreary as we own our Northern clime,
 E'en we to Phoebus raise the polish'd rhyme,
 We too serve Phoebus; Phoebus has receiv'd,
 (If legends old may claim to be believ'd)           40
 No sordid gifts from us, the golden ear,
 The burnish'd apple, ruddiest of the year,
 The fragrant crocus, and, to grace his fane,
 Fair damsels chosen from the Druid train-
 Druids, our native bards in ancient time,
 Who Gods and Heroes prais'd in hallow'd rhyme.
 Hence, often as the maids of Greece surround
 Apollo's shrine with hymns of festive sound,
 They name the virgins who arriv'd of yore
 With British off'rings on the Delian shore,         50
 Loxo, from Giant Corineus sprung,
 Upis, on whose blest lips the Future hung,
 And Hecaerge7 with the golden hair,
 All deck'd with Pic'ish hues, and all with bosoms bare.
 Thou therefore, happy Sage, whatever clime
 Shall ring with Tasso's praise in after-time,
 Or with Marini's, shalt be known their friend,
 And with an equal flight to fame ascend.
 The world shall hear how Phoebus and the Nine
 Were inmates, once, and willing guests of thine.    60
 Yet Phoebus, when of old constrain'd to roam
 The earth, an exile from his heav'nly home,
 Enter'd, no willing guest, Admetus'8 door,
 Though Hercules had enter'd there before.
 But gentle Chiron's9 cave was near, a scene
 Of rural peace, clothed with perpetual green,
 And thither, oft as respite he requir'd
 From rustic clamours loud, the God retir'd.
 There, many a time, on Peneus' bank reclin'd
 At some oak's root, with ivy thick entwin'd,        70
 Won by his hospitable friend's desire
 He sooth'd his pains of exile with the lyre.
 Then shook the hills, then trembled Peneus' shore,
 Nor Oeta10 felt his load of forests more,
 The upland elms descended to the plain,11
 And soften'd lynxes wonder'd at the strain.
     Well may we think, O dear to all above!
 Thy birth distinguish'd by the smile of Jove,
 And that Apollo shed his kindliest pow'r,
 And Maia's son,12 on that propitious hour,          80
 Since only minds so born can comprehend
 A poet's worth, or yield that worth a friend.
 Hence, on thy yet unfaded cheek appears
 The ling'ring freshness of thy greener years,
 Hence, in thy front, and features, we admire
 Nature unwither'd, and a mind entire.
 Oh might so true a friend to me belong,
 So skill'd to grace the votaries of song,
 Should I recall hereafter into rhyme
 The kings, and heroes of my native clime,           90
 Arthur the chief, who even now prepares,
 In subterraneous being, future wars,
 With all his martial Knights, to be restor'd
 Each to his seat around the fed'ral board,
 And Oh, if spirit fail me not, disperse
 Our Saxon plund'rers in triumphant verse!
 Then, after all, when, with the Past content,
 A life I finish, not in silence spent,
 Should he, kind mourner, o'er my deathbed bend
 I shall but need to say--"Be yet my friend!"       100
 He, faithful to my dust, with kind concern
 Shal1 place it gently in a modest urn;
 He too, perhaps, shall bid the marble breathe
 To honour me, and with the graceful wreath13
 Or of Parnassus or the Paphian isle
 Shall bind my brows--but I shall rest the while.
 Then also, if the fruits of Faith endure,
 And Virtue's promis'd recompense be sure,
 Borne to those seats, to which the blest aspire
 By purity of soul, and virtuous fire,
 These rites, as Fate permits, I shall survey
 With eyes illumin'd by celestial day,              110
 And, ev'ry cloud from my pure spirit driv'n,
 Joy in the bright beatitude of Heav'n!
 
 1 Milton's Account of Manso, translated.
 
 2 The Muses.
 
 3 Cornelius Gallus, Roman eleist. See Virgil (Eclogue vi,
 64-66, and x).
 
 Maecenas. Roman patron of letters. See Horace (Odes, i,1),
 
 4 Author of the Adone, a poem on the story of Venus and Adonis.
 
 5 Herodotus, to whom The Life of Homer is attributed.
 
 6 Chaucer, called Tityrus in Spencer's Pastorals.
 
 7 The maidens who brought offerings to Delos. Loxo, descended from the ancient
 British hero, Corineus; Upis, a prophetess; and
 Hecaerge.
 
 8 Admetus was King of Thessaly. Apollo was for a year his
 shepherd.
 
 9 See Homer (Il. xi, 830-831) and Ovid (Met. ii, 630).
 
 10 Mt. Oeta, between Thessaly and Aetolia.
 
 11 See Ovid (Met. x, 87-I06), where the trees crowd the hear
 Orpheus sing.
 
 12 Hermes.
 
 13 The wreaths of victors, made from the laurel, which grew on Mt.
 Parnassus, sacred to the Muses, and the myrtle, sacred to Venus,
 a shrine to whom was at Paphos in Cyprus.
 
 
                      The Death of Damon.
 
                         The Argument.
 
    Thyrsis and Damon, shepherds and neighbours, had always pursued
 the same studies, and had, from their earliest days, been united
 in the closest friendship. Thyrsis, while traveling for improve-
 ment, received intelligence of the death of Damon, and, after a
 time, returning and finding it true, deplores himself and his
 solitary condition, in this poem.
    By Damon is to be understood Charles Diodati, connected with
 the Italian city of Lucca by his Father's side, in other respects
 an Englishman; a youth of uncommon genius, erudition, and virtue.
 
 Ye Nymphs of Himera1 (for ye have shed
 Erewhile for Daphnis2 and for Hylas dead,
 And over Bion's long-lamented bier,
 The fruitless meed of many a sacred tear)
 Now, through the villas laved by Thames rehearse
 The woes of Thyrsis in Sicilian verse,
 What sighs he heav'd, and how with groans profound
 He made the woods and hollow rocks resound
 Young Damon dead; nor even ceased to pour
 His lonely sorrows at the midnight hour.                   10
 The green wheat twice had nodded in the ear,
 And golden harvest twice enrich'd the year,
 Since Damon's lips had gasp'd for vital air
 The last, last time, nor Thyrsis yet was there;
 For he, enamour'd of the Muse, remain'd
 In Tuscan Fiorenza long detain'd,
 But, stored at length with all he wish'd to learn,
 For his flock's sake now hasted to return,
 And when the shepherd had resumed his seat
 At the elm's root within his old retreat,           20
 Then 'twas his lot, then, all his loss to know,
 And, from his burthen'd heart, he vented thus his woe.
 Go, seek your home, my lambs; my thoughts are due
 To other cares than those of feeding you.
 Alas! what Deities shall I suppose
 In heav'n or earth concern'd for human woes,
 Since, Oh my Damon! their severe decree
 So soon condemns me to regret of Thee!
 Depart'st thou thus, thy virtues unrepaid
 With fame and honour, like a vulgar shade?          30
 Let him forbid it, whose bright rod controls,
 And sep'rates sordid from illustrious souls,
 Drive far the rabble, and to Thee assign
 A happier lot with spirits worthy thine!
 Go, seek your home, my lambs; my thoughts are due
 To other cares than those of feeding you.
 Whate'er befall, unless by cruel chance
 The wolf first give me a forbidding glance,
 Thou shalt not moulder undeplor'd, but long
 Thy praise shall dwell on ev'ry shepherd's tongue;  40
 To Daphnis first they shall delight to pay,
 And, after Him, to thee the votive lay,
 While Pales3 shall the flocks and pastures love,
 Or Faunus to frequent the field or grove,
 At least if antient piety and truth
 With all the learned labours of thy youth
 May serve thee aught, or to have left behind
 A sorrowing friend, and of the tuneful kind.
 Go, seek your home, my lambs, my thoughts are due
 To other cares than those of feeding you.           50
 Yes, Damon! such thy sure reward shall be,
 But ah, what doom awaits unhappy me?
 Who, now, my pains and perils shall divide,
 As thou wast wont, for ever at my side,
 Both when the rugged frost annoy'd our feet,
 And when the herbage all was parch'd with heat,
 Whether the grim wolf's ravage to prevent
 Or the huge lion's, arm'd with darts we went?
 Whose converse, now, shall calm my stormy day,
 With charming song who, now, beguile my way?        60
 Go, seek your home, my lambs; my thoughts are due
 To other cares than those of feeding you.
 In whom shall I confide? Whose counsel find
 A balmy med'cine for my troubled mind?
 Or whose discourse with innocent delight
 Shall fill me now, and cheat the wint'ry night,
 While hisses on my hearth the pulpy pear,
 And black'ning chesnuts start and crackle there,
 While storms abroad the dreary meadows whelm,
 And the wind thunders thro' the neighb'ring elm?    70
 Go, seek your home, my lambs; my thoughts are due
 To other cares than those of feeding you.
 Or who, when summer suns their summit reach,
 And Pan sleeps hidden by the shelt'ring beech,
 When shepherds disappear, Nymphs seek the sedge,
 And the stretch'd rustic snores beneath the hedge,
 Who then shall render me thy pleasant vein
 Of Attic wit, thy jests, thy smiles again?
 Go, seek your home, my lambs; my thoughts are due
 To other cares than those of feeding you.           80
 Where glens and vales are thickest overgrown
 With tangled boughs, I wander now alone
 Till night descend, while blust'ring wind and show'r
 Beat on my temples through the shatter'd bow'r.
 Go, seek your home, my lambs; my thoughts are due
 To other cares than those of feeding you.
 Alas, what rampant weeds now shame my fields,
 And what a mildew'd crop the furrow yields!
 My rambling vines unwedded to the trees
 Bear shrivel'd grapes, my myrtles fail to please,   90
 Nor please me more my flocks; they, slighted, turn
 Their unavailing looks on me, and mourn.
 Go, seek your home, my lambs; my thoughts are due
 To other cares than those of feeding you.
 Aegon invites me to the hazel grove,
 Amyntas, on the river's bank to rove,
 And young Alphesiboeus to a seat
 Where branching elms exclude the midday heat--
 "Here fountains spring-here mossy hillocks rise--"
 "Here Zephyr whispers and the stream replies--"    100
 Thus each persuades, but deaf to ev'ry call
 I gain the thickets, and escape them all.
 Go, seek your home, my lambs; my thoughts are due
 To other cares than those of feeding you.
 Then Mopsus said (the same who reads so well
 The voice of birds, and what the stars foretell,
 For He by chance had noticed my return)
 What means thy sullen mood, this deep concern?
 Ah Thyrsis! thou art either crazed with love,
 Or some sinister influence from above,             110
 Dull Saturn's influence oft the shepherd rue,
 His leaden shaft oblique has pierced thee through.
 Go, go, my lambs, unpastur'd as ye are,
 My thoughts are all now due to other care.
 The Nymphs amazed my melancholy see,
 And, Thyrsis! cry--what will become of thee?
 What would'st thou, Thyrsis? such should not appear
 The brow of youth, stern, gloomy, and severe,
 Brisk youth should laugh and love--ah shun the fate
 Of those twice wretched mopes who love too late!   120
 Go, go, my lambs, unpastur'd as ye are,
 My thoughts are all now due to other care.
 Aegle with Hyas came, to sooth my pain,
 And Baucis' daughter, Dryope the vain,4
 Fair Dryope, for voice and finger neat
 Known far and near, and for her self-conceit,
 Came Chloris too, whose cottage on the lands
 That skirt the Idumanian current stands;
 But all in vain they came, and but to see
 Kind words and comfortable lost on me.             130
 Go, go, my lambs, unpastur'd as ye are,
 My thoughts are all now due to other care.
 Ah blest indiff'rence of the playful herd,
 None by his fellow chosen or preferr'd!
 No bonds of amity the flocks enthrall,
 But each associates and is pleased with all;
 So graze the dappled deer in num'rous droves,
 And all his kind alike the zebra loves'
 The same law governs where the billows roar
 And Proteus' shoals o'erspread the desert shore;   140
 The sparrow, meanest of the feather'd race,
 His fit companion finds in ev'ry place,
 With whom he picks the grain that suits him best,
 Flits here and there, and late returns to rest,
 And whom if chance the falcon make his prey,
 Or Hedger with his well-aim'd arrow slay,
 For no such loss the gay survivor grieves'
 New love he seeks, and new delight receives.
 We only, an obdurate kind, rejoice,
 Scorning all others, in a single choice,           150
 We scarce in thousands meet one kindred mind,
 And if the long-sought good at last we find,
 When least we fear it, Death our treasure steals,
 And gives our heart a wound that nothing heals.
 Go, go, my lambs, unpastur'd as ye are,
 My thoughts are all now due to other care.
 Ah, what delusion lured me from my flocks,
 To traverse Alpine snows, and rugged rocks!
 What need so great had I to visit Rome
 Now sunk in ruins, and herself a tomb?             160
 Or, had she flourish'd still as when, of old
 For her sake Tityrus forsook his fold,
 What need so great had I t'incur a pause
 Of thy sweet intercourse for such a cause,
 For such a cause to place the roaring sea,
 Rocks, mountains, woods, between my friend and me?
 Else, I had grasp'd thy feeble hand, composed
 Thy decent limbs, thy drooping eye-lids closed,
 And, at the last, had said--Farewell--Ascend--
 Nor even in the skies forget thy friend.           170
 Go, go, my lambs, untended homeward fare,
 My thoughts are all now due to other care.
 Although well-pleas'd, ye tuneful Tuscan swains!
 My mind the mem'ry of your worth retains,
 Yet not your worth can teach me less to mourn
 My Damon lost--He too was Tuscan born,
 Born in your Lucca, city of renown,
 And Wit possess'd and Genius like your own.
 Oh how elate was I, when, stretch'd beside
 The murm'ring course of Arno's breezy tide,        180
 Beneath the poplar-grove I pass'd my hours,
 Now cropping myrtles, and now vernal flow'rs,
 And hearing, as I lay at ease along,
 Your swains contending for the prize of song!
 I also dared attempt (and, as it seems
 Not much displeas'd attempting) various themes,
 For even I can presents boast from you,
 The shepherd's pipe and osier basket too,
 And Dati and Francini both have made
 My name familiar to the beechen shade,             190
 And they are learn'd, and each in ev'ry place
 Renown'd for song, and both of Lydian Race.
 Go, go, my lambs, untended homeward fare,
 My thoughts are all now due to other care.
 While bright the dewy grass with moon-beams shone,
 And I stood hurdling in my kids alone,
 How often have I said (but thou had'st found
 Ere then thy dark cold lodgment under-ground)
 Now Damon sings, or springes sets for hares,
 Or wicker-work for various use prepares!           200
 How oft, indulging Fancy, have I plann'd
 New scenes of pleasure, that I hop'd at hand,
 Call'd thee abroad as I was wont, and cried--
 What hoa, my friend--come, lay thy task aside--
 Haste, let us forth together, and beguile
 The heat beneath yon whisp'ring shades awhile,
 Or on the margin stray of Colne's5 clear flood,
 Or where Cassivelan's grey turrets stood!
 There thou shalt cull me simples, and shalt teach
 Thy friend the name and healing pow'rs of each,    210
 From the tall blue-bell to the dwarfish weed,
 What the dry land and what the marshes breed,
 For all their kinds alike to thee are known,
 And the whole art of Galen6 is thy own.
 Ah, perish Galen's art, and wither'd be
 The useless herbs that gave not health to thee!
 Twelve evenings since, as in poetic dream
 I meditating sat some statelier theme,
 The reeds no sooner touch'd my lip, though new
 And unassay'd before, than wide they flew,         220
 Bursting their waxen bands, nor could sustain
 The deep-ton'd music of the solemn strain;
 And I am vain perhaps, but will tell
 How proud a theme I choose--ye groves farewell!
 Go, go, my lambs, untended homeward fare,
 My thoughts are all now due to other care.
 Of Brutus, Dardan Chief, my song shall be,7
 How with his barks he plough'd the British sea,
 First from Rutupia's tow'ring headland seen,
 And of his consort's reign, fair Imogen;           230
 Of Brennus and Belinus, brothers bold,8
 And of Arviragus, and how of old
 Our hardy sires th'Armorican controll'd,
 And the wife of Gorlois, who, surprised
 By Uther in her husband's form disguised,
 (Such was the force of Merlin's art) became
 Pregnant with Arthur of heroic fame.9
 These themes I now revolve--and Oh--if Fate
 Proportion to these themes my lengthen'd date,
 Adieu my shepherd's-reed--yon pine-tree bough      240
 Shall be thy future home, there dangle Thou
 Forgotten and disus'd, unless ere long
 Thou change thy Latin for a British song.
 A British?--even so--the pow'rs of Man
 Are bounded; little is the most he can,
 And it shall well suffice me, and shall be
 Fame and proud recompense enough for me,
 If Usa10 golden-hair'd my verse may learn,
 If Alain, bending o'er his chrystal urn,
 Swift-whirling Abra, Trent's o'ershadow'd stream,  250
 Thames, lovelier far than all in my esteem
 Tamar's ore-tinctur'd flood, and, after these,
 The wave-worn shores of utmost Orcades
 Go, go, my lambs, untended homeward fare,
 My thoughts are all now due to other care.
 All this I kept in leaves of laurel-rind
 Enfolded safe, and for thy view design'd,
 This--and a gift from Manso's hand beside,
 (Manso, not least his native city's pride)
 Two cups, that radiant as their giver shone,       260
 Adorn'd by sculpture with a double zone.
 The spring was graven there; here, slowly wind
 The Red-Sea shores with groves of spices lined;
 Her plumes of various hues amid the boughs
 The sacred, solitary Phoenix shows,
 And, watchful of the dawn, reverts her head
 To see Aurora11 leave her wat'ry bed.
 In other part, th'expansive vault above,
 And there too, even there, the God of love;
 With quiver arm'd he mounts, his torch displays    270
 A vivid light, his gem-tip'd arrows blaze,
 Around, his bright and fiery eyes he rolls,
 Nor aims at vulgar minds or little souls
 Nor deigns one look below, but aiming high
 Sends every arrow to the lofty sky,
 Hence, forms divine, and minds immortal learn
 The pow'r of Cupid, and enamour'd burn.
 Thou also Damon (neither need I fear
 That hope delusive) thou art also there;
 For whither should simplicity like thine           280
 Retire, where else such spotless virtue shine?
 Thou dwell'st not (thought profane) in shades below,
 Nor tears suit thee--cease then my tears to flow,
 Away with grief on Damon ill-bestow'd,
 Who, pure himself, has found a pure abode,
 Has pass'd the show'ry arch, henceforth resides
 With saints and heroes, and from flowing tides
 Quaffs copious immortality and joy
 With hallow'd lips. Oh! blest without alloy,
 And now enrich'd with all that faith can claim,    290
 Look down entreated by whatever name,
 If Damon please thee most (that rural sound)
 Shall oft with ecchoes fill the groves around)
 Or if Diodatus, by which alone
 In those ethereal mansions thou art known.
 Thy blush was maiden, and thy youth the taste
 Of wedded bliss knew never, pure and chaste,
 The honours, therefore, by divine decree
 The lot of virgin worth are giv'n to thee;
 Thy brows encircled with a radiant band,           300
 And the green palm-branch waving in thy hand
 Thou immortal Nuptials shalt rejoice
 And join with seraphs thy according voice,
 Where rapture reigns, and the ecstatic lyre
 Guides the blest orgies of the blazing quire.
 
 1 A river in Sicily.
 
 2 Subject of Theocritus's Lament for Daphnis (Idyl i) in which
 Thyrsis is the mourning shepherd. Hylas was taken away by nymphs
 who admired his beauty and Bion is the subject of Moschus's
 Epitaph of Bion (Idyl iii).
 
 3 Goddess who was protector of the flocks. Faunus is god of the
 plains and hills around Rome.
 
 4 Characters in Ovid's Metamorphoses.
 
 5 A river near St. Albans. Cassivellaunus was a British chieftan
 who opposed Caesar. See Gallic War (v, xi.)
 
 6 Medicine. Diodati took medical training at Cambridge.
 
 7 Milton's planned epic opened with the Dardanian (i.e. Trojan)
 fleet, under Brutus, approaching England.
 
 8 Brennus and Belinus were kings of Brittany who, according to
 Spencer's Fairie Queen, "rasackt Greece" and conquered France
 and Germany. Arviragus led the Britons against Claudius.
 
 9 See Malory's Morte d'Arthur.
 
 10 A river in Oxford.
 
 11 Goddess of the Dawn.
 
 
               To Mr. John Rouse,
       Librarian of the University of Oxford,
 
    An Ode1 on a Lost Volume of my Poems Which He
      Desired Me to Replace that He Might Add
  Them to My Other Works Deposited in the Library.
 
               Strophe I
 
  My two-fold Book! single in show
    But double in Contents,
  Neat, but not curiously adorn'd
    Which in his early youth,
  A poet gave, no lofty one in truth
 Although an earnest wooer of the Muse--
  Say, while in cool Ausonian2 shades
    Or British wilds he roam'd,
  Striking by turns his native lyre,
    By turns the Daunian lute                        10
    And stepp'd almost in air,--
 
               Antistrophe
 
  Say, little book, what furtive hand
  Thee from thy fellow books convey'd,
  What time, at the repeated suit
      Of my most learned Friend,
 I sent thee forth an honour'd traveller
 From our great city to the source of Thames,
           Caerulean sire!
 Where rise the fountains and the raptures ring,
      Of the Aonian choir,3                          20
   Durable as yonder spheres,
   And through the endless lapse of years
      Secure to be admired?
 
               Strophe II
 
  Now what God or Demigod
 For Britain's ancient Genius mov'd
      (If our afflicted land
 Have expiated at length the guilty sloth
    Of her degen'rate sons)
  Shall terminate our impious feuds,
 And discipline, with hallow'd voice, recall?        30
    Recall the Muses too
    Driv'n from their antient seats
 In Albion, and well-nigh from Albion's shore,
    And with keen Phoebean shafts
    Piercing th'unseemly birds,
      Whose talons menace us
 Shall drive the harpy race from Helicon afar?
 
               Antistrophe
 
  But thou, my book, though thou hast stray'd,
      Whether by treach'ry lost
 Or indolent neglect, thy bearer's fault,            40
      From all thy kindred books,
  To some dark cell or cave forlorn,
      Where thou endur'st, perhaps,
 The chafing of some hard untutor'd hand,
           Be comforted--
 For lo! again the splendid hope appears
  That thou may'st yet escape
 The gulphs of Lethe, and on oary wings
 Mount to the everlasting courts of Jove,
 
               Strophe III
 
 Since Rouse desires thee, and complains             50
    That, though by promise his,
  Thou yet appear'st not in thy place
 Among the literary noble stores
           Giv'n to his care,
 But, absent, leav'st his numbers incomplete.
  He, therefore, guardian vigilant
      Of that unperishing wealth,
 Calls thee to the interior shrine, his charge,
 Where he intends a richer treasure far
 Than Ion kept--(Ion, Erectheus' son4                60
 Illustrious, of the fair Creusa born)--
 In the resplendent temple of his God,
 Tripods of gold and Delphic gifts divine.
 
               Antistrophe
 
    Haste, then, to the pleasant groves,
      The Muses' fav'rite haunt;
 Resume thy station in Apollo's dome,
           Dearer to him
 Than Delos, or the fork'd Parnassian hill.
           Exulting go,
 Since now a splendid lot is also thine,             70
 And thou art sought by my propitious friend;
      For There thou shalt be read
      With authors of exalted note,
 The ancient glorious Lights of Greece and Rome.
 
                  Epode
 
 Ye, then my works, no longer vain
      And worthless deem'd by me!
 Whate'er this steril genius has produc'd
 Expect, at last, the rage of Envy spent,
  An unmolested happy home,
 Gift of kind Hermes and my watchful friend,         80
  Where never flippant tongue profane
    Shall entrance find,
 And whence the coarse unletter'd multitude
    Shall babble far remote.
  Perhaps some future distant age
 Less tinged with prejudice and better taught
    Shall furnish minds of pow'r
    To judge more equally.
  Then, malice silenced in the tomb,
    Cooler heads and sounder hearts,                 90
    Thanks to Rouse, if aught of praise
 I merit, shall with candour weigh the claim.
 
 
 1 This Ode consists of three strophes and the same of antistrophes,
 concluding with an epode. Although these units do not perfectly
 correspond in their number of verses or in divisions which are
 strictly parallel, nevertheless I have divided them in this
 fashion with a view  to convenience or the reader, rather than
 conformity with the ancient rules of versification. In other
 respects a poem of  this kind should, perhaps, more correctly be
 called monostrophic. The metres are in part regularly patterned
 and in part free. There are two Phaleucian verses which admit a
 spondee in the third foot, a practice often followed by Catullus
 in the second foot. [Milton's Note, translated--W.C.]
 
 1 This Ode is rendered without rhyme, that it might more
 adequately represent the original, which, as Milton himself
 informs us, is of no certain measure. It may possibly for this
 reason disappoint the reader, though it cost the writer more
 labour than the translation of any other piece in the whole
 collection.--W.C.
 
 2 Italian.
 
 3 The Muses, who dwelt on Mount Helicon in Aonia.
 
 4 See Euripides' Ion.
 
 
 
          Paradisum Amissam, Lib. II 1
 
 Quales aerii montis de vertice nubes
 Cum surgunt, et jam Boreae tumida ora quierunt,
 Caelum hilares abdit spissa caligine vultus,
 Nimbosumque nives aut imbres cogitat aether:
 Tum si jucundo tandem sol prodeat ore,              5
 Et croceo montes et pascua lumine tingat,
 Gaudent omnia, aves mulcent concentibus agros,
 Balatuque ovium colles vallesque resultant.
 
 
 1 Translation of a simile in Paradise Lost,
  "As when, from mountaintops, the dusky clouds
   Ascending, &c.--"(ii. 488)--W.C.
 
 
 
 3. TRANSLATIONS OF THE ITALIAN POEMS
 
 
                         I
 
 Fair Lady, whose harmonious name the Rheno
    Through all his grassy vale delights to hear,
    Base were, indeed, the wretch, who could forbear
    To love a spirit elegant as thine,
 That manifests a sweetness all divine,               5
    Nor knows a thousand winning acts to spare,
    And graces, which Love's bow and arrows are,
    Temp'ring thy virtues to a softer shine.
 When gracefully thou speak'st, or singest gay
    Such strains as might the senseless forest move, 10
    Ah then--turn each his eyes and ears away,
 Who feels himself unworthy of thy love!
    Grace can alone preserve him, e'er the dart
    Of fond desire yet reach his inmost heart.
 
                         II
 
 As on a hill-top rude, when closing day
    Imbrowns the scene, some past'ral maiden fair
    Waters a lovely foreign plant with care,
    That scarcely can its tender bud display
 Borne from its native genial airs away,              5
    So, on my tongue these accents new and rare
    Are flow'rs exotic, which Love waters there,
    While thus, o sweetly scornful! I essay
 Thy praise in verse to British ears unknown,
    And Thames exchange for Arno's fair domain;      10
    So Love has will'd, and oftimes Love has shown
 That what He wills he never wills in vain.
    Oh that this hard and steril breast might be
    To Him who plants from heav'n, a soil as free.
 
                         III
                       Canzone.
 
 They mock my toil--the nymphs and am'rous swains--
 And whence this fond attempt to write, they cry,
 Love-songs in language that thou little know'st?
 How dar'st thou risque to sing these foreign strains?
 Say truly. Find'st not oft thy purpose cross'd,      5
 And that thy fairest flow'rs, Here, fade and die?
 Then with pretence of admiration high--
 Thee other shores expect, and other tides,
 Rivers on whose grassy sides
 Her deathless laurel-leaf with which to bind        10
 Thy flowing locks, already Fame provides;
 Why then this burthen, better far declin'd?
    Speak, Canzone! for me.--The Fair One said who guides
 My willing heart, and all my Fancy's flights,
 "This is the language in which Love delights."      15
 
                         IV
                To Charles Diodati.
 
 Charles--and I say it wond'ring--thou must know
    That I who once assum'd a scornful air,
    And scoff'd at love, am fallen in his snare
    (Full many an upright man has fallen so)
 Yet think me not thus dazzled by the flow            5
    Of golden locks, or damask cheek; more rare
    The heart-felt beauties of my foreign fair;
    A mien majestic, with dark brows, that show
 The tranquil lustre of a lofty mind;
    Words exquisite, of idioms more than one,        10
    And song, whose fascinating pow'r might bind,
 And from her sphere draw down the lab'ring Moon,
    With such fire-darting eyes, that should I fill
    My ears with wax, she would enchant me still.
 
                         V.
 
 Lady! It cannot be, but that thine eyes
    Must be my sun, such radiance they display
    And strike me ev'n as Phoebus him, whose way
    Through torrid Libya's sandy desert lies.
 Meantime, on that side steamy vapours rise           5
    Where most I suffer. Of what kind are they,
    New as to me they are, I cannot say,
    But deem them, in the Lover's language--sighs.
 Some, though with pain, my bosom close conceals,
    Which, if in part escaping thence, they tend     10
    To soften thine, they coldness soon congeals.
 While others to my tearful eyes ascend,
    Whence my sad nights in show'rs are ever drown'd,
    'Till my Aurora comes, her brow with roses bound.
 
                         VI.1
 
 Enamour'd, artless, young, on foreign ground,
    Uncertain whither from myself to fly,
    To thee, dear Lady, with an humble sigh
    Let me devote my heart, which I have found
 By certain proofs not few, intrepid, sound,          5
    Good, and addicted to conceptions high:
    When tempests shake the world, and fire the sky,
    It rests in adamant self-wrapt around,
 As safe from envy, and from outrage rude,
    From hopes and fears, that vulgar minds abuse,   10
    As fond of genius, and fix'd fortitude,
 Of the resounding lyre, and every Muse.
    Weak you will find it in one only part,
    Now pierc'd by Love's immedicable dart.
 
 1 It has ever been thought difficult for an author to speak
 gracefully of himself, especially in commendation; but Milton,
 who was gifted with powers to overcome difficulties, of every
 kind, is eminently happy in this particular. He has spoken
 frequently of himself both in verse and prose, and he continually
 shows that he thought highly of his own endowments; but if he
 praises himself, he does it with that dignified frankness and
 simplicity of conscious truth, which renders even egotism
 respectable and delightful: whether he describes the fervent and
 tender emotions of his juvenile fancy, or delineates his situation
 in the decline of life, when he had to struggle with calamity
 and peril, the more insight he affords us into his own sentiments
 and feelings, the more reason we find both to love, and revere
 him.--W.C.
 
 
 
 
 
 Appendix: Cowper's translation of Andrew Marvell's "To Christina,
           Queen of Sweden," &c.
 
 To Christina, Queen of Sweden, with Cromwell's Picture.1
 
 Christina, maiden of heroic mien!
 Star of the North! of northern stars the queen!
 Behold, what wrinkles I have earn'd, and how
 The iron cask still chafes my vet'ran brow,
 While following fate's dark footsteps, I fulfill
 The dictates of a hardy people's will.
 But soften'd, in thy sight, my looks appear,
 Not to all Queens or Kings alike severe.
 
 1 Written on Cromwell's behalf, this poem was originally attr. to
 Milton, hence Cowper's inclusion of it. It has since been
 recognized as the work of Marvell.
 
 
 Appendix: Poems from the Latin Prose Works. Translated by various
           hands.
 
      Epigram From "Pro Populo Anglicano Defensio" (I650).
      Translated by Joseph Washington (I692).
 
      On Salmasius's "Hundreda."
 
 Who taught Salmasius, the French chatt'ring Pye,1
 To try at English, and "Hundreda"2 cry?
 The starving Rascal, flush'd with just a Hundred
 English Jacobusses,3 "Hundreda" blunder'd.
 An outlaw'd King's last stock.--a hundred more,
 Would make him pimp for th'Antichristian Whore;4
 And in Rome's praise employ his poison'd Breath,
 Who once threatn'd to stink the Pope to death.
 
 1 i.e. The Magpie.
 2 Salmasius attempted to do certain English words in his Latin.
   a "Hundred" was a division of an English shire.
 3 The Jacobus was a gold coin named for James I.
 4 Salmasius attacked the Pope in "De Primatu Papae" in I645.
 
      Epigrams from the "Defensio Secunda" (I654).
      Translated by Robert Fellowes (I878?).
 
      On Salmasius.
 
 Rejoice, ye herrings, and ye ocean fry,
 Who, in cold winter, shiver in the sea;
 The knight, Salmasius,1 pitying your hard lot,
 Bounteous intends your nakedness to clothe,
 And, lavish of his paper, is preparing
 Chartaceous jackets to invest you all,
 Jackets resplendent with his arms and fame,
 Exultingly parade the fishy mart,
 And sing his praise with checquered, livery,
 That well might serve to grace the letter'd store
 Of those who pick their noses and ne'er read.
 
 1 A play on "Salmon."
 
     [Lines Concerning Alexander More.]1
 
 O Pontia, teeming with More's Gallic seed,
 You have been Mor'd2 enough, and no More need.
 
 1 Wrongly attr. to Milton, who prefaced these lines with,
 "Ingenii, hoc distochon" [Some ingenious person wrote this
 distich]. Milton wrongly believed More to be the author of a libel
 against him.
 
 2 It is impossible to give a literally exact rendering of this. I
 have played upon the name as well as I could in English.--R.F.
 
 Appendix: Translation of a Letter to Thomas Young,
           Translated by Robert Fellows (I878?).
 
           To My Tutor, Thomas Young.
 
 Though I had determined, my excellent tutor, to write you an
 epistle in verse, yet I could not satisfy myself without
 sending also another in prose, for the emotions of my
 gratitude, which your services so justly inspire, are too
 expansive and too warm to be expressed in the confined limits
 of poetical metre; they demand the unconstrained freedom of
 prose, or rather the exuberant richness of Asiatic
 phraseology: thought it would far exceed my power accurately
 to describe how much I am obliged to you, even if I could
 drain dry all the sources of eloquence, or exhaust all the
 topics of discourse which Aristotle or the famed Parisian
 logician has collected. You complain with truth that my
 letters have been very few and very short; but I do not
 grieve at the omission of so pleasurable a duty, so much as I
 rejoice at having such a place in your regard as makes you
 anxious often to hear from me. I beseech you not to take it
 amiss, that I have not now written to you for more than three
 years; but with you usual benignity to impute it rather to
 circumstances than to inclination. For Heaven knows that I
 regard you as a parent, that I have always treated you with
 the utmost respect, and that I was unwilling to tease you
 with my compositions. And I was anxious that if my letters
 had nothing else to recommend them, they might be recommended
 by their rarity. And lastly, since the ardour of my regard
 makes me imagine that you are always present, that I hear
 your voice and contemplate your looks; and as thus... I charm
 away my grief by the illusion of your presence, I was afraid
 when I wrote to you the idea of your distant separation
 should forcibly rush upon my mind; and that the pain of your
 absence, which was almost soothed into quiescence, should
 revive and disperse the pleasurable dream. I long since
 received your desirable present of the Hebrew Bible. I wrote
 this at my lodgings in the city, not, as usual, surrounded by
 my books. If, therefore, there be anything in this letter
 which either fails to give pleasure, or which frustrates
 expectation, it shall be compensated by a more elaborate
 composition as soon as I return to the dwelling of the muses.1
           --London, March 26, I625.
 
 1 i.e. Cambridge.
 
 
 Appendix: Translations of the Italian Poems
           By George MacDonald (I876).
 
                         I.
 
 O lady fair, whose honoured name doth grace
    Green vale and noble ford of Rheno's stream--
    Of all worth void the man I surely deem
    Whom thy fair soul enamoureth not apace,
 When softly self-revealed in outer space             5
    By actions sweet with which thy will doth teem,
    And gifts--Love's bow and shafts in their esteem
    Who tend the flowers one day shall crown thy race.
 When thou dost lightsome talk or gladsome sing,--
    A power to draw the hill-trees, rooted hard--     10
    The doors of eyes and ears let that man keep,
 Who knows himself unworthy thy regard.
    Grace from above alone him help can bring,
    That passion in his heart strike not too deep.
 
                         II.
 
 As in the twilight brown, on hillside bare,
    Useth to go the little shepherd maid,
    Watering some strange fair plant, poorly displaced,
    Not thriving in unwonted soil and air,
 Far from its native springtime's genial care;        5
    So on my ready tongue hath Love assayed
    Of a strange speech to wake new flower and blade,
    While I of thee, in scorn so debonair,
 Sing songs whose sense is to my people lost-
    Yield the fair Thames, and the fair Arno gain.    10
    Love willed it so, and I, at others' cost,
 Already knew Love never willed in vain.
    Ill would slow mind, hard heart reward the toil
    Of him who plants from heaven so good a soil,
 
                         III.
                       Canzone.
 
 Ladies, and youths that in their favour bask,
 With mocking smiles come round me: Prithee, why,
 Why dost thou with an unknown language cope,
 Love-riming? Whence the courage for the task?
 Tell us--so never frustrate be thy hope,             5
 And the best thoughts still to thy thinking fly!
 Thus mocking they: Thee other streams, they cry,
 Thee other shores, another sea demands,
 Upon whose verdant strands
 Are budding, every moment, for thy hair,             10
 Immortal guerdon, leaves that will not die;
 An over-burden on thy back why bear?--
    Song,1 I will tell thee; thou for me reply:
 My lady saith-and her word is my heart--
 This is Love's mother-tongue, and fits his part.     15
 
 1 Ital. "Canzone."
 
                         IV.
                To Charles Diodati.
 
 Diodati--and I muse to tell the tale--
    This stubborn I, that Love was wont despise,
    And made a laughter of his snares, unwise,
    Am fallen, where honest feet will sometimes fail.
 Not golden tresses, not a cheek vermeil,             5
    Bewitched me thus; but, in a new-world guise,
    A beauty that the heart beatifies;
    A mien where high-souled modesty I hail;
 Eyes softly splendent with a darkness dear;
    A speech that more than one tongue vassal hath;   10
    A voice that in the middle hemisphere
 Might make the tired moon wander from her path;
    While from her eyes such potent flashes shoot,
    That to stop hard my ears would little boot.
 
                         V.
 
 Truly,1 my lady sweet, your blessed eyes--
    It cannot be but that they are my sun;
    As strong they smite me as he smites upon
    The man whose way o'er Libyan desert lies,
 The while a vapour hot doth me surprise,             5
    From that side springing where my pain doth won;
    Perchance accustomed lovers--I am none,
    And know not--in their speech call such things sighs;
 A part shut in, itself, sore vexed, conceals,
    And shakes my bosom; part, undisciplined,         10
    Breaks forth, and all about in ice congeals;
 But that which to mine eyes the way doth find,
    Makes all my nights in silent showers abound,
    Until my Dawn2 returns, with roses crowned.
 
 1 Correcting MacDonald's "Certes" (Ital. "Per Certo").
 2 [Ital.] "Alba"-I suspect a hint at the lady's name.-G.M.
 
                         VI.
 
 A modest youth, in love a simpleton,
    When to escape myself I seek and shift,
    Lady, I of my heart the humble gift
    Vow unto thee. In trials many a one,
 True, brave, it has been, firm to things begun,      5
    By gracious, prudent, worthy thoughts uplift.
    When roars the great world, in the thunder-rift,
    Its own self, armour adamant, it will don,
 From chance and envy as securely barred,
    From hopes and fears that still the crowd abuse,  10
    As inward gifts and high worth coveting,
 And the resounding lyre, and every Muse.
    There only wilt thou find it not so hard
    Where Love hath fixed his ever cureless sting.
 
 
 
